Authors
Bob Bloom
Number of Reviews
265

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)

"The Sixth Sense" (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Bruce Willis, Haley
Joel Osment and Toni Collette. Written and directed by M. Night Shyamalan.
 Some movies require patience and a modicum of faith from the viewer.
You can sit for an hour or more asking yourself, "Where is this movie
going?" or "When is something going to happen?"
 Then the last reel unspools, a light goes off in your head and, like a
jigsaw puzzle, everything comes together.
 That is how you should approach "The Sixth Sense." This supernatural
thriller requires careful attention. If you pick up on the nuances, then
you will find this a most satisfying feature. If you're the type that needs
to be walloped over the head with a sledgehammer, then I suggest you go see
"Deep Blue Sea" or "Brokedown Palace."
 "The Sixth Sense" is a chiller for serious moviegoers, those who pay close
attention to everything that happens on screen.
 Writer-director M. Night Shyamalan, with the aid of cinematographer Tak
Fujimoto, creates an aura of uneasiness. The movie has an almost surreal
quality to it. You know something is not quite right, but you can't put
your finger on what it is until the denouncement.
 An eerie score by John Newton Howard helps to heighten the suspense.
Actually, "The Sixth Sense" is a movie in which - dramatically - not much
really happens, yet paradoxically, events are transpiring constantly.
 Bruce Willis plays renowned child psychologist Dr. Malcolm Crowe who comes
to the aid of Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment). The boy harbors a dark secret,
he is continually visited by ghosts. Everywhere he looks, he sees them.
 At 8, Cole is too frightened and confused by his paranormal gift to
understand its meaning.
 Cole and Crowe work together to uncover the truth and explain the
unexplainable. For Crowe, saving Cole would be redemption because of his
guilt for not being able to help an earlier patient.
 Shyamalan elicits a complex and tortured performance from young Osment.
The young man deserves a supporting actor Oscar nod for his portrayal of a
little boy overwhelmed by circumstances he can't even comprehend.
 Willis is low-key, speaking in mostly whispers as the anguished Dr. Crowe,
who is trying - by helping Cole - to put his life back together.
 Toni Collette, who made quite an impression a few years ago in "Muriel's
Wedding," is  confused and vulnerable as Cole's mother. She tries to be
supportive and loving, while being totally mystified by what is troubling
her son.
 "The Sixth Sense" is like a slow carriage ride around the park. You have
the time to take in all the sights, sounds and smells.
 It, along with "The Blair Witch Project," emphasize that you don't need
bloody special effects to create an atmosphere of horror or terror. As
always, the mind is the biggest bogeyman of all.
 So, savor "The Sixth Sense," like a fine glass of expensive wine. It is a
movie that demands you attention and will earn your respect.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Great Expectations (1998)
 Great Expectations (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Ethan Hawke,
Gwyenth Paltrow, Robert De Niro and Anne Bancroft.
 What sets a classic above the rest is its timelessness and universality.
 No matter how you bend or twist it, its themes transcend age and culture.
 Screenwriter Mitch Glazer's loose adaptation of the Charles Dickens novel
transports the tale of a poor orphan boy's rise to riches from 19th-century
England to contemporary Gulf Coast Florida and New York City.
 Glazer simplifies Dickens' complex tale, jettisoning some characters and
subplots, while retaining the essence of the story.
 Director Alfonso Cuaron, Glazer and cinematographer Emmanuel Lubezki have
given the picture a fairy tale-like look, painting scenes - literally and
figuratively - in broad strokes.
 The once-majestic mansion of Miss Dinsmoor (the modern Miss Haversham) is
a colorful collage of decay and neglect.
 Dinsmoor herself, a courageous, eccentric interpretation by Anne Bancroft,
mirrors her surroundings. Her clothes look as though they were shoveled
upon her, while her garish makeup gives her the appearance of a walking
cadaver.
 Contrasting the outrageousness of Bancroft's performance is the intense,
smoldering interplay between Ethan Hawke's Pip (now called Finn) and
Gwyneth Paltrow's Estella.
 When onscreen together, the two exude sensuality. Paltrow's feline air,
her ice-princess persona as Estella is a fine counterpoint to Hawke's
passionate, but somewhat innocent, Finn.
 Paltrow's remoteness makes her a fitting Muse for Hawke's budding artist.
 Their love scenes, a Glazer addition definitely not found in Dickens, are
erotic and shimmering.
 Helping the story along are the two young actors who portray Finn and
Estella as youngsters. Jeremy James Kissner and Raquel Beaudene are dead
ringers for their older counterparts.
 Robert De Niro adds an air of menace as the escaped convict who turns
Finn's life around, while Chris Cooper brings a decency and humanity to the
role of Joe, Finn's uncle.
 Purists may complain about Glazer's treatment, but, overall, this Great
Expectations should hold the interest of young viewers and, perhaps,
rekindle an interest in one of Dickens' better works.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
Hurlyburly" (1998) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Sean Penn, Robin Wright
Penn, Kevin Spacey, Garry Shandling, Chazz Palminteri, Meg Ryan and Anna
Paquin.
 I was taught if you can't say anything nice about something, keep your
mouth shut.
 But that would be doing a disservice to anyone who is thinking of seeing
this sorry excuse for a motion picture.
 On stage, David Rabe's play may be fascinating, but as a film "Hurlyburly"
is an excruiating two hours of self-absorbed narcissists doing nothing but
whining, crying, cursing and babbling about life, drugs, sex, money and
friendship.
 It's all pretentious nonsense as these Hollywood losers snort cocaine,
drink, screw and continually blab about nothing. This movie makes an
episode of "Seinfeld" look like Chekov.
 Even though it is fascinating watching Sean Penn seem to self-destruct,
his brave performance (which he had done earlier on stage) cannot save this
tiresome tirade of banalities.
 Never has such a fine cast, which includes Kevin Spacey, Robin Wright
Penn, Chazz Palminteri, Garry Shandling and Anna Paquin, been forced to try
to do so much with so little.
 Even the stunt casting of Meg Ryan as a hooker cannot keep this leaden
vehicle afloat.
 Some will say that I'm a cretin because David Rabe is one of our finest
playwrights. Perhaps. But if being a cretin means applauding "Hurlyburly,"
then just consider me an uneducated lout who cannot appreciate high art.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)

 Runaway Bride (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Julia Roberts, Richard
Gere and Joan Cusack. Directed by Garry Marshall.
 "Runaway Bride" is nothing more than a cynical device to reteam Julia
Roberts and Richard Gere and capitalize on the magic they created a decade
ago with "Pretty Woman."
 "Runaway Bride" is so contrived, so phony, that only the star power of
Roberts and Gere manage to make it salvageable.
 The story is preposterous, totally fluff. A young woman, Maggie (Roberts),
continually leaves men at the altar. A columnist for "USA Today" (Gere)
takes her to task and, because his column contained some inaccuracies, he
is fired.
 Gere's Ike then finagles a free-lance assignment to travel to Maggie's
rural Maryland town and dig up some dirt on her by checking with residents
who will talk with him, including the skittish bride, as well as her jilted
grooms.
 The movie is rather tame. The premise has all the makings of one of those
classic screwball comedies from the 1930s. Irene Dunne, Barbara Stanwyck or
Jean Arthur would have been perfect for the bride, while Henry Fonda, Jimmy
Cagney or Jimmy Stewart would have fit snugly into the columnist's shoes.
 Unfortunately, the "Runaway Bride" script does not utilize the outlandish
possibilities of the situation to its comic potential. It tries to be more
romance than comedy, and is too tame, too sedate.
 Which is too bad, since it has the prime ingredient needed for a
successful screwball comedy recipe - a cast of strong supporting actors.
But director Garry Marshall doesn't seem to take advantage of many of these
performers - except for the incomparable Joan Cusack as Maggie's best
friend.
 Cusack is a treasure, a talented performer who adds luster to any film in
which she appears. She was the bright spot in the disappointing "Arlington
Road," and here she helps elevate the humor above what seems indicated in
the script.
 Gere and Roberts are magical. The chemistry between them is still there.
Yet it seems like such wasted potential because everything seems so
predictable, so by-the-numbers.
 True, the movie offers several laughs, but it seems "Runaway Bride" has to
strain for them instead of allowing them to flow naturally.
 "Runaway Bride" is a pastiche, a movie that seems cobbled together from
bits and pieces of other works. Fans of Roberts and Gere probably will
enjoy it - but even they are not enough to sustain this weighted effort.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Snow Falling on Cedars (1999)
Snow Falling on Cedars (1999) 1 star out of 4. Starring Ethan Hawke,
Youki Kudo, Sam Shepard and Max Von Sydow. Written by Ron Bass and Scott
Hicks. Directed by Hicks.
 "Snow Falling on Cedars" is a languid character study propped up by
fine cinematography and beautiful scenery.
 Unfortunately, that is not enough to sustain this snail-paced feature.
 The movie's biggest flaw is one common to most Hollywood films that
deal with people of other cultures - it approaches situations from a
white, Western perspective.
 Set in post-World War II Washington state, the crux of the story is the
murder trial of a Japanese-American fisherman and the prejudice it
arouses.
 The film's hero is a newspaper reporter who has a personal stake in the
case because the wife of the accused is his childhood sweetheart. And
while she has moved on, he still carries a torch for her.
 "Snow Falling on Cedars" lacks passion and fire. It is as cold as the
frigid landscape that director Scott Hicks continually enjoys
intercutting throughout the drama.
 It doesn't help that the hero, Ishmael Chambers, is portrayed by Ethan
Hawke as a sad-faced piner who seems to be daydreaming throughout the
entire proceedings. 
 How he finally solves the mystery seems a mystery, since it appears he
hasn't been paying attention to anything that has been going on in the
courtroom.
 The feature is really two stories - a murder mystery and a love story.
Where they intersect is at the character of Hatsue Miyamoto (Youki
Kudoh).
 As children, Hatsue and Ishmael were in love. Then the war came along,
and Hatsue and her family were carted off to an internment camp.
 Returning after the war, Ishmael finds that Hatsue has married, while
Hatsue and her family find they have been cheated out of the land they
were promised would be held for them by a kindly neighbor.
 Despite what sounds like an intriguing story, "Snow Fall on Cedars" is
dull, with a limpid payoff.
 The fault lies in the script, adapted by Oscar-winner Ron Bass ("Rain
Man") and Hicks from the novel by David Guterson, which fails to bring
any of the characters to life. They all seem so subdued, so lifeless.
 And Hicks' direction isn't any help. It lacks speed and pace. It just
drifts like a ship lost in a fog. It is dark and dank.
 Hicks' intention may have been to allow us to get to know his
characters, but none of them have much meat, so we have nothing to chew
on.
 For example, it is almost three-quarters of the way through the movie
before you realize that Ishmael lost an arm fighting in Europe during
the war. 
 The movie only comes alive during its courtroom sequence, which
features a rousing portrayal by Max Von Sydow as the wily, elderly
defense lawyer.
 In the small roll of Ishmael's father, Sam Shepard is dignified, a bit
fiery and compassionate.
 "Snow Falling on Cedars" was supposed to be a movie that would melt
your heart. Instead its lack of spirit, of moral outrage, leaves you
cold.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Girlfight (2000)
 GIRLFIGHT (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Michelle Rodriguez,
Paul Calderon, Santiago Douglas,  Ray Santiago and Jaime Tirelli.
Written and directed by Karyn Kusama. Rated R
 Her name is Diana Guzman. She's a high-school senior with a chip on her
shoulder.
 Life has not been kind to Diana. Her mother is dead. She lives in the
projects of Brooklyn with her father and brother.
 Her father ignores her, lavishing money for boxing lessons on her
brother, Tiny, who would rather be an artist.
 But then, Diana decides that boxing is a way to express her anger, her
frustration, and she convinces Hector, Tiny's coach, to secretly train
her.
 This is the simple plot for "Girlfight," an impressive feature film
debut by writer-director Karyn Kusama as well as for its star, Michelle
Rodriguez.
 You may think, ah, a female "Rocky." But, sorry. "Girlfight" does not
offer the same uplifting kind of ending as Sylvester Stallone's classic,
even though it does end on a positive note.
 What "Girlfight" does, is trace the growth - spiritual and physical -
of Diana, as she learns to come to terms with herself and the world
around her.
 For Diana, boxing is a form of self-expression. It is her arena for
gathering her self-respect.
 Kusama's film is no feminist essay on the inequities of sports.
Girlfight is about people, not politics.
 As Diana, Rodriguez is lovely and volatile. She is not a classic
beauty. Hers is a tough, urban loveliness. Rodriguez, for a newcomer, is
able to mix smoldering danger with an appealing vulnerability.
 She boxes, not to make a statement, but simply because she likes it. To
her, it's a way to be noticed, which she isn't at home.
 The most powerful scene in the film comes when Diana confronts her
father, Sandro (Paul Calderon), who threatens to beat her. Unable to
hold back, Diana vents years of frustration on her unsuspecting parent
with near fatal results.
 "Girlfight" also is a love story, as Diana is attracted to Adrian
(Santiago Douglas), a fellow boxer. It is one of Kusama's in-jokes that
she names this character after Rocky's love interest.
 The bittersweet romance that grows between Diana and Adrian is
threatened by events in the gym and ring, but the two youths are able to
confront their differences.
 Like most first-time independent films, "Girlfight" has some rough
edges. It is a bit slow in a couple of spots. Yet Kusama's direction and
Rodriguez's charisma overcome any flaws.
 "Girlfight" is a tough, touching movie, introducing a filmmaker and
actress who should have an impact on the industry for years to come.
 Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@ journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Datatbase
at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
 The Insider (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Russell Crowe, Al Pacino
and Christopher Plummer. Written by Michael Mann and Eric Roth. Directed by
Mann.
 I have a problem with movies based on fact that offer disclaimers saying
parts of the story are fictitious dramatizations of actual events.
 Which parts? What should I believe and what should I consider as a
screenwriter's fertile imagination?
 These questions gnaw at me as I reflect on "The Insider," a suspenseful
drama about a tobacco executive who blew the whistle on the industry,
revealing its dirty big secret - that its executives always have been aware
that the nicotine in their cigarettes is addictive.
 But "The Insider" is so much more. It's a story of courage, idealism, ego
and corporate cowardice.
 It is understandable why CBS officials are criticizing the movie. The
network, specifically "60 Minutes" creator Don Hewitt, are portrayed as
waffling individuals, caving in to the corporate lawyers who call the
behind-the-scene shots.
 As a whole, lawyers come off very poorly here, whether representing CBS or
the tobacco interests. "The Insider" could spark a renaissance in lawyer
jokes.
 Another institution receiving an unflattering portrayal is 60 Minutes
newsman Mike Wallace (Christopher Plummer), who is conceived as
egotistical, pompous and self-serving.
 The hero of "The Insider" is Dr. Jeffrey Wigand (Russell Crowe), the
former Brown & Williamson vice president who went public.
 Wigand, like all true heroes, is a conflicted and flawed individual. He
weighs doing what he knows is right against an uncertain future. Wigand
risks the financial security of his family by violating the confidentiality
agreement he signed upon his termination.
 It is Wigand who first approaches - anonymously - Lowell Bergman (Al
Pacino), a producer for 60 Minutes, by sending him a packet of data
concerning the tobacco industry.
 It is mesmerizing to watch the cat-and-mouse game played by Wigand and
Bergman. Wigand wants to unburden himself, yet he remains reticent around
Bergman, continually questioning his motives. He pushes Bergman away while
simultaneously enticing him with hints about what he knows.
 At the same time, Wigand begins to receive threats. The phone rings at odd
hours, but no one is on the other end. He finds a bullet in his mail box
and believes he is under surveillance. Is this real or paranoia? "The
Insider" proffers the perspective that, yes, the tobacco interests are
keeping an eye on this former top official and are using coercion to force
him to maintain his silence.
 But you never know for sure. The FBI believes Wigand himself placed the
bullet in his mail box. So, who to believe?
 "The Insider" changes focus once Wigand goes public and films his "60
Minutes" interview with Wallace.
 Director Michael Mann, who co-wrote the screenplay with Eric Roth (adapted
screenplay Oscar-winner for "Forrest Gump"), begins to concentrate on the
infighting at CBS over the airing of the Wigand piece.
 And while all this behind-the-scenes activity is interesting, it lacks the
human drama of Wigand's dilemma.
 Wigand, reduced to teaching chemistry at a high school in Kentucky,
becomes the focus of a smear campaign contrived by the tobacco interests.
His past is combed, and he is accused of being a wife beater, an alcoholic
and a crook.
 But instead of concentrating on Wigand's situation, we watch the raging
debate between the CBS news people and its corporate lawyers over airing
the Wigand interview. It ends with Bergman being overruled and an alternate
version of the segment aired minus Wigand's testimony.
 The last section of "The Insider" focuses on Bergman's attempts to
exonerate Wigand and get his "60 Minutes" segment aired.
 "The Insider" is compelling and very interesting. Despite the big issues,
Mann has created a very intimate film. Much of it is shot in close-up -
with generous dollops of extreme close-ups so we are forced to become
intimate with the characters.
 Crowe is superb as Wigand. Wisely, he does not make his crusader a knight
in shining armor. Crowe re-creates an individual coping with extraordinary
circumstances. He doesn't hide Wigand's drinking, his vanity, his emotional
confusion. Crowe's eyes show a man trapped under a spotlight he wishes to
avoid.
 Crowe's Wigand is a decent man doing what is right while at the same time
regretting his actions.
 Pacino's Bergman is the idealist, a former radical journalist hired by "60
Minutes" to uncover the big lies and air the hard-hitting stories. Bergman
continually says he is a man of his word who has never betrayed a source.
 But Bergman also is a seducer. He knows what to say to Wigand and how to
say it. He plays Jiminy Cricket to Wigand, telling him it's his duty to
humanity to go public.
 Pacino recently, in films such as "The Devil's Advocate," has a tendency
to be very broad. In "The Insider" he is a bit restrained but does have
some moments of theatricality in which he is more Pacino than Bergman.
 If Crowe has inhabited Wigand, then Pacino has merely scouted out Bergman.
Plummer is smooth as Mike Wallace. The real Wallace, of course, has taken
umbrage with this portrayal of himself as a man concerned more with his
legacy than with revealing the truth. Plummer's Wallace seems to go with
the flow. He appears as adept at office politics as he does at interviewing
a terrorist or a whistleblower.
 In the end, of course, the original "60 Minutes" interview with Wigand is
aired. History - still being written - tells us what havoc this has created
within the tobacco industry.
 But is "The Insider" history? It's high docu-drama wrapped around a
skeleton of facts. It's fascinating and holds your attention for its entire
two hours and 38 minutes. But as you watch, you have to cipher history from
Hollywood. Does it make a difference? Will it affect the movie's impact? In
the short term, no. But 20, 30 or 40 years from now, who can tell?
 Today, when people think of the Apollo 13 mission, do they picture Jim
Lovell or Tom Hanks?
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
 Remember the Titalns (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Denzel
Washington, Will Patton, Wood Harris and  Ryan Hurst. Written by Gregory
Allen Howard. Directed by Boaz Yakin.
 Any football coach with a lick of smarts should take his team - en
masse - to see "Remember the Titans."
 Not because it is a great movie -  it is very good, despite its usual
quota of sports clichés - but because it is a film that amply displays
how a team is forged and how the concept of team can overcome even the
most hardened social structures and ideologies.
 Alexandria, Va., 1971. The last vestiges of segregation are dying as
the school district is finally integrated.
At T.C. Williams High School football coach Bill Yoast (Will Patton) has
a new assistant coach, Herman Boone (Denzel Washington), a black man
with years of coaching experience in South Carolina.
 Later, in a political move to appease the black community, Yoast is
demoted and Boone is named head coach, but with a codicil: His team
cannot lose one game or he will be fired.
 This situation causes tension and animosity not only among the coaching
staff, but among the players.
Boone, though, is determined to fight through these obstacles. He
surprises the black players by refusing to show them preferential
treatment. Nor will he brook any insubordination from the white players
or his assistant coaches.
 His message is simple and direct: The only colors on the football field
are those on the Titan uniform.
 He is first tested when his players board buses to ride to practice.
The white players get on one bus, blacks on another. Boone makes
everyone disembark and the buses are designated for offense and
defensive players, no matter what that player's color.
 Washington creates a towering figure in Boone. He never allows his
guard to fall, always appearing in control, self-confident, unswaying,
single-minded and ferocious in his commitment to forge one cohesive unit
from his diverse group of young men.
 And Washington accomplishes this feat without being flashy or showy. He
is steel, an uncompromising locomotive steaming over all who get in his
way, including his assistants.
 Washington's Boone is a bully, a tyrant, driving his players to the
point where they focus all their thoughts on him, forgetting their
differences and uniting in self protection.
W
 orking uneasily at first Boone and Yoast mold these young men into a
dynamic, winning team, triumphing over the town's prejudice and the
intolerance of many of the people around them.
 Patton's Yoast is a less flashy character than Washington's Boone. But
in his quiet way, he is as strong as Boone, seeing what the coach is
trying to accomplish and helping him along without calling attention to
himself.
 Patton's performance is something that should be studied by acting
students. He serves the purpose of the supporting character, which is to
advance the story without hogging the spotlight from the film's nominal
star. In this Patton succeeds wonderfully, and he deserves a best
supporting actor Oscar nomination if not the statue itself for his
portrayal.
 Two young actors also deserve recognition: Wood Harris as Julius
Campbell, leader of the black players, and Ryan Hurst as Gerry Bertier,
the Titans' captain. Like their elders these two begin their
relationship under a cloud of distrust and suspicion.
 But they rise above their preconceived biases, forging an alliance that
puts team ahead of any personal glory.
  "Remember the Titans" is a moving, heartfelt drama. It is masterful,
packed with emotion and some humor. It is an inspiring movie that should
not be missed.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
  Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Replacements, The (2000)

 The Replacements (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Keanu Reeves,
Gene Hackman, Orlando Jones, Jon Favreau, Brooke Langton and Rhys Ifans.
Written by Vince McKewin. Directed by Howard Deutch. Rated PG-13.
 "The Replacements" is a difficult movie to dislike because its theme is
one close to the hearts of all of us: Fulfilling a dream, getting a
second chance.
 And tackling that theme hard and clean would have made for a very fine
feature.
 Instead, the brains behind "The Replacements" fumbled the ball, giving
us a mish-mash of comedy, male bonding, class strife and cheerleaders.
 The trouble with "The Replacements" is that you have mixed feelings for
these players. On one hand they're scabs. Of course the athletes they
are replacing are spoiled, overpaid dolts who complain that once they
give their commissions to their lawyers and agents or make the monthly
payment on their souped-up sports car, there's hardly anything left to
live on.
 But on the other hand, these replacement players are guys looking for
that elusive moment of glory, which is something we all can identify
with.
 So, from the outset your emotions are torn, which makes it difficult to
wholly root for former college quarterback standout Shane Falco (Keanu
Reeves) and his new teammates, thrown together by newly hired coach
Jimmy McGinty (Gene Hackman).
 Why the owner of the Washington Sentinels was forced to hire a new
coach just because his players went on strike is never really explained.
And that is one of the movie's many oversights and distractions.
 One of the others are the players who comprise Falco's teammates. They
are not really individuals, they are archetypes: a psycho SWAT team
member; a mini-market janitor with great speed and bad hands; two big,
black brothers who are former rock-star bodyguards; an ex-sumo wrestler;
a deaf athlete; and a Bible spouting wide receiver.
 All are played for comic relief and all are very cartoonish in
character. The idea that they can jell as a team within a week is
ludicrous and totally unbelievable.
 Nor does Vince McKewin's script do Reeves any favors. You never get a
clear focus on his character. He lacks that special spark that a
successful quarterback must have to lead and inspire. He's too laid
back, too quiet, too Keanu.
 And director Howard Deutch doesn't help matters much, wasting a lot of
footage showing fan reactions as well as the Sentinel cheerleaders
gyrating through their monotonous routines.
 I suspect Deutch was trying to pull a cinematic end run by shifting
attention from his weak script.
 What "The Replacements" needed was someone to intercept the script
somewhere between the time it was greenlighted and filming began.
Unfortunately, someone dropped the ball on this one.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
    Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Hollow Man (2000)

 Hollow Man (2000) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Kevin Bacon, Elisabeth
Shue, Josh Brolin, Kim Dickens, Greg Grunberg, Joey Slotnick,  Mary
Randle and William Devane. Screenplay by Andrew W. Marlowe. Story by
Gary Scott Thompson and Andrew W. Marlowe. Music by Jerry Goldsmith.
Directed by Paul Verhoeven. Rated R.
 "Hollow Man" is as empty as its name implies.
 This cynical updating of "The Invisible Man" is turgid and
preposterous.
 From the outset, director Paul Verhoeven sets a nasty tone by showing
the  gruesome demise of a lab rat.
 Things merely go downhill from that memorable moment.
 Kevin Bacon stars as hot-shot young scientist Sebastian Caine who has
been working on a top-secret Pentagon-funded project to turn people
invisible.
 So far, his experiments have worked on animals, but now comes the time
to test it on humans.
So Caine, who is an obnoxious, self-centered and selfish genius,
nominates himself as the test subject.
 And, being the brilliant scientist he is, the first thing he does when
he fades out is to go around scaring women and making sexual advances.
 In other words, director Verhoeven merely is content to tap into the
adolescent fantasies experienced by every 16-year-old who pondered the
advantages of invisibility.
 It's sick, disgusting and shameless, but what else can you expect from
the man who brought the world Showgirls.
 At the outset, it is obvious that Bacon is a few cards short of a full
deck, so why do his colleagues, whom seem to have more sense, allow him
to inject himself? Simple, to move the plot - if you want to label it as
such - along.
 Elisabeth Shue and Josh Brolin play Bacon's main assistants. She, of
course, is his former lover, giving him another reason to go bonkers
when he discovers that she is now carrying on with Brolin.
 You think of any mad scientist-invisible man cliché, and Verhoeven is
shameless enough to exploit it.
 The movie is not helped by an overwrought and bombastic cacophony of
music, cobbled together by Jerry Goldsmith, who has done much better
work in his career.
 "Hollow Man's" only positive is its eye-popping special effects, which
are stunning in their anatomical grossness.
 Unlike the Universal "Invisible Man" films of the 1930s and '40s,
people just don't fade away to nothing in Verhoeven's world. They
disappear bit by bit, and every vein, artery and organ is put on
display.
 "Hollow Man" is a travesty, a sick and twisted vehicle unworthy of the
talents of such fine performers as Bacon and Shue.
 Bacon has a lot of fun hamming it up (sorry, I couldn't resist), which
is probably the only reason he took on the role.
 Otherwise, this is one science fiction movie that could go straight to
"Mystery Science Theatre 3000," if it was still airing.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found at the Internet Movie Database Web site
at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)

 Dinosaur (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Featuring the vocal talents of
D.B. Sweeney, Ossie Davis, Alfre Woodard, Max Casella, Hayden Panettier,
Julianna Margulies, Joan Plowrightand Della Reese
 Disney's latest  creation, "Dinosaur," is a magical meld of digitally
enhanced live-action photography, special effects and computer animated
wonder.
 Though a bit ragged on the technical side, the film showcases a simple
story with a moral that the younger members of the audience can
understand and appreciate, plus some heroic and amusing characters with
whom they can relate.
 The story is reminiscent of the animated "Land Before Time" of several
years ago: A group of dinosaurs seek a legendary verdant valley
containing enough food and water to sustain them.
 "Dinosaur" follows the adventures of an Iguanodon named Aladar (voiced
by D.B. Sweeney) who is separated from his own species as a hatchling
and adopted by a tribe of Lemurs.
 Years later, a catastrophic event forces the family to flee and join up
with a herd of dinosaurs searching for a safe nesting ground.
 In a sense, the movie is anti-Darwinian. Its message that survival of
the fittest is a brutal misconception, while standing together and
cooperation - the mighty protecting the weak - makes for a more viable
and stronger community, is a lesson the children will easily grasp.
 Moreso than the special effects, it is the characters who drive
"Dinosaur."
 Besides Aladar, there is his Lemur parents, Yar (Ossie Davis) and Plio
(Alfre Woodard); his best pal, Zini (Max Casella); sister, Suri (Hayden
Panettiere); and the friends they make on the trek, Neera (Julianna
Margulies), another Iguanodon; Baylene (Joan Plowright), an elderly,
dignified Brachiosuar; and Eema (Della Reese), a gruff, but lovable
Styrachosaur.
 The movie's real stars, though, are the various technicians who
recreated the world of 65 million years ago. Though the effects are
sometimes dark and murky, the Disney team has created such
fully-developed creatures, plus some beautiful vistas that you tend to
gloss over the rough spots.
 Aided by a rousing score by James Newton Howard, which contains echoes
of a previous Disney winner, "The Lion King," "Dinosaur" is a movie that
will engross the younger set.
 One concession I really appreciated is that none of the dinosaurs nor
Lemurs break into song and dance. That would have been a bit too much,
even for an animated feature.
 Though it contains some violence, "Dinosaur" is basically a
good-hearted saga, and at a little under 90 minutes, it will hold the
attention of the youngest viewer.
 "Dinosaur" is basically a family movie. Adults will find it simplistic,
but they will enjoy it if they see it with their children. And an
entertaining movie with a moral is always a good bet for a family
outing.
 "Dinosaur" is not as colorful as "Tarzan," nor does it pack the
emotional wallop of "The Lion King, "but it does provide breathtaking
scenery, the latest in special effects and lovable characters.
 You can't lose with this combination.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
  Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, are posted on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)

 "Man on the Moon" (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Jim Carrey, Courtney
Love and Danny DeVito. Directed by Milos Forman.
 "Man on the Moon" opens in black and white with Jim Carrey in character as
Andy Kaufman talking directly to the camera.
 Go home, he tells audience. This is a bad movie. Actually, he adds, it was
a bad movie until he got hold of it and cut out all the bad parts. This, he
says, is all that is left. Then the end credits begin to roll.
 Oh, that "Man on the Moon" had been as inventive as its opening.
 For those who knew the comedy of Andy Kaufman, "Man on the Moon" may be a
disappointment. Those who are not familiar with the late comedian, may
wonder, so what? What's the big deal?
 In truth, "Man on the Moon," directed by Milos Forman, brings no new
insights about Kaufman to light. You can learn just as much by watching the
pair of documentaries about the comedian that are continually rerun on
Comedy Central.
 And that is too bad. Kaufman was a unique comedian, a man who challenged
his audiences, tested their limits, pushed them to the edge - and then
sometimes shoved them over.
 Like "Chaplin" of a few years ago, "Man on the Moon" presents the story of
a comic genius, but fails to show the genesis of the spark that set the man
apart from others.
 And like "Chaplin," "Man on the Moon" is more of a highlights-greatest
hits narrative rather than an examination of the man himself and of what
drove him.
 After the rather intriguing opening, the movie flashes back to Kaufman's
childhood where he is seen playing alone in his room, making believe he's
on television and performing to his wall, which he imagines as his audience.
 His father comes into the room and tries to get Andy to go outside and
play normal games with the other kids. He also explains to Andy that to
really perform, you need an audience.
 Well, flash forward several years and there's Andy on the stage at a
comedy club bombing big time. After some friendly advice from the club
owner, Andy comes back with his Foreign Man character as well as his Elvis
impersonation and before you can say, Judd Hirsch, he has an agent and a
featured role on a new sitcom called "Taxi."
 The movie's main conflict revolves around Kaufman's philosophy of
performing. He does not consider himself a comedian. He sees himself as an
old-fashioned song-and-dance man.
 He enjoys playing with the audience's mind, fouling up their expectations.
 Of course, as in any good bio-pic, he is met with skepticism and
opposition until he finally gains popularity.
 "Man on the Moon" seems to race through Kaufman's life. He goes from
"Taxi" to concerts, and then into his infamous wrestling phase, which
features his "feud" with pro wrestler Jerry Lawler (who plays himself).
 A lot about Kaufman is left unexplained and unexplored. For example, Bob
Zemuda, Kaufman's creative partner is introduced in a scene backstage at a
nightclub where Kaufman, as overly obnoxious Vegas lounge singer Tony
Clifton, has just humiliated Zemuda, posing as a customer. The two are
gleeful that their gag has succeeded beyond expectations.
 Yet, nowhere do we learn where Kaufman and Zemuda met, nor how they
decided to work together.
 Like Athena from Zeus's head, it seems the pair merely sprung into being
fully grown and fully developed. Plus, since Zemuda is listed as one of the
movie's producers, did he or could he have exaggerated his contributions to
Kaufman's career.
 Carrey is eerie as Kaufman - the on-stage Andy at least - recreating some
of his most famous bits: the Mighty Mouse sing-along on the first "Saturday
Night Live," Clifton, Latka from "Taxi" and, of course, the obnoxious,
bad-guy intergender wrestling champion.
 Carrey's problem, though, is that when off-stage he continues to act like
Kaufman on stage; the hunched shoulders, big eyes. He fails to
differentiate between the public and private person.
 Carrey gives a wonderful impersonation, but a rather tepid performance.
Like Kaufman, he only comes alive when in front of an audience.
The supporting cast, which includes Danny DeVito as Kaufman's manager,
George Shapiro, and Courtney Love as Kaufman's fiance, are merely wasted.
They either act befuddled and exasperated by his actions or laughing and in
awe of his comic genius.
 "Man on the Moon" has been a movie much anticipated. Unfortunately,
especially for Kaufman fans, it is going to be a disappointing Christmas.
It's like expecting a Playstation and getting a pair of socks instead.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Rock Star (2001)
ROCK STAR (2001) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Mark Wahlberg, Jennifer Aniston,
Jason Flemying, Timothy Olyphant, Timothy Spall, Dominic West, Jeff Pilson and
Jason Bonham. Written by John Stockwell. Directed by Stephen Herek. Rated R. 
 Rock Star is a heavy metal fairy tale that despite striking some discordant
notes is overall enjoyable and likable. 
 Inspired by the true story of a singer in a tribute band who gets his chance to
join and front a famous rock group, Rock Star features Mark Wahlberg as Chris
Cole, lead singer for Blood Pollution, a Steel Dragon tribute band. Chris
idolizes Steel Dragon's lead singer, Bobby Beers, and knows everything about the
band, its history and members. For Chris, fronting Steel Dragon would be a dream
come true. 
 After being thrown out of Blood Pollution, Chris receives a phone call that
will fulfill his fantasy. Next thing he knows he and his girlfriend, Emily
(Jennifer Aniston), have been jetted to L.A. After a brief audition, Chris is
rechristened Izzy and is soon becoming the idol of millions. 
 Set in the mid-1980s, this rags-to-riches story has much to offer. Even if you
don't like heavy metal music, you will find Rock Star an entertaining outing
because while the music does play a major role in the proceedings, the story is
more about Chris's/Izzy's introduction into the perks and pitfalls of stardom.
 Chris begins his new life filled with wide-eyed innocence and enthusiasm. After
all, he is now the embodiment, the cipher of those millions of anonymous youths
who pay to see him perform and imagine themselves in his tight-leather pants. 
 As time passes, though, Chris learns the responsibilities of stardom are more
than just wailing to an enthusiastic audience. The grueling pace of the road,
the groupies, drugs, publicity shoots and all that the role encumbers soon
begins to wear on the young man. 
 Despite growing jaded, Chris/Izzy never loses his passion for the music. It is
only when Kirk (Dominic West), Steel Dragon's lead guitarist and spokesman,
rejects Chris's song ideas that the young singer understands his limited role
within the organization. Kirk explains to him that the band holds a specific
niche in the music world and any deviation would destroy that toehold. 
 John Stockwell's script is surprisingly low on cynicism, which is refreshing
considering all the fodder this particular territory could have afforded. And
while the script does cast a jaundiced eye at the practices and machinations of
the music industry, it is neither preachy nor judgmental. 
 Wahlberg offers a sincere, hard-working performance as Chris/Izzy. His
transformation from obsessive fan to naive innocent to disillusionment is
gradual and painful. Wahlberg does his own vocals, which were electronically
enhanced, but that should not detract from his first-rate effort. 
 Aniston's role is a bit underwritten as the loyal girlfriend watching the
corruption of her man, but unable to stem the tide. 
 A small, but memorable bit of acting is offered by Timothy Spall as Mats, Steel
Dragon's longtime road manager, who counsels Chris on the wild lifestyle of rock
stardom. 
 One of the film's best moments revolves around the confrontation between Bobby
Beers (Jason Flemyng) and his former bandmates, which echo an earlier scene
between Chris and his former group members. 
 Flemyng's short scene is touching and painful as he tells Chris of the
realities and responsibilities of being a member of a top rock group. 
 One of the funnier moments is a parking lot confrontation between two Steel
Dragon tribute bands, which leads to a war of words, costume critique and near
fisticuffs. 
 Helping the enterprise is the casting of members of various heavy metal bands
in pivotal roles. They include Zakk Wylde, lead guitarist for Black Label
Society and Dokken guitarist Jeff Pilson. 
 If Rock Star, ably directed by Stephen Herek (Mr. Holland's Opus, 101
Dalmatians) has a drawback, it is it's anti-climatic ending. 
 Rock Star is a fast and loud fable, filled with colorful characters and
ear-shattering music. It's a somewhat cautionary tale about wishes coming true
and about how those desires may not measure up to expectations. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found by going to www.jconline.com and clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
 Mighty Joe Young is not a good movie. It's an OK outing, that can't decide
whether it wants to be a cutsy kid's movie or a special effects outing for
adults.
 Therefore, it has a schizophrenic feel and fails to accomplish either mission.
 This updated remake of the 1949 adventure suffers in comparison.
 The original, with special effects by the legendary Willis O'Brien, always
has placed a distant second to O' Brien's other famous creation, King Kong.
Mighty Joe Young can be considered Kong's distant, gentle cousin.
 Like the original, this contemporary version begins in Africa. But times
have changed. So instead of a farmer-hunter, we have a Dian Fossey-like
anthropologist studying gorillas. When poachers attack the gorilla tribe
she is observing, she is killed as is the mother of Joe, a baby gorilla
befriended by the anthropologist's little daughter, Jill.
 Joe and Jill become inseparable, growing up in the deep jungle, where Jill
has taken her mother's place.
 Joe has grown to enormous height and weighs a ton, literally.
 Jill and Joe are lured to America by Bill Paxton's Greg O'Hara, who offers
the pair safety from the poachers out to capture or kill Joe.
 In Los Angeles, Joe becomes the star attraction at a nature preserve, but
things go awry and Joe is hunted as a menace.
 You know the rest. Joe becomes a hero, the bad guys are thwarted.
 It's all juvenile fun, by-the-numbers, you-fill-in-the-blanks filmmaking.
The actors, who also include very lovely Charlize Theron as Jill) give
adequate perfomances.
 Yet one must realize that the actors spent a lot of time emoting to thin
air, imagining where Joe would be a screen. It's not easy to perform like
that, so Theron and Paxton must be given some due for pulling it off.
 But it is Rick Baker's special effects who are the film's real stars. Joe
is a big ham, though not as corny nor as menacing as in the original.
 This big gorilla is really a teddy bear.
 Mighty Joe Young is predictable and factory-made filmmaking. It's an OK
way to while a way a couple of hours over the Christmas break.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)

 15 Minutes (2001). Starring Robert De Niro, Edward Burns, Kelsey
Grammer, Avery Brooks, Melina Kanakaredes, Karel Roden and Oleg
Taktarov. Written and directed by John Herzfeld. Rated R.
 Supposedly buried deep within 15 Minutes is some profound statement
about our society, its relationship with the media and how said media
allows us to abrogate our responsibilities for our actions.
 Or 15 Minutes could just be another cynical, exploitive melodrama out
to score a quick buck by offering audiences what they crave ó violence
and sex ó or at least female nudity.
 Actually 15 Minutes is an amalgamation of both. It damns tabloid
journalism ó especially those reality-based news shows such as Hard Copy
and Inside Edition ó while simultaneously allowing the audience to be
voyeurs to some rather gruesome proceedings.
 15 Minutes is fascinating in a cheesy and sleazy way. This loud, crass
thriller sucks you into the action, and you discover a kernel of
enjoyment in this overblown drama. Afterward, though, your conscience
berates you indulging yourself in such low-fare, obvious melodramatics.
 15 Minutes tries to take the high-road approach of foisting itself off
as an examination of our culture's cravings for celebrities ó to the
point that we don't care if the people shown on camera are cops or
killers. If they're on TV, they're famous, which gives them to impetus
to try to get away with murder.
 But this is only window dressing, because ó at its core ó 15 Minutes is
nothing more than your standard-fare cops hunting down killers B-movie
plot.
 Some of the plot points are so dumb that you wonder how
screenwriter-director John Herzfeld was allowed to keep them in his
script.
 For example, the two lowlife criminals are Eastern European refugees.
One is a movie-crazy Czech, the other an ex-con from Russia, newly
released from prison.
 They come to the United States to collect money from an old pal with
whom they pulled a job in the old country. Which old country, we are
never told, but it makes no difference.
 From the outset these two goons, Emil Slovak (Karel Roden) and Oleg
Razgul (Oleg Taktarov), should be setting off alarms. They do nothing
but sweat. It pours off them like a sumo wrestler in a Turkish bath.
 Plus, they look so shifty at customs, that the dimwit who allows them
into the country, should be fired.
 But, of course, they are passed through, so they can begin their
murderous spree.
 Representing the side of law and order is Detective Eddie Flemming
(Robert De Niro), a media darling who breaks the big cases and who
manages to always get his mug ó and his collars ó on a fast-paced
tabloid TV show hosted by the smarmy Robert Hawkins (Kelsey Grammer).
 Flemming is aided by fire marshal Jody Warsaw (Edward Burns), who gets
involved in the case after our two slimebags torch a building to cover a
crime.
 All of this leads to a lot of spilled blood, gunfire, cursing and legal
wranglings.
 Of course, virtue triumphs in the end and the American way of life is
preserved.
 15 Minutes does offer one big shocker, but even that is not enough to
elevate it from programmer status.
The media, of course, is the scapegoat as well as the punching bag ó
literally ó for the ills of society.
 The performances are mixed. De Niro, who seems to be taking any kind of
role and whatever he is offered, adds nothing to his canon. Here he
relies on props ó a cigar, a two-headed quarter ó to create his
character.
 Burns seems to whine his every line. At times, he sounds like that Will
Ferrell character on Saturday Night Live who cannot modulate his voice.
 The acting honors here go to Roden and Taktarov as the two émigrés who
try to live the American dream on their own terms. Taktarov, especially,
is memorable as he carries around his little video camera filming
everyone and everything he sees. Life ó and death ó to him are merely
extensions of some cosmic movie in which he is vying for the final cut.
 15 Minutes is a brutal excursion that may make you uncomfortable. But
as a serious examination of the ills of the media and the cult of
celebrity, it is laughable. So take it for what it is, a two-hour-plus
game of cops and robbers played by some well-paid actors.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Here on Earth (2000)
Here on Earth (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starrng Chris Klein, Leelee
Sobieski, Josh Hartnett, Michael Rooker, Annette O'Toole, Annie Corley
and Bruce Greenwood. Directed by Mark Piznarski
 For young filmgoers - the audience for which it is targeted - "Here on
Earth" may be a new experience.
 These days, most relationship stories dealing with young men and women
center around how quickly he (she) can connive to get her (him) into
bed.
 Not so with "Here on Earth." This is an old-fashioned love story. It's
flawed, a bit saccharine and at times plays like a Hallmark movie of the
week, but it just drips with sincerity and stars three very attractive
young performers.
 The three protagonists in "Here on Earth" are stock archetypes: The
arrogant, snobbish, rich boy humanized by love; the young girl wiser
than her years; and the best friend who's a bit rough around the edges
but ultimately displays an understanding and kind heart.
 That these characters are played by Chris Klein, Leelee Sobieski and
Josh Hartnett make the clichés palatable.
 The plot: Klein's Kelley Morse - rich, Boston-bred, private school
educated - is put on probation and sentenced to spend the summer in
small-town Putnam, Mass., helping to rebuild a diner that was destroyed
because of a drag race in which he and townie Jasper Arnold (Hartnett)
were the perpetrators.
 Sobieski is Samantha. Of course, everyone calls her Sam, and she is
Jasper's girl until ..
 Aw, you can figure out the rest without me.
 During the course of "Here on Earth's" approximate 105-minute running
time we learn that Kelley's haughtiness hides a sensitive soul. How do
we know? Because he can quote Robert Frost.
 We also learn that Sam has a dark secret, and that Jasper's tough
veneer also is a masquerade.
 Prodded on by a sappy score by Andrea Morricone, son of legendary
composer Ennio Morricone, "Here on Earth" leisurely flows from one scene
to the next.
The movie is slow, but never dull.
 A fine supporting cast of adults, including Annie Corley, Michael
Rooker, Annette O'Toole and Bruce Greenwood, keep the younger performers
on their toes.
 The trio of young people are well lit and perform admirably. Sobieski,
especially, looks eerily like a young Helen Hunt, and her acting ability
improves with each role.
 Klein who was most enjoyable in "Election," here seems buffed and
bronzed. He appears to strain trying to play the bad kid, but relaxes
when his good qualities are allowed to break through.
 Hartnett is touching in the `other guy' role and holds his own with his
contemporaries.
 It's kind of refreshing to see a movie in which young people are not
sex-crazed adolescents with only one thing on their minds.
 Who knows. "Here on Earth" may ignite a romantic spark in you.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Snatch. (2000)

 Snatch (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Brad Pitt,Jason Statham,
Stephen Graham, Dennis Farina, Benicio Del Toro, Vinnie Jones, Alan
Ford, Rade Sherbedgia and Mike Reid. Written and directed by Guy
Ritchie. Rated R.
 Snatch is a rollicking, violent offbeat outing that will leave you
gasping, laughing and perhaps  a bit outraged.
Written and directed by Guy Ritchie (yes, THAT Guy Ritchie), the movie
covers similar ground to Ritchieís breakthrough film of last year, Lock,
Stock and Two Smoking Barrels.
 Both films deal with not-too-bright underworld factions battling and
trying to double cross each other. Both are filled with mayhem and both
contain a cockeyed humor that is infectious even as you watch bodies
drop in droves.
 Snatch plays like one of those old Warner Bros. crime dramas from the
ë30s that so expertly melded gunplay with snappy patter. Only in Snatch,
you really have to pay attention since the story is set in England and
most of the cast speak quickly in those blue-collar British accents that
takes a while to pick up.
 Snatch ostensibly revolves around the theft of an 84-karat diamond in
Antwerp by Franky Four Fingers (Benicio Del Toro) and some confederates.
 The theft of the diamond sparks the interest of a number of low-life
and not-very-nice characters with names such as Brick Top (Alan Ford),
Avi (Dennis Farina), Bullet Tooth Tony (Vinnie Jones), Boris "The Blade"
(Rade Sherbedgia) and Doug "The Head" (Mike Reid)
 Others on the periphery include novice unlicensed fight promoter
Turkish (Jason Statham), his partner, Tommy (Stephen Graham) and the
Gypsy bare-knuckle fighter, Mickey O'Neil (Brad Pitt).
 Ritchie unites these two worlds in his helter-skelter drama that seems
to be going in all directions, yet folds together neatly at the finale.
 One thing you can say about Ritchie, the man does not believe in a
linear narrative. Snatch jumps from person to person, place to place,
event to event without so much as a fade-out or iris.
 Ritchie has a natural affinity for these mugs and thugs. He doesnít
exactly treat them with respect or extol their virtues, but he does seem
to be winking at his audience, saying, ěYea, theyíre bad, they rob,
cheat and kill, but theyíre funny in a pathetic way.î
 He does not glamorize them like Coppolaís Corleone family or Scorseseís
Wise Guys. And that may be because in Ritchieís underworld, the
gangsters are only half as smart as they think they are.
 Snatchís plot contrivances and double-dealings are too convoluted to
explain in print. Just take my word, that you will have a rousing good
time at Snatch, even as you try to follow its various threads.
 As for the performers, Statham keeps a level head as the promoter
merely trying to stay alive; Pitt is nearly incomprehensible, jabbering
rapidly with a brogue that would make Barry Fitzgerald blush; while Ford
nearly steals the movie as the gangster kingpin-pig farmer who sometimes
serves his animals some special feed in order to get rid of evidence.
 Snatch is no Sunday picnic. It is at times bloody and brutal. Yet it
also has an innate, childish charm, almost a tongue-in-cheek quality in
which Ritchie seems to be saying that none of what you are watching
should be taken seriously.
I know I didnít ó because I was too busy laughing.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Reviews by Bloom also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Next Friday (2000)
 Next Friday (1999) Starring Ice Cube, Lisa Rodriguez, Don `D.C.' Curry
and John Witherspoon. Directed by Steve Carr.
 "Next Friday" is a raunchy, innocuous little comedy relying mostly on
slapstick and scatology for its humor. The movie, a sequel to 1995's
"Friday," was written by Ice Cube, who also stars as he did in the
original.
 The premise is simple: Cube's Craig, who only wants to survive in the
'hood, is sent packing to the suburbs to stay with his uncle after the
neighborhood bully he beat up at the end of "Friday" escapes from prison
and comes looking for him. 
 Craig discovers the burbs can be just as wild as the city, as he
begins feuding with a Latino neighbor, smokes pot like it's becoming
scarce and falls for a beautiful woman -  a fetching Lisa Rodriguez, who
happens to be the sister of the Latino neighbors.
 The entire affair is rather silly and slight. There is no attempt at
character development. Cube and director Steve Carr just want to pack
one joke on top of another, hoping the entire structure can hold. 
 And "Next Friday" is funny. If you enjoy lowbrow humor, it will afford
you several yuks.  And many of the characters are quite vaudevillian:
Craig's uncle, played by Don `D.C.' Curry, who lives in the suburbs
because he won the lottery; and Craig's dog-catching, taco-loving dad,
played by John Witherspoon. Ice Cube seems to be the ringmaster, playing
it straight while everyone around him clowns outrageously. 
 "Next Friday,"  at about 90 minutes, definitely will appeal to a
younger audience. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)

 Blue Streak (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Martin Lawrence and Luke Wilson
 "Blue Streak" is unoriginal, uninspired and derivative. Plus it stars
Martin Lawrence, a comic who thinks he's an actor in the Eddie Murphy mode
of the fast-talking con man who's smarter than anyone else - especially the
white cops with whom he becomes involved.
 Lawrence plays Miles Logan, a master burglar who steals a diamond valued
at nearly $20 million. On the verge of being caught, he hides the gem in a
building under construction.
 Released from jail two years later, he goes to the construction site only
to discover that the new building is a police station.
 Failing to gain entrance disguised as a pizza delivery man, he comes up
with fake credentials and foists himself off as a new detective.
 Luke Wilson plays the Judge Reinhold role of the not-too bright, eager,
white partner who is in awe of his new buddy's police skills.
 The reason I mention race is because we have reached a point in movies in
which a new kind of black stereotype has evolved. From illiterate and
subservient slaves and servants, this revised image is that of a
hip-hopping, quick-talking/thinking, con artist who makes white people look
like buffoons.
 Now, I am not opposed to the notion of mocking white people. As a matter
of fact, I'm not opposed to mocking any people as long as it is not
mean-spirited.
 What is pertinent is that no matter which stereotype you consider - and
admittedly the contemporary one is preferable - it is still an insidious
method of classifying one group of people and setting them apart.
 The film industry has made very large strides in nearly erasing the color
barrier. But films such as "Blue Streak" are a step backward and only
reinforce this new distortion in the minds of those ignorant enough to
believe it or base enough to try to use it for their own bigoted agendas.
 Enough, I'm stepping down from the soapbox.
 Plotwise, "Blue Streak" is filled with holes and missteps that are obvious
to even the most casual moviegoer.
 Lawrence does not act - he mugs, struts, shouts and makes faces. He lacks
charm and charisma.
 The rest of the cast really has nothing to do but stand around and look
amazed as Lawrence's Logan acts like a hot-shot detective and solves crime
after crime.
 The ending is ludicrous, unbelievable but expected when considering this
type of fare.
 "Blue Streak" is a childish fantasy for little boys who like playing cops
and robbers.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
The Other Sister (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Juliette Lewis, Giovanni
Ribisi, Diane Keaton and Tom Skerritt.
 Sometimes you can tell a film has problems merely by reading its credits.
 Four writers are credited with the story for The Other Sister, two of whom
went on to write the screenplay. And if ever there was a clear example of
that cliché about too many cooks ... this is it.
 For The Other Sister lacks a definitive focus. It spreads itself too thin
trying to cover too many points. It is a movie that feels more cobbled
together by committee than written.
 And what exactly is The Other Sister? A love story? A dramatic
mother-daughter character study? A two-hour promo showcasing the abilities
of the mentally challenged coping and functioning without being a burden on
society?
 I do not mean to sound insensitive, but at times The Other Sister seems to
be all of the above. It also has a disturbing underlying aura of
patronization and condescension.
 The Other Sister is the story of Carla Tate, a slightly retarded young
woman recently returned home from many years at a "special school."
Carla (Juliette Lewis) yearns for freedom. She wants to prove to her family
- and especially her mother - that she can take care of herself.
 Her mother, Elizabeth (Diane Keaton), is an overprotective control freak
who tries to manage Carla's every waking second.
 Carla rebels, and she is reluctantly allowed to enroll at the local
community college and eventually get her own apartment. She also meets
Danny (Giovanni Ribisi), a mentally challenged young man, and the two fall
in love.
 Any student of movies can guess the rest, and despite the quartet of
writers, the plot doesn't really deviate from the path you expect.
 What keeps The Other Sister from being unbearable is the stellar
performance by Lewis. A gifted young actress who is best known for playing
troubled teens (Cape Fear, Natural Born Killers), she shows zest and heart.
 Lewis creates a whole woman out of what could have been a one-dimensional
stereotypical character. She is capable, yet vulnerable, sweet, yet steely,
childlike and calculating.
 In other words, she is a typical young woman.
 Ribisi holds his own as the young man who wants to make a life with Carla.
He brings a warmth and maturity to his Danny. Despite his disability, you
feel confident he can and will succeed.
 Tom Skerritt is wise and loving as Carla's father. He overcomes the
cliched aspects of his character to breathe life into a man who sees that
to hold onto his daughter he must let her go.
 Which brings us to Keaton. Her Elizabeth, unfortunately, throws the movie
a-kilter. Basically, she is a one-note, grating, mother from hell. She
talks sweetly and professes to love her daughter. And while we don't doubt
her sincerity and concern for Carla's well-being, she comes off as
condescending and a bit duplicitous. She feels that the only way Carla can
be safe and protected is if she listens to mother.
 And while The Other Sister can be described as a bittersweet romantic
comedy, Keaton's performance almost pushes it over into melodrama.
 Director Garry Marshall, who also is one of the four writers as well as
one of the screenwriters, could have done some trimming on the running
time. At nearly two hours, The Other Sister moves at an uneven pace. There
are a few dead spots, too many scenic views of San Francisco.
 The Other Sister is a flawed film, made palatable by the performances of
Lewis, Ribisi and Skerritt, but a more focused screenplay could have raised
it higher.
 Bob Bloom the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)

 Pushing Tin (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring John Cusack, Billy Bob
Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Angelina Jolie and Vicky Lewis. Directed by Mike
Newell.
 "Pushing Tin" opens with an impressive aerial shot of jumbo jetliners
zooming to and fro over New York.
 You are left to ponder how director Mike Newell created this shot. Are
they real planes? Is it computer graphics special effects?
 It's a dazzling opening and one that hooks you for the story to follow.
 For "Pushing Tin" is a character study of the men and women on the ground,
the air traffic controllers who every day hold the lives of thousands of
passengers in their hands as they direct the busy traffic that
criss-crosses the nation's skies
 Among these macho men, the balliest and coolest is Nick "The Zone" Falzone
(John Cusack), who lines 'em up and brings them in with ease and élan. To
Falzone, keeping track of who is where in the sky is the ultimate arcade
game and he is the grand master.
 That is until the arrival of Russell Bell (Billy Bob Thornton), a
laid-back, Zen-practicing controller who might be considered a bit crazy by
his cohorts. It seems Bell once placed himself at the end of the runway to
stand in the turbulence wake of a departing 747 just to see what it felt
like.
 A rivalry soon develops between Falzone, the control freak, and Bell, the
motorcycle-riding cowboy.
 Air traffic controllers are highly stressed, hard-living individuals who
work hard and, in their off hours, play hard.
 "Pushing Tin" (an expression for moving aircraft) is a quirky, comic movie
that also is a bit disturbing. If you really stop to think about it, would
you want to put your life in the hands of these on-the-edge individuals?
 You'll have your doubts after watching "Pushing Tin." The average career
span of an air traffic controller is about 6 1/2 years, and this movie -
the first to really delve into this profession - aptly shows you why. There
is no room for error in the air traffic control business. One misstep could
cost hundreds of lives.
 Yet, "Pushing Tin" does not dwell on the more morbid aspects of the job.
 Rather it focuses on the rivalry between Falzone and Bell and the
consequences it creates on the ground, which almost crashes and burns one
family.
 For the movie also looks at the spouses of the controllers and how they
must cope with the pressures their mates face.
 Russell's wife, Mary (Angelina Jolie), is a dusky, bosomy, beautiful woman
who - because of her husband's profession - is an alcoholic. She is
introduced at a backyard barbecue, and when she meets the wives of the
other controllers, they ask her what number she is. They then explain to
her how each of them is not the first wife of their respective spouses.
 It seems that most marriages eventually nosedive because of the fallout
from the stress of their spouses' jobs.
 With his calm detachment on the job, Bell eventually begins to surpass
Falzone as the ace controller. Nick has never been challenged, and his
reaction is to somehow get back at Russell.
 Nick's chance comes when he bumps into Mary crying in the supermarket.
Russell has gone off without any explanation - something he does on
occasion, Mary explains. Nick convinces Mary to accompany him to dinner.
Afterward, he follows her home and spends the night.
 The script by brothers Glen Charles and Les Charles, co-creators of the
hit TV series "Cheers," follows a path few other movies tread. It shows the
repercussions of a one-night stand.
 Mary and Nick are wracked with guilt. Mary tells Russell, but Nick cannot
bring himself to confess to his wife, Connie (Oscar-nominee Cate
Blanchett). This, of course, puts a strain on their marriage, which you get
the idea is a bit shaky from the outset.
 The last third of "Pushing Tin" cannot sustain what preceded it. It goes soft.
 If the film was a controller, it would have been relieved.
 But the performances by the four principals, as well as some throw-away
touches by the Charles brothers, redeems the effort.
 Cusack, as usual, gives a finely honed performance as a man on the edge.
He almost reminds you of his stressed-out hit man in "Grosse Point Blank."
 Thornton continues to re-invent himself. Here he is lean, meditative, an
odd man out, a far cry from the dorky, half-wit character he played in "A
Simple Plan."
 Blanchett is almost unrecognizable as Connie. Her American accent is near
perfect. She is as far removed from a legendary queen as an actress can be.
 And Jolie, daughter of Jon Voight, is sexy and vulnerable as Mary Bell.
 Among the supporting players, Vicky Lewis has a fine few moments as Tina,
one of the controllers. One of the film's best throw-aways shows Tina
competing in a women's body building competition. It has nothing to do with
the plot, but it helps define her character.
 It's those little touches that separate movies. "Pushing Tin" is fun and
interesting, a look inside a profession most people know nothing about.
 How accurate is it? Who cares. This is supposed to be entertainment, not a
documentary.
 Fine performances, a solid script and interesting visuals help "Pushing
Tin" take off without having to linger on the runway.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)

American Pie (1999) 3 stars out of  4. Starring Jason Biggs, Chris Klein, 
Thomas Ian Nicholas, Eddie Kaye Thomas, Eugene Levy, Mena Survari, Tara 
Reid, Natasha Lyonne and Alyson Hannigan.
 In the telling, American Pie may sound like a semi-gross adolescent sex 
comedy.
 In truth, though, it is a rather engaging and likable feature film that 
at times nudges the gangplank of bad taste without diving overboard.
 The story is simple: Four high school seniors  all virgins  make a 
pact to lose their virginity by the time of the senior prom.
 The quartet are basically all types: Jim (Jason Biggs) is the nerdy guy; 
Oz (Chris Klein) is the jock; Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas) is the smooth 
one who already has a girlfriend; and Finch (Eddie Kaye Thomas) is the 
brain.
 Enough hormones are raging among these four to generate the heat needed 
to evaporate the Great Lakes.
 The pleasure of American Pie is that despite it being a comedy, it 
convincingly covers the angst and awkwardness most young men experience 
when trying to connect with the young females of the species.
 It's all here: the false bravado, the exaggerations concerning size and 
prowess, the lies about previous trysts. The boys all set out to find 
dates/potential partners for prom night.
 Jim's plans go awry when the Romanian exchange student who shows 
interest in him is deported. This sequence, the funniest in the movie, 
involves some graphic magazines, the Internet and a most appreciative 
audience of peers and classmates.         
 Oz joins an a cappella jazz ensemble where he meets Heather (an ethereal 
Mena Suvari), who begins to transform him into a caring and sensitive 
all-around person. 
 Finch hires a classmate to begin spreading rumors about him, while Kevin 
uses "the Bible" to learn how to please his girlfriend, Vicky (Tara 
Reid), and prepare them for the perfect night in which they will finally 
consummate their romance. 
 Credit for American Pie should go to screenwriter Adam Herz. In his 
initial screenplay, Herz shows a definite ear for the rhythms, mores and 
attitudes of contemporary high school students.
 The one area in which he falls short is the privacy issue. No one locks 
their doors. Show me one teen who hasn't installed a dead bolt or 
trained a watch dog to keep intruders out of his or her room.
 Director Paul Weitz keeps the film moving at a brisk pace. And while not 
every sequence pays off, there are no dead spaces. Even the throwaway 
scenes involving Jim and his dad, a funny, trying-to-be-hip Eugene Levy, 
are witty and a bit touching. 
 American Pie is a fine ensemble comedy. The entire cast deserves high 
marks: Klein, who played a similar character earlier this year in 
Election, is touching; Biggs, as the sympathetic Jim, is klutzy, but 
endearing; Nicholas shows a vulnerability and an awakening 
self-awareness; while Thomas is a bit cynical, yet as wanting as the 
others.
 Also worth noting are the contributions of Natasha Lyonne as the 
frank-speaking Jessica, Vicky's best friend; and Alyson Hannigan as 
Michelle, the band-geek from hell who surprises the pants off Jim.
 Since this is a teen comedy, American Pie does have some raunchy 
moments, but overall it is a warm, pleasant outing about the travails of 
growing up. It's fun and a bit wise, but without being preachy. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)

 Sphere (1998) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone,
Samuel L. Jackson and Liev Schreiber. Directed by Barry Levinson
 Sphere is an adult science fiction movie, which means a lot of jabber in
scientific wordspeak that's supposed to impress as well as substitute for
laser blasts or bug-eyed monsters.
 Sphere is absorbing and suspenseful, but at almost two hours and 20
minutes, the guessing game becomes tedious, especially when it seems the
protagonists are repeatedly covering the same plot points.
 Ironically, the film's strong point is also its flaw. Director Barry
Levinson builds up audience expectations to such a fever level that the
payoff is a complete letdown, leaving you to ask, "Is that all there is?"
 The screenplay by Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio (Donnie Brasco, Quiz
Show), was adapted from a novel by Michael Crichton. The story revolves
around a spaceship discovered at the bottom of the Pacific Ocean. It seems
the ship has been resting in the deep for about 300 years.
 A team of scientists, played by Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L.
Jackson and Liev Schreiber, are drafted by the government to investigate.
 Unfortunately, every answer they find leads to another riddle. Thus, the
questions pile up rapidly - too rapidly at times - while the few
explanations devised by the scientists seem feeble and far-fetched.
 The characters themselves act illogically and obtuse, especially for
scientists.
 They don't seem to ask the right questions - or even know them. It's as if
their synapses are frequently short-circuited.
 Ultimately, you are left to draw your own conclusions, which is a weak
device on the part of the filmmakers and frustrating for the audience.
 Many loose ends are left dangling while the resolution for other events
merely goes unexplained.
 The acting as well is inconsistent. There is a lack not only of chemistry,
but of communication and teamwork among the leads. It is as if each were
involved only in his or her own character without taking the time to relate
to the others.
 Hoffman, as a psychologist, seems rather dense, while Stone, as a
biochemist, goes from cold, scientific logic to near-hysteria and emotional
insecurity.
 Jackson literally sleeps his way through the film, coming alive in spurts.
He fails to get a handle on his character, and it's difficult to discern
whether he's apathetic or possessed by an alien presence.
 Sphere tries hard to be an intelligent genre piece, but a weak and
convoluted storyline only leads to a disappointing experience.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bridget Jones's Diary (2001)

 BRIDGET JONESíS DIARY (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Renee
Zellweger, Hugh Grant, Colin Firth, Jim Broadbent, Gemma Jones and
Embeth Davidtz. Screenplay by Helen Fielding, Andrew Davies and Richard
Curtis. Based on the novel by Fielding. Original score by Patrick Doyle.
Directed by Sharon Maguire. Rated R.
 With the first few words out of her mouth, Renee Zellweger has you
convinced that she is 32-year-old British ěsingleton,î Bridget Jones.
 A bit puffy, a mite too loud, a smoker who likes to down a vodka or
two, Zellweger embodies the heroine of Helen Fieldingís best-selling
novel, Bridget Jonesís Diary.
 Bridget works in the public relations department of a publishing
company. Her love life is like an unwritten novel ó blank pages.
 Bridget goes into the new year vowing several resolutions ó to lose
weight, to cut back on her drinking and smoking and to keep a diary.
 She also decides that it is the year to improve her love life. As it
happens, Bridget catches the eye of her boss, Daniel Cleaver (Hugh
Grant), and what begins as an office e-mail flirtation soon develops
into a torrid affair.
 Always in the background of Bridgetís life, though, is Mark Darcy
(Colin Firth), who grew up in the same neighborhood as Darcy. Newly
divorced, Bridgetís mother tries to play matchmaker for the pair, but no
sparks fly.
 In fact Bridget thinks that Mark, a barrister (thatís the English name
for a lawyer), is snobbish and arrogant. Meanwhile, he looks
disapprovingly upon her affair with Daniel.
 It seems Mark and Daniel have a history, which led to the breakup of
Markís marriage.
 More than a romantic comedy, Bridget Jonesís Diary is more a character
study of a young woman nearing that age when she begins to fear that she
will spend the rest of her life unattached.
 As Bridget, Zellweger puts on a brave public front as a sort of
flighty, happy-go-lucky single woman. But with her friends and when
alone she allows her guard to slip and you can see the loneliness in her
eyes and hear it in her speech.
Zellweger gives a full-bodied performance. Her English accent is superb,
and should silence those who groused that the role was not played by an
English actress. (Call it retributive karma for Vivien Leigh playing
Scarlett OíHara in Gone With the Wind.)
 You admire Bridgetís spunk and root for her to find happiness.
 Grant, meanwhile, throws off his image as the self-effacing, stammering
nice guy to portray a cad who sweeps Bridget off her feet. Grantís
Daniel is devilishly handsome, suave and charming, but heís also a
shallow rotter.
 Firth has the most difficult role. At the outset, he is an unlikable
individual, cold and judgmental. Yet, as he keeps turning up in
Bridgetís life he grows warmer, something in his eyes ó a kindness, a
sense of compassion ó attracts you to him.
 He is a calm, steadying, if a bit dull, influence; a settling force.
 As directed by Sharon Maguire, Bridget Jonesís Diary seems to cram
ending upon ending in its final reel, but that problem can probably be
laid at the feet of the three screenwriters, who included Fielding, as
well as Andrew Davies (Circle of Friends) and Richard Curtis (Four
Weddings and a Funeral and Notting Hill).
 But it is Zellweger, so good last year in the overlooked Nurse Betty,
who is the show here. She is the heart and soul of Bridget Jonesís
Diary, giving a warm and touching performance.
 Move over, Gwyneth Paltrow, thereís another Yank who has crossed the
Big Pond and scored a triumph.
 Is it too early to talk about an Oscar nomination for Zellweger?
Possibly. But at yearís end, she might be among those making the final
cut.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Datebase: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Violon rouge, Le (1998)
 "The Red Violin" is a cold, sterile feature that leaves you uninvolved and
detached.
 It's a movie that seems almost clinical, as it traces the 300-plus-years
history of the legendary musical instrument of the title.
 Opening in the 17th century, the story shows how violin-maker Nicolo
Bussotti created the instrument as a gift for his unborn son. But when
tragedy strikes, the violin becomes the personification of its maker's
grief.
 From there the violin comes into the hands of an orphaned child prodigy at
an Austrian monastery. Again, tragedy strikes as the child is struck down
at the moment of his triumph.
 We follow the violin through the centuries as it finds a home in England
and in Mao's communist China before being discovered by expert Charles
Morritz (Samuel L. Jackson), who mounts a painstaking investigation to
prove its authenticity.
 The violin becomes Morritz's obsession, just as it is for all those who
converge on a Montreal auction house to bid on it. Morritz, however, is the
only one who knows the secret of the instrument and can understand and
appreciate its creator's intention.
 "The Red Violin" could have been a touching, inspirational story, as
soaring as a Beethoven symphony.
 However director Francois Girard fails to make any emotional connection
with the viewer. Here is a story that could have made use of various camera
angles and lighting to heighten its impact.
 Girard, for some unknown reason, uses mostly master shots, keeping his
camera - and thus us - at a distance. We get no feel for the miracle that
is the violin. It's resonance, its purity of sound are not emphasized
enough to make an impression.
 Nor are any of the performances memorable. It's as if Girard wanted all
his actors to play second fiddle to his violin.
 "The Red Violin" promises much, but delivers little. It is dull at times,
a bit pretentious and a might murky. The movie's music soars over its story
and performers. And that is its only saving grace.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
 Sometimes as you watch a film you get a sixth sense that something is
lacking.
 I'm not talking about some grade-Z slasher film with a no-name cast, but a
major studio production with bankable stars.
 On the surface the movie, about a highly-decorated Chicago police hostage
negotiator who takes hostages of his own after being framed for his
partner's murder and the theft of $2 million from the police pension fund,
is enjoyable as well as being predictable.
 But it's missing that spark, that added something that raises it from the
mere ordinary.
And it's in the performances of Samuel L. Jackson and Kevin Spacey that
this fault lies. Both are very fine actors who usually dominate the screen.
But in The Negotiator they seem to only be going through the motions. Both
give workmanlike performances. Both are very professional and smart. Both
are very good. But it's as if they didn't put their hearts and souls into
the project.
 It's more like the movie was just another job, another paycheck.
 With Jackson and Spacey as protagonists - Spacey's character, like
Jackson's, is a hot-shot police negotiator - sparks should fly when they
face off on screen.
 But nothing happens. Just two fine actors throwing lines at each other. A
remoteness is emitted from the screen. An invisible barrier keeps you from
any emotional involvement in either character or Jackson's predicament.
 Jackson and Spacey are too intelligent and too charismatic to allow their
characters to be nothing more than two-dimensional archtypes. They endow
their roles with enough business to keep you interested. But, perhaps
because of their reputations or their past performances, we've come to
expect more.
 Maybe it's because the screen just doesn't explode from the force of their
personalities. Or maybe it's because they are so focused on each other that
they forgot there's an audience watching.
 It doesn't help that The Negotiator has a been-there, done-that feel to
it. An honest cop, framed by dishonest bretheran. We've seen it all before.
 And after a while it becomes obvious who the secret leader of the
conspiracy is. While everyone else involved in the hostage situation wants
to rush in and shoot Jackson's Danny Roman, only one of his superiors
remains the calm voice of reason.
 Fans of Jackson and Spacey should enjoy The Negotiator. It's just that
considering the fine cast, which also includes David Morse, Ron Rifkin and
John Spenser, you'd expect more of an edge, a bit more unpredicatibility.
 As it is, The Negotiator is merely routine. And that is not enough.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
  A young playwright is under pressure to finish his latest work. The
producer is breathing down his neck because the producer's creditors are
breathing down his.
  But, alas, the young playwright's Muse has deserted him. He is without
inspiration and is suffering from writer's block.
  What's a young playwright to do. Well, if his name is Will Shakespeare,
he crashes a party to meet a beautiful young woman who, lo and behold, is a
patron of the theater and a fan of the playwright's.
  Thus, with newfound confidence our playwright sets out to compose his
latest comedy "Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter."
  But, soft, for as quickly as you can say iambic pentameter, our
love-struck Will is no longer writing a comedy. Ever so slowly, it is being
transformed into a classic love story of the ages. "Romeo and Ethel ... "
has been transformed by love into "Romeo and Juliet."
 Thus is the conceit of Shakespeare in Love, a boisterous, bawdy and most
appealing romantic comedy, written by Marc Norman and Tom Stoppard.
  Shakespeare in Love is a luminous, entertaining tale. And, yes, having
some rudimentary knowledge of the Bard's work will heighten your enjoyment
of the movie, but even if you've never read a line from any of his plays or
sonnets, you still can appreciate the humor and theatricality of this
wonderful outing.
  Taking center stage in this enjoyable conceit is Gwyneth Paltrow as Lady
Viola, the young woman who longs for a stage career and also worships the
words of Shakespeare. Unfortunately, in Elizabethan England, women are
forbidden from appearing on the stage. The female parts were played by
young boys.
  So, Viola hits upon the idea of disguising herself as a man named Thomas
Kent so she can join Shakespeare's company of players. Any comparison
between Viola's actions and the plot of any Shakespeare work is purely not
coincidental.
 Will and Viola become star-crossed lovers as she is bethrothed to another
- a poor nobleman who will use his dowry to build up his tobacco plantation
in Virginia.
  As Will and Viola's relationship deepens, so does the intensity of the
love story in Romeo and Juliet. And, when Will and Viola finally concede
that their love, while true, is doomed, it inspires Shakespeare to create
the tragic finale for his play.
  Paltrow is luscious, luminous, sensual as Viola. To use the Bard's own
words, "Oh, she doth teach the torches to burn bright! It seems she hangs
upon the cheek of night like a rich jewel in an Ethiop's ear. ...For I
ne'er saw true beauty till this night."
  She also displays a comic flair in her disguise as Thomas Kent, the
actor. Paltrow is the sun around which this comic tale revolves.
  As Shakespeare, Joseph Fiennes (younger brother of Ralph) is a bit
bumbling, but quick-witted and lustful. He is not a dashing figure, but
rather a tempermental young playwright trying to make a name for himself.
  A strong supporting cast including Oscar-winner Geoffrey Rush (Shine) as
the theater owner who believes comedy is box office, Ben Affleck as
matinee-idol dramatic actor Ned Alleyn, Tom Wilkinson (The Full Monty) as
Fennyman, the stage-struck money lender and, most notably, Dame Judi Dench
as Queen Elizabeth. With this performance, as well as her Oscar-nominated
impersonation of Queen Victoria in last year's Mrs. Brown, she displays the
skill that has made her a monarch among actors.
  Director John Madden (Mrs. Brown) keeps the film moving at a steady pace,
deftly switching from broad comedy to touching moments of romance and
drama.
  Shakespeare in Love in a wonderful experience. You need not be a fan of
the Bard to become enthralled, but I guarantee you will reach for a volume
of Shakespeare soon after leaving the theater.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bring It On (2000)

Bring It On (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4.. Starring Kirsten Dunst, Eliza
Dushku, Jesse Bradford and Gabrielle Union. Written by Jessica
Bendinger. Directed by Peyton Reed. Rated PG-13.
 Probably the one saving grace of "Bring It On" is its sincerity.
 After all, this is a story about cheerleaders - usually a target of
cinematic ridicule - and their struggles to make it to the national
championships in Orlando, Fla.
 Admittedly, the plot isn't "War and Peace." This is just a silly,
formulaic movie with stock characters who are pretty to ogle.
 The photography is well lit, the film's score is bouncy and the cast
plays it straight. It avoids the pitfalls of tackiness and sexism.
 The story centers around the Rancho Carne High School cheerleading
squad in San Diego. The squad has won the national championship five
consecutive years. Now, under the leadership of newly appointed captain
Torrance Shipman (Kirsten Dunst), the Toros squad will shoot for title
No. 6.
 But Torrence makes a disturbing discovery. The squad's routines had
been stolen from the Clovers, a hip-hop squad from East Compton, by the
Toros' former captain.
 Thus Torrance must create enough confidence in herself and her squad's
abilities to devise all new routines to carry them to the championship.
 Meanwhile Isis (Gabrielle Union), the driven captain of the Clovers,
must concoct a way for her squad to raise money to attend the nationals
so they can gain the recognition they so richly deserve.
 "Bring It On" does have a certain innocent charm to it, despite its
PG-13 rating. The sexual innuendo is limited to the cheerleading
routines.
 The movie's main flaw is that most of the characters, especially the
Toros girls, are types.
 But this is not the fault of the performers, but of writer Jessica
Bendinger.
 Dunst, who made a startling film debut in "Interview With the Vampire,"
and since then has gone on to do fine work in such films as "Little
Women," "Drop Dead Gorgeous" and the made-for-cable drama "Devil's
Arithmetic," is smart, honest and inventive as Torrance.
 the school has no gymnastics program. Dushku, best known for her role
as Faith in WB's "Buffy the Vampire Slayer," plays Torrance's new best
friend who opens her eyes to the Toros' former captain's perfidy.
 Acting honors, though, go to Union as the tough, self-sufficient Isis
who fights to bring her squad to the nationals.
 "Bring It On" is very lightweight fare. Honestly, who takes
cheerleading - or cheerleaders - seriously. The good folks at Universal,
though, in trying to emphasize the importance of cheerleading enclosed a
fact sheet in the press kit that includes a list of famous people who
were cheerleaders. Among the names, Madonna, Kathie Lee Gifford, Donna
Rice, Alicia Silverstone, Meryl Streep, Paula Adbul, Halle Berry and
Sheryl Crow.
 Come on, studio folks. It's only a movie - loud, colorful, but
feathery, with limited appeal for those who believe cheerleading is the
alpha and omega of their existence.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)

 The Blair Witch Project (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Heather Donahue,
Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard. Directed by Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez.
 So few events live up to their advanced hype that it's a pleasure to
report that "The Blair Witch Project" indeed fulfills all the expectations
created by the past several months of buzz.
 "The Blair Witch Project," a small independent movie about a trio of
filmmakers who disappear in the woods of Maryland, is one of the most
harrowing films you will ever have the fortune of viewing.
 The movie follows a basic tenet of filmmaking: Put ordinary people in
ordinary surroundings, create an extraordinary situation and see what
happens.
 As human beings, our most primal fear is of the unknown - of those things
that go bump in the night. We may sense something, even believe we hear it,
but if it remains unseen, our imagination becomes our worst enemy. It runs
rampant with dread, creating worst-case scenarios that can drive a person
mad.
 And that is the genius of "The Blair Witch Project." It plays upon those
fears like a violin virtuoso plucking at our nerves, assaulting our senses.
 What makes "The Blair Witch Project" so frightening is its understanding
of the mundane, of normalcy. The movie is not set on some alien planet or
in some dank, dark castle in a distant land. It's here in the woods.
 And the woods, for the most part, are associated with pleasurable
experiences - camping, hiking, sex.
 Scorning the use of special effects, filmmakers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez utilize rocks and sticks to generate an unsettling atmosphere of
suspense, which slowly but continually builds: first to curiosity, then to
dread, up to fear and ultimately to outright horror.
 "The Blair Witch Project" is the quintessential independent movie. - shot
on a shoestring budget, relying heavily on improvisation. It is ragged and
dizzying, and this rawness - again - contributes to the overall uneasiness
that multiplies as the film careens to its abrupt climax.
 The trio of actors - Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard
- were given camera equipment and sets of instructions by Myrick and
Sanchez, turned loose in the woods and were allowed to improvise most of
their dialogue.
 This illusion of reality permits them an enhanced sense of hysteria as
they stumble lost through the forest, which becomes more foreboding as the
movie progresses.
 Their dialogue is not Shakespeare, consisting mostly of "We're lost,"
"Where the fuck are we?", "What's that?" as well as intermittent arguments
as they take turns accusing each other of incompetence and placing all
their lives in jeopardy.
 They curse and swear at each other while continuing to cling together for
safety.
 The true-to-life manner in which they deliver their inane lines only adds
to the realism and the horror of their predicament.
 The three actors start off self-assured, almost cocky, and by the end are
babbling, frightened children.
 "The Blair Witch Project" is not for the faint hearted, yet it is neither
explicitly violent or bloody. It is nerve-wracking and intense. It is not a
movie you want to see alone.
 I saw "The Blair Witch Project" at a midnight screening. When I arrived
home and climbed out of my car, I know I walked a little more briskly than
usual to get into my house. The movie will cause you to do the same.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
MOVING DOWNTOWN, 8/11: 434A Main St., Lafayette, IN 47901
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Down to Earth (2001)

 Down to Earth (2001) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Chris Rock, Regina
King, Mark Addy, Eugene Levy, Chazz Palminteri, Frankie Faison, Greg
Germann and Jennifer Coolidge. Screenplay by Chris Rock, & Lance
Crouther & Ali Le Roi & Louis CK. Based on the film "Heaven Can Wait,"
screenplay by Elaine May and Warren Beatty from a play by Harry Segall.
Directed by Chris Weitz and Paul Weitz. PG-13.
 Third timeís a charm, the adage goes, but exceptions are possible.
 Take Down to Earth, for example. It is the third version of Here Comes
Mr. Jordan, originally produced in 1941 and remade by Warren Beatty in
1978 as Heaven Can Wait.
 The story is simple: A young man is accidentally taken before his time.
The young man and his guardian angels then spend the rest of the film
seeking the right body in which to return him to the land of the living.
 Along the way he, of course, falls in love, and at the fade-out
everything has worked out as divinely planned.
 Here Comes Mr. Jordan actually won two Academy Awards, one for original
story, the second for original screenplay.
 Heaven Can Wait, received 10 nominations, but won in only two minor
categories ó art direction and set decoration.
 And that brings us to Down to Earth. Before a reel of film unspools you
know problems will abound. Why? Because the story is credited to four
screenwriters: star Chris Rock, Lance Crouther, Ali Le Roi and Louis CK.
 It should not take four screenwriters to hash out a plot based on a
screenplay co-written by the legendary Elaine May and Warren Beatty.
 Down to Earth has a disjointed feel to it as if bits from each of the
writers were blended into a cinema stew without any thought of
cohesiveness. It jumps around from scene to scene without any rhyme or
reason. It feels as if were taped together instead of edited.
 A few laughs and a couple of chuckles rear their heads, but nothing
sustains them.
 The major problem is Rock. He is a fine comedian, but an inept actor.
His delivery of lines sounds like a constant standup routine. Every
sentence is shouted like its a punchline to some joke. Rock needs to
learn how to modulate his voice and phrase dialogue.
 Some of the humor works, especially Rockís diatribe about hospitals and
his put-down of a heckler at a comedy club. But most of the jokes are
not that funny.
 In this version of the story Rock plays Lance Barton, a failed standup
comedian, instead of an athlete as in the plotís previous incarnations.
 Heaven, as shown here, is a chintzy nightclub that would even make
Vegas blush. God, if we are to believe Down to Earth, has neither a
sense of taste nor style.
 Lance is sent back to earth and inhabits the body of a white,
53-year-old ruthless business tycoon, but even the comic possibilities
associated with this point are not utilized to their full potential.
 What we get are shots of a balding, chubby white guy trying to sing and
move to the beat of rap music. Hilarious, not!
 Down to Earth is deficient is plot and in substance. The weight of the
picture falls on Rockís shoulders and while he strenuously tries to hold
it up, he ultimately fails. Unfortunately, as a co-writer and an
executive producer, he must shoulder some of the blame.
 Rock has potential to be a fine comic actor. His work in Nurse Betty
and Dogma attest to that.
It just may be he still lacks the stamina to pull his own movie.
 Nice try, Chris, but we are certain you can do better.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafaytte.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Misérables, Les (1998)
The newest screen version of Les Miserables is like its hero, Jean Valjean,
strong and solid.
This adaptation of the Victor Hugo classic about social injustice and
redemption is a well-acted, moving movie.
 But looming over this production, like a giant elm keeping it always in
shadow, is the very popular musical stage version of the book. For more
than 10 years people around the world have become familiar with Hugo's
story through this extravaganza. They know the words and they hum the
music.
 However, that should not stop anyone from enjoying director Bille August's
newest incarnation. Only don't expect any surprises.
 Jean Valjean (Liam Neeson) is paroled after 19 years in prison for
stealing food. He finds a night's sanctuary at the house of an archbishop,
whom he repays for his kindness by stealing his silver.
 When the archbishop refuses to send Valjean back to jail, telling his
captors that he made a gift of the silver to the ex-con, Valjean is freed
and his life transformed. The archbishop tells the confused Valjean that he
has ransomed his soul for God, and that he must now walk the path of
righteousness.
 Neeson is a wonderful Valjean. His bulk conveys the weight of a man who is
striving to do good, to compensate, not only for the injustice in the
world, but for his own past.
 Neeson's Valjean is a man always looking over his shoulder. He is striving
for a bright, peaceful future for himself and adopted daughter, Cosette,
while continually running from his past.
 That past is represented by Javert (Oscar-winner Geoffrey Rush), the
police inspector who ferrets out Valjean's secret and vows to bring him to
justice.
 Rush's interpretation of Javert is the movie's only drawback. Rush's
Javert is too implacable, too grim. The tragedy of Javert is that he is a
man for whom the law is everything. He is so blinded by adhering to the
letter of the law that he forgets that law is tempered by justice.
 The audience should feel pity, even a bit of compassion, for Javert and
his merciless obsession with Valjean. But Rush refuses to allow that. His
inspector never reveals the chink in his armor, thus when his end comes,
the audience feels relief instead of loss.
 Javert is a character to be pitied not scorned.
 Clare Danes is wholesome as the grown-up Cosette, who while loving her
adopted parent, fights the restraints he imposes on her to protect their
lives.
 Uma Thurman's Fantine is another figure who is trampled under the weight
of society's injustices. Dismissed from her job because she has an
illegitimate daugther, she is forced into prostitution to earn money for
her daughter's upkeep.
 A haunting score by the usually bombastic Basil Poledouris adds a touch of
yearning to Les Miserables.
 Les Miserables has been filmed many times both in the United States and
France. Thus, because of its various screen incarnations and the worldwide
popularity of its musical cousin, it is a story that offers no surprises.
 August, wisely, sticks to the basic text. Les Miserables is nothing more
than a very good adaptation of a classic novel. It is literate,
well-crafted entertainment.
 And until that day that the film version of the musical arrives, this
production should serve nicely.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Enemy at the Gates (2001)

 Enemy at the Gate (2001). 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jude Law,
Rachel Weisz, Joseph Fiennes, Ed Harris, Bob Hoskins, Ron Perlman and
Gabriel Marshall-Thomson. Written by Jean-Jacques Annaud and Alain
Godard. Directed by Annaud. Rated R..
 Enemy at the Gates opens with scenes of stark brutality that try to
match the ferocious realism of Steven Spielbergís Saving Private Ryan.
 In this scenario, a group of Soviet soldiers are being transported
across a river to take up arms in the defense of Stalingrad. Their boats
are attacked by Nazi aircraft. Ships are blown out of the water and
unarmed men, who are packed in like sardines, are machine gunned.
 Those who jump overboard to escape the carnage are shot down by their
own officers.
 Things get worse once the troops land. They are rushed into battle, but
only every other man gets a rifle. Facing overwhelming German odds, many
of those who survive the onslaught attempt to retreat and are ó again ó
mowed down by their own officers for cowardice.
 This is the setting for an often compelling, but sometime frivolous,
World War II drama based on the real-life exploits of Vassili Zaitsev, a
celebrated Russian sniper who emerged as one of the heroes of the siege
of Stalingrad.
 Enemy at the Gates, which was co-written by Alain Godard and
Jean-Jacques Annaud, who also directs, falls into the Hollywood trap of
foisting an unnecessary love triangle into a story that is compelling
enough to stand on its own.
 The main focus of this drama is the war-within-a-war fought by Vassilli
and a German sharpshooter, Major Konig (Ed Harris), sent from Berlin for
the express purpose of stopping him.
 Vassilli (Jude Law) is an unassuming rural lad who merely performs his
duty with extraordinary skill. But the Soviet propaganda machine óled by
Danilov (Joseph Fiennes) ó  use him as a rallying tool to boost morale.
The Soviet press publishes his daily kill count.
 Where Enemy at the Gates excels is portraying the cat-and-mouse duel
between Vassilli and Konig, as each tries to learn about the other and
anticipate each others moves.
 The rubble of Stalingrad serves as a broken chess board in which these
two marksmen play a deadly game of hide-and-seek.
 This would be enough to sustain this wartime drama, but for some reason
a love interest is added in Tania (Rachel Weisz), one of the many women
soldiers fighting to save her city. She falls in love with Vassilli,
Danilov falls in love with her and their various passions fracture the
close friendship that has grown between Vassilli and Danilov.
 Why this hokum is needed is beyond explanation. The story stands well
enough on its own. If anything, it degrades the heroics and sacrifices
displayed in the movie, merely using the war as a backdrop for a clichéd
situation that has been filmed thousands of times before.
 Yet the Vassilli-Konig scenario is so strong, it even overshadows this
banal subplot.
 As Vassilli, Law is quiet, self-effacing and modest. He does not
consider himself a hero, but a soldier doing his duty. This young
killing machine displays a boyish innocence.
 Fiennes is pragmatic, ambitious and self-serving as Danilov, who wants
not only to help save Stalingrad, but help promote the Soviet message of
communism.
 Harris is calculating as the German marksman. He shows a low-key warmth
and weariness that hides a deadly ruthlessness. He is a noble character
who admires his prey while continuing to hunt him.
 Weisz, unfortunately, is pretty, but bland, and adds nothing to the
proceedings.
 Worth noting is Bob Hoskins as Nikita Khrushchev, sent by Stalin to
oversee the cityís defense, and save it at any cost ó including
sacrificing every soldier under his command. Hoskinsí Khrushchev is a
raw combination of charm, maliciousness and savagery.
 Enemy at the Gates is an interesting experience. How true to history it
is, of course, is questionable. But it would have been much improved if
the filmmakers had shown the courage of Vassilli and jettisoned the
familiar subplot and concentrated on the hunter and the hunted.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
Romeo Must Die (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Jet Li, Aaliyah and
Delroy Lindo.
 "Romeo Must Die" is definitely a guilty pleasure movie.
 An action-packed, one-two punch of martial arts and hip-hop, the film
marks the starring debut of Hong Kong action star Jet Li.
 Li was the main action heavy in "Lethal Weapon IV" and walked away with
the film without so much as a thank you to Mel Gibson and company.
 Set mainly around the Oakland waterfront, "Romeo Must Die," as the
title implies, involves two warring families, one black the other
Chinese.
 Li is Han, whose father is the head of the Chinese faction. His
co-star, Aaliyah (Trish) is the daughter of the leader of the black
faction.
 Han and Trish unite to solve a series of murders, including those of
both their brothers.
 Of course the story is mere stuff and nonsense centered around
acquiring waterfront property in hopes of luring an NFL team back to
Oakland.
 But you really don't give a hoot about the plot. 
 All you really want to see is Li kick butt, face, stomach, groin and
other body parts. And he does plenty of that.
 The problem with "Romeo Must Die" is a lack of action. There is too
much dialogue and too little Li. Not that he is much of an actor. His
feet and hands usually do the talking for him.
 And some dialogue is needed for exposition, but you merely tolerate
those scenes waiting for Li to again knock the heck out of some smirking
wise guy who can't see beyond Li's calm facade.
 He is a tiger. The fight sequences are a superb melding of choreography
and editing. At times it looks as if Li is defying gravity.
 "Romeo Must Die" is not a movie for serious filmgoers. But fans of this
genre will have a field day.
 With Chow Yun-Fat and Jackie Chan also making movies for American
studios, some enterprising studio boss should try to develop a script
utilizing the talents of all three.
 Now that would be a cinematic battle royal.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Emperor's New Groove, The (2000)
 The Emperor's New Groove (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Featuring the vocal
talents of David Spade, John Goodman, Eartha Kitt and Patrick Warburton.
Story by Chris Williams and Mark Dindal. Screenplay by David Reynolds.
Head of story Stephen Anderson. Music by John Debney. Songs by Sting and
David Hartley. Directed by Mark Dindal. Rated G.
 In recent years, with such works as Beauty and the Beast, The Lion
King, The Hunchback of Notre Dame and Tarzan, the Disney animation
unitís work has been spectacular and literary ó high-brow, if you
please.
 These features have been just as satisfying for adults as for children.
 Now comes The Emperorís New Groove. If the above mentioned titles can
be likened to grand opera, than this newest Disney offering is on the
level of vaudeville.
 Don't misconstrue. The Emperorís New Groove is a delightful little
pastiche that lacks the grandeur of its predecessors.
 But what it is missing in production values is compensated by its voice
talents.
 It must be the true millennium for I am about to do something I never
thought possible ó compliment David Spade.
 This annoying little comic actor has, since his days on Saturday Night
Live, made a career out of sarcasm. Mostly, he is grating and annoying.
 Yet it is just these qualities (or deficiencies, depending on your
point of view) that make his foray into the wonderful world of Disney
animation so successful.
 Spade voices Kuzco, emperor of a mythical mountain kingdom in a
pre-Columbian South America. Kuzco is arrogant, egocentric, spoiled and
selfish, thinking only of his own pleasure.
 He treats everyone with contempt and condescension, including his chief
adviser, Yzma (voiced by the legendary Eartha Kitt).
 After being fired by Kuzco, the power-hungry Yzma transforms the young
emperor into a llama. The metamorphosed ruler is stranded in the jungle
where his only hope of returning to his palace and regaining his throne
rests with a peasant named Pacha (voiced by John Goodman), whose village
he was about to destroy to make room for his summer palace playground.
 Pacha, a good-hearted soul, agrees to help Kuzco if he promises not
raze the village. The devious Kuzco, to whom a promise means nothing,
agrees, of course, and the mismatched pair set out to set things right.
 At about 80 minutes, The Emperorís New Groove moves quickly. The
animation, especially the backgrounds, is sketchy. The depth and detail
that went into previous efforts such as Tarzan are wanting, but that is
not much of a drawback since the story is a piece of fluff ó sort of a
fairy tale with a moral for the youngsters.
 Of course by the finale, Kuzco is changed back into a human being, has
learned the true meaning of friendship and is a reformed ruler. The only
missing ingredient is Jiminy Cricket singing ěWhen You Wish Upon a
Star.î
 I donít believe I am writing these words, but Spade is perfect as the
arrogant emperor you love to hate. He plays his voice like a violin,
making his character one you can despise, but not crossing the line so
that you cannot root for his reformation.
 Goodman does well as the honorable peasant, while Kitt is wonderfully
flamboyant and hammy as the evil Yzma.
 However, they all pale in comparison to Patrick Warburtonís Kronk,
Yzmaís muscle-bound manservant. If the name doesnít sound familiar,
Warburtonís claim to fame was as Puddy, Elaineís off-again, on-again
boyfriend on TVís Seinfeld.
 In The Emperorís New Groove, he steals the film as the somewhat dim,
right-hand man of Yzma. Kronk can and would rather whip up a gourmet
meal or speak to the forest animals in their own language, than do his
masterís evil bidding.
 It is a wonderful performance and should lead to bigger and better
roles for this fine comic actor in live-action films.
 The filmís songs by Sting are serviceable, but lack the soaring
splendor of The Lion King or Beauty and the Beast.
 Overall, The Emperorís New Groove is more a childrenís adventure than
previous Disney outings. But adults shouldnít be dissuaded from giving
it a look-see. It all depends on your David Spade tolerance quotient.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. For more
reviews by Bloom visit www.jconline.com and click on golafayette.
 More reviews by Bob Bloom can be found at the Internet Movie Database
Web site at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
 Titan A.E. (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Featuring vocal talents of Matt
Damon, Bill Pullman, Drew Barrymore, Nathan Lane, John Leguizamo and
Janeane Garofalo. Story by Hans Bauer and Randall McCormick. Screenplay
by Ben Edlund and John August and Joss Whedon. Original score composed
by Graeme Revell. Directed by Don Bluth and Gary Goldman.
 Decent concept, uneven presentation.
 That about sums up "Titan A.E.," a new animated science fiction feature
from Don Bluth.
 After the technological advances displayed in such recent animated and
computer-generated movies as "Tarzan," "Toy Story 2" and "Dinosaur,"
"Titan A.E." looks relatively quaint - a rough meld of Saturday morning
cartoon and computer effects.
 And while the story is interesting and has possibilities, its execution
is flawed.
 The moviemakers appear to be hedging their bets, trying to create a
product that will attract both a younger audience as well as a more
sophisticated older youth demographic.
 "Titan A.E. "follows the model of an epic quest: A young man on a
journey to find his Holy Grail, in this case a super-advanced spacecraft
created by his father. Dad disappeared years earlier in an effort to
save the ship from the dreaded Drej, an energy-force life form out to
destroy mankind.
 The story also is a classical search for home.
 Earth has been destroyed by the Drej, and the remnants of humanity have
been scattered across the galaxy.
 Only one force can reunite mankind, the mythical ship, Titan A.E. And
only one person holds the secret to its whereabouts, Cale, the son of
its creator.
 But Cale is a reluctant hero, bitter over being abandoned by his
scientist father. He does not want to get involved, and only does so
when the Drej set out to kill him.
 The screenplay by Ben Edlund, John August and Joss Whedon, based on a
story by Hans Bauer and Randall McCormick, borrows a bit from "Star
Wars" and a smidgen from "Star Trek."
 Some of the alien characters are in that cute childish Jar Jar Binks
mode, while others appear more adult and believable.
 At times, you feel like you are watching scenes from two different
movies.
 Directors Bluth and Gary Goldman maintain a nice pace, diverting from
the story to show off some opulence with scenes of hydrogen trees and
space angels.
 The vocal talent, unfortunately, is rather bland. Matt Damon lacks the
charisma needed to voice mankind's new messiah. He is rather flat and
rarely conveys any real emotion.
 Drew Barrymore is more fiery as Akima, the young woman who believes in
Cale (of course) and aids him in his journey.
 Others lending their vocal talents include Bill Pullman as Korso, a Han
Solo-like rogue; John Leguizamo as Gune, the cute, cuddly alien who is
sure to be a favorite at whichever fast-food joint has a tie-in contract
with the film; Nathan Lane as Preed, the sarcastic, immoral alien
co-pilot; and Janeane Garofalo as Stith, the sharp-shooting weapons
master.
 Overall, "Titan A.E." is a letdown. It is cold and has that
by-the-numbers, been-there-seen-that effect.
 It's not a bad film, some of the sequences are colorful and exciting.
But it has a rather worn, dated feel. "Titan A.E." is merely OK, but it
could have been much more if some more originality and effort had been
put into the story as well as the direction of the characters.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN . He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database
at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Road to El Dorado, The (2000)
The Road to El Dorado (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Featuring the vocal
talents of Kenneth Branagh, Kevin Kline, Rosie Perez, Armand Assante and
Edward James Olmos.
"The Road to El Dorado" is a bumpy one, filled with potholes and ruts.
 DreamWorks latest animation offering is pale and a tad old-fashioned
especially in lieu of the advances showcased in rival Disney's "Tarzan"
of last summer.
 It also is disappointing coming on the heels of DreamWorks magnificent
"Prince of Egypt," which was a splendid mixture of animation, story and
song.
 But "El Dorado's" main problem is in the screenplay. Any story set in
1519 that uses the common vernacular and contemporary jargon is a victim
of lazy writing.
 Perhaps it was done purposely for the young children who are the
movie's target audience. But hearing one Spaniard say to his amigo, `I
want in on the scam,' rings false.
 "The Road to El Dorado" seems to have been inspired by the old Bob
Hope-Bing Crosby-Dorothy Lamour series of the 1940s and 50s, in which
the intrepid trio visited such exotic places as Zanzibar, Morocco,
Singapore, Utopia, Rio, Bali and Hong Kong.
 At least those movies had some wit and style, most supplied by Hope and
Crosby's ad-libs.
 Unfortunately, the same cannot be said for "El Dorado." The film seems
to meander along at a pleasant pace. 
 Even the vocal talent cannot elevate this substandard production. 
 Kevin Kline is Tulio and Kenneth Branagh is Miguel, two lowlifes who
accidentally wind up on a ship heading for the New World. Miguel has won
a map in a crooked dice game showing the way to the fabled gold city of
El Dorado.
 Arriving in the New World, the two set out to find the city, which is
rather easily accomplished.
 Along the way they save Chel (Rosie Perez), an Indian maiden, and show
up the evil medicine man, Tzekel-Kan (Armand Assante).
 Unlike the Hope-Crosby tandem in which Bing was the brains while Bob
was usually the cowardly victim, there seems to be no clear delineation
between Tulio and Miguel. Only Miguel's blonde hair differentiates them.
 Perez, unfortunately, is totally miscast. You can take the girl out of
Brooklyn, but you can't take the Brooklyn out of the girl. Every word
she utters shatters the illusion the filmmakers are striving to create.
 The songs by Elton John and Tim Rice also are unremarkable, nowhere
near their compositions that helped make "The Lion King" such a success.
 Overall, "The Road to El Dorado" will satisfy the very young and
undemanding in the audiences. The older youngsters and adults may find
this adventure a bit of a bore.
 A lot of roadwork is needed to successfully pave the way to this "El
Dorado."
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)

The Contender (2000)  1 star out of 4. Starring Joan Allen, Gary Oldman,
Jeff Bridges, Christian Slater, Sam Elliott and William Petersen.
Written and directed by Rod Lurie. Rated R.
 It's bad enough that this year's political campaigns are more about
style and sound bytes than substance.
 Now we have "The Contender," a pretentious political pot-boiler that
will do to political movies what "Roller Boogie" did to disco.
 How lame is "The Contender?" Probably the Gore-Bush debates will ignite
more sparks and offer more excitement than this tedious, overblown,
filibuster of a feature.
 Not only that, the movie lacks the courage of its convictions, proving
a lame,  cop-out ending.
 And that is too bad because "The Contender" had potential to be an
interesting examination about morals, the double standard and the
nuts-and-bolts of political machinations.
 Unfortunately, all this was flushed down the toilet to include a stupid
subplot about a governor who goes to extreme lengths to try to reach a
higher office.
 In "The Contender," the vice president has died in office, and now
President Jackson Evans (Jeff Bridges) must fill his position.
 His nominee is a centrist woman senator, Laine Hanson (Joan Allen). The
opposition is led by a conservative House elder, Rep. Sheldon Runyan
from Illinois (Gary Oldman).
 "The Contender" isn't a movie; it's a boring two-hour-plus civics
lecture. The characters don't speak dialogue, they spout politically
correct slogans guaranteed to warm the cockles of any liberal. It is a
movie overbaked with platitudes and clichés about democracy, the rights
of privacy and the majesty of government.
 Writer-director Rod Lurie has created a ham-fisted, clunky diatribe
that is about as entertaining as reading the "Congressional Record." One
of his biggest problems is the sanctimonious, self-righteousness that
peppers his script. Lurie is as subtle as Roseanne singing `The Star
Spangled Banner.'
 He despises hypocrisy, male chauvinism and zealots - especially
political ones - witch hunts, persecution and McCarthyism. Well, gee,
with the exception perhaps of Jesse Helms, who among us doesn't?
 In fairness, it should be noted that the actors give their all. Allen
is lovely combination of steel and sex as the senator who will not yield
on her principles even if it costs her the vice presidency as well as
her reputation.
 Oldman is not as spontaneous and overripe as he has been in features
such as "Air Force One." Of course, he just can't say his lines. He
fiddles with his hair, and fusses around as if he's primping for a Mr.
Congressman beauty contest.
 Bridges gives a sly performance as a president who acts like a good
ole boy, but in reality is a shrewd player.
 Also featured is Christian Slater as a young congressman with a
conscience - an endangered species.
 No, in this political season the best thing to do is veto "The
Contender." It definitely does not get my vote.
 Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net.
Reviews by Bob Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Grease (1978)
 The question isn't why has Grease been reissued. The answer to that one is
easy: To celebrate the movie's 20th anniversary and to make more bucks for
Paramount's coffers because John Travolta is once again a hot commodity.
 No, the question that ought to be asked is: Should Grease be reissued?
 Grease is a fun movie, an entertaining fantasy of the '50s, embodying all
the cliches of that era. The music is lively and the dance numbers,
choreographed by Patricia Birch, are energetic and high-spirited.
 Travolta was at his pinnacle as a sexual icon, cool, but non-threatening.
 But Grease didn't break any new cinematic ground. It was not a milestone
in movie history such as Citizen Kane or Easy Rider.
 What Grease is - or has become - is the highest-grossing musical in film
history.
 OK, let's not be a spoilsport. Grease is a fun and entertaining movie,
even though it stretches credulity to see such performers as Travolta,
Olivia Newton-John, Taxi's Jeff Conaway and the multi-talented Stockard
Channing try to act like high schoolers.
 It's nostalgic to recall how good a dancer Travolta was, and it's sad to
think of what could have been had not a few missteps sidetracked his
career. He could have become a musical comedy star in the tradition of Gene
Kelly.
 Cinematically, the musical comedy has basically gone the way of the
dinosaur. Between Grease and 1996's Evita., you can probably count the
number of movie musicals on one hand.
  Two reasons have contributed to the demise of the genre: The first is
that movie audiences have become more sophisticated, no, make that cynical
and jaded. Today, if a character began to dance and sing with no orchestra
in sight, he or she would probably be hooted off the screen.
   Today's audiences lack the innocence, that belief in movie magic that is
required for a musical to succeed.
  Secondly, a lack of talent. Performers with the charisma, the style, the
larger-than-life panache of Fred Astaire, Gene Kelly, Ginger Rogers and
Judy Garland are gone.
  Most singers and dancers remain on the stage, and those who do succeed in
movies usually wind up in serious dramatic parts. A good example is Gregory
Hines, one of the greatest dancers in the world. He danced a bit in The
Cotton Club, Tap and White Nights, but those were essentially dramatic
vehicles.
  So, perhaps the reissue of Grease can serve a purpose. If audiences show
enough interest, meaning if the re-release earns the studio enough revenue,
it may spark a revival in movie musicals.
  Perhaps not original musicals such as Singin' in the Rain , An American
in Paris or Seven Brides for Seven Brothers, but for Broadway properties
that have been in the planning stages for film adaptations for several
years.
  At one time or another, according to the industry rumor mill, Hollywood
has been set to create an animated version of Andrew Lloyd Webber's Cats, a
filming of the popular Phantom of the Opera  as well as Les Miserables and
Chicago, the latter reportedly to star Madonna.
  So, let this Grease be the forerunner of an armada of movie musicals. Let
Grease be the word that sparks this revival.
   Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)

HEARTBREAKERS (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Sigourney Weaver,
Jennifer Love Hewitt, Gene Hackman, Jason Lee, Ray Liotta, Nora Dunn and
Anne Bancroft. Written by Robert Dunn and Paul Guay & Stephen Mazur.
Directed by David Mirkin. Rated PG-13.
 Heartbreakers is one of those movies that tries to be all things to all
people and in the process disappoints.
 On one level, Heartbreakers is a wonderful farce about a veteran con
woman who tries to seduce an older, rich man into marriage so she can
gain his fortune.
 On another level, it's a gooey love story about a
tough-as-nails-on-the-outside-but-tenderhearted-on-the-inside younger
con woman who falls in love with a regular guy causing conflicts about
her living the grifterís life.
 Heartbreakers stars Sigourney Weaver and Jennifer Love Hewitt as a
mother-daughter con team. Mom woos and weds them, daughter arranges a
seduction that mom can conveniently catch so she can collect a large
divorce settlement.
 Daughter wants to branch out on her own, but due to circumstances
beyond both womenís control they are forced to work together one last
time to try for the big score.
 They travel to Palm Beach in order to land a sucker.
 Mom sets her sights on William B. Tensy, a tobacco tycoon, played in
grand style by Gene Hackman.
 Hackman, as Tensy ó a cigarette constantly dangling from his lips ó
hacks, coughs and wheezes his way through his part. He seems to be
having a ball.
 And the scenes between him and Weaver, masquerading as a Russian
émigré, are the best in the film as she mangles her English and fakes
being charmed by this geriatric Lothario.
 Hewittís material is weaker as she vacillates between hard-bitten
bamboozler and love-smitten ingenue. Plus, Jack (Jason Lee), the guy she
falls in love with, is bland and rather dull.
 The possible reason for this schism is that three writers ó Robert
Dunn, Paul Guay and Stephen Mazur ó worked on this project.
Heartbreakers plays as if each ó Dunn working alone, and Guay and Mazur
teaming up ó concentrated on a specific character for director David
Mirkin who, afterward, merely melded the two disjointed scripts.
 Heartbreakers is a weak movie, one of wasted potential. It had the
makings of a great farce, but plays as if someone chickened out and
diluted the more biting story with an overdose of sweetness.
 As it stands, though, it is very enjoyable watching Weaver. As she has
shown in movies such as Working Girl and Galaxy Quest, she is very
comfortable at comedy. Her scenes with Hackman as well as with the other
men she ensnares ó most notably Ray Liotta ó come close to classic
screwball.
 Only in her scenes with Hewitt, when she tries to act motherly, does
the chemistry fail.
 Hewitt is lovely to watch, but her character is rather ill-defined. She
spends a lot of time complaining and whining, and it is difficult to
understand what Jack sees in this self-centered young woman.
 Hackman and Weaver are worth the price of admission. Unfortunately, you
have to sit through the rest of the movie to appreciate them.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)

 Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring
Mike Myers, Mike Myers, Mike Myers, Heather Graham and Michael York.
 Austin Powers is back, bad teeth, elephantine libido and all. And like in
the original, Mike Myers has stretched a one-joke premise to the breaking
point.
 "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me" is more of a series of sketches
and shtick, rather than a cohesive, follow-the-plot feature.
 I mean, how can it be anything else considering Myers' free-flow imagination.
 No, what "The Spy Who Shagged Me" is really is a Valentine to the 1960s
and the spy melodramas that proliferated during that era. The super-stud,
super-agents such as Bond and Flint who could kill a man with one hand
while caressing a woman with the other.
 Those who loved the first Austin Powers movie will undoubtedly enjoy this
sequel, which is basically more of the same. Those who felt the original
movie was stupid and childish are advised that they are taking their
chances here.
 For like the original, the humor in "The Spy Who Shagged Me" is that kind
of juvenile, smuttiness, double-entendre jokiness we all thought was so
cool in junior high school.
 The premise of "The Spy Who Shagged Me" is quite simple. Austin Powers'
nemesis, Dr. Evil (also Myers), travels back to 1969 and steals Powers'
mojo - his libidinous life force. The theft doesn't seem to incapacitate
our hero, or even slow him down. It merely keeps him from bedding luscious
CIA agent Felicity Shagwell (Heather Graham), while Dr. Evil tries to carry
out his nefarious plan to extort millions from the nations of the world.
 The movie does have some funny bits: Dr. Evil trying to reconcile with his
estranged son, Scott, on "The Jerry Springer Show"; a romantic sidewalk
interlude during which Austin and Felicity dance to "I'll Never Fall in
Love Again," as played by Burt Bacharach and sung by Elvis Costello; and
most of all two very well-edited sequences in which people around the world
see Dr. Evil's spaceship - which has a very distinctive shape - and
continually use phallic euphemisms and slang to call attention to it.
 Graham is deliciously funny as Shagwell, entering the spirit of the
enterprise with a twinkle in her eyes and a smile on her lips.
 Myers, of course, is becoming a master at the knowing nod, the mischievous
pause that lets the audience know that he, too, is in on the joke, whether
he is portraying Austin Powers or Dr. Evil.
 However most of the tomfoolery that comes between the sequences seems like
empty filler.
 Even the introduction of some new characters, including Mini-Me, a
diminutive double of Dr. Evil, and Fat Bastard, a one-ton slovenly killer
Scot, also portrayed by Myers, cannot cover the cracks in silly going-ons.
 Myers and co-screenwriter Michael McCullers constantly walk the edge of
bad taste, but skirt it with a wink and a smile.
 "The Spy Who Shagged Me," honestly, is a movie no one in their right mind
can take seriously. It is a spoof, a parody, but its flaw is that it
continually meanders around trying to cram in too many affectionate riffs
about the 1960s.
 A little more discipline and a lot less scatology and sex jokes would have
made for a better - and funnier - picture.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
The Wedding Singer (1998) 2 stars out of 4
 Sometimes when you go into a movie with low expectations - be it because
you are unimpressed with the talent or lack thereof of one or more of the
participants - you can be surprised.
 Such is the case with The Wedding Singer. Now, this isn't the funniest
movie since Buster Keaton's The General. Let us just say it's better than
Dumb and Dumber,  but not as good as Caddyshack.
 What catches you off guard is the performance of Saturday Night Live
alumnus Adam Sandler. It's restrained and, at times, touching. The comedy
of Sandler, like many of the recent SNL grads, is - like limburger cheese -
an acquired taste.
 In The Wedding Singer Sandler puts aside his usual loud, obnoxious schtick
to create a character with whom the audience can actually empathize and
root for.
 Sandler plays Robbie Hart, the title character, a failed rock musician who
makes his living singer at wedding, Bar Mitzvahs and other social
occasions.
 While he makes others happy, he himself is tossed into the dumpster after
his fiance jilts him on his wedding day, leaving him embittered and
forlorn.
 To try to lift his spirits his friend, Julie (a winsome Drew Barrymore)
asks him to help her with her wedding plans because her jerk of a fiance, a
snooty Wall Street bonds investor, claims he is too busy to help.
 Well, you can guess the rest as well as the outcome. If not, it's back to
basic film school for you.
  The Wedding Singer is a nice little movie, mostly thanks to the chemistry
between its two protagonists. Barrymore, with her baby moon face, looks
radiant, a good contrast to Sandler hound-dog appearance.
 Some of the laughs fall flat, and many of the characters are types rather
than real people, but overall, The Wedding Singer  entertains. It's a nice
diversion for undemanding and unsophisticated moviegoers who want to wile
away about 100 minutes.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)

 Toy Story 2 (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Featuring the voices of Tom Hanks,
Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammer, Don Rickles, Wallace Shawn, Annie
Potts, Jim Varney and John Ratzenberger.
 If you want to treat the kids and yourself to an early holiday gift, I
strongly urge you to see "Toy Story 2," a warm and wonderful sequel that
will keep you laughing from the outset.
 Some movies make you feel good from the get-go, hugging you until the
closing credits quit rolling. "Toy Story 2" is one of those movies.
 "Toy Story 2" is, on a basic level, a fable about the relationship between
toys and children - and the transient nature of that unique partnership.
 The main plot of "Toy Story 2" deals with the kidnapping of Woody by a
dishonest toy collector and his rescue by his former rival Buzz Lightyear
and a group of Andy's other toys.
 Andy has gone off to cowboy camp, but Woody - who usually goes with Andy -
had to be left behind because his arm is ripped. Trying to save one of
Andy's old, abandoned toys, Woody accidentally winds up in a yard sale from
which he is stolen.
 A witty script, filled with pop culture references to the James Bond
villain, Oddjob, "Jurassic Park" and "Star Wars," ensures that "Toy Story
2" will be just as enjoyable to adults as it is to the kids.
 The technicians at Pixar have again used computer animation to bring to
life a lively group of toys, and you soon forget how they were created.
Subconsciously, you know they are not human, but on the screen they appear
as real and you or I.
 And what a collection. Besides Woody and Buzz, returning characters
include Mr. Potato Head, Rex the dinosaur, Slinky Dog and Hamm the pig.
 The movie is filled with funny lines. As Mr. Potato Head prepares to
venture forth with his comrades in search of Woody, Mrs. Potato Head tells
him she has packed an extra pair of feet and his mean eyes.
 Of course, it's the talented voices that make these characters so
charming. Tom Hanks as Woody, Tim Allen as Buzz Lightyear, Don Rickles as
Mr. Potato Head, Wallace Shawn as Rex, Jim Varney as Slinky Dog and John
Ratzenberger as Hamm are joined by the heavenly Joan Cusack as Jessie the
cowgirl and Kelsey Grammer as Stinky Pete the prospector.
 You see, after being kidnapped, Woody discovers that he is a cultural
icon, a star of his own kiddie TV show back in the 1950s. He was joined on
the show by Jessie and Stinky Pete.
 With the addition of Woody, the evil toy collector now has a complete set
of Woody memorabilia and plans to sell it all to a toy museum in Tokyo.
 Woody doesn't want immortality. He wants to return to Andy, despite the
protests of Jessie - who was cruelly discarded when her own grew up - and
Stinky Pete, who is still wrapped because he was never removed from his box.
 One of the film's finest sequences occurs when Woody's would-be rescuers
invade a toy store. There, Buzz meets an updated model of himself (the new
Buzz has a utility belt), the toys are aided by a flight attendant Barbie
and Buzz comes face-to-face with his mortal enemy, the evil Emperor Zurg.
 Everything, naturally, works out for the best. But "Toy Story 2" is such a
fun ride that I cannot help but rhapsodize about it. The movie is one of
the top films of the year, a must-see, can't-miss, family excursion kind of
event.
 It can be argued that like "Bride of Frankenstein," "Godfather II,"
"Aliens" and "Terminator 2," "Toy Story 2" is a sequel that surpasses the
original.
 A wonderful, tuneful score by Randy Newman, a laugh-filled script,
out-of-this-world effects and some very talented voices and technicians
have created a world we will want to visit again and again.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Ever After (1998)
 Ever After (1998) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Drew Barrymore, Dougray Scott
and Anjelica Huston.
 It seems the Brothers Grimm - as well as all the other writers of fairy
tales - had it all wrong.
 No fairy godmother, no magical pumpkins turning into carriages. Nope, it
was pure spunk, resilience, honesty and Leonardo Da Vinci who won
Cinderella her prince.
 Only her name wasn't Cinderella, it was Danielle. At least that's the way
the story goes in Ever After.
 Danielle was the daughter of a French nobleman. When her beloved father
remarries, he brings Danielle the mother she never had, as well as two
stepsisters.
 However, shortly after his remarriage Danielle's father dies, and her
stepmother, Rodmilla, while not necessarily wicked, turns out to be less
than kind to her new stepdaughter.
 Director Andy Tennant, who co-wrote the screenplay with Susannah Grant and
Rick Parks, has turned the Cinderella legend on its ear.
 Call this a PC fairy tale, with a pinch of Gloria Steinem.
 Danielle may be a damsel in distress, but she is no weakling. She's more
16th-century Xena, Warrior Princess than a Snow White. She can ride, handle
a sword, is well-educated (her favorite book is Thomas More's Utopia) and
is not afraid to speak her mind. She believes in the rights of the
individual and that all men - and women - are equal.
 As portrayed by Drew Barrymore, Danielle is an outspoken, strong-willed
young woman who, while working in and around the manor house like a
servant, is savvy enough to know when to yield and when to get in the face
of her stepmom.
 Barrymore is most appealing, and while she is no beauty, she radiates an
honesty and frankness that is most appealing. It is easy to understand how
she could attract the eye of any man, especially a prince.
 Dougray Scott is handsome as Prince Henry, the nobleman smitten by
Danielle's outrageous ideas, her passion for life and her frankness.
 As Rodmilla, Anjelica Huston gives a deliciously evil comic performance.
It borders on campiness but falls short of crossing that fine line.
 Her portrayal is very similar to Sigourney Weaver's performance as the
evil stepmom in the revisionist Snow White: A Tale of Terror that aired on
the Showtime cable channel earlier this year.
 Patrick Godfrey is an eccentric Leonardo, reminding one of Desmond
Llewelyn's "Q" from the James Bond movies.
 The lush French countryside, plus a soothing score by George Fenton adds
to the pleasure of this modern retelling of an old bedtime story.
 Ever After offers wit and charm. It's colorful, enjoyable and tame enough
for the entire family.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)

 The Iron Giant (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Featuring the voices of
Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick Jr., Eli Marienthal, Vin Diesel and
Christopher McDonald.
 "The Iron Giant" is one of those movies that seem to have come out of nowhere.
 It is a warm and touching animated feature with roots in the science
fiction films and mores of the 1950s, the period in which this feature
takes place.
 This entertaining family feature is based on a book by British Poet
Laureate Ted Hughes, best known as the widower of poet Sylvia Plath.
 It is a simple tale of friendship, love and understanding. Set in Maine in
October of 1957, the story tells of 9-year-old Hogarth who, hearing a
fisherman tell how his boat was sunk by a gigantic metal man, sets out in
the woods to find this wondrous robot.
 As the saying goes, be careful what you wish for, it may come true. Not
only does Hogarth find the 50-foot-tall iron robot, but he also saves its
life.  The metal-eating robot turns out to really be a gentle giant, and
Hogarth decides to find a place where he can hide it so as not to frighten
the local residents.
  being a time of paranoia in the United States, a government agent is sent
to Maine to investigate rumors of flying saucers, Soviet invaders, giant
robots or whatever he can find.
 This is where "The Iron Giant" succeeds brilliantly. Like the live-action
"October Sky," released earlier this year, this movie captures the fear and
loathing for anything un-American that existed during this era.
 Whatever is not American is automatically an enemy and must be destroyed,
was the thinking of the day. And this theme of intolerance is carried over
into "The Iron Giant."
 It is a wholesome, family-oriented feature that will please and amuse
parents and children. One sequence especially will have the baby boomers in
the audience smiling.
 One day at school, Hogarth and his class watch a movie giving them
instructions on how to "duck and cover" in case of atomic attack. If you
remember those air raid drills when you had to crawl under your desk, this
scene will tickle you.
 "The Iron Giant" is a story of friendship, tolerance and knowing who you
are - even if you are made of iron. It's a story with a message, but the
two are interwoven so thoughtfully that you are not hammered over the head
and feel as if the filmmakers are preaching to you.
 The animation is not as sophisticated as some newer features such as
Disney's "Tarzan." "The Iron Giant" has a 1950s comic book look to it,
which is apropos to the story.
 The movie features the voices of Jennifer Aniston as Hogarth's mother; Eli
Marienthal as Hogarth; Harry Connick Jr. as his friend, Dean; Christopher
McDonald as government agent Kent Mansley; and, notably, Vin Diesel as the
giant.
 One complaint about the movie is that it is too white. True, it is set in
Maine in 1957, yet there are no people of color anywhere. Every character
is white. It would not have hurt the film in any way to put some ethnic
faces on some of the townspeople.
 Otherwise, Brad Bird, who adapted Hughes book and directed the film, keeps
the pace lively so as the younger audience members do not get bored. "The
Iron Giant" is a quaint little film, a nostalgic piece of entertainment.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Lucky Numbers (2000)

Lucky Numbers (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta, Lisa
Kudrow, Ed O'Neill, Tim Roth and Michael Rappaport. Written by Adam
Resnick. Directed by Nora Ephron.
 Every town and small city has its Russ Richards. He's the local
ěcelebrity,î the TV anchorman, weatherman or pitchman who everyone knows
and adores.
 Russ Richards is the star celebrity weatherman at a Harrison, Pa., TV
station. And it is his story that is the focus of Lucky Numbers, a broad
and sometime strident comedy about greed and its consequences.
 Set in 1988, Lucky Numbers is loosely based on a real incident from
1980 in which someone tried to fix the daily number drawing in the
Pennsylvania state lottery.
 Screenwriter Adam Resnick and director Nora Ephron have fictionalized
this scandal, creating an almost slapstick style comedy, which moves in
starts and spurts.
 Richards (John Travolta) is the king of Harrisburg. His life, as far as
he is concerned, is a joy. He has his own parking space as well as his
own table at the local Dennyís. Fans, waiters and waitresses fawn over
him.
 However, Richardsí life is about to start that long painful downhill
slide. His snowmobile business is causing him to go broke, costing him
his house and his prized possession  his Jaguar. It seems a warm spell
has gripped Harrisburg so there is no call for snowmobiles during the
winter of '88.
 Richards turns to his friend, Gig (Tim Roth), who gives him several
suggestions none legal  on how to obtain some quick cash.
 The first, an attempted burglary of his dealership, is thwarted but an
overzealous employee.
 Then Gig suggests a way to fix the $6.4 million lottery drawing. This
plan works, but then everyone who knows about the scheme wants a piece
of the action.
 Pretty soon, Russ again owes more than he has.
 And while all this may sound hilarious  and parts are Lucky Numbers has
a mean-spiritedness to it. These people  who also include Lisa Kudrow as
the sluttish lottery number girl and Ed O'Neill as the slimy head of the
TV station  are venal, unethical and greedy.
 None of them are really worth caring about. It is difficult to like or
root for any of them. Even while you laugh, you don't want to see them
succeed.
 As a paean to avarice, Lucky Numbers is a textbook study. It doesnít
rank, though, with a comedy such as Outrageous Fortune. Lucky Numbers it
is too long, too broad and features too many characters and too much
double dealing.
 Travoltaís performance, while rather hammy, is not bad. His Russ
Richards is one of those self-centered, spoiled people who believes
their status entitles them to whatever they want.
 Kudrowís Crystal Latroy is an immoral co-conspirator who uses her body
to get what she wants and what she thinks she deserves.
 Lucky Numbers has several funny moments, but as a whole the film leaves
you dissatisfied. Maybe it is because I don't care about bad things
happening to these unredeemable characters. I think these people all get
what they deserve.
 And I donít like spending two hours dwelling on their flaws and
shortcomings.
 No, Lucky Numbers has its hilarious moments, but overall these people
are not worth anyoneís time.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bob Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Saving Silverman (2001)
Saving Silverman (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Jason Biggs, Steven
Zahn, Jack Black, Amanda Peet, Amanda Detmer, R. Lee Ermey and Neil
Diamond. Written by Greg DePaul and Hank Nelken. Directed by Dennis
Dugan. 91 minutes. PG-13.
 Saving Silverman is a winning combination of slapstick and sweetness
propelled by the antics of two fine young character actors ó Steven Zahn
and Jack Black.
 This low-brow, sometimes crude comedy is nonetheless rather charming.
After all, any movie in which Neil Diamond is characterized as a
cultural icon who can save the day canít be bad.
 Silverman is a story of friendship and the lengths some people will go
to to preserve that bond.
 Darren (Jason Biggs), Wayne (Steve Zahn) and J.D. (Jack Black) have
been best friends since grade school, sticking together into adulthood
where they rock together in Diamonds in the Rough, a Neil Diamond cover
band.
 The trio, especially Darren, always have been unlucky in love.
 Then along comes Judith (Amanda Peet), a stunning, cold-hearted,
manipulative psychiatrist who grabs the sweet Darren away from his
friends. ěHe is my puppet and I am his puppet master,î she brazenly
tells Wayne and J.D. when they try to reclaim their pal.
 Judithís stranglehold is so great on Darren that he even refuses a
chance to be reunited Sandy (Amanda Detmer) with his ěone and only true
loveî from high school.
 Wayne and J.D. then take extreme action to separate Darren from Judith,
thus giving their friend a chance to realize his true feelings for
Sandy.
 Zahn (That Thing You Do and Happy Texas) and Black (High Fidelity) are
wonderfully funny, physical and bumbling as the inept pair endlessly
scheming to rescue sweet Darren. That they are no intellectual match for
Judith is part of the fun, as she uses her brain while they try to use
brawn.
 Much of the humor is coarse, involving punishment to unmentionable body
parts, but the overall tone of the movie is so cheery and light-hearted
that you are not offended or ache with the punishment Wayne and J.D.
endure for the sake of friendship.
 Peet is hilarious, playing her Ice Queen part with a minimum of
tongue-in-cheek.
 Biggs adds another sweet characterization to his roster of parts
following American Pie and Loser, while Detmer brings a wholesomeness to
her role as the girl of Darrenís dreams.
 Veteran F. Lee Ermey spoofs his tough-guy image, first honed as the
sadistic drill sergeant in Stanley Kubrickís Full Metal Jacket ó with
several variations since ó as the win-at-any-cost football coach and
mentor to Wayne and J.D.
 And then thereís Neil Diamond. Saving Silverman can be appreciated as
one sweet, long love song to the singer. He only appears briefly and his
acting hasnít improved since The Jazz Singer, but so what. Heís Neil
Diamond and he has some fun spoofing himself.
 Saving Silverman is rather short, running only about 90 minutes. It is
not a classic comedy, but it is an entertaining vehicle that will leave
you smiling.
 It is witty, a bit naughty, but most of all, warm.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)

 The Haunting (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Liam Neeson, Catherine
Zeta-Jones, Owen Wilson and Lili Taylor. Directed by Jan De Bont.
 "The Haunting"  the original, 1963 Robert Wise-directed version  is one
of the scariest films in the history of cinema.
 And it follows the precepts of two old grand masters of the horror genre
 Boris Karloff and Vincent Price. Both said on more than one occasion
that the most frightening terror was not what was put on screen, but
what the audience conjured up in its own imagination.
 That was where Wise's "Haunting" succeeded so brilliantly. Everything
happened just out of sight. You heard noises, but never saw anything, or
something flashed by so quickly you weren't sure what you saw.
 The same cannot be said for a very lame remake of "The Haunting" released
by DreamWorks. It is about as scary as a haunted house ride at a kiddie
park.
 At a screening of the movie, audience members laughed during scenes that
were supposed to make them scream.
 Everything in this new version of "The Haunting" is bigger, especially the
house, the sets and the special effects. It looks like more money was
poured into these than into financing an adequate script.
 Calling the screenplay for "The Haunting" mediocre gives it more credit
than it is due.
 "The Haunting" is a dud, a big disappointment, a letdown.
It reeks of cynicism.
 And I'm angry because Hollywood  in its infinite idiocy  has once again
taken a classic and tried to "improve" on it not through the story but
by using bells and whistles. I curse movie executives who continually
underestimate, condescend and show utter contempt for moviegoers by
releasing crap such as "The Haunting." Their penalty should be an eternity
in purgatory with continuous showings of this abomination coupled with
the remake of "The Wild Wild West."
 You could get more chills standing in front of an open refrigerator than
by watching "The Haunting."
 In the original, a scientist invited a group of test subjects  most of
whom had paranormal powers such as ESP  to spend time with him in an
evil, old house. The doctor wanted to prove that ghosts and evil spirits
did exist. Those who joined him knew from the outset what they were in
for.
 In this remake, a scientist (Liam Neeson, in a very weak role) invites
three people to join him in a spooky old castle ostensibly to study
insomnia, but in reality, he is conducting experiments in fear. Of
course, he fails to let his subjects know what he's doing, but, hey, I
guess scientists today also have seen a sharp decline in ethics.
 So tagging along with Neeson are Lili Taylor's Eleanor, who is a bit
off-kilter after spending the past 11 years caring for her demanding
invalid mother; Catherine Zeta-Jones' Theo, a bisexual artist; and Owen
Wilson's Luke, a wise-cracking cynic.
 It's not even worth the time or effort to go into the specifics of the
plot.
 Let's just say there's a gratuitous decapitation inserted solely for
shock value; a ghost who's about as scary as Casper; and a silly looking
haunted house that can pass as a refugee from a Scooby-Doo cartoon.
 The interior of the house looks as if it were decorated by the same people
who did the Nostromo in "Alien."
 Director Jan De Bont, the man who gave us "Speed" and "Twister," seems to be
in a slump. Prior to this he directed the dreadful sequel "Speed 2:
Cruise Control." Perhaps the three-strikes law should be applied to movie
directors. If so, De Bont would be a prime candidate.
 "The Haunting" is dull, dreadful and plodding. It's about as scary as "Bela
Lugosi Meets a Brooklyn Gorilla." The only thing scarier would be if
DreamWorks decides to do a sequel.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
  "American Beauty" (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Kevin Spacey,
Annette Bening, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, Mena Suvari, Chris Cooper and
Peter Gallagher. Directed by Sam Mendes
 Lester Burnham is going through a midlife crisis. Correction. Lester
Burnham is a walking, breathing midlife crisis, a tragedy in waiting.
 He hates his job, is distant from his wife and daughter, has no interests,
no friends, no passion. The highlight of his day is masturbating during his
morning shower.
  Lester is invisible. He gets no enjoyment out of life nor does he give any.
 That all changes though when Lester sees Angela (Mena Suvari), his high
school daughter's best friend. Quicker than you can say Lolita, Lester has
found a purpose in life.
 He decides to buff up, take stock in himself, become a new man, all to
impress a teeny-bopper.
 Thus is the crux of "American Beauty," a disturbing, sad and funny look at
a dysfunctional family trying to fool itself into believing its a living a
normal American middle-class existence.
 "American Beauty" is an actor's movie. Forget the plot and subplots, as
interesting as they are. What sticks here are the performances. Kevin
Spacey and Annette Bening are mesmerizing and daring as Lester and Carolyn
Burnham.
 He's a burnt-out copy editor for a magazine, she's a gung-ho wannabe real
estate agent. They have as much in common as Jesse Helms and Chastity Bono.
 They don't communicate, they bark, snarl and snap.
 Spacey starts out shuffling around like a schlep. He doesn't walk, but
drags himself painfully through his daily existence. As his focus narrows
and his mind becomes more set on his courseof action, he becomes more
confident in tone and stride.
 It is fascinating to watch this transformation. It is Academy
Award-caliber acting. It is imaginative and smart because through it all,
Spacey keeps in character. He makes it so casual, so matter-of-fact, that
you don't question his re-emergence into the land of the living.
 Bening's Carolyn is a woman who refuses to be dragged down into the muck
of dispair that is sucking away her husband's soul.
 She fights to remain the optimist, scrubbing and cleaning the property she
is trying to sell, then slapping herself out of discouragement after an
open house from hell.
 Caught in the middle of it all is the Burnham's daughter, Jane (Thora
Birch), who can neither understand nor cope with either parent.
 Birch also gives a compelling performance as a confused adolescent who
cannot grasp the vacuum between her parents. Like most teen-agers, she is
self-absorbed with her own wants and needs, repelling any attempts at
communication from either parent.
 Doom hangs over the Burnham household like a smog over Los Angeles.
 Yet for all its tragic undertones, "American Beauty" actually has you
laughing. But sometimes it's that embarrassed laughter, the one that comes
out when you see someone take a fall or walk around with his fly unzipped.
 "American Beauty" is not a perfect film. Writer Alan Ball has created a
couple of quirky characters too many, especially Chris Cooper's Marine Col.
Fitts, a send-up stereotype that could have come from Kubrick's "Full Metal
Jacket." His character doesn't seem to fit and when he is on screen,
American Beauty goes a bit a-kilter.
 Fitts' son, Ricky (Wes Bentley), first appears as a creepy peeping Tom,
secretly recording life in Burnham household, with special emphasis on Jane.
 But Ricky, despite dealing drugs, turns out to be - normal is not the word
- but moral and decent.
 Director Sam Mendes has done a masterful job with his cast. He has taken
extraordinary situations and what could have been over-the-top
characterizations and molded them into people you may not understand, but
could at least symphathize with.
 "American Beauty" is an original, a tour-de-force exhibition of acting
missing from the movie screen so far this year.
 When Academy Award nomination time rolls around, "American Beauty" is a
movie that will not - should not and cannot - be ignored.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)

 Lethal Weapon 4 (1998) Starring Mel Gibson, Danny Glover, Rene Russo, Joe
Pesci, Chris Rock and Jet Li. Directed by Richard Donner.
 Lethal Weapon 4 is crass, vulgar, childish, ultraviolent, profane, stupid
and appealing to the lowest common denominator of movie audiences. And yet
...
 It's hard to really hate this movie, simply because of the by-play and
chemistry of stars Mel Gibson and Danny Glover. Yea, it's the same old
shtick they've done in the other Lethal Weapon movies, but it still exudes
some magical pull that sucks you in.
 It's like going to a strip joint. You enjoyed yourself, but feel dirty and
hope that no one saw you go in or out.
 The plot of Lethal Weapon 4 is convoluted and really makes little sense.
The script is full of preposterous holes and dead ends. And yet ...
 The ease with which Gibson and Glover, along with series veterans Joe
Pesci and Rene Russo, slip back so comfortably into their roles allows for
an easy familiarity that lets you ignore all the movie's shortcomings as
you just tag along for the ride.
 The movie doesn't condescend to its audience as does, say, Armageddon.
>From the outset, Lethal Weapon 4 lets you know you're in for a fantasyland
shoot-'em-up, and any resemblance to real police work is purely
coincidental.
 Lethal Weapon 4 really is a big, expensive game of cops and robbers played
by a bunch of overage adolescents who had several million bucks to spend.
Consider it the most expensive home movie ever made.
 The team of producer Joel Silver and director Richard Donner know what the
audience wants - and gives them plenty of it. Lots of big bangs, car chases
and crashes, gunplay and fisticuffs, all done in such an outlandish manner
that you could probably substitute some of the critters from the Warner
Bros. animation stable and release the film with Wile E. Coyote and the
Road Runner instead of Gibson and Glover.
 A saving grace is that no one really takes the proceedings seriously,
especially not Gibson. He mugs, chuckles, rolls his eyes and continually
lets the audience know that he's having a frolic.
 Adding to the festivities is Chris Rock as an eager young detective who
teams up with veterans Riggs and Murtaugh to solve a case involving murder,
illegal smuggling and counterfeiting. The story, however, is secondary to
the interplay between the main protagonists.
 The only breath of fresh air is offered by Hong Kong action star Jet Li as
the main villain, a human killing machine. Li does some impressive martial
arts moves that will have the audience gasping.
 Lethal Weapon 4 is not art. It's not even good filmmaking. At a little
over two hours, it's a bit flabby and could have used some tighter editing.
But none of that really matters, does it?
 It's the action - the stunts and pyrotechnics - that will lure moviegoers.
Lethal Weapon 4 does what a movie of this caliber is supposed to do. It
will take your mind off the heat, the rain, the flooding - whatever. And
that's the bottom line, isn't it? If you go in with low expectations, you
will walk out satisfied.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Finding Forrester (2000)

 Finding Forrester (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Sean Connery,
Rob Brown, F. Murray Abraham, Anna Paquin and Busta Rhymes. Written by
Mike Rich. Directed by Gus Van Sant.
 Director Gus Van Sant threads a very thin line in his newest movie,
Finding Forrester.
 Firstly, some people may draw comparisons between this and his previous
outing, the Oscar-winning Good Will Hunting.
 Secondly, some may accuse the director of patronization or even racism
in this well-done story of a black ghetto teen-ager, Jamal Wallace (Rob
Brown), who's undisciplined talent is given focus and purpose by a
reclusive, white writer, William Forrester (Sean Connery).
 But these are arguments you think of days or maybe even weeks after
seeing Finding Forrester. While you watch it, though, you are caught up
in the dynamics of the relationship between this older man whoís afraid
to leave his apartment and this ambitious, but realistic youth who knows
the odds he must overcome to achieve the recognition to which his
God-given talent entitles him.
 Finding Forrester is a belated holiday gift ó a film you can cheer and
applaud as the end credits roll.
 The movie is like an oasis in a cinematic desert. Cinematically, 2000
was as exciting as a Floridianís dissertation about chads. Finding
Forrester is like discovering a Lena Horne is a chorus of Brittany
Spearses.
 The movie does contain a few clichés: The preppy private school that
accepts Jamal as much for his basketball playing skills as for his
intellectual skills; the schoolís trustees who patronize Jamal and only
offer him token acceptance: the one white, rebellious female student
(Anna Paquin) who takes a romantic interest in Jamal.
 What also is brought to mind are some movies from the late ë80s and
early ë90s, such as Cry Freedom and Mississippi Burning, which dealt
with the issues of apartheid and the civil rights movement, but from the
perspective of those films white characters.
 Again, though, these shortcomings do not interfere with the overall
emotional impact you get from watching Finding Forrester.
 The glue that binds this drama is the performance of Connery ó at once
arrogant, grumpy, suspicious and afraid ó and his characterís
interaction with Jamal. Connery endows Forrester with some quirky
habits: He wears his socks inside out, for example.
 Underneath Forresterís bluster is a vulnerable, lonely man who abhors,
yet simultaneously misses, social intercourse.
 Finding Forrester marks Brownís film debut, and itís a beaut. This
young man is intelligent, cynical and talented, aware of the
circumstances in which he lives and knowing the odds he faces to raise
his status. But Brownís Jamal shows more determination than bitterness.
He fights the odds society has stacked against him not with a sword, but
with a pen.
 As I said, Finding Forrester has its fill of clichés and caricatures.
The most obvious is F. Murray Abraham as a snobbish literary teacher at
Jamalís private school who does not believe that this ghetto teen is a
prodigy. The mistake was making Abrahamís character a failed, frustrated
author.
 At more than two hours, Finding Forrester does not lag. Director Van
Sant keeps the action flowing between Jamal, Forrester, their
relationship as well as glimpses of Jamalís home life and his struggles
at school.
 Finding Forrester is a positive experience, a movie you can sit back
and enjoy. It will make you laugh, anger you at times, and may even
bring a tear to your eye. Itís a movie that may envelop you like a warm
hug.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. For more
of Bloom's reviews go to www.jconline.com and click on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
 A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Haley
Joel Osment, Jude Law, Brendan Gleeson, William Hurt, Sam Robards and
Frances O'Connor. Music by John Williams. Based on a short story by
Brian Aldiss. Based on a screenplay by Ian Watson. Screenplay by Steven
Spielberg. Directed by Spielberg. Rated PG-13
 It is easy to see why the late Stanley Kubrick believed Steven
Spielberg would be the perfect director for his A.I. Artificial
Intelligence, just as it is understandable why Spielberg was attracted
to the material.
 For here we have another lost boy trying to find his way home, an
outcast seeking family, themes very familiar from most of Spielbergís
body of work from Sugarland Express to Close Encounters of the Third
Kind to Empire of the Sun to Hook to Saving Private Ryan, naming just a
few examples.
 A.I. is set in an undefined near future in which giant technological
advances have led to the creation of robots who serve every purpose from
housekeeping to fulfilling sexual fantasies. It is an era when robots
are treated merely as sophisticated appliances.
 The last great leap in robotic evolution is the addition of emotions,
and with the number of births limited by the government, many couples
are yearning for children.
 And Professor Hobby (William Hurt) has the solution. A robotic boy
named David (Haley Joel Osment), who is programmed to love. As a test,
David is placed with Henry Swinton (Sam Robards) and his wife, Monica
(Frances OíConnor). Their natural-born son has been cryogenically frozen
until a cure can be found for his illness.
 The first third of A.I. deals with Davidís life with the Swintons and
how that is changed by the recovery and return of their son, Martin.
 Circumstances force David to be cut off from the Swintons. He is
abandoned and alone. David, highly influenced by the fairy tale,
Pinocchio, feels that if he becomes a real boy he can rekindle Monicaís
love for him.
 The filmís second act follows Davidís search for The Blue Fairy, whom
he believes will be able to fulfill his wish. During these adventures he
meets and is helped by Gigolo Joe (Jude Law), a robot who specializes in
sex.
 Spielberg is at his top form in this sequence, offering a brutal ěFlesh
Fairî where robots are destroyed via sadistic methods for the amusement
of paying customers.
 Here, is where Kubrickís influence is strongly felt, as the movie
explores the fear and distrust humans have for robots. The savagery
conjures up images from the late directorís A Clockwork Orange.
 At about two hours and 30 minutes, the film begins to falter during the
last 20 minutes, a sequence that seems most Spielbergian with images
that appear to be borrowed from Close Encounters.
 It is all very anti-climatic and jarring. These scenes seem almost
superfluous, as if from a different film.
 A.I. is a dark fairy tale that deserves its PG-13 rating. It is a story
combining hope and intolerance, sacrifice and bigotry, and while it does
not coalesce perfectly, the movie does offer some disturbing images.
 But A.I. is really a showcase for the acting talents of the amazing
young Osment. If ever an actor deserved an Academy Award nomination, it
is this lad, who brings a sense of joy and wonder to the role of David,
a being created for the express purpose of loving.
 He beams when with Monica, beaming with love, as eager as a puppy to
please. After being left in the woods, he is confused, lost, hurt,
focusing on one objective: To become a real boy and find his way home so
he can redeem himself in his motherís eyes.
 Law is pleasant as the care-free robot who really doesnít understand
Davidís quest, but is nonetheless happy to help him on his journey.
 Probably the toughest role is OíConnorís Monica. Playing an emotional
fragile woman who sees David as a substitute for her lost Martin, she
grows conflicted after her boy returns and she begins to perceive David
not as a second chance, but as a threat to her family.
 She gives her character enough emotional chaos that you cannot fault
her for her course of action.
 Many of A.I.ís futuristic sets are breathtaking, especially a mostly
submerged New York, lost to the world by the melting of the polar ice
caps.
 A.I. is a flawed film, and you cannot get through the entire feature
without pondering ó even subconsciously ó how it would have turned out
with Kubrick instead of Spielberg behind the camera. Would it have been
darker? More cynical? We will never know.
 We can only judge what is before us on the screen, a collaboration of
two cinematic giants. A.I. is a most interesting and thought-provoking
examination of a future that is quickly gaining on us.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. Other
reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Data
Moviebase site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Idle Hands (1999)
 "Idle Hands" is distasteful, crass and derivative.
 If an original thought found its way into this horror-comedy it would die
of loneliness.
 Plus, you have to question the judgment and sensitivity of studio
executives who would green light the release of a movie dealing with the
slaughter of innocent teen-agers the week after the tragedy in Littleton,
Colo.
 The movie is insulting to horror film fans and teen-agers. The plot, what
little there is, deals with Anton (Devon Sawa), a high-school slacker who's
hand goes on a murderous rampage after becoming possessed.
 Along the way the hand kills Anton's parents and his two best friends. The
friends, also slackers, are so lazy that they return from the dead because
the walk into the light was too far for them. That is the level of this's
atrocity's humor.
 "Idle Hands" is gruesome and morbid. The performances are stereotypical
and cartoonish.
 I realize this is supposed to pass for comedy, but recent events have
surpassed what is on the screen.
 It is not the fault of the filmmakers that real life has overtaken reel
life. And I can only presume that the writers of "Idle Hands," Terri Hughes
and Ron Milbauer, were trying to make some statement about today's young
people and their values in a satiric vein.
 However, it's hard to laugh at death these days, especially ones involving
young people. With the real horrors of the world put before us on
television, a stale pastry such as "Idle Hands" should be held from release
for a few weeks or months to give us time to catch our collective breaths.
 "Idle Hands" is bad, no matter the circumstances in the world outside. But
the context of recent events only heightens its shortcomings. The time is
not right for this type of movie.
 And as far as "Idle Hands" goes, the time may never be right. This is a
movie that shoud be consigned to the trash bin of cinema.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Krippendorf's Tribe (1998)
 Krippendorf's Tribe  is an old-fashioned piece of fluff from Touchstone
Pictures, one of the Disney studio's subsidiaries.
 This is no coincidence, as the movie has that quaint kind of feeling as if
it were from the old Disney factory of the late 1950s or early '60s. Only,
to accommodate the '90s, this film adds a few profanities and a hint of
sex.
  Otherwise, 40 or 30 years ago, this comedy could have starred Fred
MacMurray or Dean Jones, instead of Richard Dreyfuss. And someone such as
Suzanne Pleshette could have played the Jenna Elfman role, while Annette,
Tommy Kirk or Kurt Russell and little "Moochie" would have nicely filled
the roles of the professor's children.
 The slight story is about ant anthropology professor who, after the death
of his wife-partner, goes through burn out. Instead of using his grant
money to find a lost tribe of aborigines in New Guinea, he spends the money
on food and to make house payments.
 Comes the day of his long-awaited lecture concerning the discovery of his
lost tribe, and poor Professor Krippendorf, at the prodding of a pushy
former student-turned-anthropologist (Elfman), pulls himself together long
enough to con his way through his talk in which he creates a fictitious
tribe, the Shelmikedmu, named after his children, Shelley, Mickey and
Edmund.
 The entire fluff snowballs, as things usually do in such comedies, until
the professor drafts his kids into being the "natives" he filmed on his
expedition by faking scenes in his own back yard.
 The rest, of course, is predictable, but that does not diminish the
movie's fun. Familiarity, in this case, does not breed contempt, but rather
a comfortable expectation of what's ahead.
  The performances are a bit over the top, especially those of Dreyfuss and
Lily Tomlin, who plays his academic rival.
  Elfman has an effervescent presence that carries over from her Dharma and
Greg  TV sitcom, only here she is more worldly and conniving than her
small-screen counterpart.
 Krippendorf's Tribe is a family film with several laughs and a few
misfires. It's a junk-food movie that can be easily digested without fear
of any after-effects.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Enemy of the State, starring Will Smith, Gene Hackman and Jon Voight
2 1/2 stars out of 4
 Depending on your level of paranoia, you will either scoff at Enemy of the
State or check your toothbrush, smoke alarm, cell phone and various items
of clothing to see if Big Brother is indeed monitoring every moment of your
life.
 Enemy of the State builds upon the concept that ours, because of video
camera, spy satellites and other technological marvels, is a world in which
privacy is a quickly becoming an illusion.
 As chief villain Jon Voight explains, soon the only privacy will be what's
in your head.
 As the film opens, a congressional committee is looking at a bill that
will allow the government to conduct unfettered surveillance of its
citizens. After all, supposedly lots of people out there - in and out of
the country - hate the United States and its way of life and want to
destroy it. Thus the justification for the bill's passage.
 To get what he wants, Voight, a top government official, resorts to
murder. Unbeknownst, at least at the outset, to Voight and his team of
techno-nerds, is that the crime was caught on tape.
 This discovery sets off a chain of events that eventually involves Robert
Dean (Will Smith), a labor lawyer whose life is turned upside down - and
for most of the proceedings he doesn't even know why.
 It seems he was slipped a copy of the incriminating footage copied onto a
computer disk, and Voight's operatives are trying to retrieve it wouth
tipping their hands.
 What makes Enemy of the State work, and it does up until the last reel, is
the little voice it sets off in the back of your mind. Sure, it's fiction,
a movie.
 But, does the government have the capabilities to watch our every move,
and if it does, are we being spied upon right now.
 The movie plays off the now common usage of video cameras everywhere - in
restaurants, department store changing rooms, sky cams, cameras that
monitor busy intersections.
 Do they all feed into a mainframe somewhere that the government can log
onto the check up on us? Possible, but highly, improbable. Or is it?
 Eventually Dean teams up with a former operative (Gene Hackman) and all is
made right with the world - or at least Dean's portio of it.
 Director Tony Scott keeps the paranoia level high, continually showing
scenes of a spy satellites being moved around merely to spy on one
individual, while his operatives plant bugs and transmitters on Dean's
clothes, shoes, phone and pen.
 But eventually Scott and and his four screenwriters run out of imagination
and resort to a ludicrious finale involving a stereotypical Mafia boss, who
acts like a grade Z Don Corleone.
 This nearly destroys all the nearly one hour and 45 minutes that lead up
to this point.
 Smith works very well as the confused, but determined lawyer who is in
over his head, and completely unaware of the machinations going on around
him.
 As in Independence Day and Men in Black, Smith works best when paired with
an older, more experienced actor. In ID4 it was Jeff Goldblum, Tommy Lee
Jones created chemistry in Men in Black, and in Enemy of the State, Smith
teams with Hackman, as a disheveled, semi-paranoid ex-operative who helps
Dean regain his life and in the process, gets one for himself.
 The real treat is watching the young supporting actors who play Voight's
team of computer nerds who treat the entire affair as if it the planet was
their own private video screen and we were all pawns they could move around
in a game of life and death.
 They're not evil, per se, just deadened. They have lost their humanity to
their computers and are either unconcerned or unaware of the havoc they
wreak.
 Enemy of the State is a colorful political thriller. You may find it
perposterous or you may think it hits too close to him - maybe too close.
Either way, after seeing it, you'll be more conscious of the technology
surrounding you.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)

 Boys Don't Cry (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Hilary Swank, Chloe
Sevigny, Peter Sarsgaard and Brendon Sexton III. Directed by Kimberly
Peirce.
 Like most of us Teena Brandon was seeking love, yearning for that someone
to hold her, comfort her, grow old with and accept her for who she was.
 Unfortunately, Teena herself did not know who she was. But she did realize
who she wanted to be.
 Teena's true story is told in "Boys Don't Cry," a wrenching and tragic
look at a confused individual searching for love as well as identity.
 Teena admits to suffering from a "sexual identity crisis." Teena dresses
like a man. She binds her breasts, stuffs a sock into the crotch of her
blue jeans and cruises bars. She calls herself Brandon Teena.
 Women are attracted to Brandon because he is non-threatening and treats
them with respect and kindness.
 Teena insists she is not a lesbian, that she is a man trapped in a woman's
body. Her dream is to undergo sex transformation surgery.
 Run out of her hometown of Lincoln, Neb., Teena as Brandon arrives in the
small town of Falls City, Neb., where she befriends Lana (Chloe Sevigny) as
well as Lana's crowd, which includes two ex-cons, John (Peter Sarsgaard)
and Tom (Brendon Sexton III).
 All goes well for Brandon at first. His new friends treat him as one of
the guys. They good naturedly tease Brandon about his slight demeanor to
which he confesses to John and Tom that he is a "wuss." Even so, they
accept him.
 Complications arrive when Brandon and Lana fall in love, and when
Brandon's past catches up with her.
 The truth when revealed ignites a chain of events culminating in rape and
murder.
 "Boys Don't Cry" is a sensitive, compelling drama that will rivet you for
its nearly two-hour run. It is a movie that will emotionally drain you
while forcing you to confront your feelings about people who live outside
what our society considers the norm.
 It is unflinchingly brutal and candidly tender.
 As Teena/Brandon Hilary Swank is a revelation. Best remembered as the star
of "The Next Karate Kid", the last and weakest film in that unlamented
series, she has come a long way from the young girl who only seemed to be
able to glower, pout or smile.
 Here she fleshes out a young person who seems at odds not only with the
world, but with herself. Swank, lowering her voice and barely speaking
above a whisper, always seems to be checking herself. She appears forever
to be wanting to shed her skin.
 Swank gives a poignant and courageous performance, one in which she is
forced to expose herself physically as well as emotionally.
 She seems to tiptoe through her world, afraid that at any moment someone
will expose her secret.
 As Brandon she doesn't act macho, but stays in character as the quiet,
rather sensitive, shy person she appears to be.
 When trapped in her lie, her eyes show the panic of a snared animal.
 Swank's Teena is a victim, not a protagonist. When she is brutally
punished by John and Tom for her deception, she accepts the abuse and
humiliation, feeling she deserved it.
 When the five Academy Award nominees for best actress are announced in
February, Swank's name definitely will be among them. She gives the
strongest female performance of 1999, bar none.
 Sevigny's Lana is another victim. A young girl with low self-esteem, her
confidence is bolstered by Brandon's sweet affection and attention.
 Even when graphically confronted with the truth about Brandon's gender,
she stubbornly continues to call her lover "he."
 Sevigny and Swank's love scenes are sensuous without being sordid.
 Sevigny's performance here is even better than her recent portrayal in
"American Beauty."
As John, Sarsgaard is a walking psychopath. One powerful scene has him
playing with his baby daughter, his eyes all aglow with warmth and love.
The next moment, she wets him and he explodes with an animalistic rage
capable of killing. It is a foreshadowing of things to come.
 Director Kimberly Peirce, who co-wrote the script with Andy Bienen, shows
an affection for her subject as well as a balanced objectivity. She is
sympathetic to Teena/Brandon's plight but is not afraid to show her flaws,
her willingness to flirt with danger and discovery and the thrill it
engenders. Nor does Peirce pull back from showing Teena/Brandon as a user
who steals a blank check from one friend, and continually imposes herself
on a cousin whenever she needs a safe haven.
 How good is "Boys Don't Cry?" At the end I wanted to hate John and Tom,
but couldn't because Peirce and Bienen - with able assistance from
Sarsgaard and Sexton - have created such well-rounded individuals that you
understood their motivations and, while not condoning their actions, you
could at least appreciate their disgust and outrage.
 "Boys Don't Cry" is an achievement, one of the best movies of the year. It
is gloomy, overpowering and black, a movie that will stir your soul and
your psyche.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
 You can't help but laugh during Dr. Dolittle.
 And the funny thing is, it has nothing to do with Eddie Murphy.
 The laughs are generated by the lines coming from the mouths of the
various animals who turn Dr. Dolittle's life into a zoo.
 It's shows how the funny have fallen when a guinea pig, tiger, dog and a
couple of pigeons can upstage Eddie Murphy.
 Not that Murphy isn't funny, but he basically is playing straight man to a
menagerie. Most of the laughs he inspires are not from his lines, but from
reacting to the lines and situations created by others.
 It's just a little sad to see Murphy, who brought such savvy, sass,
attitude and a hint of the rebel, to such movies as 48 HRS, Trading Places
and the first Beverly Hills Cop, being in a position in which he has to be
second banana.
 Despite these underpinnings, Dr. Dolittle is a most enjoyable romp, one
that the kids will enjoy.
 Basically an updating of the clunky old Rex Harrison late '60s musical of
the same title, this Dr. Dolittle is set in contemporary San Francisco.
Whereas Harrison's Dr. D talked to the animals by learning their language,
Murphy's doc just hears them talking to him in English.
 It seems he was born with this ability. But, as a child, his father,
fearing his son would be ostracized for his gift, had young John Dolittle
"exorcised." The trauma led the boy to block out his unique talent.
 Only as an adult, after a bump on the head from a car accident in which he
swerved his vehicle to miss a dog, does the power return.
 Of course, Dolittle thinks he's going crazy. But eventually he learns to
accept his role as friend and doctor to the animals and everything works
out all right in the end.
 The script by Nat Mauldin and Larry Levin is a bit weak, improbable and
filled with plot holes. Yet, they are benignly overlooked because of the
animal antics.
 They also rely on an overabundance of animal scatalogical humor.
 And it is the vocal talents of these unseen stars that carry Dr. Dolittle.
 The juiciest lines go to Norm MacDonald as Lucky, the stray dog adopted by
Dolittle, and Chris Rock as Rodney, the pet of Dolittle's daugther, Maya.
 Albert Brooks brings a touch of melancholy to the part of an ill tiger,
while Garry Shandling is in fine form as a neurotic pigeon. He is
complemented by Julie Kavner as his female partner.
 Other contributors include the annoyingly funny Gilbert Gottfried as a
compulsive dog who only likes to play fetch, and Reni Santoni and John
Leguizamo as a couple of wise-cracking rats.
 This Dr. Dolittle, directed by Betty Thomas (who also directed The Brady
Bunch Movie), is a straight comedy.
 It's filled with laughs and it's entertaining.
 But, one sad aspect sticks in your subconscious. They could have made this
movie without Eddie Murphy. Basically, any other comic actor - Steve
Martin, for example, could have played the doctor.
 Is this a portend on path of Murphy's career - remaking and updating old
movies? First, The Nutty Professor, now Dr. Dolittle. What next, Gilligan's
Island.
 Murphy is a charismatic performer on screen. We can only hope that these
successful outings are the impetus to get him back into the style of comedy
he knows and does best.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
You can e-mail him at bloom@journal-courier.com.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
 He's leaner, more agile and meaner, no longer the plodding, campy
guy-in-the-rubber suit stomping cities constructed of paper maiche and
balsa.
 After all the hype about "size does matter," the Independence Day
moviemaking team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin have created a wild,
but uneven, amusement park of a monster movie.
 Godzilla takes the "star" of 22 Japanese films, most of which were
targeted for children, and turns him loose in the city that never sleeps -
and probably never will again.
 Godzilla, like Emmerich and Devlin's Independence Day, is the perfect
summer movie; heavy on special effects and action, light on the dramatics
and sprinkled with dashes of humor.
 In appearance and actions, this giant lizard is unlike the one moviegoers
have come to recognize. The only similarity between the original Godzilla
and his American counterpart is that both were spawned by nuclear testing.
 But while the original - called Gojira and released barely nine years
after the atomic blasts that destroyed Hiroshima and Nagasaki - carried a
somber warning about the dangers of nuclear testing, this latest
incarnation barely glosses over that aspect.
 At nearly two hours and 20 minutes, Godzilla speeds along, except for a
long stretch about three-fourths of the way through when the big guy is off
the screen.
 Director Emmerich keeps building the suspense for the first full-length
appearance of Godzilla.
 As the film opens, a Japanese freighter is destroyed in the South Pacific,
but all the audience sees are flashes of claws and a tail, but it hears the
monster's roar.
 The scene next shifts to Panama where enormous footprints are found. Later
in the waters off New England, three fishing trawlers are dragged under the
North Atlantic.
 Emmerich is teasing, building for the inevitable monster-in-New York mayhem.
 And it is not long in coming. Once Godzilla comes ashore at the Fulton
Fish Market, the movie's pace accelerates. Buildings are destroyed,
vehicles are flattened as Godzilla runs amok through the Big Apple.
 Battling this big beast is Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), a Nuclear
Regulatory Commission biologist pulled from his three-year project in the
Ukraine of studying the growth of earthworms caused by leaking radiation
from the Chernobyl nuclear plant.
 Broderick is no heavyweight hero. He brings a nerdish, brainy, boyish, but
competent air to his character. He is more in awe of Godzilla, wishing to
study and understand rather than destroy him.
 The design of the monster, created by Patrick Totopoulos (he did such a
wonderful job that the filmmakers named the lead character in his honor),
is superb.
 Unlike the Japanese, who merely placed a man in a rubber suit and had him
plod through miniature sets, Totopoulos' Godzilla is a multifaceted
creation. He runs, leaps, walks upright and on all fours. He snaps, lunges,
dives and swims.
In looks, he's a bit of H.R. Giger's Alien, and the raptors and T-Rex from
Jurassic Park.
 With the help of computer generated effects, it actually looks like this
mountainous monster is leveling the greatest city on earth.
 Pointing out the film's flaws are superfluous as it will not keep anyone
from seeing the movie.
 First the female characters, especially Maria Pitillo as Audrey, Nick's
ex-girlfriend, are superficial and lame. She's a wanna-be reporter who uses
the crisis the further her career, but the monster displays more
personality than her character.
 Secondly, the movie's script is a bit too cute for it's own good. The
mayor of New York, played loudly by Michael Lerner, is a short, round,
gray-haired individual named Ebert, whose campaign slogan is the thumbs-up
sign. His top aide, with whom he always seems to be arguing, is a tall,
thin balding man named Gene.
 Near the finale, Godzilla begins to sputter and shifts tone, becoming an
extended ripoff of the raptor chase sequence from Steven Spielberg's
Jurassic Park. Only this deadly hide-and-seek match is set in Madison
Square Garden.
 Besides Broderick, fine performances are turned in by Jean Reno as a
mysterious French agent who also wants to see Godzilla stopped, and Hank
Azaria as Animal, the fearless news videographer who if need be will get in
the lizard's face for a shot.
 Godzilla is a full-throttle, special effects extravaganza. It has disposed
of the serious baggage of the original, while keeping just a touch of
campiness of the many sequels.
Nor has it not gone to the extreme, as did the later Japanese movies, of
transforming Godzilla into a good guy battling other monsters to save the
planet.
 This Godzilla is a competent mix of thrills, chills, explosions and humor.
The finale, of course, is open-ended. A sequel or two or three is
inevitable.
 So grab your bucket of popcorn and check your thinking cap at the door.
Godzilla is pure summer candy.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Object of My Affection, The (1998)

 The Object of My Affection (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jennifer
Aniston, Paul Rudd, Tim Daly and Nigel Hawthorne.
 The Object of My Affection is not a simple boy-girl love story.
It's actually a boy-boy, boy-girl, boy-boy, boy-girl love story.
George (Paul Rudd), a teacher, learns at a dinner party thrown by the
parents of one of his young pupils that he is about to be dumped by his
lover, Robert (Tim Daly).
 To atone for her faux paus, Nina (Jennifer Aniston) offers George the
spare bedroom in her Brooklyn apartment.
 Nina, a social worker, is dating Vince (John Pankow, cousin Ira on Mad
About You), a civil liberties lawyer, who tries to run her life.
 When Nina discovers she is pregnant by Vince, she decides she would rather
have George help her raise the child than Vince. Nina and George fall in
love with each other, but their relationship remains platonic.
 They have an "understanding." If Nina - or George - finds another man,
they are free to bring him to the apartment. But, since they are so happy
together, neither is looking.
 That is, until George meets Paul, who is involved with an older man,
Rodney, who ...
 The Object of My Affection, with a Wendy Wasserstein screenplay based on a
novel by Stephen McCauley, works as an odd sort of romantic comedy. And
that's strange, because most of the main characters, especially George and
Nina, are basically self-centered individuals who leave broken hearts
strewn all over New York and Brooklyn as they search for happiness.
 They are not mean. They don't hurt others deliberately. Even if you can't
respect them, you can like and even empathize with them.
 Aniston is a lovely actress with a winning personality. Rudd exudes a
sexual charisma. Their characters have frailties we can recognize in
ourselves, which compensates for the movie's undercurrent of pain and makes
the film a success.
 This may seem an odd project for director Nicholas Hytner, whose previous
credits were the costume dramas The Madness of King George and the screen
adaptation of Arthur Miller's The Crucible.
 Hytner allows the audience to get to know the various characters, which
include Nigel Hawthorne in the small but dignified role of Paul's rejected
older partner.
 Considering all the hurt that people inflict on one another throughout the
movie, The Object of My Affection is civilized. Maybe it needed more of an
edge. Maybe George and Nina's self-absorption should have been emphasized
more strongly. But it's difficult to get an audience to root for
disagreable protagonists in a love story. Difficult, but not impossible.
 The Object of My Affection is a crowd-pleasing movie. Perhaps Wasserstein
and Hytner should not have worried about being so appealing. It may have
made for a better movie.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
Halloween H20: 20 Years Later, starring Jamie Lee Curtis and Adam Arkin
1 1/2 stars out of 4
 Twenty years ago Halloween was a groundbreaker, an intense, scary,
shockfest that held you breathless from start to finish.
  It introduced most of the modus operendi of what became known as the
"slasher" film; linking sexual promiscuity, especially that of teen-age
girls, to death; the jump-into-frame bump; the unstoppable killer.
 Without Halloween, they'd be no Jasons and no Freddie Kruegers. I will
leave it to the sociologists to determine whether that is a good or bad
thing.
 Kevin Williamson, the writer of Scream and Scream 2, was profoundly
influenced by Halloween. It's obvious in his works.
 Now, he serves as executive producer of Halloween H2O: 20 Years Later, a
cumbersome title for a cumbersome movie.
 Williamson probably meant this film as a tribute to a work that set him on
his career course. Unfortunately, his writers and director have done a hack
job with this latest incarnation in the deadly exploits of Michael Myers.
 Ignorning all the sequels that came after Halloween 2, H2O's story picks
up 20 years after that infamous Halloween night back in Illinois in which
Michael massacred half the teen-age population.
 His sister, Laurie Strode, has changed her name to Keri Tate and is
headmistress at a private school in northern California. Reprising her role
as Laurie is Jamie Lee Curtis.
 Her Laurie/Keri is a single mom, a closet alcoholic beset by nightmares
about Michael coming after her.
 And so he does. No explanation is given for where Michael came from or how
he even knew how to begin to look for his long-lost sister.
 But before you can say butcher knife, Michael has murdered his way to
California and is making plans to skewer Laurie and anyone else within his
grasp.
  H2O is a pale imitation of the original. But, to be fair, this is not so
much the fault of the filmmakers, as it is with the changing times.
  So many films has copied and ripped off the original Halloween formula
that instead of being one step behind the filmmaker, as in the original,
the audience is one step ahead.
  Yes H2O offers some frights. It has its share of people jumping out of
corners into into the frame, red-herring screeching music that sets the
audience on edge, but signifies nothing. Yet it is now so familiar, so
predictable that it elicits laughs instead of screams.
  H2O may be meant as a homage, but nearly comes off as parody, especially
in the over-the-top finale.
  Curtis is too good an actress to allow the weak material to underwhelm
her. She makes Laurie/Keri's fears palatable. She does not condescend to
the material. It's a shame the script never is able to reach her artistic
level.
  The rest of the cast is merely there to be victims. Adam Arkin really has
nothing to do as the school's counselor, who also happens to be Laurie's
lover.
  Only LL Cool J as the school's romance-writing security guard offers some
originality.
  Other Halloween H2O is merely just another cliched entry into the
overstuffed trunk of slasher films. And it's a sad commentary on the
audience that we can laugh at all these gruesome proceedings without
feeling a bit of pity or empathy for the plight of those Michael is
stalking.
 The vast number of these movies have so overwhelmed our senses that we
have become immune to any normal reaction - except perhaps to keep a body
count.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
You can reach him by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
The Wild Wild West (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Will Smith, 
Kevin Kline, Salma Hayek and Kenneth Branagh. Directed by Barry 
Sonnenfeld.
 The West is neither very wild nor very funny in The Wild Wild West, the 
latest in a tiresome stream of adaptations of old television shows.
 Starring Will Smith as suave secret agent James West, the movie appears 
to need a jump start as it lurches from situation to situation.
 And, of course, the writers  six are credited, two for the story and 
four for the screenplay, a bad sign  have, in their infinite wisdom, 
sought to "improve" on the concept of the '60s TV series.
 Thus, Artemus Gordon (a hammy Kevin Kline) is not merely West's friend 
and assistant. No, here he's a U.S. marshal  a rival to West, at first 
 who, like in the TV series, is a master of disguise. But the writers 
do him one better, transforming him into a scientific genius who is 
always devising new and useful gadgets to extricate himself and West 
from various predicaments.
 The only saving grace to this campy confection is Smith, who breezes 
through the proceedings unconcerned about the ludicrous situations.
 Unlike Robert Conrad, who in the TV series was supposed to be suave and 
debonair, Smith's James West is a shoot-first, ask-questions-later type 
of hero.
 He is a smooth talker and a charmer, but he sounds more the con-artist 
than cultured government agent.
 What is embarrassing is watching Kenneth Branagh chew up the screen as 
the evil Dr. Loveless. He affects as thick a Southern accent that hasn't 
been heard on screen since Vivien Leigh complained about "War, war war!" 
in Gone With the Wind.
 The story, what little there is, revolves around Loveless' attempts to 
break up the United States and reclaim the honor of the South following 
its defeat in the Civil War.
 The chemistry that should exist between partners West and Gordon is nil.
 And the same goes for the actors portraying them. Throughout the movie 
it seems that Smith and Kline merely recite lines to one another, that 
they have not developed any rapport.
 Lovely Salma Hayek is wasted as the damsel in distress. She isn't in 
much danger, nor does she seem to be distressed that much.
 Director Barry Sonnenfeld, his actors and writers cannot seem to decide 
if they want to play the movie straight, tongue-in-cheek or campy, so 
they meander through all three with very mixed results.
 The Wild Wild West is a disappointment. Smith fans will enjoy this movie 
because their star gets most of the good one-liners. Other than that, 
there is no reason to go West, young people.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
The Matrix (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Keanu Reeves, Laurence
Fishburne, Carrie-Anne Moss and Hugo Weaving.
 Ever have the feeling that you were living in someone's dream? That there
was something wrong with the world around you, but you really couldn't put
your finger on what it was?
 That about sums up The Matrix, a science fiction thriller that owes a debt
to the writings of Phillip K. Dick and William Gibson, as well as to the
imaginations of Larry and Andy Wachowski, who wrote and directed the movie.
 The Matrix is about a world run by computers and machines, in which humans
are bred as energy sources to keep the machines running. Only the humans
are kept in a virtual reality world in which they believe they are leading
normal lives.
 However, a group of freedom fighters, led by Morpheus (Laurence
Fishburne), are striving to end this domination. But to do so, they need to
find "the one," the individual who has the power to overcome the machines.
 That person is Thomas Anderson, alias Neo (Keanu Reeves), a renowned hacker.
Neo is recruited by Morpheus and his group to lead humanity's fight to
regain control of the planet and of their lives.
 The Matrix is basically a special effects extravaganza in which the human
actors are merely props to bounce around in front of green screens.
Kind of ironic, isn't it, that a movie about a future in which machines
dominate is dependent for success on the very machines the movie is warning
us about.
Even at two hours and 15 minutes, The Matrix is a perpetual motion flick.
The action hardly lets up.
 The performances are adequate, but that is all that is necessary.
 Reeves is rather stoic as the Christ-like Neo. It's difficult to picture
him as the savior of humanity, but he is able to pull it off with the right
amount of incredulity and panache.
 At first Reeves' Neo finds Morpheus' claims hard to believe. But when he
is eventually convinced, he joins the resistance without reservation.
 The Matrix has some nice touches. Much discussion surrounds the oracle, an
all-knowing individual who is the spiritual leader of the resistance. It's
a nice touch when she is revealed as a middle-aged black woman (Gloria
Foster) working in her kitchen baking cookies.
 Carrie-Anne Moss is Trinity, another of the resistance fighters who adds
spunk as Neo's comrade-in-arms and later love interest.
 Fishburne is stoic and stalwart as Morpheus, while Hugo Weaving is vile as
the robotic Mr. Smith, one of the brutal guardians of the matrix.
 The Matrix is fun. It's thought-provoking, especially if you are touched
with a pinch of paranoia.
 It's loud, explosive and a movie science fiction fans will appreciate.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Serendipity (2001)
SERENDIPITY (2001). 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John Cusack, Kate Beckinsale,
Jeremy Piven, Molly Shannon, John Corbett, Bridget Moynahan and Eugene Levy.
Written by Marc Klein. Directed by Peter Chelsom. Rated PG-13. Approx. 85 mins.
 Serendipity. What an apt title for a contemporary romantic comedy set in a
magical, fairy tale New York. 
 Yet through circumstances far beyond its control, this movie may stand as a
poignant reminder of what New York once was  and may someday be again. 
 It is difficult to watch this sweet outing without thinking about the horrors
that hit the Big Apple. Luckily, no scenes take place at the World Trade Center,
and it is only glimpsed for a second in an opening shot panorama of the city. 
 Yet its loss weighs heavily on this movie. 
 Because for now the wound is too fresh. It is difficult to think of New York as
a city of romance and love, when daily television reminds us of the death and
destruction that wounded its core. 
 Serendipity has become a slice of nostalgia before it even hits the theaters.
 The movie is one of those cute-meet, boy-girl stories that can only happen on
the big screen.  John (John Cusack) and Sara (Kate Beckinsale) meet over the
glove counter at Bloomingdales when both try to purchase the same pair of gloves
for their respective paramours. 
 They soon forget about the gloves and spend a magical evening roaming the city,
from Rockefeller Center to Central Park, luxuriating in each other's company. It
is love at first sight - or is it. Sara is a big believer in fate. She tells
John that if it is their destiny to be together, that they will find each other
again. She writes her name and phone number in a book, which she then sells at a
second-hand bookshop. 
 John, meanwhile, writes his name and number on $5 bill, which Sara spends. Her
logic - which, of course, is only credible in the movies - is that if they are
destined for each other, the $5 will come back to her, and John will eventually
find the book containing her name and number. 
 A few years pass, and it is the weekend of John's wedding. But, something is
nagging at him, so he recruits his best friend, Dean (Jeremy Piven), and they
begin seeking Sara. 
 Sara, who has moved to San Francisco, also is soon to be married. Her betrothed
is a self-absorbed New Age musician, Lars (John Corbett). She, too, decides to
go searching and shanghai's her best friend, Eve (Molly Shannon), and whisks her
off to New York. 
 You can already guess how all this turns out. 
 As usual, Cusack turns in a winning performance as the young romantic who - no
matter how hard he tries - cannot erase that one special night from his mind.
Cusack is one of those actors who - even with such routine material as
Serendipity - can transform the material into more than it is. If Cusack was a
chef, he could change ground beef into filet mignon. 
 Beckinsale is charming and resourceful as Sara. She is a lovely actress, easy
on the eyes. A nice chemistry develops between her and Cusack. 
 One minor objection is the sort of heartless manner in which John and Sara just
dump their prospective life partners at the last minute. It detracts from the
characters, giving them an air of unfeeling selfishness and self-centeredness.
 Neither's intended really seems to deserve such an emotionally painful
departure. Wisely for director Peter Chelsom both breakups occur off-screen. 
 Serendipity is a warm vessel with likable stars and an escapist story. If you
don't think too much about its setting, it is an enjoyable diversion. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found by going to www.jconline.com and clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Hardball (2001)
HARDBALL (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Keanu Reeves, Diane Lane, John
Hawkes, D.B. Sweeney, Mike McGlone, and Graham Beckel, Screenplay by John
Gatins, based upon the book by Daniel Coyle. Directed by Brian Robbins. Rated
RG-13. Approx. 106 minutes. 
 Many factors contribute to the distant nature of Hardball: the flimsy
characterizations, the plot clichés, the overall familiar feel of this
comedy-drama. 
 Hardball may sound like an inner-city remake of The Bad News Bears, but the
sunny, light touch of that film is nowhere to be found in this somber feature.
Part of Hardball's lack of spontaneity can be blamed on its star, Keanu Reeves.
He is a talented performer, but not a  charismatic one who can grab an audience
and hold it to his bosom. 
In Hardball, Reeves plays Conor O'Neill, a degenerate gambler who owes thousands
to various bookies. 
To help erase his debt, he takes over - for $500 a week -from a busy investment
banker pal as coach of an inner-city Little League team. 
Of course, O'Neill cares nothing about the kids under his charge. It's merely a
means of getting money for his weekly payoffs. But, as happened to crusty Walter
Matthau in Bad News Bears, the youngsters eventually get under O'Neill's skin,
sparking a regeneration and transforming him into a warm and caring individual.
 But questions remain: How and why is O'Neill the way he is? No one is born a
compulsive gambler, risking life and limb on the throw of the dice or a shot at
the buzzer. 
 We only get a surface picture of this desperate hustler. 
 His young charges are merely types: Loud, brash youngsters who look and act
older than their ages because of the circumstances life has dealt them. 
 Showing the wretched and sometimes deadly conditions these young boys must
routinely face is what sets Hardball apart. For these youngsters, fear is a
constant companion. 
 Escorting one child to his door, O'Neill notices the family sitting on the
floor watching television. Asked why, the young man matter-of-factly tells his
coach that it's to keep low and avoid stray bullets. 
 The young men who comprise O'Neill's team are heart warmers.  For them the
baseball diamond is a refuge. Watching them come together as a team is
inspiring. 
 But the script really fails to address how O'Neill sparks these rambunctious
youngsters to solidify into a united force. In one scene he orders them to stop
the trash talk amongst themselves, and before you can say Sammy Sosa, they are
do-or-die teammates. 
 Hardball may bring a tear to your eye, especially when the dangers of the
projects are tragically brought home to O'Neill and his team. Yet, even this
feels more like a clichéd standard plot device than the natural course of
action. 
 What Hardball needed was a larger-than-life actor, one who can inspire, for the
part of Conor O'Neill. Reeves is competent and can ably show angst, but he lacks
the warmth required to pull off the part. 
 Hardball has a few moments of truth. The rest, however, feels like your
watching a game replay. 
 Bob Bloom isthe film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Bloom's reviews also can be found by logging into www.jconline.com and clicking
on golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)

 ChickenRun (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Featuring the vocal talents of
Mel Gibson, Julia Sawalha, Miranda Richardson, Jane Horrocks, Imelda
Staunton, Benjamin Whitrow, Lynn Ferguson, Tony Haygarth, Timothy Spall
and Phil Daniels. Screenplay by Karey Kirkpatrick and Jack Rosenthal.
Directed by Peter Lord and Nick Park. Rated G.
While a student at Ohio University in the late 60s (1960s, that is),
the university had a program called the MIA, which stood for Movies in
Auditorium.
 Every Friday and Saturday night, students would troop to Mem Aud, as we
called Memorial Auditorium, to see a not-so-old movie.
 Two of the most popular - they were screened every quarter - were "The
Magnificent Seven" and "The Great Escape." I saw the latter so many
times that by my senior year, I'd be whistling along with "The Great
Escape's" music track over the opening titles.
 What brought this wave of nostalgia to mind was "Chicken Run," a
wonderfully daft Claymation comedy from the team behind the popular
Oscar-winning `Wallace and Gromit' shorts.
 Trapped behind barbed wire, a group of prisoners plot their escape.
Time after time, they try and fail to flee their barbaric surroundings.
 Only these prisoners are chickens and their stalag is Tweedy's Chicken
Farm where certain death awaits any chicken who doesn't meet her egg
quota.
 Led by Ginger (voiced by Julia Sawahla of "Absolutely Fabulous" fame),
the hens devise plan after plan, including such classic ruses as
tunneling under the compound and cutting through the barbed wire.
 "Chicken Run" utilizes all the clichés from the classic p.o.w.-escape
genre and, in doing so, brings off one of the most entertaining vehicles
of the year.
 For the movie takes all the stereotypical elements found in such
adventures and endows those characteristics in chickens. There's the
Scottish engineer who's always calculating the probability of success or
failure and the veteran sergeant-major type who believes in maintaining
discipline and tradition even under the most dire circumstances.
 Then there''s the solitary Yank, the cocky American who assures the
chickens he can lead them in a successful mass exodus.
 Rocky (voiced by Mel Gibson) crash lands in the compound, creating the
mistaken belief that he can fly. Rocky enjoys all the clucking and
fussing. But he neglects to inform the others that the only way he can
take to the air is to be shot out of a cannon. Rocky, it is learned, is
an escapee from a nearby circus.
 Cocky Rocky (he calls himself `the lone free-ranger') bamboozles the
hens until the truth is uncovered. But the indomitable Ginger won't give
up, leading to a soaring, splendid finale.
 "Chicken Run" is witty and charming in that veddy, veddy understated
British manner. As directed by Peter Lord and Nick Park, you soon forget
the characters are merely clay figures moved frame-by-frame by hand.
 There are no computer-generated images here. This movie was done the
old-fashioned way, one shot at a time. And the care shows.
 "Chicken Run" contains some wonderful moments. Continually thrown into
`solitary' (actually a coal bin) for her many escape attempts, Ginger,
at one point, begins bouncing a wall off the coal bin wall, a homage to
Steve McQueen and "The Great Escape."
 A wonderfully scary sequence concerns a Rube Goldberg-like contraption
purchased by Mrs. Tweedy who has decided the farm would make more money
selling chicken pies than chicken eggs.
 Ginger, caught in the deadly machinery, is rescued in the nick of time
by Rocky in an exciting sequence.
 The movie's vocal talent is first rate. Gibson gives a sturdy comedic
performance as the self-assured cock of the walk.
 Sawalha is all determination and grit as the leader of the hens, while
Miranda Richardson exudes menace as the evil Mrs. Tweedy, a character
who could cause nightmares for the very young viewers.
 "Chicken Run," at about 80 minutes, never falters. The uplifting finale
will have you cheering. It is an original, entertaining feature the
entire family can enjoy.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in
Lafayette,IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com
or at bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Antz (1998)

 Antz (1998) 4 stars out of 4. Featuring voices of Woody Allen, Sharon
Stone, Sylvester Stallone, Gene Hackman and Chirstopher Walken.
 Antz is a witty, entertaining story about conformity vs. individuality,
the worth of the individual vs. the welfare of the whole and, of course,
true love.
 Oh, it's also about ants. And after seeing this computer-animated feature,
you'll hesitate before trying to crush another one again.
 Featuring an all-star cast of vocal talent, including Woody Allen, Sharon
Stone, Anne Bancroft, Gene Hackman, Sylvester Stallone, Dan Aykroyd, Danny
Glover and Christopher Walken, to name just a few, the story will capture
the interest of young and old viewers.
 And the story is strong enough that you quickly accept that these are
computer-created creatures and get totally involved in their insect lives
and dreams.
 Allen is Z, a worker ant who is tired of being like all the other workers.
He tells his shrink that he "feels insignificant," to which the
psychologist (voiced by director-actor Paul Mazursky) congratulates him on
making a breakthrough. "You are insignificant," he explains to Z.
 At a workers' bar, Z meets Princess Bala, who is slumming away from the
palace. They dance, creating their own steps, thus breaking away from the
others who are marching in step.
 To see her again, the smitten Z trades places with Weaver (Stallone), a
soldier ant. After a dress parade, the soldiers are sent by the mad Gen.
Mandible (Hackman) to make war on the termites.
 Z is the only survivor and is declared a hero.
 Later, Z and Bala share many adventures and thwart Mandible's wild scheme
to begin a new colony.
 It's all fairy tale-like, but in a sense rather adult.
 The script, by Todd Alcott and Chris and Paul Weitz, is droll and quirky,
filled with many zingers and one-liners. The writing, especially that of
Allen's Z, feels as if the writers watched most of Allen's films to get his
vocal cadence and rhythms. In a sense, when Allen speaks, it almost sounds
as if he wrote his own lines.
 What makes Antz successful is that the performers take their roles
seriously. Hackman sounds like a demented Patton, while Walken brings his
usual creepy persona to his role as the general's aide.
 Even Stallone has some fun as the soldier ant, who trades places with Z so
he can meet some female workers.
 Antz is a rewarding experience. It will enchant the children and rivet
their attention. Adults will appreciate the movie's technique and humor.
 It is truly a film for the entire family and a portend of the road the new
Dreamworks studio is creating.
 With this, Steven Spielberg's Saving Private Ryan, and the upcoming Prince
of Egypt, Dreamworks will be a Hollywood innovator.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)

 The Mask of Zorro (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Antonio Banderas,
Anthony Hopkins and Catherine Zeta-Jones.
 The Mask of Zorro is everything you'd want a swashbuckler to be.
 A tale filled with romance, daring deeds, spectacular stunts, stunning
swordplay, dashing heroes, dastardly villains, all done on a
larger-than-life tableaux with a sly bit of tongue-in-cheek.
 This rousing adventure spans 20 years and tells of the aged Don Diego de
la Vega (Anthony Hopkins), the original Zorro, who after languishing in
prison for 20 years escapes and finds an apt pupil, Alejandro Murieta
(Antonio Banderas), to train and take his place. Think of it as a
19th-century "Rapier Kid."
 Don Diego seeks revenge against Don Raphael Montero (Stuart Wilson) who,
as the despised governor of California 20 years earlier, was responsible
for the death of Don Diego's wife, killed in the struggle to capture Zorro.
 Montero, who fled to Spain with Elena, Diego's baby daughter, has returned
to California with the now-grown girl who believes the villain is her
father. Montero's scheme is to buy California from Mexico and establish an
independent nation with himself as leader.
 Thwarting him at every turn is the new, young Zorro, Alejandro, trained by
Diego to be a "servant of the people," to protect them and right wrongs.
 Under the able direction of Martin Campbell (Goldeneye), The Mask of Zorro
is a sweeping adventure with an old-fashioned sensibility, recalling the
days when Errol Flynn and Douglas Fairbanks (Sr. and Jr.) picked up a sword
to defend the helpless, protect the crown and defeat all blackguards.
 However, the movie does offer a nod to the '90s. Elena (the stunning
Catherine Zeta-Jones) is a spunky lass who speaks her mind and can handle a
sword as well as any man.
 Hopkins is wise, patient and determined as the aged Diego, passing on not
only his knowledge of how to handle a sword and whip, but how to outfox the
opposition to his hot-headed student.
 Banderas is charming, a bit self-depreciating and charismatic as the new
man in black. He handles a sword with skill, dances well and woos Elena
with panache and wit.
 Wilson is a fine, brains heavy who leaves much of the dirty work to his
murderous aide, Capt. Love (the handsome and chilling Matt Letscher).
 The duels are exciting and flashy, enhanced by a wonderfully full score by
Academy Award-winner James Horner.
 The Mask of Zorro is a grand time, filled with colorful characters and
grand landscapes. It recalls a time when movies were magical.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
You can e-mail him at bloom@journal-courier.com or at cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)

  Prince of Egypt (1998). 3 stars out of 4. Featuring the voices of Val
Kilmer, Ralph Fiennes, Sandra Bullock, Patrick Stewart, Steve Martin and
Martin Short.
 Bearing as many burdens as the Hebrew slaves it depicts, The Prince of
Egypt strains to keep itself from collapsing under its own weight.
 The Prince of Egypt is the first animated feature from DreamWorks, the
company formed by Steven Spielberg, David Geffen and Jeffrey Katzenberg.
 And if the feature has the look and feel of a Disney product that's
because before co-founding DreamWorks, Katzenberg ran the Disney studio
where he was responsible for such animated films as Beauty and the Beast
and The Lion King.
 One burden overcome by Prince of Egypt is its comparison to the product of
its rival studio.
 The animation in this retelling of the story of Moses is rich and vivid.
You almost can taste the sand.
 The characters' features are complex and multilayered and, given the
story's setting, brown-hued and distinctive.
 Missing, thankfully, is the now-cliched utilization of any talking
animals. No camels pal around with Moses, offering sage advice. No talking
staffs or sphinxes to make the story more palatable for small children.
 The Prince of Egypt is a reverent retelling of the events in the Book of
Exodus.
 And that is another of its burdens. It is too reverential. This is an
animated feature aimed more at adults than children, yet at a kids-friendly
95-plus-minute running time, it comes off as a "Classics Illustrated"
capsulation of a biblical tale.
 Katzenberg sought input from a number of biblical scholars and religious
leaders in shaping his story. He sought to be fair and politically correct.
 His Rameses (voiced by Ralph Fiennes) is no prideful, strutting demi-god
whose fall is God's retribution for failing to heed His words.
 In his efforts to offend no one, Katzenberg has deflated the dramatic
tension from the story.
 It never soars, never reaches that emotional fervor that Cecil B. DeMille
was able to achieve in his four-hour epic, The Ten Commandments.
 Despite its gaudiness and vulgarity, DeMille created larger-than-life
protagonists, an epic battle of good vs. evil. When the Red Sea swallowed
Pharoah's army, you cheered.
 In Prince of Egypt, the characters' humanity is stressed. Moses (voiced by
Val Kilmer) is a conflicted individual, unsure of his worthiness to lead
his people to freedom, uncertain of the powers bestowed on him by his God,
and saddened by the death and destruction rained upon Egypt.
 This Moses is no Charlton Heston booming, "Let my people go!" Rather, he
is a man filled with doubts struggling to do what is right and fulfill his
divine mission.
 Katzenberg and his writer, Philip LaZebnik, have slightly rewritten
history, making Rameses and Moses brothers rather than cousins.
 This heightens their eventual conflict as well as humanizes the gulf that
separates them.
 What Prince of Egypt lacks in drama is compensated by its superb use of
animation as well as computer graphics. It is fluid, rich in texture and
thematically stunning.
 The parting of the Red Sea, the plagues sequence and the opening scenes of
the baby Moses floating down the Nile are the highlights.
 The vocal talents also are first rate. Kilmer makes a most-human Moses,
while Fiennes' Rameses is less a tyrant than a ruler who cannot
conceptualize the scope of his despotism. His refusal to free the slaves is
not based on cruelty and villainy, as it is on continuing the status quo
and not being "the weak link" in a dynastic empire.
 Hans Zimmer has composed a superb score and the songs of Steven Schwartz
are well done, if not memorable. There is no "Circle of Life," or "Color of
the Wind" in Prince of Egypt.
 The tunes have a Semitic air, with "Through Heavens Eyes" and "When You
Believe" among the best.
 The only misstep is "Playing With the Big Boys," a Vegas-like showstopper
performed by Steve Martin and Martin Short as Pharoah's court magicians,
that seems out of place.
 The Prince of Egypt is wonderful filmmaking. It may not reach the grandeur
one expects, but it still touches your heart and soul.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Adventures of Rocky & Bullwinkle, The (2000)

 The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle (2000) 1 star out of 4. Starring
Rocket J. Squirrel, Bullwinkle the Moose, Renee Russo, Jason Alexander,
Robert De Niro, Piper Perabo and Randy Quaid. Special guest appearances
by Jonathan Winters, Carl Reiner, Whoopi Goldberg and Janeane Garofalo.
Written by Kenneth Lonergan. Music by Mark Motherrsbaugh. Directed by
Des McAnuff.
 I wish I could report that "The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle" was
a funny as the TV show. Heck, I wish I could report that it was as funny
as "Me, Myself & Irene."
 Unfortunately, "The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle" plays like it
was produced by people who don't have a clue about the TV show.
It's as if they watched a couple of episodes and failed to get the joke.
 Even as a kid, I grasped that "Rocky and His Friends," as the show was
first called, was not your typical children's cartoon show.
It was hip. You could tell that by the puns, the pop culture references
and the sometimes subversive satire that the show was aimed at a more
sophisticated audience.
 Where does "The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle" go wrong? Oh, where
to begin.
 While Bullwinkle traverses the proceedings in his usual endearing
thick-headed oblivion, Rocky is given a severe case of hero angst.
 Because he has been out of commission for 35 years, Rocky doubts his
ability to once again take to the air. Our champion has developed a fear
about flying.
 Rubbish. Rocket J. Squirrel was - and is - the eternal optimist, never
hesitating the right a wrong or battle villainy.
 The film's other drawbacks lie in its plot as well as with Rocky and
Bullwinkle's new, live-action sidekick.
 The storyline has those dastardly villains from Pottsylvania, Boris,
Natasha and Fearless Leader, jumping from their animated selves to the
live action world.
 Fearless Leader concocts a plan to take over the United States by
creating a TV network, RBTV (Real Bad TV), which will show programs so
awful they will zombify viewers so that F.L. can control their minds and
hypnotize them into electing him president.
 The idea would have been a fine one for the 1960s or '70s, but
obviously Fearless Leader did not channel surf or he would have seen
Jerry Springer, WWF wresting or the Home Shopping Network.
 Meanwhile, eager, young, childlike FBI agent Karen Sympathy (Piper
Perabo) recruits Rocky and Bullwinkle from a depressed Frostbite Falls,
and transports them to the real world to thwart Fearless Leader's plot.
 Here is where Kenneth Lonergan's script makes a wrong turn, for instead
of concentrating on Moose, Squirrel, Boris and Natasha, "The Adventures
of Rocky and Bullwinkle" becomes a road movie, with hour dynamic duo -
plus Sympathy - driving cross-country from Los Angeles to New York for
the final confrontation.
 Along the way, Boris and Natasha, trying to `kill Moose and Squirrel,'
but their efforts in the real world are as inept as in cartoon land.
 You know a movie is in trouble when its funniest moments are the
over-the-top, overwrought narration. Even the punlike word play between
Rocky and Bullwinkle lacks some of the luster of the TV series.
 Some of Bullwinkle's puns hit their target, but they are so few and far
between, you can snooze while awaiting them.
 Jason Alexander and Renee Russo are adequate as the live-action Boris
and Natasha, mostly keeping in the character of their cartoon
counterparts. Unfortunately, they are given very little to do. And the
sight of the two sitting in a Jacuzzi, sipping champagne is totally out
of character.
 The novelty of Robert De Niro's performance as Fearless Leader quickly
wears thin. De Niro has one wonderful scene in which he spoofs the most
famous movie line he ever uttered. But, again, it is too little.
 Perabo, as Karen Sympathy, is just terrible. She acts as if she's in a
high school drama club. Every time she's on the screen, you want to
slink down in your seat until she exits.
  "The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle" will have trouble finding an
audience. It is not funny or cartoonish enough for the younger set,
while it is too slow and weak for an older crowd. And the baby boomers
for whom it is aimed, will probably feel disappointment at the manner in
which their childhood idols are handled.
 "The Adventures of Rocky and Bullwinkle" is a major misfire. The only
ones who should be happy are Boris and Natasha. Universal Pictures
finally succeeded where they always failed - they destroyed Moose and
Squirrel.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
 Rushmore (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jason Schwartzman, Bill
Murray and Olivia Williams.
 Rushmore is one of the most original and quirky, yet charming, movies of
the year.
 Max Fischer (Jason Schwartzman) is a young nerdy type who lives and dies
for his private school.
 What he lacks in grades, he makes up for in enthusiasm and
extra-cirricular activities. This 10th grader is editor of the school
newspaper and yearbook; president of the French Club, German Club, Chess
Club, Astronomy Club; captain of the fencing and debating teams; and
founder and director of the Max Fischer players, who performs plays written
by, who else, Max Fischer.
 Max lives in his own world of denial. He is attending Rushmore Academy on
a scholarship, but is placed on sudden-death academic probation because of
his terrible grades.
 Yet Max continues to blithely to steer his own course. He falls madly in
love with Miss Cross (Olivia Williams), a first-grade teacher. To honor and
impress her, as well as win her favor, he works up a plan to construct an
enormous aquarium in her honor.
 For the money, Max turns to Mr. Blume (Bill Murray), a steel tycoon and
one of the school's biggest benefactors.
 But their friendship unravels when the married Mr. Blume also falls in
love with Miss Cross.
 Best friends become bitter rivals as Max and Blume use whatever means at
their disposal to try to destroy each other.
 Wes Anderson's film, which he directed and co-wrote with Owen Wilson, is
not as dark as parts of it sound.
 It is really rather genial, despite the mayhem that develops between Max
and Blume.
 As Max, Schwartzman is a bit pompous, obtuse, determined, touching and
vulnerable. You admire him while simultaneously hoping he never moves into
your neighborhood.
 Murray is a revelation as the rich Mr. Blume, a man-child with the
emotional stability of a teen-ager. He sinks to childish pranks to thwart
Max's pursuit of Miss Cross. Blume is a man who has difficulty expressing
his feelings. His own twin sons scorn him and he finds a surrogate in Max,
whom he sees as a younger version of himself.
 Rushmore is a delight, a movie that should not be missed. If you're tired
of car chases, disasters and special effects, check out a movie about some
oddball people. You'll be glad you did.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)

 Amistad (1997) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Djimon Hounsou, Matthew
McConaughey, Anthony Hopkins and Morgan Freeman. Directed by Steven
Spielberg.
 The first scene is an extreme close-up of a man's sweaty face as he
struggles mightily to loosen a bolt.
 You neither know who the man is nor the reason for his actions.
 In quick succession, the man successfully loosens the bolt, frees himself
from shackles and then frees others, who gather weapons, attack the crew of
the ship on which they are being held and capture the ship after a short,
but bloody, skirmish.
 These are the opening images of Amistad, Steven Spielberg's film based on
a little-known event in American history.
 The year is 1839 and 53 kidnapped Africans are being transported from Cuba
to begin lives as slaves in America.
 After their shipboard revolt, the Africans spare two crew members and
order them to turn the ship east and head back to Africa. During the day,
the sailors steer into the sun, but at night, when their captors sleep, the
sailors turn the ship toward North America.
 Eventually, the ship winds up off the coast of Long Island, where a U.S.
naval vessel captures the Africans.
 Brought to trial in the United States, the Africans are charged with
murder. However, the situation becomes a political tinderbox as the Spanish
government claims them as property and wants them returned.
 The whirlwind that surrounds this event eventually lands at the doorstep
of the U.S. Supreme Court, and involves an incumbent president, Martin Van
Buren, and a former chief executive, John Quincy Adams.
 Amistad is an earnest examination of one race's fight for their rights and
their freedom. Led by Cinque (Djimon Hounsou), the Africans are confused
and frightened by the international uproar they have unwittingly created.
Yet, they only want one thing - to go home.
 Coming to their defense is a property lawyer, Roger Baldwin (Matthew
McConaughey), whose initial success in winning the Africans their freedom
is sabotaged for political expediency by President Van Buren's minions.
 A reluctant and retired Adams (Anthony Hopkins) must then present their
case before the Supreme Court, seven of whose nine justices are
Southerners.
 This sounds like rather dry material for movie fare, but Spielberg gives
it a deep emotional core. He makes you care about these uprooted people and
their wretched plight. You do more than pity them - you root and pray for
their success.
 The heart of the picture is Cinque. Newcomer Hounsou, a former model whose
previous acting experience includes a Janet Jackson music video, gives a
towering performance.
 A man of great strength and dignity, Cinque finds it difficult to grasp
the various complications and ramifications being woven around him and his
fellow Africans. To Cinque, there is only right or wrong, justice and
injustice.
 Hounsou learned the Mende dialect of West Africa for his role. And though
he speaks an unfamiliar tongue, Hounsou is able to display Cinque's
courage, as well as his vulnerability.
 McConaughey is adequate as Baldwin. Even though his New England accent
comes and goes, he captures the lawyer's passion and fire to do his best
for his clients.
 Hopkins, as Adams, buried under old-man makeup, reveals the spark and
righteousness that age could not dim.
 Morgan Freeman, however, is given little to do as leader of the
abolitionists who adopt the Africans' cause as their own.
 Spielberg's strength, as it was in Schindler's List, is showing the
cruelty one human being can inflict upon another. His recreation of the
Middle Passage, the deadly journey that transported captured Africans from
their homeland across the Atlantic, is as harrowing and horrifying a series
of images as ever put on film.
 And, to his credit, Spielberg has not fallen into the trap of other
filmmakers who have told black history from a white person's viewpoint.
Most of the story and much of the action is told and shown through the eyes
of Cinque and his people.
 In a film in which the lines between right and wrong, good and evil, seem
defined, Spielberg and screenwriter David Franzoni do not stoop to
stereotypical villains to further their cause.
 His antagonists are not villains, per se, but rather flawed men who value
political expediency above morality. They are amoral politicians who feel
they are doing what they must to preserve their country.
 Amistad has its slow moments. Overall, though, it is a riveting
examination of a piece of American history ignored in the textbooks. But it
makes a powerful statement about the value of freedom.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
 "10 Things I Hate About You" is a simplified and simplistic adaptation of
Shakespeare's "The Taming of the Shrew."
 Set at upscale Padua High School, the story revolves around the Stratford
sisters, Kat and Bianca.
 Kat is the school witch, a senior who hates guys and lives by her own
convictions. Bianca is a sophomore, the belle of the school, a popular girl
every guy wants to date.
 But there's no catch. As in the original, Bianca can have nothing to do
with the opposite sex until Kat is wooed. In other words, until Kat gets a
date, Bianca must sit at home and wait.
 The movie deviates from Shakespeare in several aspects, most notably
giving Kat a valid psychological reason for her disdain of boys.
 And while "10 Things I Hate About You" is not as intellectually
stimulating nor as bawdy as the original, it has enough to satisfy young
viewers and give them a sampling of the Bard's wit and style.
 A cast of basically unknown young actors breathe life into this 90-plus
minute confection, led by Julia Stiles as Kat and Heath Ledger as Patrick
Verona, the bad-ass student hired to tame "the shrew."
 The movie lacks weight. It's a fast-food film, easy to digest, but nothing
remarkable or memorable.
 "10 Things I Hate About You" follows in the wake of "Clueless" and "Cruel
Intentions" making the classics palatable for younger audiences. Whether it
stimulates young viewers to the point of actually reading the originals is
problematic.
 Older audiences may find the proceedings juvenile, but "10 Things I Hate
About You" is a fun date movie for the under-25 crowd.
 The only reason Shakespeare would roll over in his grave is any lack of
credit for inspiring this update. Well, that's Hollywood.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Loser (2000)
 Loser (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Jason Biggs, Mena Suvari, Greg
Kinnear, Zak Orth, Tom Sadoski and Jimmi Simpson. Music by David Kitay.
Written and directed by Amy Heckerling. Rated PG-13.
 "Loser" is no winner. This youthful comedy, written and directed by Amy
Heckerling, is rather bland actually.
 It's also a bit sweet. But most of all, it is very uninvolving.
 The movie gives you a feeling of deja vu, that you've seen this story
before - somewhere.
 Maybe it is because Heckerling's characters are ill-defined, lacking
any motivation. They are mostly sketched-in types, plot devices.
 - Paul Tannek (Jason Biggs), the small-town scholarship winner
attending college in the Big Apple. He's a nice guy who no one - well,
at least his three roommates - likes. Why?
 Simple, he's at the university to study and learn, plus he wears a
funny hat.
 Paul's a square. He neither parties nor chases women.
 - Dora Diamond (Mena Suvari), the impressionable student having an
affair with self-centered, smarmy professor Edward Alcott (Greg
Kinnear).
 She is blind to Paul's kindness and affection, while explaining away
the condescending manner in which she is treated by Alcott.
  - Adam (Zak Orth), Noah (Tom Sadoski) and Chris (Jimmi Simpson),
Paul's supposedly ultra-hip, sophisticated roommates, are slugs. They
are so dense, so uncool, that it's difficult to swallow the concept that
they are the guys others want to emulate.
 Heckerling, by creating these three stooges as caricatures, has diluted
the very point she is trying to make.
 Compared to those bums, Paul is a winner. And that seems to be the
film's point.
In the eyes of the audience, Paul is no loser. He is a very nice guy,
though a bit naive and too trusting.
 But Heckerling has stacked the deck too much in his favor.
 The three geeks are such morons they have to stoop to using date-rape
type drugs to procure women.
 Paul, meanwhile, allows them to run roughshod over him. Why? It is
never explained. Obviously, he doesn't want to be like them, nor does he
want their companionship.
 Paul is staying true to himself, being a good guy, helpful to others.
He is smarter than he lets on to others.
 So the big question remains: Why at a big New York university, can Paul
only make contact with three losers, plus one flaky young woman?
 Heckerling ignores that aspect all together.
 The cast, however, makes the most with the material at hand.
 Biggs, so memorable in "American Pie, "is rather passive as Paul. He is
more victim than protagonist. He plays Paul as if he were a blank slate.
You only know him as a decent, quiet guy trying to go along to get
along.
 Suvari, who also appeared in "American Pie" and was featured in the
Oscar-winning "American Beauty, "has a problem similar to Biggs in
defining her character.
 Obviously, she is an intelligent young woman. That is why her
attraction to, and her relationship with, her professor seems more like
a plot contrivance than an avenue her character would actually explore.
 She seems too self-assured, too aware of herself, to accept the
belittling constantly heaped upon her by Alcott. It does not make sense.
 "Loser" is a very predictable movie. You know what's going to happen
and who is going to wind up with whom 10 minutes into the feature.
 It's not a very memorable movie. It's like a fast-food snack,
fulfilling at the moment, then quite forgettable.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at: http:
www/imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
 Drew Barrymore is beginning to corner the market on playing the girl
outside - the one who's the awkward klutz or the spunky do-it-yourselfer;
the one who just doesn't fit in with the others.
 She has perfected these characters in movies such as "The Wedding Singer"
and, most notably, "Ever After."
 Now she's back, starring in what could be called a modern-day Cinderella
fable - "Never Been Kissed."
 You know it's a fable because she plays a copy editor at a newspaper who
has her own office as well as a secretary. Trust me on this one, no copy
editor has seen the inside of a private office since Gutenberg (and I don't
mean Steve) invented the printing press.
 The premise is simple. Barrymore's Josie Geller, at 25 the youngest copy
editor ever to be hired by the Chicago Sun-Times, is assigned to go
undercover and return to high school to do an expose on what today's teens
are feeling and doing.
 Josie (she says she was named after the '70s cartoon character) was a geek
in high school, so she jumps at the opportunity for a second chance. This
time, she thinks, she will get it right and be accepted by the in-crowd.
 Now, what kind of adult  - with a good job and a successful career - would
actually look forward to reliving the hell that was - and is - high school
and adolescence.
 These are among the many problems that plague "Never Been Kissed."
Screenwriters Abby Kohn and Marc Silverstein cannot get a handle of Josie.
Their script has her capriciously switching from confident adult to ditzy,
blubbering woman-child at the least provocation.
 And the fact that an adult would put so much stock into trying to become
tight with the vapid airheads who are supposedly South Glen High School's
most popular girls leads you to question her maturity and mental stability.
 OK, so "Never Been Kissed" is not a sociological expose of today's high
school scene. However, certain rules should apply to film, and one of those
is consistency of character.
 Among the movie's problems is the ill-conceived conceit that Josie would
seriously strive to climb the high school food chain and, in the process,
lose focus on her assignment.
 Any competent editor would have tossed her ass out the door quicker than
you could say "get me rewrite."
 To be fair, Barrymore is very appealing, but she is given very little to
work with. She tries valiantly to get a firm grip on her character, but the
script continually undermines her.
 Barrymore comes off best in the physical comedy aspects of the script in
which she tries to walk, talk and act like a cool, hip high schooler.
Otherwise, she is left foundering on a cliched sea of teen-age stereotypes
and situations.
 "Never Been Kissed" is entertaining and funny in fits and starts. It lacks
consistency and a firm grasp on what it wants to accomplish.
 The movie's main bright spot is provided by Leelee Sobieski as Aldys, the
outsider who befriends new student Josie. Josie sees a lot of her former
self in Aldys, yet still abandons her to hang out with the popular girls.
Real mature.
And that is the main deficiency with "Never Been Kissed." It's illogical,
unrealistic, uneven and undemanding.
 It has some warm and humorous spots, but not enough to overcome its many
obstacles.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bait (2000)
 BAIT (2000) 1 star out of 4. Starring Jamie Foxx, David Morse, Kimberly
Elise, David Paymer and Doug Hutchison. Story by Jeff Nathanson, Andrew
Scheinman, Adam Scheinman and Tony Gilroy. Screenplay by Scheinman,
Scheinman and Gilroy. Music by Mark Mancina. Directed by Anthony Fuqua.
Rated R.
 "Bait" is one of those annoying movies in which flash and camera tricks
substitute for a lack of substance.
 A derivative piece of work, borrowing liberally from such movies as
"Enemy of the State" and "Blue Streak," "Bait" also suffers from the sin
of indecision. The film can't decide whether it's an action comedy or
action thriller, so it tries to be both - falling flat on either count.
 The movie stars Jamie Foxx, who performed so well in Oliver Stone's
hyper-kinetic "Any Given Sunday." But here Foxx flounders, trying to
magically switch from comical to serious not as he character demands,
but as the script dictates.
 It is not Foxx's fault that he does not succeed. The actor has a screen
presence, which is wasted in pap such as "Bait."
 As a matter of fact, a line in the movie aptly describes his
predictament: "What do you do with bait when you're done with it?"
 In this case, you let it founder in a formulaic script that makes about
as much sense as naming Bob Knight dean of Miss Manners School of
Etiquette.
 What is most preposterous about "Bait" is its plot, which begins with
the heist of $42 million in gold bullion.
 The theft was a two-man job: The mastermind, a computer genius,
escapes; the second man - who conveniently has a weak heart - dies
before he can tell the feds where he hid the loot.
 So the only way to retrieve the gold is to use Foxx's Alvin Sanders as
bait. And why Sanders?
 Because he spent about eight hours in a holding cell with Mr. Bad
Ticker, so the feds think he may have been told where the gold was
stashed.
 So to find the $42 mil, the government spends about $200 million on
newly developed surveillence equipment, including installing a device in
Sander's jaw. (This was done by having him beaten in prison so he would
need surgery).
 Not only is Sanders bugged, but helicopters fly all over the place,
seemingly following him wherever he goes, and two or three unmakred vans
- also filled with snoop gadgets - are constantly trailing him.
 Only the U.S. government would authorize the spending of hundreds of
millions to find a measly $42 million. Come to think of it, that's the
most plausible aspect of this nonsense.
 "Bait "is MTV filmmaking: a lot of quick cuts making it hard to discern
who's doing what to whom; loud music that tries to pump up the action;
and big, loud explosions, which look like a fireworks display gone mad.
 And it is riddled with cliches: the soft-spoken psychopath,
computer-nerd (Doug Hutchison); the tough-talking and acting fed (an
overwrought David Morse) who's as obsessed as "Les Miz's" Javert to
capture the criminal and recover the gold; the car chase in which 150
vehicles are smashed, but no accident reports get filed. You get the
idea.
 Wasted in this entire outing is the lovely Kimberly Elise, who was so
wonderful in "Beloved." Here she plays Alvin's girlfriend. She's an
intelligent, self-sufficient woman, which makes it hard to comprehend
what she sees in Alvin.
 "Bait" is nothing special. At a bit over two hours, it is at least a
half-hour too long. The movie is just an excuse to nosh on popcorn. Try
not to let this movie hook you.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
 The joy of imagination lies in its lack of limitations.
 You can toil in the deepest, darkest coal mine in West Virginia and still
dream of reaching the stars.
 To transform imagination into reality takes determination, self-confidence
and the courage to listen only to that inner voice, tuning out the
nay-sayers all about you.
 This is the lesson of October Sky, a genuine, inspirational story based on
the life of rocket scientist Homer Hickam.
 Hickam was born and raised in one of those coal mining towns that dot West
Virginia. In Coalwood, a young man had only two choices - play sports well
enough to earn a college scholarship or, after graduation, take your place
in the mines digging out the coal while breathing in the deadly black dust.
 But Hickam and three of his friends found inspiration as well as an escape
by watching the skies.
The year was 1957, and the Soviet Union had just launched Sputnik. What
director Joe Johnston's film, based on Hickam's autobiography, Rocket Boys,
does so well is capture the moods created by this momentous achievement.
 Many felt paranoia, that the Soviets would use this satellite to rain
nuclear missiles down on the United States. Others felt nothing, that space
was, well, just space, so let the Soviets play around all they wanted. We
had problems here on Earth to solve.
 Others, though, were visionaries. They could see ahead, that Sputnik was
just the first small toehold into a journey into a vast unknown that could
ultimately culminate with men escaping the confines of their planet.
 The success of Sputnik fired the imagination of Hickam and his friends,
Quentin, Roy Lee and O'Dell.
 Using scraps and bits and pieces of metal and other materials found in
their basements, garages and around Coalwood, the four set out to build and
launch a rocket of their own.
 After many failures, and much derision from townspeople, they succeed.
 Their idealistic teacher, a sturdy, compassionate performance by Laura
Dern, enters them in a science fair, which they win. This victory propels
Homer and his friends to the nationals.
 But October Sky is more than a story about four young men and their
obsession with rockets. It is also the tale of a father and son, trying to
bridge a generation and cultural gap created by the environment around
them.
 John Hickam is a mine official, who is proud of the work he has done. His
family has been coal miners for generations, and he sees nothing wrong with
his youngest son following in his footsteps.
 He sees Homer's devotion to his rocketry as a mere hobby, a passing fad.
The older Hickam doubts his son's ability to use his newly acquired
knowledge to escape what he sees as the boy's destiny.
 This is a gulf young Homer must overcome with the same grit and
determination he applies to his rocket experiments.
 Lewis Colick's script cannot avoid all the cliches inherent in such
situations, but he brings such sincerity to the proceedings that you tend
to overlook them, even as you realize you've run across them before.
 The true find of October Sky is young Jake Gyllenhaal as Homer. This is
young Gyllenhaal's breakthrough performance, much as A Boy's Life set
Leonardo DiCaprio on his course.
 Gyllenhaal's Homer is fierce in his doggedness to succeed, yet touchingly
vulnerable. He is driven not by ego but by seeking the approval of his
father.
 More than anything else, he wants his father to recognize that what he is
trying to do is worthwhile.
 Chris Cooper, who has given some fine performances, notably in John
Sayles' Lone Star, is touching, unyielding and exudes the strength of a
Sequoia as John Hickam. But he also is wise enough to accept and embrace
his son's chosen path in order not to lose him.
 Mark Isham contributes a strong score that helps keep the film at an even
pace, while Fred Murphy's cinematography captures the grime and dirt that
covers Coalwood.
October Sky is a bit schmaltzy and predictable. But that shouldn't keep
anyone from enjoying this true-life saga of a boy whose dreams could not be
confined by either gravity or convention.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or a
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
 On a nationally televised daytime talk show, she learns that for the past
year her high-school sweetheart husband has been having an affair with
Birdee's best friend.
 Shattered and humiliated, Birdee packs up her belongings and her daughter,
Bernice, and flees for home - Smithville, Texas.
 Here, the former high school beauty queen seeks escape and solace, but
finds neither. Instead, her life grows even more complicated as she has to
deal with an eccentric mother whom she never really took the time to know,
a daughter who desperately misses her father and the prospect of a new
romance.
 These are the paddles that turn the plot wheel of Hope Floats, a
two-hankie tearjerker, ably directed by Forest Whitaker and starring Sandra
Bullock, trying to make amends for Speed 2: Cruise Control.
 Whitaker has a wonderful eye for composition, keeping his camera close to
the protagonists, giving the viewer an intimate picture of their
interactions.
 Where Hope Floats goes wrong is in Bullock's interpretation of Birdee.
Bullock, who is also one of the movie's executive producer's portrays
Birdee as a wounded bird afraid of trying to fly from the nest.
 Birdee spends most of the film moping about and complaining, dwelling on
the shambles that once was her life.
 Birdee is a one-woman pity party, so much so that instead of feeling any
empathy for her, you want to grap her by the neck, give her and good shake
and berate her into moving on with her life.
 Yet by the time Birdee does change course, spurred on by a family tragedy,
the movie is almost over.
 Bullock makes a valiant attempt to elicit sympathy for Birdee. She
sprinkles humor throughout, but it's not enough to compensate for all that
comes before.
 Whitaker, however, has surrounded Bullock with a fine cast and it is these
people, especially Mae Whitman as Bernice and the timeless Gena Rowlands as
Birdee's mother, who help carry the picture.
 Whitman is a delight as the confused little girl forced into a situation
beyond her control or comprehension. She continually switches from berating
and sassing her mother to displaying her need for love and affection from
the parent who did not desert her.
 Whitman's best scene is a heartbreaking encounter with her visiting father.
 Rowlands has made eccentricity an artform. Her Ramona is a flamboyant,
Auntie Mame-like, larger-than-life Texan. Yet she is wise enough to see the
pain and suffering Birdee's continued wallowing is inflicting not only on
her daughter but on her granddaughter as well.
 Harry Connick Jr. as Justin, the quiet man who wants to become part of
Birdee's life, gives a low-key performance. Without being pushy, he gently
tries to glide Birdee onto a new path through continual support and
displays of affection.
 Hope Floats, at a little under two hours, moves gracefully, thanks to
Whitaker's wonderful eye for composition and detail. The director, as he
showed in Waiting to Exhale, has an affinity for actresses.
 He elicits a textured performance from Bullock. She is the antithesis of
the usual perky characters she has played on screen. But in Hope Floats,
she goes a bit too far in the other direction, nearly becoming one of the
walking dead.
 Still, amidst a summer of rampaging lizards and calamitous comets, Hope
Floats is a nice quiet respite.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
 Deep End of the Ocean (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Michelle Pfeiffer,
Treat Williams, Ryan Merriman, Jonathan Jackson and Whoopi Goldberg.
 For a parent, losing a child is the unthinkable. Nothing can assuage the
guilt or the void.
 The only way a parent can cope is to survive day-by-day and use
distractions to keep the buried memories from welling up and drowning him
or her.
 It is bad enough when a child is killed, but what if the child disappears,
is kidnapped, stolen? The uncertainty, the not knowing if that child is
alive or dead, can be so overwhelming that a parent can cease to function
as a parent and merely exist. Like the child, the parent disappears, but it
is into the self.
 All this is touched upon in "The Deep End of the Ocean" a powerful film
based on Jacqueline Mitchard's best-selling novel.
 Attending her 15-year high school reunion in Chicago, Beth Cappadora
(Michelle Pfeiffer) steps away for a moment from her young sons, 7-year-old
Vincent and 3-year-old Ben, in a crowded hotel lobby.
 When she returns, Ben is gone. He is nowhere to be found.
 Torn by despair and guilt, Beth retreats into herself, merely going
through the motions of daily life.
 Eventually the family moves from their Madison, Wis., home to Chicago
where Beth's husband, Pat (Treat Williams), fulfills his dream of opening a
restaurant.
 Nine years pass. Then one day, a miracle.
 A young boy is at the door talking to Beth's daughter, Kerry. His name is
Sam, and he lives a couple of blocks away.
 Yet Beth recognizes him as Ben. And so the family is reunited and whole again.
 The reason for divulging so much of the plot is because the story is
secondary.
 Even the circumstances surrounding Ben's kidnapping is explained in one or
two sentences.
 No, it's the emotions that resonate through the film, created by the
various situations that dominate "The Deep End of the Ocean."
 Beth and Pat are overjoyed. They have their son back.
 Vincent, however, is jealous, resentful. He has spent his growing years
fighting with a ghost for his mother's attention. Now that ghost is in the
flesh and he is again, the odd child out.
 And what about Ben/Sam. Beth and Pat may love him and shower him with
affection, but to him they are strangers. The boy is torn between his
new-found family and the love and protection of the man who raised him -
the only family he remembers.
 Pfeiffer gives a very taut, controlled performance as Beth. In a part
where the temptation for any actress might be to allow your feelings to
overflow the screen, Pfeiffer keeps herself contained, showing occasional
bursts of anger, confusion, pain, defiance and guilt.
 Williams has his best role in years. His Pat is the ultimate family man.
He, too, mourns the loss of Ben, but he refuses to wallow in self-pity. He
knows that the his son and daughter are still there, needing his support
and strength.
 The acting honors, though, go to a trio of young performers: Cory Buck,
Jonathan Jackson and Ryan Merriman.
 As young Vincent, Buck shows the resentment of being forced to grow up
quickly and become mama's little helper. He comes home from school to take
care of his sister, and displays his anger by casually smashing a vase.
 Jackson plays the teen-age Vincent, a rebellious youth bursting with guilt
and resentment. The shadow of Ben stands between him and his mother, and he
can do nothing to overcome it.
 Ryan Merriman is compelling as Sam, a boy torn from the world he knows and
thrust into the bosom of well-meaning, kind-hearted strangers who profess
to love him, yet hold him prisoner emotionally.
 Whoopi Goldberg also makes an impact in the supporting role of the police
detective trying to find Ben.
Director Ulu Grosbard uses a deft touch to keep the action moving. He does
not overplay his hand. He is a subtle manager. The scene in which
Goldberg's detective explains her sexual preference to Beth is done
matter-of-factly with no special emphasis, for example.
 Grosbard elicits a naturalness from his actors, showing them coping, or
failing to cope, under extraordinary circumstances.
 "The Deep End of the Ocean's" first half-hour-plus is peak filmmaking. And
while the rest of the movie cannot hold the intensity of the first act, it
still is gripping entertainment.
 "The Deep End of the Ocean" is intelligent, adult drama.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
 Frequency (2000) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Dennis Quaid, Jim
Caviezel, Andre Braugher, Noah Emmerich and Elizabeth Mitchell. Written
by Toby Emmerich. Directed by Gregory Hoblit.
 "Frequency" is an implausible, but entertaining fantasy that taps into
one of man's primal fantasies: the what-if scenario.
 "Frequency" is a thriller in which a father and son, separated by time,
work together to stop a serial killer.
 Detective John Sullivan (Jim Caviezel) who, after breaking up with his
girlfriend (or wife, we are never sure which she is) hooks up his dad's
old ham radio gear and - with the help of `the mother of all sun spots'
- he is conversing with his dad, Frank Sullivan (Dennis Quaid), a heroic
firefighter killed 30 years earlier in the line of duty.
 Am I giving anything away by spilling the beans here? Not really.
 For as Frequency progresses, history changes as often as diapers on
newborn quintuplets.
 History is first altered when John warns his father about his impending
death. 
 Frank, acting on John's advice, escapes the fatal Bruxton warehouse
fire.
 But then traces of John's mother disappear, and it appears she has
become a victim of a serial killer who was never captured. Somehow
Frank's survival has changed history.
 Of course, no one in either era believes John or Frank as they go about
mucking up the space-time continuum.
 The problem with movies such as "Frequency" is that they ignore the
larger context of how one small change, like a ripple in a stream,
affects the entire timeline. To cover all that, of course, a movie would
have to run four or five hours, while a novel would probably run close
to 1,000 pages.
 So, wisely, most filmmakers and authors ignore this potential snare.
 Written by Toby Emmerich and directed by Gregory Hoblit, who directed
"Primal Fear," "Frequency" has an innocent charm about it, despite its
sometime gruesome subject matter.
 Much of what happens is predictable. The suspense is not so much
who-done-it, but how will everything be resolved.
 Quaid gives a solid performance as the hot-shot firefighter who is
devoted to his wife and young son. A die-hard Mets fan, he uses
knowledge told him by Frank about the Amazin' Mets and their 1969 World
Series heroics to convince others of his sanity.
 Caviezel, who was featured in "The Thin Red Line," is almost childlike
as he makes contact with his role model-hero. He is good looking and
macho, yet vulnerable and a bit dazed by the events that begin to
dominate his life.
 Also in the cast is the fabulous Andre Braugher as Frank's best friend
and John's police mentor; Noah Emmerich as Gordo, John's lifelong best
friend; and Elizabeth Mitchell as John's loving mother.
 "Frequency" is not prime filmmaking, but it does grip you despite some
of its shortcomings. It's a middle-fare meal of a movie, one that will
not overwhelm you, but will leave you satisfied.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics Society, has his
reviews posted at http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)

 The Green Mile (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Tom Hanks, David Morse,
Michael Clark Duncan, James Cromwell, Jeffrey DeMunn, Sam Rockwell, Barry
Pepper, Michael Jeter, Doug Hutchison and Graham Greene. Written and
directed by Frank Darabont.
 Paul Edgecomb is a decent man. That's no big revelation unless you
consider his occupation. Edgecomb is a prison guard, but not just any
guard. He is head guard in Building E at Cold Mountain Penitentiary in the
deep South.
 Building E is death row, "The Green Mile" where men who are to face the
ultimate penalty are sent to spend their last days.
 Edgecomb guards his charges with fairness and firmness. His world is
orderly and routine.
 That is until John Coffey is delivered to his care.
 And that is the crux of "The Green Mile," a magical drama directed by
Frank Darabont, who like he did with "The Shawshank Redemption," has deftly
adapted the Steven King novel of the same name.
 Set in 1935 when many men were still out of work, "The Green Mile" is a
supernatural story about a poor simple man who has a power he can neither
explain nor understand.
 When the worlds of Edgecomb and Coffey collide, it brings about profound
changes in both men as well as several people around them.
 John Coffey is a gentle giant, convicted of the heinous murder and rape of
two little sisters. Weary of his new guest, Edgecomb eventually sees
Coffey's miraculous powers and realizes their implications.
 "The Green Mil"e runs three hours, but it is the quickest 180 minutes you
will ever spend in a movie theater. I doubt that anyone will take a moment
to glance at a watch once they get involved in this eerie, but poignant
story.
 This is not your usual Stephen King. Though it has tones of the
supernatural, it is a benevolent force as opposed to the usual cadre of
demons, vampires and ghosts unleashed by the Maine scribbler.
 And with only two exceptions most of the people - guards as well as
prisoners - who  are incarcerated and work on "The Green Mile" are decent
people.
 Edgecomb is a 44-year-old happily married man suffering from a very
painful bladder infection. His miraculous cure is the first clue that
Coffey is no ordinary inmate.
 Tom Hanks may be the star of "The Green Mile," but, as in "Saving Private
Ryan," this feature is an ensemble piece. The movie is no star vehicle,
even though Hanks gives a very fine performance.
 He is surrounded by a superb supporting cast including David Morse,
Jeffrey DeMunn and Barry Pepper as his fellow guards; James Cromwell as the
compassionate warden; and Michael Jeter and Graham Greene as death row
inmates.
 The movie's soul, though, belongs to Michael Clark Duncan as John Coffey.
Duncan, most familiar to audiences as Bear in Armageddon, gives a
performance that is so powerful, so touching, that it will make you weep.
 His Coffey is a man-child, an innocent. He can see into the hearts of men
and recognize good and evil. Yet his powers overwhelm and frighten him.
They are blessing and curse. A supporting actor Oscar nomination is
warranted for Duncan.
 The allegory is a little heavy-handed, of course, with the inmate's
initials J.C. The symbolism is sledgehammered.
 Two other performances of note include Doug Hutchison as a sadistic young
guard and Sam Rockwell as a psychopathic killer who stirs up trouble on
"The Green Mile."
 The performances are strong all around. Jeter, especially, is touching as
the mousy inmate whose last days revolve around a mouse he has found and
trained. His death scene is one of the most harrowing in any movie in
recent years.
 Hanks exudes a quiet strength as Edgecomb. He treats his prisoners with
dignity and compassion, neither judging nor condemning them.
 "The Green Mile" is a film that offers a surprise every now and then just
to keep the audience on its toes. Yet everything that happens is within the
parameters of the story and situation.
 Darabont's script is crisp as he deftly catches the Southern cadence of
these blue-collar people. His direction is no-frills, straight from the
hip, allowing the actors and plot to advance the story. He uses very few
camera tricks. Even the special effects sequences are not overplayed.
 "The Green Mile" is a winner, ranking among the best King adaptations
brought to the screen. It is a movie that instills faith. Despite its bleak
setting, it is a movie with a big heart. Don't miss it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)

  The Story of Us (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Bruce Willis,
Michelle Pfeiffer, Rob Reiner and Rita Wilson. Directed by Reiner.
 I wish I could say I liked "The Story of Us." I found it enjoyable and
entertaining, but at the same time, simplistic and shallow.
 "The Story of Us" is a look at a marriage at a crossroads.
 After 15 years and two kids together, Ben and Katie Jordan (Bruce Willis
and Michelle Pfeiffer) have nothing left to say to each other.
 As one of them narrates, the silences between the pair were louder than
any arguments.
 Yet the script by Alan Zweibel and Jessie Nelson fails to really show how
Ben and Katie grew apart.
 There is a lot of talk of neither one listening to the other, of the
demands of parenthood and career creating wedges between them. And
sequences highlighting these events are shown.
 But the entire thing feels superficial and slight. Ben and Katie are
presented as two highly educated and articulate individuals, so it is
difficult to buy into the proposition that they cannot communicate.
 Directed by Rob Reiner, "The Story of Us" is sunny and perky. And that is
another of the film's problems It is bathed in a cheery glow that sabotages
the supposed dark tone of its main plot.
 For in essence, "The Story of Us" is a comedy. Thus it is difficult to
seriously accept or be concerned with the disintegration of the Jordans'
marriage.
 You instinctively know from the outset what the outcome will be.
 This is not to imply that "The Story of Us" is a bad movie. It is bubbly
and warm, almost at odds with its storyline.
 Willis and Pfeiffer are most likable. The only quibble is with Willis'
various hair pieces, which become distracting as the film bounces back and
forth through various flashbacks into the Jordans' relationship.
 As usual, when he is not playing macho he-men, Willis gives a well-rounded
performance. He allows Ben's vulnerability to show, as well as his
character's rage and frustration with his situation.
 Pfeiffer is luminous and golden. Her big, expressive eyes shine with joy
or mist with sorrow.
 Where the movie falls short is in explaining the estrangement between Ben
and Katie. There problems seem so ordinary, so minor - and their love for
each other seems so strong - that you wonder what their problems actually
are.
 An attempt to show their differences by bringing in their parents fails,
as does the glimpses of the pair with various counselors. You just cannot
take their estrangement on face value.
 A talented supporting cast, featuring Reiner and Rita Wilson, work hard to
help out Willis and Pfeiffer, but all are undone by a weak script that
makes light of the main premise.
 "The Story of Us" will satisfy fans of Willis and Pfeiffer, but that's
about it. It contains several laughs, but very little insight.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Apostle, The (1997)

 The Apostle (1997) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Robert Duvall and Farrah
Fawcett. Written and directed by Duvall.
 In a lifetime of performances, Robert Duvall gives the performance of a
lifetime in The Apostle.
 Euliss "Sonny" Dewey is a man of God, but hardly a godly man. He is a
womanizer, and because of his long absences, his marriage is failing. His
wife has fallen in love with a younger minister. And, through the
instigation of his wife, he has lost his church.
 Added to his misery, "Sonny" gets drunk and smashes his wife's lover with
a baseball bat.
 Knowing the law will soon be after him, "Sonny" flees Texas for rural
Louisiana, sheds his identity and reinvents himself as The Apostle, E.F.
 He starts a new church and rediscovers his faith while gathering a flock
for his new endeavor.
 From his silent, but stunning film debut as Boo Radley in 1962's To Kill a
Mockingbird, through such unforgettable performances in such films as
Godfather I and II, the neglected, but powerfulThe Great Santini, M*A*S*H,
Apocalypse Now, Network, his Oscar-winning Tender Mercies, The Stone Boy
and A Family Thing, Duvall has earned the reputation of being America's
finest actor.
 In The Apostle, he continues his run of bringing to the screen characters
who are larger than life, yet flawed and fallable like the rest of us.
 Duvall's Apostle is no cynical Elmer Gantry. He does believe, does have
faith. But he also has feet of clay. He is good one day, not so good the
next. He may be a preacher, but he is no saint.
 What is most impressive about The Apostle  is Duvall's dedication to the
project. He not only stars, but produced, wrote and directed the movie.
With so much responsibility weighing on one individual, it is astounding
that he could focus so sharply not only on his character, but on the entire
milieu of evangelical preachers who can mesmerize as they proslatize.
 Duvall has written some powerful sequences that hold you rapt. Among them
is a first-reel soliloquoy in which he rants and vents his anger at God
while at the same time professing his love for his Lord.
 Toward the end of the film comes a wonderfully constructed confrontation
between The Apostle and a racist, played by Billy Bob Thornton, who
threatens to bulldoze the church. Using just the power of words, The
Apostle drains the hate from his antagonist as easily as green kryptonite
saps power from Superman.
 As a writer, Duvall has an ear for the cadance of these men of God, not
only the way they deliver their sermons, but the way in which they converse
day-to-day when not standing behind the pulpit. His ear also extends to
those in the region. His dialogue captures its flavor completely.
The Apostle has a few flaws. At almost 2 1/2 hours in length, it drags in a
some spots and tighter editing may have helped the flow. The opening
sequences of "Sonny" in Texas are a bit jumpy and disjointed.
 But once the locale moves to Louisiana, the story becomes smoother.
 As a director, Duvall draws fine performances from his cast, which is
comprised of professionals and non-professionals. In the small role of
"Sonny's" wife, Jessie, Farrah Fawcett proves (as she did in the TV movie
The Burning Bed) that she is more than a camp sex symbol of the '70s.
Thornton is effective and touchingly human in his small part
 The Apostle  is a movie that those who savor fine acting will appreciate.
It also is a testament to one man's vision and perserverence. It's an event
not to be missed.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Osmosis Jones (2001)
OSMOSIS JONES (2001). 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Bill Murray, Chris Elliott,
Elena Franklin and Molly Shannon, plus the vocal talents of Chris Rock, David
Hyde Pierce, Laurence Fishburne, Brandy Norwood and William Shatner. Written by
Marc Hyman. Directed by Peter Farrelly and Bobby Farrelly. Animation directed by
Piet Kroon and Tom Sito. Rated PG. Approx. 100 minutes. 
 The idea for Osmosis Jones is most imaginative: a live action-animation feature
about a slovenly man and the battle his body rages against an invading virus. 
 It's a shame the execution of this concept falls very short of its premise. The
movie is lacking and most unsatisfying. 
 Osmosis Jones is crude, gross, disgusting, and was directed by the Farrelly
brothers - the twisted siblings behind There's Something About Mary, Me, Myself
and Irene and a couple of other movies in which the humor is mostly targeted
below the belt. 
 Not that there's anything wrong with scatology. I bet even cavemen appreciated
bathroom humor - such as it was. 
 It's merely that with Osmosis Jones, the Farrellys humor is too juvenile, too
predictable. You can almost foresee the puns just by viewing the part of the
inner anatomy a sequence is drawn. 
 Osmosis Jones looks like one of those old health class movies gone psycho. The
trouble is, the animation may please the very young, but the jokes may be over
their heads, while the teen-age audience may find it too tame for their tastes.
 Adults? Well, let's just say most will find it unappetizing. 
 Osmosis Jones plays like a 100-minute infomercial for the eat healthy foods
lobby. 
 The live action sequences revolve around Frank (Bill Murray), who seems to be
the grungiest human being in the universe. He continually looks as if he needs a
shave and a shower. Frank, much to the consternation of his daughter, is a
fast-food addict, eating anything - and everything - that can kill you. 
 He works at a zoo where the animals look cleaner - and presumably smell better
- than he does. 
 Frank's body is invaded by Thrax, a lethal virus, after Frank eats a
hard-boiled egg that had fallen to the ground. It's not gross enough that Frank
picks the egg up from the dirt and plops it into his mouth. Nope, the Farrellys
pile it on by first having Frank wrestle a chimp for the egg, wresting it from
the primate's mouth. 
 Like I said, the gross meter tips the scales on this one. 
 After ingesting the egg, the movie begins its animated sequences. Here, Osmosis
Jones (voiced by Chris Rock), a renegade white blood cell is teamed with Drix
(voiced by Frasier's David Hyde Pierce), a 12-hour, painkiller cold capsule to
battle Thrax (smoothly voiced by Laurence Fishburne). 
 Basically, what we have is a cliched cop-buddy movie, rife with all the clichés
of that genre. 
 And this is why Osmosis Jones doesn't click. It merely falls back on tired,
familiar conventions instead of creating new and exciting situations. 
 The jokes and puns are lame: Osmosis searches out a snitch, a former flu virus.
After pumping him for information, Drix tells Osmosis, "Funny, he doesn't look
fluish." And the jokes don't rise above that level. 
 The live action scenes are no better. Frank is such a slob, so unappealing that
it is difficult to fathom how he ever married or even sired a child. He's almost
a bigger cartoon than the animated characters. 
 Osmosis Jones is a movie that may be too violent for young children as Thrax
burns and dissolves blood cells right and left. 
 The animation is rather two-dimensional and flat. It lacks scope and depth. 
 It is an unappealing movie that will leave you scratching your head, and maybe
leaning toward a shower after you walk out of the theater. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Knight's Tale, A (2001)

 A KNIGHT'S TALE (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Heath Ledger, Mark
Addy, Rufus Sewell, Paul Bettany, Shannyn Sossamon, Alan Tudyk and Laura
Fraser. Music by Carter Burwell. Written, produced and directed by Brian
Helgeland. PG-13.
 You are immediately jarred at the outset of A Knightís Tale when a
contestant in a jousting tournament rides onto the field, the soundtrack
begins blaring ěWe Will Rock Youî and the audience claps along to the
beat.
What the heck is going on?
 Perhaps the filmís writer-producer-director, Brian Helgeland (an
Oscar-winner for his L.A. Confidential script), can explain: ěWe wanted
to create a period piece that stayed fair to the period but felt
contemporary. ... For a movie to work, the audience has to be invited
in. They can get pushed away if overwhelmed by period costumes, obscure
speech and antique music. ... Our goal was to create a seamless bridge
between then and now.î
 Nice sentiments, noble proposal. Unfortunately, the concept for A
Knightís Tale is more distracting than beneficial.
 The movieís central plot is about jousting, painted by Helgeland as
sort of the XFL of the middle ages. Knights would travel from tournament
to tournament, battling each other for prizes and glory; standings were
kept; peasants would paint themselves in the colors of their favorite
knights; heralds would introduce their knights, in a manner reminiscent
of Vince McMahon revving up the crowd at a WWF match; and their would be
a tournament of tournament at which the grand champion would be crowned.
 All this, of course, makes it difficult as to how to view A Knightís
Tale: a comedy, a spoof, a period action-adventure, a drama. Helgeland
has made it a hodge-podge of all of the aforementioned genres.
 His story revolves around William Thatcher (Heath Ledger), squire to a
veteran knight. When his employer is found sitting under a tree dead,
William, with the help of his friends. Roland (Mark Addy) and Wat (Alan
Tudyk), puts on the knightís armor, takes his place at the joust and
wins the tournament.
 William then decides to use the prize money to fulfill his dream of
becoming a championship jouster. Unfortunately, only knights are
permitted to joust, so William ó with the help of an unemployed writer
named Geoff Chaucer (Paul Bettany) ó reinvents himself as Sir Ulrich von
Lichtenstein of Gelderland and begins his climb up the tournament
ladder.
 A Knightís Tale is a corny, fairy tale, yet somehow it exudes an
innocent and winning charm. You know, historically, itís rubbish, but so
go along just for the fun.
 For example, you laugh when William ó along with the other knights ó
marches triumphantly into the London he left as a child and the
soundtrack blasts out Tin Lizzyís ěThe Boys Are Back in Town.î
 This is definitely a movie not to be taken seriously. if it is
anything, A Knightís Tale is a showcase for the charisma of up-and-comer
Heath L:edger, best known for portraying Mel Gibsonís son in The Patriot
as well as for wooing Julia Stiles in Ten Things I Hate About You.
 He has a wonderful screen presence and a very nonchalant manner. He
acts as the various occasions demands ó serious whe needed, tongue
planted in cheek when called for.
 He is a looker who carries a fluff piece such as this with ease. It
will be interesting to see him in more demanding roles.
 A Knightís Tale will more likely appeal to a younger audience. Medieval
scholars might as well stay home as you will wind up shouting at the
screen in frustration or rage at the historical liberties the film
takes.
 But this is not meant as a documentary about the middle ages. A
Knightís Tale is an uneven parable about heroes, fame and self-worth.
That Helgeland tried to give it a contemporary spin is commendable. It
is too bad he was not totally successful.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN.. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Haley Joel
Osment, Jude Law, Brendan Gleeson, William Hurt, Sam Robards and Frances
O'Connor. Music by John Williams. Based on a short story by Brian Aldiss. Based
on a screenplay by Ian Watson. Screenplay by Steven Spielberg. Directed by
Spielberg. Rated PG-13 
It is easy to see why the late Stanley Kubrick believed Steven Spielberg would
be the perfect director for his A.I. Artificial Intelligence, just as it is
understandable why Spielberg was attracted to the material. 
For here we have another lost boy trying to find his way home, an outcast
seeking family, themes very familiar from most of Spielberg's body of work from
Sugarland Express to Close Encounters of the Third Kind to E.T. to Empire of the
Sun to Hook to Saving Private Ryan, naming just a few examples. 
A.I. is set in an undefined near future in which giant technological advances
have led to the creation of robots who serve every purpose from housekeeping to
fulfilling sexual fantasies. It is an era when robots are treated merely as
sophisticated appliances. 
The last great leap in robotic evolution is the addition of emotions, and with
the number of births limited by the government, many couples are yearning for
children. 
And Professor Hobby (William Hurt) has the solution. A robotic boy named David
(Haley Joel Osment), who is programmed to love. As a test, David is placed with
Henry Swinton (Sam Robards) and his wife, Monica (Frances O'Connor). Their
natural-born son has been cryogenically frozen until a cure can be found for his
illness. 
The first third of A.I. deals with David's life with the Swintons and how that
is changed by the recovery and return of their son, Martin. 
Circumstances force David to be cut off from the Swintons. He is abandoned and
alone. David, highly influenced by the fairy tale, Pinocchio, feels that if he
becomes a real boy he can rekindle Monica's love for him. 
The film's second act follows David's search for The Blue Fairy, whom he
believes will be able to fulfill his wish. During these adventures he meets and
is helped by Gigolo Joe (Jude Law), a robot who specializes in sex. 
Spielberg is at his top form in this sequence, offering a brutal "Flesh Fair"
where robots are destroyed via sadistic methods for the amusement of paying
customers. 
Here, is where Kubrick's influence is strongly felt, as the movie explores the
fear and distrust humans have for robots. The savagery conjures up images from
the late director's A Clockwork Orange. 
At about two hours and 30 minutes, the film begins to falter during the last 20
minutes, a sequence that seems most Spielbergian with images that appear to be
borrowed from Close Encounters. 
It is all very anti-climatic and jarring. These scenes seem almost superfluous,
as if from a different film. 
A.I. is a dark fairy tale that deserves its PG-13 rating. It is a story
combining hope and intolerance, sacrifice and bigotry, and while it does not
coalesce perfectly, the movie does offer some disturbing images. 
But  A.I. is really a showcase for the acting talents of the amazing young
Osment. If ever an actor deserved an Academy Award nomination, it is this lad,
who brings a sense of joy and wonder to the role of David, a being created for
the express purpose of loving. 
He shines when with Monica, beaming with love, as eager as a puppy to please.
After being left in the woods, he is confused, lost, hurt, focusing on one
objective: To become a real boy and find his way home so he can redeem himself
in his mother's eyes. 
Law is pleasant as the care-free robot who really doesn't understand David's
quest, but is nonetheless happy to help him on his journey. 
Probably the toughest role is O'Connor's Monica. Playing an emotional fragile
woman who sees David as a substitute for her lost Martin, she grows conflicted
after her boy returns and she begins to perceive David not as a second chance,
but as a threat to her family. 
She gives her character enough emotional chaos that you cannot fault her for her
course of action. 
Many of A.I.'s futuristic sets are breathtaking, especially a mostly submerged
New York, lost to the world by the melting of the polar ice caps. 
A.I. is a flawed film, and you cannot get through the entire feature without
pondering - even subconsciously - how it would have turned out with Kubrick
instead of Spielberg behind the camera. Would it have been darker? More cynical?
We will never know. 
We can only judge what is before us on the screen, a collaboration of two
cinematic giants. A.I. is a most interesting and thought-provoking examination
of a future that is quickly gaining on us. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)

 Shanghai Noon (2000) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jackie Chan, Owen
Wilson, Lucy Liu, Brandon Merrill, Roger Yuan and Xander Berkeley.
Written by Alfred Gough and Miles Millar. Directed by Tom Dey.
 Following in the footsteps of comedians from Buster Keaton to the Marx
Bros. to Abbott and Costello to Martin and Lewis to Bob Hope to John
Candy, Jackie Chan has followed Horace Greeley's advice and gone west.
 "Shanghai Noon" is a comedic Western, a funny culture clash in which an
Imperial guard (Chan)  comes to the Old West of 1881 to rescue a
kidnapped princess ("Ally McBeal's" Lucy Liu).
 Along the way, Chan's Chon Wang meets a fast-talking con artist, but
inept outlaw, Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson). The two ostensibly team up to
rescue the princess, though Roy has his mind set on somehow grabbing the
$100,000 in gold sent to America to ransom her highness
 "Shanghai Noon," like most of Chan's movies, is a rough blend of action
and comedy. The action sequences are first-rate as Wang battles Indians,
cowboys and a former, disgraced guardsman who masterminded the
kidnapping plot.
 The comedy is definitely low brow, but offers some funny moments. Roy,
for example, continually mispronounces Chon Wang as John Wayne as
berates his partner. `That's not a cowboy name,' he tells him more than
once.
 There are some funny subtitles as Wang tries to make himself understood
to a tribe of Indians who have befriended him.
 Chan, as usual, is always exciting to watch as he leaps, rolls and uses
props with the deftness of a ballet master.
 The real find is Wilson.  Best known for his role as a would-be
criminal in the independent "Bottle Rocket," he also has co-starred in
"Armageddon" and "The Haunting." In "Shanghai Noon" he is glib,
charming, a blowhard and a bit of a coward. His character is reminiscent
of the type Bob Hope would play, though he is physically more active and
much better looking than Hope.
 Wilson holds his own with Chan, and the two make a charming duet.
 "Shanghai Noon" features a fine score by Randy Edelman as well as
scenic cinematography by Dan Mindel.
 Alfred Gough and Miles Millar's script, though, is a bit
anti-climactic. Director Tom Dey, making his feature film debut, could
have trimmed a bit from the one-hour-and-50-minute running time. The
movie's pace needed to be a bit quicker. At a couple of junctures there
is dead space between some of the action sequences. Judicious editing
could have speeded up the movie.
 "Shanghai Noon" is a fun outing, filled with stunts and gags that will
please Chan fans. It's not art, but it is entertainment.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, is can be found on the Internet Movie Database Web site:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
 Cruel Intentions (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Sarah Michelle Gellar,
Ryan Phillippe, Reese Witherspoon and Selma Blair. Written and directed by
Roger Kumble.
 Kathryn and Sebastian are bored, manipulative, mean-spirited children of
privilege.
 The stepsibling tandem use people, playing games with their lives merely
to satisfy their own whims.
 The latest venture of the high society Manhattan dastardly duo is a wager.
Can Sebastian seduce a young woman who, in a magazine article, claims that
she will remain a virgin until marriage.
 The stakes? Sebastian's vintage auto vs., to put it delicately, fulfilling
his erotic fantasies concerning his stepsister. As Kathryn bluntly tells
him, "You can put it anywhere you like."
 If all this sounds a bit sick, well, it is. But deliciously so. For "Cruel
Intentions" is a modern-dress adaptation of the classic novel "Les Liaisons
Dangereuses," which was adapted into a play by Christopher Hampton and
later filmed in 1988 as "Dangerous Liaisons" with Glenn Close, John
Malkovich, Michelle Pfeiffer and Uma Thurman. Another, lesser seen 1989
French-British production called "Valmont", starred Annette Benning, Colin
Firth and Meg Tilly.
 And this contemporary version, written and directed by Roger Kumble, is
just as wickedly sardonic, witty and cruel as its predecessors.
 Kathryn and Sebastian are as hedonistic as their earlier counterparts,
except they use more foul language.
 What is interesting that despite the distasteful subject matter Cruel
Intentions is such a well-crafted, sarcastically humorous vehicle that you
can't help by admire it and Kumble's chutzpah.
 And Kumble has done the unthinkable. He has transformed TV's "Buffy, the
Vampire Slayer" into a self-absorbed, manipulative, evil, first-class
bitch.
 Yep, Sarah Michelle Gellar stars as the patrician Kathryn, the evil spider
who so skillfully weaves her webs of deceptions that no one can escape her
machinations.
 Gellar is no girl next door. She is hot, sexual, downright dirty and
loving it. And she gives a strong performance, whether teasingly leading on
her stepbrother, or teaching a naive young girl how to French kiss.
 Geller's Kathryn is despicable and like all fine movie villains totally
enthralling.
 Ryan Phillippe as Sebastian easily makes the jump from an amoral predator
who enjoys deflowering young girls to sincere lover who is ensnared by the
charms of the innocent Annette (Pleasantville's Reese Witherspoon).
 This could be Phillippe's break out role. It is a difficult transformation
from heel to hero, but Phillippe manages the task.
 In a supporting role as the naive young girl used by Kathryn and
Sebastian, Selma Blair holds her own. She could be considered the comic
relief as the awkward young woman taught to grow up too quickly.
 "Cruel Intentions" is not a pleasant movie, but it is a fun one. When
nastiness on the screen is done correctly, it can be entertaining. And
Kumble has delivered a fine combination. You may not like what you see, but
you will enjoy it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or a
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Go (1999)
 Go (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Sarah Polley, Jay Mohr, Scott Wolf,
Desmond Askew and Taye Diggs
 "Go" is an energetic exercise in frantic filmmaking that also is witty,
stylish and enjoyable.
 The movie, directed by Doug Liman of "Swingers'" fame, tells three
interconnecting stories set on Christmas Eve and all concerning young
people involved in Los Angeles' raucous and seamy underground life.
 The initial story revolves around Ronna (Sarah Polley), an 18-year-old
grocery store checkout clerk who needs to raise some money to keep from
being evicted from her apartment.
 She hits upon a scheme to fill in for Simon (Desmond Askew), one of her
co-workers, who deals drugs as a sideline.
 Simon, it seems, is taking off with some friends for a weekend jaunt in
Las Vegas.
 Ronna scores some pills, which she is supposed to sell to Adam (Scott
Wolf) and Zack (Jay Mohr), a pair of TV stars, who, coincidentally, find
themselves starring in a real-life drug sting.
 All those stories and most of the characters intersect in John August's
fast-paced script.
 Liman, who also handled the cinematography, creates an edgy atmosphere as
he continually jumps his camera around. You never know what's going to
happen next, nor who will pop into the picture.
 Of the three stories, the best - and funniest - is the vignette set in
Vegas where Simon and his buddies, including Marcus (Taye Diggs), are set
for a weekend of frolic.
 Of course things go terribly wrong as Simon is involved in a fire, a
shooting and a car theft. The Vegas stay is cut short as the buddies make a
hasty retreat back to Los Angeles.
 Though "Go" is an ensemble piece, a couple of the performers do stand out,
especially Diggs as the ever-cool Marcus and Polley as the beleaguered
Ronna.
 This is a movie geared more for the 20-something audience. Older audiences
may not appreciate the casual approach to drugs and sex. If so, that's
their loss, since "Go" is rife with humor.
 Wolf and Mohr are winning as the actors dealing with a moral dilemma,
while Askew is a bit outrageous as the impulsive Briton who, as he tells
his buddies, learned to drive by watching American cop shows.
 Liman, following in the footsteps of Quentin Tarantino, deftly mixes
comedy and violence, overdoing neither.
 And while "Go" is no "Pulp Fiction," it has a similar in-your-face air,
daring you to accept the movie on its own terms or forget it.
 "Go" is an entertaining ride, a wild, kinetic experience that is most
satisfying.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Three to Tango (1999)

 Three to Tango (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Matthew Perry, Neve
Campbell, Dylan McDermott and Oliver Platt.
 "Three to Tango" is a comical farce about mistaken identity - sexual
mistaken identity.
 But what the movie, directed by Damon Santostefano, cannot clearly focus
on is its attitude toward gays.
 The premise is straight out of one of those screwball comedies of the
1930s and '40s.
 Oscar Novak (Matthew Perry) and Peter Steinberg (Oliver Platt) are
partners in an architectural firm, bidding on a multimillion-dollar project
by tycoon Charles Newman (Dylan McDermott).
 Through a misunderstanding, Newman is led to believe that Novak and
Steinberg are not only partners in business, but in their private lives.
 Thus, thinking Oscar "safe," the married millionaire asks the young
architect to keep an eye on his mistress, Amy Post (Neve Campbell), an
artist.
 Of course, Oscar and Amy fall in love, and complications and
misunderstandings abound, creating comedic situations.
 What seems a bit unclear in the screenplay by Rodney Vaccaro and Aline
Brosh Viviano, based on a story by Vaccaro, are their feelings toward gays.
 Throughout the film, the script has Oscar constantly denying that he is
homosexual as well as feeling embarrassed and humiliated by the entire
situation.
 In the final reel, Oscar gives one of those heartfelt speeches that is an
affirmation of not judging people by their sexual preference, but looking
at them as individuals and at their accomplishments.
 The scene also features one of the latest - most annoying - clichés to
creep into movies: the single clap. After someone finishes a speech or
accomplishes something special there is dead silence until one person
stands and begins applauding. Then another person joins in and another,
until the entire room or arena or stadium is on its feet.
 Perry is very adept at physical comedy as he takes shots to the head and
groin and gets tackled by a football player who falls for him after his
"coming out."
 Campbell is luscious as the free-spirited artist. She glows on screen.
 McDermott is appropriately sleazy as the two-timing villain of the piece,
while Pratt easily steals the movie as the wise-cracking gay partner, who,
ironically, McDermott's Newman believes is straight.
 "Three to Tango" is a lightweight, enjoyable romp. It's not too deep, nor
is it preachy. It is what it is. Don't expect anything more.
 Bob Bloom is the movie critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or a
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Autumn in New York (2000)

 Autumn in New York (2000) 1 star out of 4. Starring Richard Gere,
Winona Ryder, Anthony LaPaglia, Elaine Stritch, Vera Farmiga, Sherry
Stringfield, Jill Hennessy and J.K. Simmons. Written by Allison Burnett.
Directed by Joan Chen. Rated PG-13.
 I must confess that underneath this gruff, cynical movie critic's
exterior beats the heart of a sentimental romantic.
 I enjoy love stories - good ones, that is. One of my favorites is a
forgotten little gem called "The Barretts of Wimpole Street," which
tells of the love affair of Victorian-era poets Robert Browning and
Elizabeth Barrett. And, of course, there's "Casablanca," the greatest
love story of all. When Rick sends Ilsa away at the end, telling her,
`We'll always have Paris,' I get a bit choked up.
 In my mind, the saddest love story is "King Kong." Boy finds girl, boy
loses girl, boy finds girl again in New York, boy gets riddled with
machine gun bullets and falls from the top of the Empire State Building.
It brings a tear to my eye just thinking about it.
 Bringing tears to my eyes, but for a different reason, was the new
Richard Gere-Winona Ryder weeper, "Autumn in New York." This
May-December romance is so artificial, so contrived that no matter how
hard you try liking it, you can't bring yourself to embrace it fully.
 He is Will Keane, 48, a famed chef and restaurant owner and a notorious
womanizer. He's one of those love em and leave em guys. He is
portrayed by Gere, who remains one of the handsomest men on the planet.
In fact, age has added a bit of character and depth to Gere's features.
 But the way in which some of the other supporting players talk about
Gere's Keane and his remarkable good looks for a guy his age, you'd
think he had a portrait of himself hidden somewhere in his apartment
doing the aging for him. (For those who don't know what the heck I'm
talking about, I suggest you read Oscar Wilde's "Picture of Dorian
Gray," or at least rent the movie.)
 She is Charlotte Fielding, a 22-year-old free spirit in the bloom of
young adulthood. She also has a terrible secret. Well, it's not really a
secret. She has a rare, congenital heart condition, and Charlotte knows
she has very little time left. And if anyone thinks, I'm spoiling the
movie, forget it. The film's trailer spills the beans, so don't go
blaming me.
 Anyway, our Charlotte figures, what the heck, why not spend what time
she has left rolling around in bed with a guy twice her age.
 Call me old fashioned, but if I knew my time was limited, I think I'd
find other worthwhile things to do - visit ballparks I haven't seen, fly
to countries I've always wanted to visit. Beg Sophia Loren to allow me
to take her to dinner. That sort of thing.
 Surprising, Ryder is very good as Charlotte. Her character is pragmatic
and confident, and in some instances much more mature than her
much-older lover. Because Charlotte seems so self-assured, so together,
it is difficult to grasp her attraction to the shallow Will.
 "Autumn in New York" contains some of the most lame dialogue I've heard
in years. You don't even hear lines like these on daytime soaps.
 Most of these clunkers are mouthed by Gere: `Man, you don't dance, you
float' and `You're a kid and I'm a creep,' are two examples.
 And those are some of the better lines. Gere and Ryder, under the
direction of former actress Joan Chen, spend a lot of time staring into
each other's eyes, crying, arguing then making up.
 After a while, it is all very tiresome.
 "Autumn in New York" is a pretty movie, with an appropriately sweet
score by Gabriel Yared.
 It is difficult to understand what attracted Chen, who made a very
impressive directorial debut with the acclaimed "Xiu Xiu: The Sent-Down
Girl," to this project. I hope it was only to get her foot in the door
of the Directors Guild of America, and that now she will go on to better
and more worthwhile projects as befits her talent.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for General, The (1998)
 The General (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Brendan Gleeson and Jon
Voight. Directed by John Boorman
 John Boorman's The General is an interesting, yet frustrating, look at the
life of Martin Cahill, a notorious Dublin criminal.
 Shot almost documentary-style in black and white, Boorman's film is a
fascinating look at a man who held the basic institutions of society  the
law, the church  in contempt, and used his cunning and ferocity to live
life on his own savage terms.
 Cahill, nicknamed "The General," was a legend in Ireland during his brutal
life, yet very few people could identify him. Cahill developed a habit of
continually obscuring his face, thus making it difficult for anyone to get
a clear picture of him.
And it seems, in a sense, Boorman was confronted with that same problem.
For while he shows the brazen and clever ways Cahill planned and committed
his various crimes, the director seems unable to get under his subject's
skin.
 Boorman masterfully displays Cahill's rage and contempt, his bravado and
cleverness, but he falls short in showing what sparked it.
 True, we get early scenes of a young Cahill in a boy's detention home,
where he fights off the sexual advances of a priest, and we learn he spent
most of his early life in prison.
 Yet while this may be a simplistic approach to explaining his contempt for
authority and society, it does not answer the big question: How and where
did Cahill develop the wiliness to plan such perfect crimes as well as
outwit the police for nearly two decades?
 As you watch The General, you get the sense that Boorman is valiantly
attempting to paint a complete picture of Cahill, yet his brush continually
misses strokes.
 For example, for years Cahill lived in a menage a trois with his wife and
her sister, and had several children by both. No explanation for this odd
arrangement is offered.
 As Cahill, Brendan Gleeson (best known to American audiences as Mel
Gibson's friend, Hamish, in the actor's Oscar-winning Braveheart) gives a
compelling performance.
 He creates a man of contradictions  a loving husband and father at his
homes, but a brutal, conniving, merciless thug on the outside.
 Gleeson's Cahill is a deadly charmer.
 Jon Voight seems wasted as the police inspector who's obsessed with
bringing Cahill to justice. There is nothing particularly memorable about
his performance.
 At a bit over two hours, The General seems to lapse during some sequences.
Also, the Irish accents are a bit hard to understand, and Cahill's habit of
covering his face and talking through his hands makes comprehending what he
is saying even more difficult at times.
 Despite these obstacles, The General is an interesting look at a unusual
individual. It's a movie Boorman fans  used to his artistic visions in such
films as Excalibur and The Emerald Forest  may not find totally satisfying.
But the force of Cahill's personality draws you to the screen and rivets
your attention.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)

 The Perfect Storm (2000) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring George Clooney,
Mark Wahlberg, John C. Reilly, William Fichtner, Diane Lane and Mary
Elizabeth Mastrantonio. Music by James Horner. Screenplay
by Bill Wittliff, based on the book by Sebastian Junger. Directed by
Wolfgang Petersen.
 "The Perfect Storm" could have been one of those classic man vs. the
elements sagas in which a group of individuals heroically battle nature
with all their heart, soul and courage.
 And while director Wolfgang Petersen's dramatization of Sebastian
Junger's best-selling novel is at times breathtaking and awesome, it
lacks the emotional resonance of a "Captains Courageous" or "The Old Man
and the Sea."
 The fault possibly lies in the screenplay, adapted by Bill Wittliff.
Wittliff is a fine writer, having adapted "Lonesome Dove" for
television. His screen credits include "The Black Stallion" and
"Barbarosa." On the down side, they also include "Legends of the Fall"
and "The Cowboy Way."
 hat Wittliff has failed to do is create a bond between the audience and
the main protagonists, so when they meet their ultimate fate, the impact
is muted.
 To be fair, this may not all be Wittliff's doing. He had to whittle
Junger's book down to a reasonable two-hour-plus running time. And in
doing so something had to be jettisoned.
 Unfortunately, it was character development in lieu of the many shots
of giant waves crashing into the swordfishing boat Andrea Gail.
 Thus we get penciled doodles instead of completed portraits of the crew
of the Andrea Gail. It also doesn't help that some of the dialogue
mouthed by these Gloucester, Mass., fishermen sounds cliched and
unnatural, as if it was written for them.
 The real heroes of "The Perfect Storm" are the technicians at
Industrial Light & Magic who have created some stomach churning effects
that will have you reaching for sea sickness pills.
 But "The Perfect Storm" is a human drama, a story of hubris,
stubbornness, tenacity and reckless moxie.
 This true tale takes place in late October of 1991. Capt. Billy Tyne
(George Clooney) has endured a run of disappointing catches. His pride
is hurt moreso than his wallet, and he decides to make one last outing
for a big score.
 Tyne gathers his crew. Among them are Bobby (Mark Wahlberg), who needs
the money to begin a new life with his girl, Chris (Diane Lane); Dale
`Murph' Murphy (John C. Reilly), a veteran seaman who is supporting his
estranged wife and son; and Sully (William Fichtner), a sharp-tongued
individual who does as little work as possible.
 They set out for the Grand Banks, but when the fishing there proves
inadequate they push on to the Flemish Cap. Tyne ignores all the
warnings about an upcoming storm and, like a mini-Ahab, pursues his
prey.
 What Wittliff's script fails to provide is a rational motivation for
Tyne's action. Is it pride because he has been outfished by a rival
captain (the lovely Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio)? Is it guilt because of
the failure to provide a decent payoff for his crew? Is it a way to
prove to his boss, the owner of the Andrea Gail, that he's still a
top-flight skipper, a worthy seaman?
 It might be a combination of all three, but the characters are so
weakly defined that we never know sure what galvanizes his decisions.
  The script's shortcomings are slightly compensated by the movie's
first-rate cast and ILM's computer graphic effects.
Clooney is scruffy and a bit sea-worn as Tyne, a proud man sure of his
knowledge of the sea and its fishing lanes.
 Wahlberg is appealing, filled with puppy-dog sincerity as the young man
in love. But he really is given little to do except admire Tyne's
seamanship.
 Reilly is tough and tender as a man with a hole in his heart. `Murph'
loves his son, and it devastates him that he must return to the sea
instead of being able to spend time with the boy.
 Again, a script problem fails to explain the animosity between Murphy
and Sully, even though the pair finally do reach some sort of
understanding.
 All in all, the characters merely seem like archetypes instead of
full-bodied individuals.
 A James Horner score helps propel the action. It is not as bombastic as
you'd expect for a movie of this type. In some scenes it has a lyrical,
sea-chanty lilt.
 Overall, "The Perfect Storm" is an imperfect feature. This is one movie
that probably could have used a longer running time for more character
exposition.
 As it is, "The Perfect Storm" is a mighty adventure that lacks any real
personal warmth. It has a cold, detached feeling. The human dimension
that director Petersen brought to his other seafaring outing, the
classic "Das Boot," is the element most needed to hoist "The Perfect
Storm" into the pantheon of great sea movies.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Parent Trap, The (1998)
 It's difficult to dislike The Parent Trap.
 Sure, it's about as realistic as an episode of The X-Files. It's a movie
that is set in some fantasy land where all the people have perfect teeth,
the kids are smarter than the adults and everyone lives happily ever after.
 Actually, it's a Disney remake of a popular 1961 confection that starred
Hayley Mills as twin daughters who meet and then connive to reunite their
long-divorced parents.
 The main plot is faithfully followed in this glossy makeover.
 It's a movie that, if you really would take the time to analyze, you would
find many problems, both thematic and sociological.
 Why, for instance, would a parent hide the fact from a child that she has
a  sister, and a twin at that?
 Wouldn't it be rather traumatic for the twins meeting for the first time?
 Little items like this are ignored in this Nancy Meyers-directed item.
 For this is a movie for children, as well as baby boomers who hold fond
memories of the original.
 For the rest of you, bah, humbug, stay home and rent Breakdown.
 The main appeal of The Parent Trap is young Lindsay Lohan, who assays the
dual roles of Hallie and Annie. Hallie lives with her father, Nick (Dennis
Quaid), in Napa Valley, Calif.
 Annie lives with her mom, Elizabeth (Natasha Richardson), in London.
 The girls meet at summer camp, where as in the original, they start out as
rivals, before discovering they are sisters.
 From there, the plot follows the familiar path of the girls switching
places, then plotting to reunite their parents.
Lohan is a very appealing young actress, and it is her charisma that grabs
and  holds the viewer. She literally shines from the screen.
 Overlooked by the script, as well as the audience, is any resentment on
either girl's part of being abandoned by the other parent.
 No, it's all hugs and kisses and tears of joy.
 Quaid and Richardson look wonderful in their undemanding roles.
 One historical note: Joanna Barnes, who played the "other woman" in the
original film, appears in the small role of the mother of this version's
"other woman," Meredith, an overly nasty performance by Elaine Hendrix.
 The Parent Trap is entertaining, filled with laughs and sentimentality.
It's simplistic in its outlook, which will make it even more appealing for
the younger audience members.
 At a little more than two hours, this Parent Trap may drag in a spot or
two, but overall it should hold the attention of most youngsters.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Summer Catch (2001)
 SUMMER CATCH (2001) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Freddie Prinze Jr., Jessical
Biel, Matthew Lillard, Fred Ward, Jason Gedrick, Brittany Murphy, Bruce Davison
and Brian Dennehy.  Screenplay by Kevin Falls and John Gatins. Story by Falls.
Directed by Mike Tollin. Rated PG-13. Approx. 110 minutes. 
 Summer Catch is a minor league effort, nine innings of banality with a lineup
of stock situations and stereotypical characters. 
 This feature is like a double header, two sets of clichés for the price of one.
Not only do we get the usual tired sports chestnuts, but the banal rich
girl-poor boy love story is tossed in for good measure. 
 An original moment in this loser is as rare as a Chicago Cubs World Series
appearance. 
 The screenplay by Kevin Falls and John Gatins, based on a story by Falls,
merely lobs its plotline at the audience. This is a story that needed sent down
for seasoning and more coaching. 
 Summer Catch centers around Ryan Dunne (Freddie Prinze Jr.), a Cape Cod youth
chosen to participate in the prestigious Cape Cod Baseball League, supposedly a
showcase for the best young amateur and college players in the country. 
 Ryan is a blue-collar kind of guy. He works with his dad taking care of the
lawns of Cape Cod's rich and famous. 
 He also, as we are informed early, his own worst enemy. He has the potential
and the talent, but always seems to self-destruct at the crucial moment. 
 So, Ryan tries to remained focused on baseball. Then he meets Tenley Parrish
(Jessica Biel), daughter of one of the blue bloods whose lawn he manicures.
Tenley, a name only a hack screenwriter could invent, is unlike her snobbish
counterparts and falls for Ryan. 
 If you can't figure out where all this nonsense leads, then you need a remedial
course in film viewing. 
 As always Prinze is pretty to look at, but his performance mainly consists of
facial expressions: puppy dog love, heartbreak, frustration, self-loathing or
determination. 
 Biel cries a lot, while Bruce Davison merely acts smarmy as her class-conscious
father. 
The only beacon is Matthew Lillard's fun-loving Billy Brubaker, the team's
catcher. 
 Summer Catch borrows situations and stylings from other baseball movies, such
as Bull Durham and The Natural. 
 No curve balls here, no sliders. Every pitch is predictable. A blind umpire
could call this movie. 
 Summer Catch is strictly rookie league moviemaking. It has as much chance of
making the movie hall of fame as the Dodgers have of moving back to Brooklyn. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Rat Race (2001)
 RAT RACE (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Rowan Atkinson, Lanai Chapman, John
Cleese, Whoopi Goldberg, Cuba Gooding Jr., Seth Green, Jon Lovitz, Breckin
Meyer, Kathy Najimy, Amy Smart, Dave Thomas and Vince Vieluf. Screenplay by Andy
Breckman. Directed by Jerry Zucker. Rated PG-13. 
 If you want some hearty laughs, then Rat Race is the movie for you. 
 This unpretentious little comedy, which sneaks into theaters today with very
little hype, will have you bouncing in your theater seat. 
 And while the film fits neatly into the low-brow, slapstick school of comedy,
one refreshing aspect is its lack of mean-spiritedness. 
 The plot follows a group of people chosen at random by an eccentric Las Vegas
casino owner (John Cleese) who must race from Vegas to a bus station locker 700
miles away in Silver City, N.M. Inside the locker is a duffel bag containing $2
million. The first one to open the locker, gets the bag and the money. 
 What the group of participants doesn't know is that Cleese's Donald Sinclair
("I can do anything I want - I'm eccentric!") is staging the race as a betting
game for a group of high rollers at the hotel. 
 The participants include Vera (Whoopi Goldberg) and Merrill (Lanai Chapman), a
newly reunited mother and daughter; disgraced pro football referee Owen
Templeton (Cuba Gooding Jr.); Italian tourist Mr. Pollini (Rowan Atkinson);
Randy Pear (Jon Lovitz) and his family; the bumbling con men Duane and Blaine
Cody (Seth Green and Vince Vieluf); and cynical young lawyer Nick Shaffer
(Breckin Meyer). 
 Various amusing encounters and mishaps befall the participants en route to
Silver City. Screenwriter Andy Breckman adds a nice touch by not having the
racers try to sabotage one another. 
 The most side-splitting situations involve Vera and Merrill's encounter with
the squirrel lady, a nice nutsy cameo by Kathy Bates; Owen's commandeering a
charter bus full of Lucille Ball look-alikes on their way to a Lucy convention;
the Cody brothers misadventures with a hot-air balloon, a flying cow and a
monster truck; and the Pear family's stopover at a Barbie museum, which turns
out not to be what they think it is. 
 The Pear family situation is a fine example of the way Breckman's script builds
the laughs. Without going into detail, this bit segues from the museum to
Hitler's touring car, to Eva Braun's dark lipstick, to Lovitz burning his
tongue, culminating at a ceremony honoring World War II veterans. 
 Rat Race's cast is first rate. Cleese is wonderfully devilish and madcap;
Lovitz is, at first, a bit whiny, but his character grows on you; Gooding is
having a fine romp; and Dave Thomas almost steals the show as Cleese's deadpan
assistant, a man "born without a personality." 
 The film is directed by Jerry Zucker, who knows something about comedy. Along
with his brother, David, and friend Jim Abrahams, he was responsible for such
hits as Airplane! and Ruthless People. 
 A throwaway subplot, which is good for some laughs, features Cleese and his
buddies, betting on a series of outlandish situations, including one dealing
with a hooker and Pepto-Bismol. 
 This is a fun little feature. The only letdown comes at the finale, which is
too touchy-feely and sweet, almost negating what came before it. 
 Rat Race is a summer sleeper, but it will keep you awake, as will the laughter
of those watching around you. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Why Do Fools Fall In Love (1998)

 Why Do Fools Fall in Love (1998) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Larenz Tate,
Halle Berry, Vivica A. Fox and Lela Rochon. Directed by Gregory Nava.
 Somewhere amidst the fragmented chaos that is Why Do Fools Fall in Love
lurks the germ of a terrific movie.
 Unfortunately, director Gregory Nava and writer Tina Andrews have
overreached their objective. Instead of the multitextured story they were
hoping to film, their film is a jumbled, unfocused undertaking.
 Why Do Fools Fall in Love centers on the life of one of rock 'n' roll's
early idols, Frankie Lymon, whom with his group, The Teenagers, rose to the
top of the charts in early 1956 with the film's title song. The recording
was one of the first big hits of the rock era.
 However, Nava's movie concentrates not on Lymon's life but the aftermath
of his death. The main plot follows the court battle for Lymon's estate
waged by three women from diverse backgrounds, each claiming to be Mrs.
Frankie Lymon.
 The women are Zola Taylor (Halle Berry), a successful singer who was a
member of that legendary group, The Platters; Elizabeth Waters (Vivica A.
Fox), a welfare mother whom Frankie meets when he saves her from a
shoplifting charge; and Emira Eagle (Lela Rochon), a schoolteacher Frankie
meets while serving in the Army, long after his singing career has peaked.
 The story is told mostly in flashback as each woman testifies about her
life with Frankie.
 Despite the various perspectives on Lymon, we never get a clear picture of
whom Frankie Lymon is. This is because Nava and Andrews emphasize the three
women, their attempts to win in court and their relationships with Lymon.
 The film creates a jigsaw puzzle that, at the end of nearly two hours,
still is missing pieces.
 We learn that Lymon had an alcoholic, abusive father and that his singing
stemmed from his need for love and acceptance. We discover that his later
heroin addiction is a result of the decline in his career.
 Nava's attempts to recreate the '50s era are inadequate. Also, we get no
time frame of the events in Frankie's life or at what age the various women
entered his life. For example, Frankie was only 13 in '56 when "Why Do
Fools Fall in Love" rose on the charts. He died in 1968 at 25.
 We also learn very little about these women. What, for example, attracted
the already-successful Zola to this upstart street kid from Harlem? Why do
we never see or hear any more about Elizabeth's daughter, despite the fact
that the clothes Elizabeth was stealing were for her child? What unknown
change of heart causes Emira, who throughout the trial seems to hold the
other women in contempt, to suddenly decide to bond with them?
 Why Do Fools Fall in Love skips over these points in favor of flashy
camera angles and tricks, slick set design and various musical set pieces.
 However, the three actresses compensate for the flimsy material they are
handed. Berry, as Zola, is the most colorful and theatrical of the trio.
Fox, so spunky as Will Smith's lover in Independence Day, brings that same
spark of grit to the role of an average person at first swept up in the
lure of celebrity, then willing to sink to the depths to help her man.
 What's puzzling is that the three women are so self-sufficient that it's
difficult to comprehend why they continue to allow Frankie to take
advantage of them.
 Larenz Tate as Frankie sparkles, but we never see the allure that
captivated these women. Tate's Frankie is a charming heel who for the most
part thinks only of himself and of ways to recapture his very brief life in
the limelight.
 Determining fact from fiction is another problem, even though the movie
feels more like a rock fable than musical history. There is no way to
gather Frankie's age when he took up with any of his wives.
 Why Do Fools Fall in Love is an entertaining look at a vibrant time in
music history. It's sassy, loud and joyful, just like the music it
celebrates. It is just too bad that the sound wasn't the film's main focus.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
 Walt Disney's original intent was to update "Fantasia" every few years,
substituting new musical pieces for old.
 Well, better late than never. Nearly 60 years after the release of this
ground-breaking animated feature, "Fantasia 2000" kicks off the new year at
20 IMAX theaters nationwide, where it will be playing exclusively for the
next four months.
 And I wish I could report that "Fantasia 2000" is as original and as
timeless as its 1940 predecessor. Alas, I'm sad to say that "Fantasia 2000"
is a minor disappointment.
 The reason is not so much with the movie as with the changing times.
 "Fantasia 200" lacks the freshness, the novelty of the original. But even
that is not its main flaw.
 The movie plays it too safe, too conservative in its musical choices. Now,
I am no musicologist, but selecting such works as Beethoven's "Fifth
Symphony", Resphigi's "Pines of Rome," Saint-Saens' "Carnival of the
Animals" and Elgar's "Pomp and Circumstance, Marches 1, 2, 3 and 4" seem
like works to cater to the broadest general audience.
 While for the most part visually exciting and stimulating, "Fantasia 2000"
lacks the daring of the first movie, which featured Stravinsky's "Rites of
Spring" as the backdrop to the story of the rise and fall of the dinosaurs.
 Plus contemporary audiences are a bit more sophisticated and learned. So,
why not choose more modern works by a composer such as Phillip Glass or the
works of an African or Far Eastern composer.
 Because of its white, Western middle-class program, "Fantasia 2000" is
artistically timid.
 Though the musical selections may be pedestrian, overall the movie is
enjoyable and, at a mere 75 minutes,  fast-paced and colorful. And it
contains genuine moments of genius.
 Gershwin's "Rhapsody in Blue" is set in 1930s New York and is drawn in the
style of famed cartoonist Al Hirschfeld.
 "The Pines of Rome" sequence is breathtaking with its balletic whales and
shimmering waters.
 The animation in "The Steadfast Tin Soldier" sequence, set to the music of
Shostakovich's "Piano Concerto No. 2," is moody, while the "Carnival of the
Animals" sequence, which features a bunch of flamingos dealing with a
yo-yo, is comic and bright.
 The best sequence is a hold over from the original: Dukas' "The Sorcerer's
Apprentice" featuring Mickey Mouse. No matter how many times you've seen
it, you still marvel at its magic and humor.
 "Fantasia 2000" features, for the most part, exceptional animation. What's
missing is boldness and impact. Maybe if the Disney people follow Uncle
Walt's original idea and update it in five or six years, those in charge
will look farther afield when making their selections.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)

A Perfect Murder (1998) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Michael Douglas,
Gwyenth Paltrow and Viggo Mortensen
 A Perfect Murder is an imperfect movie.
 A stylish thriller, loosely based on Dial M for Murder, which was one of
Alfred Hitchcock's lesser thrillers of the 1950s, A Perfect Murder is cold
and uninvolving.
 And while all the intricacies are in place for what could have been an
entertaining thriller, scriptwriter Patrick Smith Kelly seems to have
forgotten one important ingredient - humanity.
 Steven Taylor (Michael Douglas) and his much-younger wife, Emily (Gwyneth
Paltrow), are among New York's elite. Money, power, a beautiful home - they
have it all.
 Emily also has something extra - a lover. David Shaw, a poor artist, is
actually a con artist whose specialty is bilking rich women out of their
fortunes.
 Steven discovers the affair and hires David to murder Emily.
 From there, the plot unwinds in a continual charade of double dealings and
double crosses.
 But it is all so cold and impersonal that the viewer really doesn't give a
hoot about who does what to whom. Will Steven's plot succeed? Will Emily
realize her husband's duplicity? Who cares.
 It's fun to watch, but there is definitely no emotional involvement.
Paltrow is lovely, like a chiseled blonde goddess. Douglas is chilling and
level-headed.
 Viggo Mortensen seems out of his depth as an artist (who, by the way,
learned his trade in prison), but comes to life when he reverts to his con
man personna.
 But even then he remains overshadowed by his two co-stars.
 Nor is it ever explained how this starving artist made contact with the
patrician Emily, nor how he can afford his spacious loft.
 The only glimpse of humanity offered anywhere in the film is from
character actor David Suchet as the police detective investigating the
Taylors' lives.
 Director Andrew Davis, whose best work still remains The Fugitive, keeps
the proceedings moving at a leisurely pace. He offers few tricks and a
couple of surprises, but nothing earth shaking that would set A Perfect
Murder apart from any of a dozen other movies rolling off the studio
assembly line.
 What this movie needs is a bit of heart, a touch of compassion. Without
it, A Perfect Murder is just a sterile outing. It's like going to a museum
and looking at the pretty pictures without being able to get close to the
artworks.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
 I have a confession: Deep down in my darkest soul, I'm a sadist. I enjoy
watching people get killed in gruesome ways in movies. It sort of helps to
let out all the pent-up aggression.
 Therefore, for those of you who think along the same lines, "The Deep Blue
Sea" is your kind of movie.
 Nothing is as satisfying as seeing human beings transformed by sharks into
sushi.
 Too bad, though, that, there's so little of human vs. shark interaction in
the movie. At one hour and 45 minutes, about 90 minutes is filled with
humans interacting with other humans. And that is too bad.
 For when the sharks are away, the people are bores. Actually, they are not
even people - merely types: the dedicated scientist who, by breaking
protocols in the name of humanity and research, creates smart sharks that
can outthink the humans; the outsider, loner adventurer who is the only
reach match for the sharks; the black cook who has rediscovered religion;
and the industrialist who only cares about his publicity and the bottom
line.
 You really don't give a hoot about any of these people. They are merely
shark bait. And you merely sit and watch, waiting for the next person to be
bit in half by the trio of man-eating denizens at a high-tech research
facility in the middle of the ocean.
 Even the computer-generated effects are second rate. When the sharks speed
up or take a nibble on one of the performers, the screen becomes a bit
blurry and the action looks like something off a computer game.
 All in all, "The Deep Blue Sea," directed by Renny Harlin, is a grade-C
movie that should be running at the drive-in on a double bill with "Lake
Placid."
 Between killer sharks and killer 'gators, it is not nice to mess with
Mother Nature this summer.
 Nope, "The Deep Blue Sea" is a big watery bore. You can find more fun and
excitement at a water park than on the screen.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)

 Rush Hour (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jackie Chan and Chris Tucker.
 The good news, especially for fans of Jackie Chan, is that Rush Hour again
spotlights this international favorite's athleticism and sly humor.
 However, this is all offset by having Chan work with the equally obnoxious
and grating Chris Tucker.
 Tucker is supposed to be a comedian, but he's as funny as a case of
hemorrhoids. His bug-eyed, fast-talking shtick is supposed to be hip, but
it's nothing but juvenile blathering.
 In fact, Rush Hour would have been a much better action flick if Tucker
had been eliminated all together.
 As it is, this story centering around the recovery of a Chinese diplomat's
kidnapped daughter works well when Chan is on the screen. What Fred Astaire
and Gene Kelly were to movie dancing, Chan is to the martial arts. His
choreographed movements are like a ballistic ballet.
 Chan always brings a sly sense of humor to his roles, as if winking at the
audience to let them know he's in on the joke, that it's only a movie. He
is disarming and appealing.
 Tucker, on the other hand, reminds me of that old John Belushi Saturday
Night Live sketch about the guest who wouldn't leave. Whenever this
bug-eyed, motor-mouthed moron is on the screen, you want to grab a fly
swatter or other utensil and shoo him off or else run out to the concession
stand.
 Tucker is trying to copy the early Eddie Murphy, but he not only lacks
Murphy's charm, but Murphy's intelligence and charisma.
 One of Rush Hour's biggest questions is how did a big-mouth screw-up such
as Tucker's James Carter ever become a cop - even the Los Angeles police
department must have some standards.
 But Rush Hour, for the most part, rises above Tucker's antics. And while
it is cartoonish, it also is fun, and that is due mostly to Chan. Without
him, Rush Hour, even at about 90 minutes, would have been a broken-down
Edsel in a long line of stalled traffic.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Made (2001)
 MADE (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Jon Favreau, Vince Vaughn, Sean Combs,
Peter Falk, Famke Janssen, Faizon Leve and Vincent Pastore. Written and directed
by Jon Favreau. Rated R. 94 minutes. 
 Made is a comedy-drama friendship movie cloaked in the garb of the mobster
genre. 
 Making his directorial debut, actor Jon Favreau brings along his Swingers
co-star, Vince Vaughn, for this tale of two mugs on a career trajectory to
nowheresville. 
 Favreau, who also wrote the script, is Bobby, Vaughn is Ricky. By day they are
construction workers. They also are wanna-be contenders, but neither has had
much success. Their last bout pitted them against each other and was a draw,
leaving Bobby's record at 5-5-1. 
 These two L.A. not-so-wise guys also work for Max (Peter Falk), a mid-level
mobster, who is patient and understanding with Bobby, but who hates Ricky's
guts. 
 Max has an easy job for Bobby; fly to New York and make a simple delivery to a
gangster named Ruiz (a smooth and silky Sean Combs). 
 Bobby, because of his lifelong friendship with Ricky, pleads with Max to give
his pal another chance and let him tag along to the Big Apple. 
 Against his better judgment, Max agrees. 
 Of course Ricky, a motormouth who inserts both feet everytime he speaks, nearly
screws up everything. 
 While Bobby tries to stay calm and professional, Ricky begins swaggering and
throwing money around as if he was John Gotti or Tony Soprano. 
 The constrast in styles and the chemistry between Favreau and Vaughn is what
makes Made so enjoyable to watch. 
 Favreau with his hound-dog face and slow-burn personality could be a modern-day
Oliver Hardy, only much wiser. 
 Vaughn is like someone vaccinated with a phonograph needle, he just keeps
yakking and yakking, unaware of the havoc he creates. 
 Yet despite Bobby's constant aggravation and agitation with his partner, a bond
of affection and loyalty binds them. 
 The contrast between the two friends is interesting to watch. Bobby is
button-downed, tightly-wound, always waiting for the next shoe -courtesy of
Ricky - to drop. 
 Ricky is mostly oblivious to the problems he creates and is genuinely surprised
when he comes under attack for his faux paus. 
 In New York, the two lackeys are like fish out of water, stumbling from one
situation to another, trying to keep alive. 
 Combs is elegant, cool and low-key menacing as the gangsta they are sent to
meet. 
 Falk is amusing in his small role, while Famke Janssen nearly breaks your heart
as Bobby's lowlife girlfriend. 
 More than anything, Made is a movie with heart. It is loud, obnoxious and very
talkative. But the cameraderie between Bobby and Ricky holds the key to its
interest. 
 Favreau does a commendable job in his directorial debut. He is a player to be
watched as he can only improve with experience. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
 Big Daddy (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Adam Sandler, Cole and
Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams, Rob Schneider, Leslie Mann and Jon
Stewart.
 A sure sign of a pending apocalypse: I enjoyed Adam Sandler's new movie.
 In "Big Daddy," Sandler takes another tentative step toward playing an
adult, instead of his usual overgrown adolescent dufus.
 This process began with "The Wedding Singer," skipping a step along the
way with The Waterboy.
 In "Big Daddy," Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a law school graduate who
works once a week as a toll booth operator while living off the $200,000 he
was awarded from a traffic accident lawsuit. (A taxicab had run over his
foot.)
 When he is not working, Sonny just loafs around his apartment, eating
carry-in food and watching sports on his big-screen television.
 One day, a 5-year-old boy, Julian, is dropped off at the apartment Sonny
shares with his law school buddy, Kevin. Julian is Kevin's son from a
long-ago one-night stand. With Kevin out of town, Sonny adopts Julian under
the false pretense of being his biological father.
 Sonny is under the misguided impression that adopting Julian will impress
his girlfriend, Vanessa, and that she will take him back, realizing he is
ready to accept responsibility.
 Of course, everything goes wrong. Vanessa dumps him, so Sonny tries to
return Julian to social services. However, he agrees to take care of him
until the agency can find a good home for the boy.
 All this is pure dramatic - or comic, if you will - license. No social
service agency in the world would be so inept as to leave a child with an
Adam Sandler character, but this is the movies, so let's be charitable.
 As time passes, Sonny and Julian form a warm, loving relationship. Sonny
teaches Julian such useful skills as how to tumble roller bladers and how
to relieve himself against a wall when no bathroom is available.
 Sonny also allows Julian to wear whatever clothes he likes and to go by
whatever name he prefers. (Julian chooses Frankenstein for some odd
reason.)
 While "Big Daddy" is replete with a year's allowance of bathroom and vomit
humor, it also is a movie with heart.
 Sonny does come to love Julian, and vice versa. He sends the boy to
school, helps him with his homework and tries to give him a good home.
 Things do begin to unravel when social services officials learn of Sonny's
ruse and take the boy away.
 But being a comedy, everything works out for the best by the final fade-out.
 Sandler is actually likable as Sonny. He adds some warmth and heart to his
usual comic repertoire of loud voices and funny faces, but even those are
toned down from his previous outings.
 A fine supporinting cast, including Rob Schneider as the delivery boy who
spends so much time at Sandler's apartment that he is considered one of the
family, and Joey Lauren Adams as Layla, the young attorney who comes to
love Sonny for his humor and compassion.
 Twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse are cute and not too obnoxious as Julian,
while Leslie Mann adds a nice comic flair as Corinne, Kevin's fiance - and
Sonny's mortal enemy - who used to work at Hooters and is the butt of many
jokes.
 Another of the movie's finer points is the positive portrayal of two of
Sonny and Kevin's law school friends who are gay and have a solid, loving
relationship. It is a minor plot point, but one that adds to the overall
adult tone of the film.
 "Big Daddy" can stand as one big promotion for Hooters because of all the
references to Corrine's time their as well as a funny closing sequence that
wraps up all the film's loose ends.
 The script by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Sandler, based on a story by
Franks, is a bit crude and vulgar, but ultimately it is cuddly and
touching.
And whoever thought you'd see those words in a review about an Adam Sandler
movie. Just goes to show that the human race is constantly evolving.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for What's the Worst That Could Happen? (2001)

 What's the Worst That Could Happen (2001) 1 star out of 4. Starring
Martin Lawrence, Danny DeVito, John Leguizamo, Glenne Headly, Carmen
Ejogo, Bernie Mac, Larry Miller, Nora Dunn, Richard Schiff, William
Fichtner and Ana Gasteyer. Screenplay by Matthew Chapman. Based upon the
novel by Donald E. Westlake. Music by Tyler Bates. Directed by Sam
Weisman. Rated PG-13.
 Did the studio brain trust who approved a title such as Whatís the
Worst That Could Happen? pause to consider the potential fun critics
could have playing off those words if they disliked the film?
 You can be forced to sit through this nonsense a second time.
 You can find yourself locked in a theater holding a Martin Lawrence
film festival.
 The directorís cut on DVD could include an extra 30 minutes of footage.
 Whatís the Worst That Could Happen is a lame, cynical movie trying to
pass itself off as a comedy caper. The movie has its moments, but you
could do the Sunday New York Times crossword puzzle between them.
 Itís difficult enjoying a movie in which most of the characters are
thieves and crooks. Itís even harder to garner sympathy for people who
spend their lives thumbing their noses at the law.
 Of course you can say actors such as James Cagney and Humphrey Bogart
made careers playing such characters. The difference is the agents of
law and order generally prevailed, and the Cagneys and Bogarts usually
paid the ultimate price in the final reel.
 Whatís the Worst That Could Happen revolves around Kevin Caffery
(Lawrence), a high-class thief, and his battle with corrupt media tycoon
Max Fairbanks (Danny DeVito) to retrieve a ring Fairbanks took from
Caffery when the latter was caught burglarizing the mogulís summer home.
 The ring was given to Kevin by his girlfriend, Amber (Carmen Ejogo).
 Even taking into consideration that this feature is a comedy, the
plotting and storyline is preposterous. Though captured early in the
film in Fairbanksí mansion, Kevin escapes. Yet the police arenít looking
for him and he walks around in broad daylight without fear of seizure.
 Amber falls in love with Kevin because he steals back a painting she
was forced to sell. Even when he admits to her that he is crook, she is
unfazed. Why? Because, as she tells him, she had dated lawyers, so
dating a thief shouldnít be much different.
 In some ways the film is offensive. William Fichtner plays a police
detective who is a stereotyped gay directly from some homophobicís
handbook. He minces, swishes, carries a cane, dresses all in white, and
owns three cute little doggies to whom he speaks in baby talk.
 The mush-mouthed Lawrence is not credible as a high-classed thief. He
lacks the sophistication and suaveness called for in the part.
 DeVito merely seems to be reprising a role he has played many times
before ó most notably in Ruthless People ó that of the overbearing,
crooked tycoon who believes his wealth puts him above the law.
 A strong supporting cast, including John Leguizamo, Glenne Headley,
Bernie Mac, Richard Schiff, Larry Miller, Nora Dunn and Ana Gasteyer are
wasted in this weak effort.
 Whatís the worst that could happen? That this movie actually draws an
audience and takes up screen space that could be used for more deserving
fare.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
 These are the dog days of summer, that time of year when the kids go back
to school and the movie studios clear their shelves of junk that has been
languishing for a year or two.
 "The 13th Warrior" is a prime example. Filmed about two years ago, this
wannabe-epic, directed by John McTiernan of "Die Hard" fame and produced by
Michael Crichton, is based on the latter's book "Eaters of the Dead."
 No matter what the title, though, this stinker barks. It has been
fermenting for a couple of years as the creative minds behind it continued
to cut, recut then cut again, trying to make steak out of ground beef.
 Nothing can help "The 13th Warrior," not even the star presence of Antonio
Banderas, who, throughout the proceedings, looks like he wishes he was
somewhere - anywhere - else. Of course, that is how his character is
supposed to act through much of this "Excaliber"-lite, but it sure looks
like he added more emphasis to that part of his characterization. Perhaps
he read the script.
 This is merely a B movie with A movie pretensions. A blaring score by
Jerry Goldsmith seems to do nothing but try to convince the audience that
"The 13th Warrior" is an important epic, when it is just a shallow shadow
play.
 Banderas plays Ahmed Ibn Fahdlan, an Arab ambassador who hooks up with a
band of Vikings. When another tribe of Vikings is threatened by a menace
too horrible to name, 13 warriors are chosen to fight this unknown horde.
The catch is, one of the volunteers has to be an outsider, so guess who
goes from diplomat to fighter?
 The question remains: Why only 13 to fight such a fearsome force? Perhaps
because a title such as "The 1,450th Warrior" doesn't sound as sexy.
 Well, the heroic baker's dozen travel to the north to meet and combat this
menace. Along the way, Banderas' Ahmed picks up the Norsemen's language
merely by listening to them talk night after night. Suddenly, he begins
speaking to them in their language and before you know it, everyone is
speaking English. Ah, the magic of movies.
 So, our intrepid band of warriors arrives at the besieged village and
begins battling the baddies. Of course, the battle scenes are filmed rather
darkly, with lots of fog and smoke, thus making it hard to distinguish who
is killing who.
 But it really doesn't matter. The Norsemen all talk about Valhalla and how
great fighting is and how they have no fear, yadda, yadda, yadda.
 Nothing much else happens. People get beheaded and chopped to ribbons.
Body parts and gore fly everywhere, and then the end credits roll.
 "The 13th Warrior" is like those silly costume dramas Universal released
during the early and mid-1950s starring Tony Curtis, Jeff Chandler or Rock
Hudson. At least, they did not take themselves as seriously as those who
conceived "The 13th Warrior."
 Yes, it was an unlucky day for filmgoers when Touchstone finally decided
to do some housecleaning and foist this puppy on an unsuspecting public.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
 Bicentennial Man (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Robin Williams, Sam
Neill, Embeth Davidtz, Oliver Platt and Hallie Kate Eisenberg. Directed by
Chris Columbus.
 It is in the nature of our species to continually try to better ourselves,
to evolve.
 And you can't fault a person for doing what comes naturally.
 So, I really can't be upset with Robin Williams who seems to have turned
his back on comedy to strive to become an Actor.
 After all, we all want to improve, to continually grow ...
Ah, the hell with it. Who am I kidding? Just call me a selfish s.o.b. I
want my old Robin Williams back, the one who kept me laughing for nearly
two hours in concert back in Columbus, Ohio, about 17 years ago, the Robin
Williams from "Good Morning Vietnam" and "Aladdin."
 I want the spontaneous Robin Williams who appears on talk shows or
performs during Comic Relief.
 This new Robin Williams is creepy. Worse, he's kind of dull and boring.
I'm tired of this touchy-feely guy who began emerging in "Good Will
Hunting" and has invaded my multiplex in "Patch Adams," "When Dreams May
Come," "Jakob the Liar" and now "Bicentennial Man."
 He has become the cliche of the comedian wanting to play Hamlet.
 Maybe this is what attracted him to "Bicentennial Man," an artificial
weeper that is overly schmaltzy and ponderous.
 In the movie, based on a short story by science fiction legend Isaac
Asimov, which was later expanded into the novel, "The Positronic Man," by
Robert Silverberg, Williams plays Andrew, a robot who continually strives
for humanity.
How anyone can see this as an improvement is beyond me, but after all, it
is science fiction.
 We first meet Andrew at the home of Sir (Sam Neill), his wife, Ma'am
(Wendy Crewson) and their daughters, Miss (Undze Letherman) and Little Miss
(Pepsi spokeskid Hallie Kate Eisenberg, who already is beginning to wear
out her welcome).
 At first considered merely a "household appliance," Sir sees a creative
spark in Andrew and encourages him to continue his explorations.
 As the decades pass - the movie covers 200 years - Andrew continues to
grow and evolve.
 But then he falls in love with Portia, the great-granddaughter of Sir and
the granddaughter of Little Miss.
 Both Little Miss as an adult (as well as an old woman) and Portia are
played by Embeth Davidtz, best remembered as Ralph Fiennes Jewish maid in
"Schindler's List."
 So, more than halfway through the movie, directed by Chris Columbus, who
has done better work, we are now involved in a robot/girl love story and
all the cliches that entails.
 The real stars of "Bicentennial Man" are the makeup and special effects
people who created Williams' robot look. Unfortunately, later in the movie
he is given a human face that looks like an old, tired Robin Williams.
 People are going to flock to "Bicentennial Man" no matter what I or any
other critic says. It's inoffensive and the kids will like it, though the
younger ones may become restless because of it's nearly
two-hour-and-20-minute running time.
 But it is a rather weak movie, rife in self-important sounding dialogue
and situations that don't ring true.
 I just wish Robin Williams would quit wasting his time and devolve. Who
says moving forward is always progress?
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for 3000 Miles to Graceland (2001)

3000  Miles to Graceland (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Kurt Russell,
Kevin Costner, Courtney Cox, Christian Slater, David Arquette, Bokeem
Woodbine, David Kaye, Kevin Pollack and Howie Long. Written by Richard
Recco and Demian Lichtenstein. Directed by Lichtenstein. Rated R.
 The reaction to watching 3000 Miles to Graceland is probably akin to
attending one of those Elvis nostalgia shows, but with the guy who does
the older, fatter Elvis.
 You enjoy the show, but are embarrassed and feel foolish about it.
 The same emotions tend to rear up during this outlandish crime caper.
 3000 Miles to Graceland is, like Elvis, chintzy retro. It is
ultra-violent and bloody, but in such a cartoonish manner that you can
neither take it seriously nor really be offended.
 This foray into foolishness is so outrageous, so near camp that all you
can do is sit back and go along for the ride when, at times, all you
wish you could do is ěReturn to Sender.î
 You watch this movie with disbelief at times, jaws agape at how
preposterous and excessive this entire venture can be.
 In a nutshell, the story revolves around a quintet of ex-cons who,
during an Elvis impersonation convention at a Vegas hotel, dress up as
The King to knock over the joint.
 The robbery isn't the filmís main focus, though, except that it is kind
of kinky seeing Kevin Costner, Kurt Russell, Christian Slater, David
Arquette and Bokeem Woodbine all decked out in their best
rhinestone-studded Elvis paraphernalia.
 No, it is the post-robbery double dealings that occupy most of the
filmís approximate 2 hours and 10 minutes.
 What we get is a combination chase, road movie and love story, all
courtesy of screenwriters Richard Recco and Demian Lichtenstein, the
latter also serving as director ó or ringmaster, depending on your
outlook.
 The bulk of the movie follows the cat-and-mouse game between Russellís
Michael and Costnerís Murphy for possession of the $3.2 million Vegas
loot.
 Along for the ride is con woman Cybil (Courtney Cox) and her precocious
10-year-old son, Jesse (David Kaye).
 The body count is mega-high, and that is disturbing, especially in this
post-Columbine climate in which officials are breathing down Hollywoodís
neck to tone down cinematic violence.
 It is like the filmmakers are thumbing their noses at the
establishment. But, of course, being Hollywood, the filmís creators try
to have it both ways by putting together an end-title sequence that
seems to say, ěHey, folks, don't get all riled up, we're only kidding
around and having some fun here.î
 One of the filmís weak points is Costnerís performance. The man cannot
be taken seriously as a badass ex-con. No matter how hard he tries, or
how many people he kills, he retains that Kevin Costner, all-American
good guy image. He even curses like a wuss.
 Russell fares better as the ex-con with a conscious. You can tell heís
the movieís good guy because heís the only one who doesnít mow down a
dozen cops or gamblers during the heist sequence.
 This is a movie in which the performances are really secondary to the
overall ambiance of the film. Director Lichtenstein uses hyper-drive
camera movements and lots of fancy angles to disguise the fact that what
he has created is merely a ferocious crime drama.
 3000 Miles to Graceland is a movie you may find entertaining, then
question your reaction afterwards.
 It is a savage, destructive outing with a modicum of wit, some style
and many disturbing images.
 However, you have to appreciate Lichtenstein and his crew for doing
things their way.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net More of Bloom's reviews can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
 A Simple Plan is not a simple movie to watch.
 It's a film that, on its surface, shows the depths to which greed drives
some people. It is a story of moral corruption and murder.
 Three men - Hank, his younger brother, Jacob, and Jacob's friend, Lou -
find a plane that has crashed deep in the woods. In the wreckage they
discover the body of the pilot plus a bag containing $4.4 million.
 Realizing the money must be either stolen or drug money, they decide to
hide it until spring, then divide it three ways.
 Of course, from the outset, everything goes awry. First, an innocent
farmer is accidentally killed when Jacob tries to stop him from entering
the woods. From that point, events escalate, and the body count rises.
 But the question you are left to answer is: Were these good people to
begin with who were corrupted by the discovery of the money? Or, were they
morally weak and was the discovery the catalyst that unleashed their baser
instincts?
 Hank (Bill Paxton) seems to be a decent guy. He has a boring job at the
feed store, and a loving, pregnant wife (Bridget Fonda) at home. Hank is
the practical individual. He's the one who stashes the money and devises
the plan to keep it hidden until after the snows melt.
 All his level-headedness, however, cannot halt the freight train of
disaster that unfolds once he conceals the money.
 The unemployed Lou (Brent Briscoe) is a big-mouth, drunken lout who is
eager to get his share of the loot immediately.
 The moral core of the film is anchored by Jacob (Billy Bob Thornton). Also
unemployed, Jacob is a bit dim-witted, usually going along with whoever
devised the latest plan.
 Jacob, though, wants to use his share of the money to buy back and restore
the family's farm, lost after their parents' death.
 One lie builds upon another as the trio find it more and more difficult to
contain their secret.
 Hank loses his moral compass, rationalizing the violence that ensues.
 One problem with the film, adapted by Scott B. Smith from his novel, is
the character of Sarah, Hank's wife.
 Her transformation from a decent woman appalled by her husband's actions
into a greedy, grasping harridan is too sudden and inexplicable.
 Director Sam Raimi, best known for his horror outings such as The Evil
Dead, Army of Darkness and Darkman, uses the cold and isolation of the area
to dominate the film. You feel the breath of the characters as they
contrive their misbegotten plans and watch in horror as those dreams slowly
disintegrate.
 A Simple Plan is a disturbing movie. The characters gain your sympathy
while they simultaneously appall you. A Simple Plan is a film that
demonstrates how weak the moral fiber can be when it is severely tested.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)

 The Mummy (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Brendan Fraser, Rachel
Weisz, John Hannah and Arnold Vosloo.
 At its core, the original version of "The Mummy" was a story of lost love.
 A priest in ancient Egypt loses his princess and, after her death, commits
blasphemy by trying to use a forbidden incantation to raise her from the
dead.
 He is caught, condemned and buried alive. Much later - 3,700 years later -
he is unearthed and accidentally brought back to life. This living mummy
then helps a team of archeologists find the tomb of his lost love so he can
again try to read that same spell and bring her back to life.
 It was the stellar performance of Boris Karloff that was the main
attraction to this - by today's standards - creaky and somewhat campy
horror film.
 The action-packed remake of this venerable classic owes more to Steven
Spielberg and George Lucas than to the Universal studio filmmakers of the
early 1930s.
 For the new version of "The Mummy" isn't a horror film. It's more a
combination of many things - Indiana Jones rip-off, Foreign Legion
adventure, Cecil B. DeMille extravaganza and video game shoot-'em-up.
 This remake of "The Mummy" may be bigger and incorporate the latest
technology in computer special effects, but it definitely is not better.
 It lacks the two key ingredients that made the original a classic -
atmosphere and sincerity.
 "The Mummy," starring Brendan Fraser, cannot decide what coat to wear. It
continually changes from adventure to horror to spoof, never settling on
one course. It also lacks the romanticism of the original.
 That much you learn at the outset. Instead of the priest, Imhotep (Arnold
Vosloo), being in love with pharaoh's daughter, he and the pharaoh's
mistress are two-timing the Egyptian ruler. He catches them, and they
assassinate him.
 Captured themselves, she is killed while he, like in the original, is
buried alive. However, because of the nature of today's movie audiences,
some embellishments are added for thrills. Imhotep has his tongue cut out
and a swarm of flesh-eating scarabs are dumped into his sarcophagus.
 The story then leaps forward to the Egyptian desert of the 1920s. A band
of legionnaires, among them daredevil and dashing Rick O'Connell (Fraser),
is battling a group of nomads in the ruins of the ancient, legendary city
of Hamunaptra. It's a scene straight out of "March or Die," as O'Connell,
the only survivor, is allowed to wander off into the desert.
 A couple of years later, O'Connell teams up with a brother-sister pair of
treasure-hunting archeologists (Rachel Weisz and John Hannah) to again find
Hamunaptra and carry off its treasures.
 And just for fun, there's another expedition, racing to the same locale.
 Of course, they find the city and inadvertently unleash the dead Imhotep,
who is not your slow, stiff-walking, bandage-wrapped dead Egyptian.
 No, thanks to computer technology, he can change into sand and be gone
with the wind.
 He goes after members of the expeditions, stealing their body organs to
assist in his regeneration, so he can resurrect his girlfriend and
together, they can conquer the world.
 "The Mummy" is not dull. It's action-laden in that outlandish, cartoonish
way most modern films treat such enterprises. People are mauled, beaten,
wounded, but, just like video game characters, they pop right back up and
return for more.
 Fraser is actually quite good. He gets into the spirit of the proceedings,
and keeps his tongue in cheek. He knows this is a lark and goes along for
the fun.
 Weisz is rather ditsy for an academic and totally unbelievable, while
Hannah is just along for comic relief.
 Admittedly, this update of "The Mummy" is exciting, but it's also sad. It
seems so cynical, so contrived.
 In the original, for all his foul deeds, you felt a twinge of sympathy for
Imhotep. You even were a bit sorry for him.
 In this remake, Imhotep is only pixels and memory bytes, to be shot to
pieces and reconstituted as the plot dictates.
 And that's too bad. "The Mummy" lacks heart. It's as cold and dead as a sphinx.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
 Battlefield Earth (2000) No stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta,
Barry Pepper, Forest Whitaker, Kim Coates and Richard Tyson. Screenplay
by Corey Mandell and JD Shapiro. Based on the novel by L. Ron Hubbard.
Directed by Roger Christian.
 OK, bear with me now. Here's my theory. "Battlefield Earth" was meant
to be "The Producers" of the science fiction genre.
 You remember "The Producers," don't you? Mel Brooks comedy about two
men (Zero Mostel and Gene Wilder) who decide to make a fortune by
producing the worst play ever written. They sell about 1,000 percent of
the play to various investors because they believe it will close after
one night and they can just keep the money.
 They hire the worst director and cast the most inept actors. But
something goes wrong and the play becomes a hit. Thus Mostel and Wilder
go to jail for embezzlement.
  So, how does this relate to "Battlefield Earth." Well, John Travolta,
who is listed as one of the film's producers, seems to have taken the
opposite tact. He hired whom he believed were the best actors - himself
included - as well as the strongest writers to adapt L. Ron Hubbard's
massive novel and the correct director to helm the opus.
  Well "Battlefield Earth" is no "Springtime for Hitler." If only
Travolta and company had played "Battlefield Earth" as a send-up, a
parody, a satire, anything but a straight, dramatic vehicle. If they had
just been able to put their tongues in their cheeks and say, "Come on,
folks. We're having a great time kidding around."
  Maybe some blooper outtakes during the closing credits. Anything.
 Unfortunately, "Battlefield Earth" take itself seriously, way too
seriously. And because of that, it is one of the most wretched,
embarrassing and clumsy features ever put on celluloid.
  It is a movie that makes you cringe and chuckle simultaneously. You
sit in disbelief as this lumbering behemoth staggers along. You watch in
amazement as Travolta gives the worst performance of his career.
  And you wonder: What was he thinking? Could his passion for the novel
so overwhelmed his sense of judgment that he would allow himself to be
ridiculed in such a manner?
  Compared to Travolta, Kevin Costner's turns in "Robin Hood: Prince of
Thieves," "Waterworld" and "The Postman" and nearly Shakespearean.
  Travolta goes through the film spewing inane dialogue and laughing
like a straight-jacketed man in a padded cell. The laugh is neither
menacing nor evil, merely obnoxious.
  Most every line in "Battlefield Earth" is spoken with an exclamation
point. Every plot turn and revelation is punctuated with Elia Cmiral's
overwrought music.
  There is no point dissing the cast members. Most of them have done
fine work in previous films. And every actor is entitled to his
"Parnell." (Clark Gable fans will understand the reference.)
 The plot is ridiculous, The action - even by s-f standards - beyond
belief. Humans, reduced to almost caveman-like existence, teach
themselves to fly sophisticated fighter jets in a week. Not to mention
the jets and their payload of weapons are in perfect condition after
1,000 years of inattention.
  At least give the audience some credit for having brains.
  There is really no need to go on. "Battlefield Earth" is a major
blunder. It will go down in history with such infamous titles as "Hudson
Hawk," "Bonfire of the Vanities" and "Showgirls."
  However, to be fair. "Battlefield Earth" can have one positive
purpose. It can be used by film schools as a teaching lesson. It can
stand as the quintessential example of big moviemaking ineptitude.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net.
  Bloom also is an associate member of the Online Film Critics Society.
His reviews can be found at the Internet Movie Database Web site:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for O (2001)
O (1999). 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Mekhi Phifer, Josh Hartnett, Julia
Stiles, Martin Sheen, Andrew Keegan, Rain Phoenix, Elden Henson and John Heard.
Written by Brad Kaaya. Directed by Tim Blake Nelson. Rated R. Running time: 91
minutes. 
 A welcome cinematic trend over the past couple of years has been to make the
works of Shakespeare more accessible to the younger audiences who are the vast
majority of moviegoers by contemporizing the Bard and altering the settings to
familiar surroundings. 
 A prime example of this is 1999's 10 Things I Hate About You, which was
basically The Taming of the Shrew in a high school. 
 Less successful was last year's adaptation of Hamlet with Ethan Hawke as the
heir apparent of the Denmark Corp. Here the setting was the corporate world of
New York. 
 Now comes O, a faithful retelling of one of the most tragic of Shakespeare's
tragedies. 
 Like 10 Things I Hate About You, the stage is a high school - a private prep
school where Odin James (Mekhi Phifer) is the on-court general, the basketball
team's standout player. 
 Julia Stiles, featured in 10 Things I Hate About You as well as performing
Ophelia in Hawke's Hamlet, plays Desi Brable, Odin's girlfriend, whose father
also happens to be dean of the institution. 
 Josh Hartnett (Pearl Harbor) is on hand for the villainy, playing the scheming
Hugo, who sets the tragic wheels in motion. 
 O was actually filmed a couple of years ago, but was shelved because of the
Columbine High School tragedy. 
 The movie, directed by Tim Blake Nelson - best known for his co-starring role
in O Brother, Where Art Thou? - and written by Brad Kaaya, is very grim. An air
of tragedy weighs it down from the opening scene to the closing credits. And
that is how it should be. 
 Of all of Shakespeare's tragedies, Othello is the most harrowing, not because
of any body count, but because of the psychological havoc wreaked by Iago, whose
motivation in the sheer pleasure of his treachery. 
 Kaaya's profane-filled script - after all, these are high school kids - does
offer Hugo a subtle motive of sorts. The young man considers himself the
basketball team's prime utility man who does a little bit of everything - pass,
shoot, rebound - but is constantly in the shadow of Odin. 
 Plus his father, the team's coach - played with a ferocious intensity by Martin
Sheen - showers more love and concern on his star player than on his own flesh
and blood. 
 The script follows the familiar lines of the classic. Hugo begins dropping
hints to Odin concerning Desi's fidelity, eroding the star's confidence in those
he considers closest to him, affecting both his relationships and his game. 
 It all ends in blood, of course, which is why the movie was originally shelved.
 The performances in O vary. Phifer is at first cocky and self-assured, emotions
he handles with ease. He also does quite well displaying Odin's darker side; his
defensive sensitivity about being the only black at the institution, his growing
distrust of those he loved, his rage and the erosion of his belief system. 
 Hartnett is appropriately cool and Machiavellian as he weaves his deadly web of
lies and deceit, turning friend against friend, and lover against lover. 
 Stiles seems a bit stilted, but occasionally also rises to the occasion, moving
from adoration to confusion to fear of her young knight. 
 The film does contain a few missteps: A subplot involving Hugo's theft of the
school mascot is left hanging. 
 Also Desi's actions concerning Michael (Andrew Keegan), Odin's former teammate
and best friend who was kicked off the team because of one of Hugo's
machinations, is puzzling. Why she would continually be seen with Michael -
however innocent the circumstances - when she knows her man suspects the two of
cheating behind his back. It is irrational. 
 But these are minor carpings. Overall, O is a stylish and faithful adaptation.
 If nothing else, it may encourage some people to read the original text, and
that will counterbalance the severity of this feature. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
may be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)

Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon (2000) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Chow
Yun-Fat, Michelle Yeoh, Zhang Ziyi, Chang Chen and Cheng Peipei. Written
by James Schamus, Wang Hui Ling and Tsai Kuo Jung. Based on a novel by
Wang Du Lu. Music by Tan Dun. Directed by Ang Lee. Rated PG-13.
 If you see one movie this year, I strongly urge that it be Crouching
Tiger, Hidden Dragon.
 This Ang Lee spectacle combines soaring adventure with a rousing love
story.
 It is epic filmmaking on a grand scale. Oh, and it is in Mandarin.
 Lee, best known for work behind the camera on Sense and Sensibility and
The Ice Storm, has returned to his roots, filming a novel by Wang Du Lu.
 The story dealing with warrior wizards is similar to the stories Lee
grew up with.
 The protagonists of this two-hour epic are Li Mu Bai (Chow Yun-Fat),
Shu Lien (Michelle Yeoh) and Jen Yu (Zhang Ziyi).
 Chowís Li is a world-weary warrior ready to give up his ways. To prove
so he asks Shu Lien to present his legendary sword, The Green Destiny,
to Sir Te as a gift and token of his respect and devotion.
 However, shortly after carrying out her mission, the sword is stolen by
a mysterious warrior.
 Li and Shu Lien then begin a series of adventures in which they seek
the sword and this new warrior.
 Meanwhile, Shu Lien grows close to Jen, a young woman betrothed in
marriage who seeks an alternative life. She, of course, is the
mysterious thief and is as skilled in the ways of the warrior as Li and
Shu Lien.
 Any description of this movie does it an injustice. It is one that must
be seen to be appreciated. Itís grandeur and craftsmanship must be
viewed first-hand..
 Especially spectacular are the martial arts sequences, choreographed by
Woo-ping Yuen, who also staged the fights in The Matrix. Here, the
combatants fly over rooftops, confront each other on slim tree limbs
hundreds of feet of the ground and glide over water.
 But what really makes Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon so appealing is
the human element. Screenwriters James Schamus, Wang Hui Ling and Tsai
Kuo Jung present us with characters who have a history, who have weight.
 The unrequited love between Li and Shu Lien, their warrior code, their
sacrifices, are all the more poignant because we come to care for them.
 Jen, too, is presented as a complex, headstrong individual who wrestles
with herself before finally deciding on a path to follow.
 What is also interesting is that for a movie of this stripe, the
bloodshed is at a minimum. Itís the beauty of the combat that Lee
emphasizes, not the outcome.
 Lee is ably assisted by cinematographer Peter Pau, who has captured
some exquisite landscapes and vistas, as well as the music of Tan Dun ó
aided by cello solos by Yo-Yo Ma ó which sets a kind of mythic tone for
the movie.
 Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon is an exuberant movie exercise. It
neatly captures the potential of the cinema to take you into a foreign
culture and get you caught up in its mythology.
 Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon is a sure bet to win the best foreign
language film at the Academy Awards. I also think Lee should be
recognized in the directorís category for this splendid achievement.
 This is a must-see experience for anyone who loves movies. It will
leave you gasping, awed and overwhelmed. Don't deny yourselves the
pleasure of Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon. It is monumental.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)

 Being John Malkovich (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Starring John Cusack,
Cameron Diaz, Catherine Keener and John Malkovich. Written by Charlie
Kaufman. Directed by Spike Jonze
 If you want a different type of movie experience, than "Being John
Malkovich" is it.
 A true original, "Being John Malkovich" is a surreal journey. If you wish
the vicarious adventure of knowing what it's like to walk in another
person's shoes, than this is your ticket.
 What makes "Being John Malkovich" so appealing is its primal familiarity.
It taps into a universal fantasy: How would it be to live the life of a
celebrity for day? An hour? Or even 15 minutes?
 It's a dream we all share. And Craig Schwartz (John Cusack) surely
qualifies as a dreamer.
 Craig is a puppeteer who creates elaborate, cerebral shows using his
puppets who - coincidentally look like him and his wife, Lotte (an almost
unrecognizable Cameron Diaz).
 Lotte, who works at a pet store and tends injured and sick animals in her
and Craig's basement apartment, convinces Craig to look for a job since he
is not earning much of a living as a puppeteer.
 Because he has fast hands, Craig gets a job as a file clerk at LesterCorp,
located on 7 1/2th floor of Manhattan's Mertin-Flemmer office building.
 It also is where he meets Maxine (Catherine Keener), a free-spirited young
woman who becomes Craig's obsession. However, he's just another loser to
her.
 One day, trying to retrieve a file that falls behind a cabinet, Craig
uncovers a small passageway. He climbs in and gets sucked through a tunnel.
Next thing he knows he is seeing through the eyes of John Malkovich.
 To tell any more would ruin the absolute surprise and wonder of this most
unusual, bizarre and unique feature.
 Suffice it to say that Craig and Maxine join forces and charge a $200 fee
for allowing people to traverse the portal and enter the mind of Malkovich.
The trip is fleeting, lasting only 15 minutes before the traveler is dumped
along the New Jersey Turnpike. I told you this is a weird movie.
 Yet :Being John Malkovich" is so disarming, so much fun that you sit in
the dark and wish you were the one on screen taking the plunge.
 The script for "Being John Malkovich" was written by Charlie Kaufman. It
is his debut feature, and a more auspicious beginning I cannot imagine.
Kaufman's name will be among those listed for original screenplay come
Oscar roll call, and I wouldn't be surprised if he walks away with the
statue.
 Cusack, as usual, gives a brilliant performance as a man who likes the
pull the strings - literally. With his discovery, he becomes the ultimate
puppet master, using Malkovich to serve his own selfish ends.
 Diaz is at first a bit drap and unkempt as Lotte, but as her fascination
with Malkovich builds, her looks and demeanor seem to improve. It's a nice
comic turn.
 Keener nearly steals the film as the amoral Maxine who - at first - only
sees profit in the Malkovich venture. She deserves a supporting actress
Academy Award nomination.
 And then there is John Malkovich. What a sport. What a performance. To
allow himself to be used - and abused - as he does shows not only what a
trouper he is, but what a selfless and generous talent he possesses.
Clearly, Malkovich knows who he is and is comfortable in his own skin. He
must also own one hell of a sense of humor.
 Kaufman and director Spike Jonze (Mark Wahlberg's ill-fated GI comrade in
"Three Kings"), making his feature film debut, have created some very
surreal moments, especially one in which Malkovich enters the portal to get
inside his own head. It is hilarious, wild and a bit scary - almost
something out of a Luis Bunuel movie. The film, despite its comic emphasis,
has a tragic undertone that helps keep everything grounded in a straunge
kind of reality.
 "Being John Malkovich" is that rarity, a movie that stands apart. Nothing
like it has been seen before, and I doubt they'll be many filmmakers trying
to copy it. This is a once-in-a-lifetime, "Alice in Wonderland"-like look
at obsession, self-discovery and love. Don't miss it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
 The most telling line in "Notting Hill" has mega star Anna Scott (Julia
Roberts) telling her bookstore-owner boyfriend, William Thacker (Hugh
Grant), about Rita Hayworth.
 Men, Hayworth used to say, would go to bed with "Gilda" (her most famous
movie character) and wake up with me.
 Translation: Men would confuse the love goddess on screen with the real
person who, offscreen, had the same frailties and doubts as we mortals.
 "Notting Hill" is a romantic fable that plays upon the fantasies in all us
ordinary men and women. You know the one: That Julia Roberts or Brad Pitt
would bump into you, and actually find you interesting. The two of you
would fall in love, marry and spend the rest of your lives happily ever
after.
 Like I said, a fantasy. Let's be honest. You probably have a better chance
of winning Powerball.
 The world in which a super celebrity orbits is so high above us common
folk these days that we would need an oxygen mask to reach such altitudes.
 Yet, "Notting Hill," written by Richard Curtis (who penned the delightful
"Four Weddings and a Funeral"), so charmingly manipulates that very fantasy
that we swallow the premise entirely.
 Anna and William meet at his travel bookstore. He is shy, she is weary.
They later collide - literally - on the street. It's one of those cute-meet
situations recognized by veteran moviegoers.
 From there, a cautious, awkward and humorous mating dance begins as Anna
and William gingerly step into each others worlds.
 To his credit, Curtis - as well as director Roger Michell - do not always
show Anna in a favorable light. After all, she is a superstar, and Roberts
is at her best when she acts the pampered, spoiled and self-centered role
of diva actress.
 After the paparazzi discover Anna at William's apartment, for example, her
reaction centers only on how the situation and ensuing publicity will
affect her. She gives no thought to William and how the circumstances will
impact on his now-former life of anonymity..
 Such are the nuances that hoist Notting Hill a notch above the usual,
predictable, romantic-comedy drivel that lately has infested movie screens.
 Grant, of course, plays his usual charming, boyish character, with his
self-depreciating comments, his stammer and fluttering eyebrows. It becomes
a bit tiresome, but Grant has such a winning personality that you tend to
overlook this by-now overdone trademark.
 A strong supporting cast of eccentrics, led by Welsh actor Rhys Ifans as
Spike, William's uncouth and unconventional roommate, aids in making
Notting Hill an enjoyable two hours,
 Ifans is a comic natural who does not overplay his character nor allow him
to be wallowed in stereotype.
 A quick cameo by Alec Baldwin as Anna's movie star boyfriend shows the
unconscious condescending nature that grips those who have gained fame and
are too ill-equipped to handle the social graces attached to such public
positions.
 "Notting Hill" is a winner, a truly starry-eyed endeavor, complete with
sappy music, lovers' spats, reconciliations and good vibrations.
 It's a quiet alternative to George Lucas' world of fantasy. Yet, in a
sense, it is just as much a once-upon-a-time story as the new "Star Wars"
saga.
Roberts is beautiful, Grant is charming, London is picturesque. What more
can you ask for?
 Maybe a candlelight pasta dinner with Sophia Loren? Well, I can dream,
too, can't I?
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
  South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Written 
by Trey Parker and Matt Stone. Directed by Parker.
 They will tell you it's only a cartoon. Wrong.  It is more  much more. 
It is an adult R-rated animated feature.
 This 80-minute movie also is offensive, raw, uncouth, profane, raunchy, 
raucous, satiric and hilarious.
 Going way beyond the restrictive bounds of television  even for cable's 
Comedy Central  South Park is a savage riff on parents, mores, morals, 
war, jingoism and patriotism.
 Canadians, especially, will probably want to picket this movie.
 Transferred from the small screen is that cute, crude group of kids, led 
by Cartman, Stan, Kyle and Kenny.
 The amazing aspect about the movie version of South Park is that Trey 
Parker and Matt Stone, the creators of the series and writers of the 
film, have created a mirthful musical.
 The movie contains about a dozen musical numbers, most of which spoof 
various musical movie and stage presentations.
 The storyline is basic. The youngsters sneak into an R-rated movie 
starring their favorite performers, the potty-mouthed Canadians Terrence 
and Phillip. The profane-ridden movie influences the third-graders and 
the entire child population of South Park as the kids, after seeing the 
movie, develop mouths that constantly need to be washed out with soap.
 Stan's mother goes on the warpath, and it leads to the arrest of the 
Canadian performers on The Conan O'Brien Show.  (Conan is so distraught 
about his part in their capture that he commits suicide by jumping out 
the window of his NBC studio.)
 Things escalate. Poor Kenny is again killed, and he is sent to hell. 
There, he uncovers a plot by Satan and his new lover, Saddam Hussein, to 
take over the world after the execution of Terrence and Phillip.
 The Canadian air force retaliates by bombing the Baldwin mansion, 
killing the entire acting clan.
 OK, even writing this sounds surreal. So let's wrap it up by saying 
Parker and Stone set out to offend and shock as many people as they can. 
That they succeed in doing.
 It is in-your-face comedy and satire. This is a movie that will have no 
middle ground. People will either see it more than once or walk out 
before the finale.
 No nation, religious group or ethnic group is spared Parker and Stone's 
barbs.
 The movie is tasteless, but it is done in such an artful way that all 
you can do is applaud the audacity of Parker and Stone. 
 South Park is an original, the funniest film of the year.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at 
cbloom@iquest.net.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
 Pyscho (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche,
Viggo Mortensen, Julianne Moore and William H. Macy
 Here's a philosophical pastry to chew on while you're sipping your morning
latte.
 A painter announces he has created an exact replica of the Mona Lisa down
to the original hues and shading, and he's offering it for sale.
 The original is your favorite work of art, and the only difference between
the two is that while the original is signed Leonardo, this replica is
signed Fred.
 So, would you buy it? Probably not, because no matter how beautiful it is,
it's worthless. Why? Because it's a copy, a re-creation of another person's
vision, work and sweat.
 Which brings us to Psycho. Director Gus Van Sant has not remade the Alfred
Hitchcock classic, he has copied it, using Hitch's setups and storyboards,
as well as Joseph Stefano's original screenplay. The only major difference:
Van Sant's version is in color, while Hitchcock's original was shot in
black and white.
 Another difference is today's audiences and their cognizance of movies.
 In 1960, when Psycho was released, moviegoers had certain expectations, a
certain perception of what a film was supposed to do. In Psycho, Hitchcock
set out to deliberately shatter those ingrained ideas.
 Never before was a film's "star" dispatched so early, nor so brutally, as
was Janet Leigh when she stepped into that shower. The psychological effect
on an audience was mind-blowing. It unnerved viewers. The person they
thought they were identifying with, the character they believed would be
with them until the closing credits, was cruelly murdered and dumped. It
was no dream, there was no escape.
 What other conventions would Hitchcock break? Expectation kept the
audience on edge, which is exactly what Hitch wanted.
 Granted, many filmgoers in their 20s and 30s have never seen Psycho, but
the movie's title and the name Norman Bates have become ingrained in our
collective pop culture lexicon.
 The missing ingredient in Van Sant's version is the shock value, the
defiance of movie conventions that Hitchcock set out to break. You may not
have seen the original movie, but you know what is to come and who turns
out to be who.
 Thus the senses are dulled, your level of expectation anesthetized.
 Van Sant gets workmanlike performances from his Anne Heche, Julianne
Moore, William H. Macy and Viggo Mortensen.
 The only problem, ironically, is Vince Vaughn's interpretation of Norman
Bates. Vaughn, from the outset, seems like a loose cannon, a nut case, a
psycho. Unlike Anthony Perkins who, at first, appeared as a shy mama's boy,
Vaughn adds an extra layer of menace to his Norman that renders Van Sant's
film a bit a-kilter.
 Again, perception is everything. Before he played Norman Bates, Perkins
was best known as a young juvenile lead - Gary Cooper's son in Friendly
Persuasion, the young Cornelius Hackel in The Matchmaker. It was Psycho
that transformed Perkins' career, typecasting him as a maladjusted
individual.
 Unfortunately for Vaughn, he recently played a similar weirdo in Clay
Pigeons, so he already has a reputation for oddball characters.
 Wisely, Van Sant had composer Danny Elfman adapt Bernard Herrmann's
original score, which, as in the original, heightens the suspense.
 So, is Van Sant's Psycho as good as Hitchcock's? Yes, but the question is
moot. For who deserves the credit? Van Sant or Hitchcock?
 The only way to answer that question is for you to rent the original and
judge for yourself.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Just Visiting (2001)
 Just Visiting (2001) 2 stars out of 4.. Starring Jean Reno, Christina
Applegate, Christian Clavier, Matthew Ross, Malcolm McDowell, Tara Reid
and Bridgette Wilson-Sampras. Screenplay by Christian Clavier &
Jean-Marie Poire and John Hughes. Based on Les Visiteurs written by
Jean-Marie Poire and Christian Clavier. Directed by Jean-Marie Gaubert.
Rated PG-13. 88 minutes.
 It appears something was lost in the translation when the creative team
behind the 1993 French comedy blockbuster Les Visiteurs remade it for
Hollywood Pictures as Just Visiting.
 Just Visiting has moments of hilarity, but it lacks a cohesion. It
plays more like a linked series of comedy sketches than a feature film.
 Reprising their roles from the original film are Jean Reno as Count
Thibault of Malfete and Christian Clavier as his servant, Andre. Also on
board are the original director, Jean-Marie Gaubert, as well as
screenwriters Clavier and Jean-Marie Poire. The American addition to the
screenwriting team is John Hughes.
 Yes, that John Hughes, the man behind the obnoxious Home Alone movies.
 It would be so simple to blame the filmís failures on Hughes, but they
go deeper than that. Basically, the problem with Just Visiting is dead
time. The sequences in which Reno as the 12th century nobleman, and
Clavier, as his always-hungry lackey, are not involved are static. They
are merely redundant expository filler.
 Ah, but when Reno and Clavier are on screen the movie comes to life.
Even though it grows a bit wearisome watching the duo repeatedly act
confused, overwhelmed and confounded by modern technology and culture,
the bits are funny ó if not overly obvious.
 The two wash themselves with water from the toilet, Thibault covers
himself with Chanel No. 5, Clavier wolfs down dog food as if it were a
sirloin steak. Well, you get the idea.
 Clavier is the filmís scene stealer. His willing-to-please Andre is a
wide-eyed buffoon, always looking for a morsel or a damsel.
 Christina Applegate is rather bland as Julia, Thibaultís modern-day
descendant, while Matthew Ross does nothing but mug outrageously as her
scheming fiancé, Hunter.
 Malcolm McDowell has a couple of funny bits as the inept wizard who
accidentally transports the two Frenchmen to modern-day America.
 Reno wisely plays it straight as the chivalrous and romantic count. He
is a good actor and knows that the best way to get a laugh in certain
situations is to play them seriously. This he does throughout, and it
helps keep Just Visiting afloat.
 Just Visiting is merely so-so. It has its moments, but lacks a certain
quality that would raise it above the merely routine. At 88 minutes,
itís an uneven venture offering scattered laughs and a guffaw or two.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for American Pie 2 (2001)
AMERICAN PIE 2 (2001) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jason Biggs, Chris Klein,
Shannon Elizabeth, Alyson Hannigan, Natasha Lyonne, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Chris
Own, Tara Reid, Seann William Scott, Mena Suvari, Eddie Kaye Thomas and Eugene
Levy. Story by David H. Steinberg and Adam Herz. Screenplay by Adam Herz.
Directed by J. B. Rogers. Rated R. Approx. 115 minutes. 
 American Pie 2 is filled with laughs. But they are mostly cheap ones built
primarily upon sexual degradation and adolescent humor more fit for a locker
room than a movie theater. 
 I'm no prude and I admit to laughing along with everyone else at the preview
screening to this sequel to the 1999 hit comedy. 
 But the laughs are built on discomfort and embarrassment, not on any intrinsic
humor from within the story itself. 
 What separates American Pie 2 from its predecessor is heart. Of the original, I
noted it was "a warm, pleasant outing about the travails of growing up." 
 Well, the quartet of chums - Jim (Jason Biggs), Oz (Chris Klein), Kevin (Thomas
Ian Nicholas) and Finch (Eddie Kaye Thomas) - have grown up. At least they are a
year older, but don't seem any wiser. 
 Fresh from their first year of college the quartet, along with the obnoxious
Stifler (Seann William Scott), rent a summer house by the lake in order to
attract girls in an attempt to score. 
 As usual nothing goes right until the last reel. But what we are left with is
five guys spending nearly two hours drooling over various young women. 
 And American Pie 2 is rather degrading to women. For the most part, they are
not shown as individuals. They are nothing more than potential recipients of
over-active, raging hormones. 
 It is telling that the most normal couple, Oz and Heather (Mena Suvari) spend
the bulk of the film trying to have phone sex - she's overseas on an exchange
student program. 
 Despite having been to college, Jim is still klutzy and awkward, unsure of
himself around the opposite sex. Most of the pratfalls and humiliations are
heaped upon him, including a painful episode involving an instant glue-like
substance. 
 Also uncomfortable to watch is a sequence involving three of the lads with two
young women roommates, whom the boys suspect of being lesbians. It is offensive
and plays upon outdated, adolescent stereotypes to generate laughs. 
 The first film, despite some raunchy moments, had an innocent charm to it. The
sequel is more cynical. It knows what its predominantly male audience members
want and unabashedly gives it to them: The many mentions of Finch's encounter
with Stifler's mom becomes a tiresome running gag throughout as does Eugene
Levy's return as Jim's well-meaning, trying-to-be-hip dad. 
 The only performer who is actually given some new, fresh material is Alyson
Hannigan as Michelle, the band geek from the original. In the sequel, she imbues
her character with vulnerability, wisdom and maturity. 
 American Pie 2 is a pre-sold commodity that will earn several million at the
box office. It is a shame, though, that in its rush to rake in some bucks
screenwriter Adam Herz, who also penned the original, could not have set his
sights higher. 
 American Pie 2 is funny, but it's still a comedown as well as a letdown. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)

 Star Trek: Insurrection (1998) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Patrick Stewart,
Donna Murphy, F. Murray Abraham, Brent Spiner. Directed by Jonathan Frakes
 Star Trek: Insurrection is an enjoyable movie, employing the basics that
should endear it to most Trekkers. It lacks the weight of some of its
predecessors, especially Star Trek: First Contact, but that's not
necessarily a negative.
 Once in a while the Star Trek franchise offers a movie with a lighter
tone, such as in Star Trek IV: The Voyage Home. Insurrection, while in a
more serious vein, falls within that category in the Star Trek canon.
 This time, the crew of the Enterprise is out to defy a renegade Starfleet
admiral who is working with an alien race to take over a planet that has
all the properties of a fountain of youth.
 Basically, these bad aliens, the Son'a, who supposedly are Federation
members, are violating the Prime Directive, the code to which this
interstellar organization strictly adheres. It's kind of a non-interference
clause.
 Well, Capt. Jean-Luc Picard and his crew act to set things right, which,
of course, they do.
 The heart of this Star Trek venture is, as always, the interplay between
the principals. And Insurrection is no exception. Picard (Patrick Stewart)
remains the voice of authority and reason. Yet he is willing to act when
necessary.
 This film also shows Picard, the romantic, as he becomes infatuated with
Anij (Broadway star Donna Murphy), the leader of the Ba'ku.
 One of the complaints Trekkers had about Picard and the Next Generation
series was that this captain was too cerebral. He would rather talk his way
out of a situation, unlike classic Trek's Capt. Kirk, who was willing to
fire a phaser at the least provocation.
 But, as in First Contact, Picard demonstrates his military skills, though
not in the same overwrought, vengeful manner he brought to the previous
outing.
 Brent Spiner's Data provides, in a sense, the film's comic relief. This
android's childlike fascination with humanity is ably demonstrated when
Data befriends a young boy who teaches him about having fun.
 Both Spiner and Stewart also get the chance to demonstrate their vocal
talents with a bit of Gilbert & Sullivan. You know the producers - and cast
- are having fun when HMS Pinafore can be thrown into the mix without the
audience groaning.
  Also rekindled is the romance between Cmdr. William Riker (Jonathan
Frakes) and ship's counselor Deanna Troi (Marina Sirtis).
 Again, this all totals a more relaxed film, especially compared to the
previous outing against the evil dronelike Borg.
 Insurrection also features Oscar-winner F. Murray Abraham, buried under
much makeup, as the main villain, out to take over the Eden-like planet.
 The script is predictable, with one interesting surprise in the last act.
The special effects, most of which are computer generated, are very well
done, and Jerry Goldsmith contributes another fine score.
 Frakes, in his second stint behind the camera, shows his fine direction of
First Contact was no fluke. He keeps the action moving and ably mixes the
humor and adventure, creating a smooth-flowing audience pleaser.
 Insurrection is not a great movie, lacking the substance and depth of
First Contact as well as Star Trek VI: The Undiscovered Country.
 But it is a pleasurable excursion that should satisfy franchise fans, as
well as hold the interest of sci-fi fans in general.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)

 Galaxy Quest (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Tim Allen, Sigourney
Weaver, Alan Rickman, Tony Shalhoub, Sam Rockwell and Daryl Mitchell.
 Imagine that the cast of the original "Star Trek" series were recruited by
a group of aliens who thought what they saw on TV was the real thing to
help them battle an evil alien menace.
 How do you think William Shatner, Leonard Nimoy, James Doohan and the rest
would react?
 Well, that is the one-joke premise of "Galaxy Quest," a movie that is
funnier than its flimsy concept.
 The humor of "Galaxy Quest" is not so much in the situations, but in the
recognition.
 The story by David Howard, who co-authored the screenplay with Robert
Gordon, relies on our familiarity not so much with "Star Trek" but with a
culture that blurs the line between reality and fiction as well as the
concept of cultdom and fanaticism.
 The funniest scenes in "Galaxy Quest" are not those in space, but the ones
on Earth in which the "crew" of the NSEA Protector attend an annual
convention and are besieged by fans who ask questions about minutiae
concerning that old TV series that the bored and humiliated actors don't
know or even care about.
 The cast is headed by Tim Allen as Jason Nesmith, alias Commander Peter
Quincy Taggart, who is abducted by the childlike Thermians from the Klatu
Nebula to help them defeat the evil Sarris.
 Allen does not do a Shatner impersonation, but he exudes the right amount
of ego and hambone to remind you of the flamboyant "Star Trek" actor.
 Nesmith then recruits his co-stars to help out. His crew is played by
Sigourney Weaver, Alan Rickman, Tony Shalhoub, Daryl Mitchell and Sam
Rockwell.
 Shalhoub and Rockwell walk away with the film. Shalhoub is Fred Kwan,
alias Tech. Sgt. Chen, a laid-back kind of guy who goes along with the
flow. For the most part he remains cool and unflustered by the
extraordinary circumstances in which he his thrown.
 Rockwell, seen recently as the psychotic killer Billy the Kid in "The
Green Mile", plays Guy, who appeared in one episode of the "Galaxy Quest"
TV show and was killed off in the first five minutes.
 He fears that real life will imitate art during this mission and that he
will be the one to die in battle with the Sarris. After all, he reasons,
his character didn't even have a last name.
 The entire cast seems to have fun with their roles. Rickman as the
resident alien continually complains about how he used to be a serious
actor. And, shades of "Star Trek," he always carps about Allen's
Nesmith/Taggart stealing his best lines and earning all the glory.
 "Galaxy Quest" is an enjoyable movie. The special effects are so-so, but
this is more of a character-driven science fiction comedy than one relying
on lasers and explosions to entertain.
 "Star Trek" fans will recognize some of the veiled references and
situations, but you needn't be a Trekker (or even a Trekkie) to have fun
with "Galaxy Quest."
 It may be a bit too violent for the very young moviegoers, but older
children and parents may have a good time together watching some
make-believe heroes transform themselves into the real McCoys.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Pearl Harbor (2001)

 PEARL HARBOR (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Ben Affleck, John
Hartnett, Kate Beckinsale, Cuba Gooding Jr., Alec Baldwin, Jon Voight
and Mako. Music by Hans Zimmer. Screenplay by Randall Wallace. Produced
by Jerry Bruckheimer. Directed by Michael Bay. Rated PG-13.
 Hollywood has this unfathomable necessity to transform any monumental
historical event into a backdrop for a trite and clichéd love story.
 Thus it was with Titanic, and so it is with Pearl Harbor.
 And while the film isnít a total dud, it is ó considering the script is
by Braveheart writer Randall Wallace ó a disappointment.
 The characters are by-the-numbers archetypes, the dialogue at times is
purple prose and the situations are very predictable.
 Only the special effects offer this three-hour elephant any saving
grace.
 The story revolves around two fighter pilots ó Rafe  McCawley (Ben
Affleck) and Danny Walker (Josh Hartnett). They have been friends for
life, almost like brothers.
 So, of course, a woman, Nurse Evelyn Johnson (Kate Beckinsale), is who
comes between them.
 Actually, Kate originally falls for Rafe, but when she and Danny
believe Rafe is killed flying for the RAF, they turn to each other for
consolation.
 But then on the eve of the Pearl Harbor attack, Rafe returns from the
dead.
 And before he, Danny and Evelyn can resolve things, the Japanese are
impolite enough to ruin a perfectly good Sunday morning by staging their
surprise attack.
 The raid, which comes about 90 minutes into the film, finally relieves
the doldrums that have been building since the opening scenes.
 The pyrotechnics, computer-generated images and stunt work are first
rate. Yet, it also is oddly impersonal. The sailors and soldiers who are
killed and wounded are merely props. We hardly learn about any of them.
 The performances by Affleck and Hartnett are stalwart. However, neither
is challenged dramatically. Both merely are called upon to look
resolved, brave, sad or determined.
 The same can be said of Beckinsale, who has the added burden of
maintaining an American accent. But she has lovely teeth, which she
flashes frequently.
 Pearl Harbor is a pretty movie. The opening scenes between Rafe and
Evelyn have that 1940s camera look to them, containing several extreme
close-ups.
 For a movie supposedly built around an event that transformed the
United States from an isolationist nation into a world leader, it treats
that occurrence like an intrusion.
 The day after the attack, when Evelyn goes to visit Rafe, who has been
ordered stateside along with Danny, she winds up telling him, ěAnd then
all this happened.î
 The movie seems to trivialize the attack, which is insulting to the men
and women who made the ultimate sacrifice in Hawaii.
 Pearl Harbor, at three hours, tries to cover a wide audience spectrum ó
romance for the women and action-adventure for the men. And in that
aspect it succeeds. Yet the two components never really mesh.
 The movie is also a politically correct outing. The Japanese are
portrayed as reluctant warriors who launch the attack because they see
the United States as a threat to their empire.
 You can almost hear the filmmakers, director Michael Bay and producer
Jerry Bruckheimer, apologize for allowing World War II to intrude on
their love story.
 There is nothing that can be written to dissuade anyone from seeing
Pearl Harbor. Itís the big summer blockbuster, so people are expected to
go see it.
 Pearl Harbor is an uneven venture, an overblown balloon of a movie.
Considering the subject matter, it fails to inspire.
 Enjoy the explosions and the aerobatics. That is mostly all this movie
has to offer.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
 Seeing A Bug's Life, to paraphrase the great Yogi Berra, won't be déjŕ vu
all over again.
 Sure, like Antz, it's a computer-animated feature about bugs. But that is
where the similarity ends.
 For while Antz was a story about striving to be an individual in a society
built on conformity, A Bug's Life is a story about learning self-reliance,
self-confidence and self-worth.
 This production from Pixar, the same people who brought you the enjoyable
Toy Story, is a '90s adaptation of the old Aesop fable about the
grasshopper and the ants.
 In this case, the grasshopper isn't lazy, he's a big, mean bully who heads
a gang of good-for-nothing hoppers who force a colony of ants to work all
summer to gather food for them.
 Eventually one ant, a dreamer named Flik, rebels, and hits upon the idea
of getting bigger bugs to protect the colony from the snarly grasshoppers.
Of course Flik, who is also somewhat of a bungler, hires a company of
circus bugs whom he mistakes for warrior bugs.
 However, everything works out fine. Flik redeems himself, the ants learn
self-respect, the circus bugs learn self-worth and the grasshoppers get
their just desserts.
 Whereas Antz offered so many easily recognizable voices - Sylvester
Stallone, Gene Hackman, Danny Glover and, principally, Woody Allen - A
Bug's Life works as more of an ensemble piece. As good and as witty as Antz
was, at times it felt like an animated Woody Allen movie.
 No such problem with A Bug's Life. Featuring the vocal talents of, among
others,  Dave Foley (TV's NewsRadio), Oscar-winner Kevin Spacey, Frasier's
David Hyde Pierce and, most charmingly, original Lost in Space icon
Jonathan Harris, the audience is freer to concentrate more on the story
than play the "who's voice is that?" guessing game.
 The computer-generated animation is superb, bringing the bugs' world to
life. The colors are vivid, the characters are distinctive.
 Adding to the pleasure is a wonderful Randy Newman score, one of this
solid composer's best.
 A Bug's Life is witty, warm and charming - perfect holiday fare for the
entire family. Just because you've seen Antz, don't pass up A Bug's Life.
After seeing it, you may decide insects aren't so ikky after all.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Head Over Heels (2001)

Head Over Heels (2001) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Freddie Prinze Jr.,
Monica Potter,  Sarah O'Hare, Shalom Harlow, Ivana Milicevic, Tomiko
Fraser, China Chow and Jay Brazeau. Story by John J. Strauss & Ed Decter
& David Kidd & Ron Burch. Screenplay by Ron Burch & David Kidd. Directed
by Mark Waters.
  It is only the charm of Freddie Prinze Jr. that keeps Head Over Heels
from being a total disaster.
 As it is this so-called comedy is ó even at just about 90 minutes ó
long, lame and lamentable.
 Yet Prinzeís winning personality, his shy smile, his light approach,
raises Head Over Heels from abominable to merely mediocre.
 Head Over Heels is so pathetic it raises The Wedding Planner to the
level of an American Beauty.
 It's difficult to believe that four writers worked on this story,
luckily only two of them get screen credit, but all their names and
faces should be posted in Americaís post offices under the crime of
impersonating a screenwriter. The screenplay, a kindly description for
what supposedly passes as one, is credited to Ron Burch and David Kidd.
The story is credited to Bruch, Kidd, John J. Strauss and Ed Decter.
 Oh yes, ěthe story.î Letís see, single woman in New York canít find Mr.
Right. Gee, how original. How many times have we walked this path? Too
many to count or even bother.
 Suffice it to say that Monica Potter plays Amanda Pierce, an art
restorer, who likes art better than real life. It seems the men she
always picks eventually hurt her.
 The latest one is in bed with a model one day when she comes home early
from work.
 Amanda, seeking new digs, moves in with four models, all portrayed as
self-centered, shallow airheads, only interested in the gifts they can
wheedle from panting men.
 Then Amanda meets Jim (Prinze) and sparks fly. And how do we know that
heís the one? Simple, earlier one of the models told Amanda that when
she meets the right man her knees would buckle. So guess what happens
when she meets Jim?
 From there everything goes downhill, with Jim suspected of being a
killer, and then the story taking a sharp left turn involving Russian
mobsters and diamond smuggling.
 The movie goes off in as many directions as a politician trying to
please all his constituents.
 Even the music is terrible, sounding like rejected tracks from episodes
of The Brady Bunch.
 Head Over Heels is a stinker, a dud. Itís a corny B-programmer; its
sole purpose to fill empty screens until something better comes along.
 This is a movie that is totally forgettable. As a matter of fact, Iíve
forgotten about it already.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Traffic (2000)
 Traffic (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Michael Douglas, Don
Cheadle, Luis Guzman, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Benicio Del Toro, Dennis
Quaid, Miguel Ferrer, Amy Irving, Erika Christensen, Steven Bauer and
Benjamin Bratt.  Screenplay by Stephen Gaghan. Directed by Stephen
Soderbergh. Rated R. Running tim: 147 minutes.
  Traffic is a depressing, documentary-style drama that sadly depicts
the futility of this nationís efforts in the drug war.
 Using an omnibus, storytelling technique, director Steven Soderbergh
intermixes the lives of an Ohio state supreme court justice (Michael
Douglas) nominated to become the countryís newest drug czar; a Mexican
police officer (Benicio Del Toro) trying to end the epidemic of drugs in
his country; two undercover U.S. narcotics detectives (Don Cheadle and
Luis Guzman) who are working to help convict a big-time drug dealer; and
a pregnant wife (Catherine Zeta-Jones) who does what is necessary to
survive after learning her husband has been arrested for disturbing
narcotics.
 Traffic is not a movie the DEA will use as a recruitment tool. The
movie shows law enforcement officials as mostly ineffectual, undermanned
and outgunned.
 And while the film does not glamorize the various drug dealers, sellers
and users, it does portray them as more adept at skirting the law and
beating the judicial system than their honest foes.
 With a screenplay by Stephen Gaghan, Traffic is a grim examination of a
problem that seems to be getting worse, despite what government
officials or the nightly news tell us.
 And much to their credit, Gaghan and Soderbergh portray the drug world
as a big business, a corporate community distributing a product that
just happens to be illegal. They take no moral stand, but they do convey
the ugliness of the userís universe, the dangers of the dealersí domain
and the rampant double crosses that is par for the course among the
various distributors.
 The temptation of easy money that can turn an honest copís outlook and
make him look the other way also is touched upon.
 Nowhere is this made clearer than in the episode involving Del Toro,
who must team up with one drug cartel in order to eliminate another. His
price, a baseball field for the youngsters of his town so they can have
a place to go at night, thus keeping them off the streets and away from
the various dealers who prey on children.
 The weakest episode involves Douglas as the drug czar nominee. As he
travels about the country learning of the extent of the drug problem, he
is faced with a personal crisis after discovering that his teen-age
daughter is an addict.
 This seems too pat, too melodramatic a plot contrivance, even though it
allows Gaghan and Soderbergh to examine the problem at a level on which
many moviegoers can relate.
 With the aid of cinematographer Peter Andrews, Soderbergh has given
Traffic a you-are-there quality as if watching a TV documentary. This is
especially true of the scenes shot in Mexico, which are bathed in a
golden hue and have an improvised air to them. It also helps that the
actors speak Spanish and the filmmakers use subtitles.
 Adding to the realism are many sequences that appear shot with
hand-held cameras.
 The performances are superb throughout, especially Douglas as the
nominee, who confidence is slowly eroded as he observes the problem from
afar as well as from within his own household.
 Del Toro is outstanding as the conflicted drug cop who wants to
eradicate the trade from his country.
 Cheadle and Guzman are strong as the front-line grunts who risk their
lives to keep the poison off the streets.
 Most notable is Zeta-Jones as a decent woman who must resort to
extremes to save her husband, her family and her home. Hers is the most
disturbing story and she instills a moral ambiguity in her performance
that is most troubling.
 Traffic is one of the best films of 2000, a grim and pessimistic
exploration of an insidious menace that can touch any household not only
in this country, but anywhere in the world.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN.. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. Other
reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com at golafayette.
 Reviews by Bob Bloom also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Lost in Space, starring William Hurt, Gary Oldman and Mimi Rogers
1 1/2 stars out of 4
  Lost in Space is an apt title for a movie that is dramatically lost for
lack of consistency and focus.
 This big-screen adaptation of the silly Irwin Allen sci-fi TV series of
the 1960s hedges its bets by trying to be all things to all viewers, and in
doing so founders in its own uncertainty. Is it straight s-f adventure? A
send-up? A family drama? Yes, no and a little bit of each.
  Lost in Space, the TV show, lost many viewers when it disintegrated from
a space drama to a campy kiddy show in which the show's purported main
villain, the evil Dr. Zachery Smith, was transformed by producer Allen into
a bumbling and verbose, comically and cowardly baddie.
 And it is the shadow of Jonathan Harris' performance as Dr. Smith that
creates havoc in this cinematic reincarnation.
 Gary Oldman, an actor not known for subtley (for reference, see The
Professional, The Fifth Element or Air Force One) is given the difficult
task of following in Harris' space boots.
 Unfortunately, he is not at all helped by the screenplay of Akiva
Goldsman, whose most recent offering was the feeble Batman and Robin.
Goldsman script is too ambitious, trying to capture the flavor the TV show
and blending it with a '90s quotient of familial angst.
 Thus, we get a movie in which dad (William Hurt as Professor John
Robinson) is a workaholic, while mom (Mimi Rogers as Maureen Robinson)
tries to balance home and career, while the kids (Heather Graham as Judy,
Lacey Chabert as Penny and Jack Johnson as Will) all reflect, in some
manner, the havoc caused by this dysfunctional family of the future.
 Eldest child Judy is a cold, brainy scientist who spends all her time
working with dad on the Jupiter project. Penny is the rebellious middle
child who would rather spend her days and nights at the mall instead of
trapsing through space. And Will is the young genius working on scientific
gizmos in order to capture his father's attention and love.
 So far, so good. A nice diversion from the Ozzie and Harriet-type family
portrayed by Guy Williams and June Lockhart and their
cute-as-button-children in the TV show.
 However, in rewriting the villainous Smith, Goldsman seems to have lost
faith in his original vision. For Oldman's Smith is merely an updated
version of Harris. He wheedles, lies, cringes and acts the coward, while
tossing out sarcastic one-liners under his breath. It's charming, but not
threatening.
 And what's a movie without some sort of serious antagonist. Therefore,
Goldsman tosses in a subplot involving time displacement and some alien
spiders in order to create a credible menacing villain.
 But by the time that all comes to pass, Lost in Space  has nearly twisted
itself back into the self-parodying world of Irwin Allen.
 Also not helping matters is the performance of Hurt. Here he seems
detached, merely acting by the numbers. He spends a lot of time furrowing
his brow and shooting sidelong glances at the rest of the cast.
 Matt LeBlanc as Major Don West seems like he's acting the part as a comic
bit from his Friends sitcom. His macho posturing is almost campy.
 Young Johnson as Will Robinson has some good moments with his robot pal,
while Chabert mouths some of the best zingers in the film. Rogers and
Graham really have little to do.
 Oldman, unfortunately, can't seem to get a handle on how to handle his Dr.
Smith. At times he's a comic villain, other times he's devilishly evil.
Either way, he's neither fish nor fowl, and that is this movie's sore
point.
 Of course, the open-ended finale leaves ample opportunities for sequels,
but perhaps this Lost in Space should merely remain lost for all time.
 It's darker and more sophisticated than the TV series, but that's like
saying The National Enquirer publishes a better product than your local
high school newspaper.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
 The Truman Show is a thought-provoking, original movie that works on many
levels.
 It has you questioning your concepts of reality - and even God.
 The movie can be viewed as a parable on the amount of control we have over
our lives, or as an allegory about the exploitation so rampant in today's
world.
 But what is most amazing about The Truman Show is the performance of Jim
Carrey.
 Linking the words Jim Carrey and drama have been considered an oxymoron.
But in The Truman Show, Carrey gives a breakthrough turn as a man who
slowly comes to realize that his life is really not his own.
 Shucking his familiar manic mannerisms, Carrey is subtle, winsome,
innocent, in control and wise as Truman Burbank, whose life, from the
moment of his birth, has kept television audiences enthralled worldwide.
 Truman lives and works in Seahaven, a perfect little community in which
all the people are friendly and life is a series of product placements.
 But gradually Truman becomes aware that something is amiss. A klieg light
falls from the sky, the same people perform the same tasks on a regular
schedule, an open elevator wall reveals a set filled with technicians.
 Most disturbing is the unexpected reappearance of Truman's father, whom he
believed drowned years earlier in a boating accident. But everyone tries to
convince Truman that the homeless man he saw could not be his father.
 Truman begins questioning the reality of his world and of those in it.
 He tells his friend, Marlon, that sometimes "it feels like the whole world
revolves around me."
 And in a sense, it does. From the outset we, the audience, know that
Truman's world is a fraud, a gigantic set created by Christof, the Godlike
director pulling Truman's strings.
 Christof has designed the ultimate reality-based television show. "We
accept the reality of the world we are presented," he advises his staff
about Truman.
 Later when Truman has discovered the truth, Christof tells him that "in my
world, you have nothing to fear."
 Ed Harris is brilliant as Christof, establishing a character who should be
considered reprehensible and loathsome and making him a figure, if not
worthy of respect than at least understanding.
 Noah Emmerich is fine as Marlon, crying on cue as Christof uses him to try
to distract some of Truman's suspicions.
 Laura Linney as Meryl, Truman's "wife," gives a deft comic turn as an
actress who goes ballistic when Truman begins to ad-lib.
 Director Peter Weir's biblical symbolism may offend some. But it is not
meant to be sacrilegious. Rather it questions the status of God in today's
world.
 Is He, like Christof, that omnipotent director scripting our every action,
or is He merely one of the viewers sitting back and watching as events
unfold?
 Weir's setting and staging of the confrontation between Truman and
Christof is loaded with biblical implications.
 It also is one of the strongest scenes in the film.
 Weir leaves his ending a bit ambiguous, forcing the viewer to think about
Truman's future.
 That's the way smart movies work. They refuse to cater to an audience's
lowest common denominator.
 The Truman Show is a very effective and touching movie. It may leave you
questioning the concept of reality.
 Even if you can't find a hidden message the film will remain an enjoyable
and unforgetable experience.
 At this stage of the movie season, it may be premature to talk about
Academy Award nominations. But don't be surprised come February if The
Truman Show is among the handful of films receiving multiple honors.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Best Man, The (1999/I)

 The Best Man (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Taye Diggs, Nia Long,
Morris Chestnut, Sanaa Lathan, Harold Perrineau, Terrence Howard, Monica
Calhoun and Melissa De Sousa. Written and directed by Malcolm D. Lee
 You know a script is strong and universal when, after seeing a movie, you
believe that the story will work with any group of actors of any
nationality or ethnicity.
 Thus is the case of "The Best Man," an impressive movie debut from
writer-director Malcolm D. Lee. And, yes, he's related to that other Lee -
Spike.
 Malcolm D. Lee has written a romantic comedy that features some very
well-defined, likable, but flawed characters.
 The set-up for "The Best Man" is simple. Harper Stewart (Taye Diggs) has
just learned that his first novel, a fictitious account of his friends and
their times together at college, has been chosen to be an Oprah book of the
month.
 He is headed from Chicago to New York not only to celebrate his success,
but to stand as best man to one of his college buddies, Lance (Morris
Chestnut).
 Unfortunately, Harper also learns that Jordan (Nia Long), another of his
college-crowd friends, has obtained an advance copy of the book and that it
is making the rounds of all his old gang.
 An easy-to-digest premise that could have fallen flat if not handled
correctly. But Lee displays a wonderful ear for dialogue and a deft pen for
characterization that holds the audience and makes them care about these
people.
 What is interesting is despite the fact that all the main characters are
black, color really is not an issue. True there is some talk about the
sexual politics and gender expectations between black men and black women,
but change a couple of words and this story could have been told in Chinese
or Croatian.
 The point is the situations and characters are easily recognizable and are
common to the human condition.
 The cast works together very smoothly, reacting off each other with the
timing and precision of an Army drill team.
 Diggs, of course, is one of the sexiest men in movies today. His Harper is
a man walking a tightrope, waiting for the shoe to drop as his book is
passed from friend to friend, revealing secrets that should have remained
buried.
 He is a man fearful of commitment. Despite being in a two-year, loving
relationship with his girlfriend, Robin (Sanaa Lathan), he cannot take that
final step toward marriage.
 Long's Jordan is a career-driven woman regretting her one missed
opportunity with Harper. She is a goal-oriented, self-assured person who
also is not afraid to reveal a vulnerability.
 Chestnut's Lance is a God-fearing, Bible-quoting football megastar. His is
a character that could have been caricature, but Chestnut fleshes him out,
showing not only his strength, but his pride and his weaknesses.
 Rounding out the cast are Harold Perrineau, Terrence Howard, Monica
Calhoun and Melissa De Sousa. This is the prettiest cast of actors to hit
the screen in a long time. Yet their looks do not obscure their finely
honed performances.
 "The Best Man" is a most enjoyable motion picture, a date movie that will
have you laughing as well as bring a tear or two to your eyes.
 It is lively, it sparkles and is one of the most life-affirming movies to
hit the screen in a long time. "The Best Man" is a gem - treasure it.
 Bob Bloom is the movie critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or a
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)

 Bowfinger (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Steve Martin, Eddie
Murphy, Heather Graham and Christine Baranski. Written by Martin. Directed
by Frank Oz.
 We movie critics usually are an impassive lot. We sit at screening after
screening, detached, perhaps jotting a note or two. In public, we hardly
ever react to what is being shown - be it good or bad.
 The latest is "Bowfinger," a hilarious comedy about the magic of movie making.
Bowfinger could be the grandson - or distant cousin - to Tim Burton's "Ed
Wood." Both overflow with an affectionate, loopy love of filmmaking. Both
forego cynicism and condescension about the process.
 "Bowfinger" also hits the Marx. While lacking the anarchy of an outing
with Groucho, Chico and Harpo, Bowfinger - at 97 minutes - is reminiscent
of the frenetic pace of the early Marx Bros. films such as "Horse Feathers"
and "Duck Soup."
 "Bowfinger" offers more laughs than any other film this year. It is
express-train comedy, written by and starring Steve Martin.
 Martin plays Bobby Bowfinger, a producer-director on the edge of the
industry, whose shanty office is a ramshackle dump miles from the glitter
and glamour of Hollywood.
 Bowfinger is desperate to hit the big time and feels that "Chubby Rain," a
science fiction action flick written by his accountant, Afrim, is his
ticket. The only hitch is he doesn't have a big-name star.
 No problem. Gathering his motley crew of filmmakers, he sets out to trick
the biggest action star in the business, Kit Ramsey (Eddie Murphy), and,
without his knowledge, make him the star of his ultra-low budget flick.
 Bowfinger does this by having people spy on Ramsey and fashioning his
scenes around the locales at which Ramsey is scheduled to appear.
 It's hijinks hilarity as the already-paranoid Ramsey - he turned down a
script because it contained about 1,400 K's, which, when divided by three,
equals about 445 KKKs - is driven to higher heights of paranoia by these
strange people, some of whom act like aliens, who continually accost him.
 To fill in the long shots, Bowfinger hires Jiff, a not-too-bright, but
earnest young man without much acting ability whose only attribute is a
resemblance to Kit Ramsey. The reason for that resemblance is made clear
later in the movie.
 Martin's script hardly allows you time to catch your breath between
laughs. Scenes continually top each other.
 For instance, Bowfinger says he's going to get the best crew available,
and the camera cuts to his van picking up a group of illegal aliens coming
across the border. The joke is topped at the end of the movie when these
men - who could not speak English nor who knew one end of a clapboard from
another - all have cell phones and are talking industry lingo.
 The strong supporting cast also is responsible for much of "Bowfinger's"
jocularity.
 Heather Graham is Daisy, a wannabe starlet who will do anything to get
more screen time in Bowfinger's movie. She is smarter than she lets on, at
one point telling one of her paramours, "I may be from Ohio, but I'm not
from Ohio." She knows the score and who to score with to get her way.
 The always-reliable Christine Baranski plays Carol, the over-the-hill
diva, for all she's worth. She dominates most of her scenes with a comic
abandon.
 Murphy is the funniest he has been in years. Forget "Dr. Dolittle" and
"The Nutty Professor." This is the Eddie Murphy of "Trading Places," of the
first "48 HRS." As Kit, he's a profane, spoiled, motor-mouthed nutcase. As
Jiff, he's vulnerable, sweet and shy. And Murphy draws a clear demarcation
between the two.
 Martin is in top form. Not since "All of Me" has he shined so brightly in
a comedic role. His Bobby Bowfinger is a quick-thinking con artist whose
only goal is to complete his dream movie. To do so, he will lie, cheat,
connive, steal. If Groucho Marx were to play a down-and-out movie
producer, he would be Bobby Bowfinger.
 "Bowfinger" is a 97-minute laugh-a-thon. Your sides will hurt when the
film fades out. It is a comedy event not to be missed.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)

 The Patriot (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger,
Joely Richardson, Jason Isaacs, Chris Cooper and Tom Wilkinson. Music by
John Williams. Screenplay by Robert Rodat. Directed by Roland Emmerich.
 "The Patriot" is a rousing, bloody, violent adventure that despite its
drawbacks, will more than likely be a huge crowd pleaser.
 And I have to admit that regardless of the movie's obvious flaws, I
remained enthralled and entertained for nearly its entire 164 minutes.
 This, of course, is mainly due to the charismatic presence of Mel
Gibson as fictional Revolutionary War hero Benjamin Martin, a South
Carolina landowner loosely based on Frances Marion, the legendary `Swamp
Fox.'
 "The Patriot" feels like a movie created by people who study
demographics. There's blood and guts for the guys; a love story,
featuring two attractive young people, for the women; a paean to
brotherhood for the liberals; and a good dose of God, country and
flag-waving for the conservatives.
 In other words, "The Patriot" offers something for everyone.
 The movie earns its R rating. The battle scenes are brutal with men
losing limbs as well as lives. Screenwriter Robert Rodat ("Saving
Private Ryan") captures the futility of 18th-century warfare in which
armies would line up across from each other on the field and use the
opposing force for target practice until one army gave up and fled.
 Gibson's Martin, realizing how ineffectual such tactics are, adopts
guerrilla warfare and hit-and-run forays to achieve his successes.
 At the outset Martin opposes fighting. A heroic veteran of the French
and Indian Wars, he is tired of bloodshed.
 However, when an arrogant and thoroughly despicable British dragoon,
Col. William Tavington (Jason Isascs) cold-bloodedly kills Martin's
15-year-old son, Martin is instantly transformed into a lethal foe, who
harasses the British at every turn.
 Martin's transformation comes to quickly, too easily. And that is one
of the movie's flaws.
 Another is Isaacs' performance as Tavington. He has no redeeming
qualities. He is absolutely evil, casually killing men, women and
children without hesitation.
 Also fighting the war is hunky Heath Ledger ("Ten Things I Hate About
You") as Gabriel, Martin's eldest son, who fights alongside his father.
This young actor is the main reason young women will flock to "The
Patriot." Like Gibson, he is a ruggedly handsome individual.
 Another problem with the film is its political correctness. There is
just too much of it. A young woman speechifies in church about the
necessity of men going to fight for their beliefs.
 Then there's the minor subplot of the redneck member of Martin's army
who dislikes then comes to respect the black slave who also is a member
of the group.
 Director Roland Emmerich keeps the proceedings in motion. There is very
little dead space. He is ably abetted by Caleb Deschanel's expert and
portrait-like cinematography.
 But this is Gibson's movie, an old-fashioned star turn. He makes some
of Rodat's overripe dialogue  palatable. He has a vulnerability about
him, a sense of regret for what he has to do and loss for the personal
cost the war is extracting from him.
 John Williams offers another of his red, white and blue symphonic
concoctions. It blends perfectly with the action on the screen.
 Overall, "The Patriot" will hold your attention. I have to admit that
it more than compensates for its weaknesses. A larger-than-life hero, a
hissable villain, a moving love story. Who could ask for anything more?
 "The Patriot" may be history as redefined by Hollywood, but it still
manages to convey the tenacity and will of those who, knowing they were
vastly outnumbered, continued with dogged determination to fight for
their dream.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Datatbase at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
 City of Angels (1998) 1 star out of 4. Starring Nicolas Cage, Meg Ryan,
Dennis Franz and Andre Braugher.
 A wise person once admonished that every film should be judged on its own
merits, whether it's an original or a rip-off of an excellent foreign film.
 So, this is how City of Angels will be assessed.
 There is not much good to say about this sappy, manipulative,
Hollywoodized, cliché-ridden love story. To sum it up: angel meets girl,
angel and girl fall in love, angel yearns to become human to get girl, and
so on and so on.
 This is a movie done by the numbers. It has some wonderful cinematography,
but overall, the City of Angels feels hollow and cold.
 The performances are adequate, except that the stars, Nicolas Cage and Meg
Ryan, are really given nothing to do but mope around Los Angeles. And while
they look good, it's hard to sustain a movie for almost two hours on looks
alone.
 Screenwriter Dana Stevens fails to evoke any true emotions. In a movie
that begs for intimacy, her script is joyless and distant. It is more a
romance novel transferred to screen than a fairy-tale-like story of
yearning for the experience of being mortal.
 Basically, what is on screen is a story about a guy who happens to be an
angel who develops the hots for a good-looking woman and will do anything
to get close to her.
 The story's conceit, that angels are all around us, watching us and aiding
us through the trial and tribulations of life, is fine, though not
original.
 But Stevens cheats. She allows humans and angels to interact at will. In
movies of this sort, the rules by which the divine and the mortal behave
usually are rigid and unbroken. To break them at will is lazy
screenwriting.
 Cage and Ryan make a wistful couple. The script doesn't allow them to be
more than two glamorous movie stars playing roles.
 The movie is saved by Dennis Franz as Nathan Messenger, a person who
understands all too well the worlds of Cage's Seth and Ryan's Dr. Maggie
Rice.
 However, his screen time is limited, and it is left to Cage and Ryan to
carry this story. But, unfortunately, the load is too heavy, and they are
weighed down by a heavy-handed and ill-conceived storyline.
 City of Angels requires a deft, poetic hand. It's a fragile story that
needs to unfold slowly without sledgehammering its audience.
 Unfortunately, those behind the enterprise haven't the required skill.
 If you want to see it done correctly, go to your video store and rent Wim
Wenders' 1988 classic, Wings of Desire. Or wait a couple of months. City of
Angels will probably be joining it on the shelves by then.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
You can e-mail him at bloom@journal-courier.com or at cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Gift, The (2000)
 The Gift (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Cate Blanchett, Keanu
Reeves, Giovanni Ribisi, Greg Kinnear, Katie Holmes, Hilary Swank, Gary
Cole and J.K. Simmons.  Screenplay by Billy Bob Thornton and Tom
Epperson. Directed by Sam Raimi. Rated R.
 With the exception of the performance of Cate Blanchett, The Gift is a
major disappointment.
 Written by actor-director Billy Bob Thornton and Tom Epperson, and
directed by Sam Raimi, the movie crawls, the plot is flimsy and the
suspense is minimal.
 This is one of those Southern Gothic tales filled with eccentric and
offbeat characters who seem to only exist below the Mason-Dixon line.
 Supposedly Thornton based Blanchettís Annie Wilson, who is psychic, on
his own mother who read fortunes.
 Annie, a young widow with three boys, uses her gift to do readings for
the locals in her rural Georgia town. At times, she has visions in which
she sees future events as well as some that already have passed.
 This gets her involved in the murder of Jessica King (Dawson Creekís
Katie Holmes), a young, rich, spoiled local woman who is found strangled
in a pond, a chain wrapped around her body.
 Of course, the main suspect, Donnie Barksdale (Keanu Reeves) is a
redneck, cheatiní, wife beater  who has threatened Annie because she
does readings for his abused spouse (Oscar-winner Hilary Swank), urging
the poor woman to leave Donnie.
 Now, since The Gift is part murder mystery, anyone with any film sense
knows immediately Reeves is not the killer.
 And so because the filmís main characters are sparse, the list of
suspects is greatly narrowed, making the identity of the killer easy to
determine. Is it Wayne Collins (Greg Kinnear), her school principal
fiancé? Or is it David Duncan (Gary Cole), the county prosecutor with
whom Jessica was having an affair? Or could it be Buddy Cole (Giovanni
Ribisi), the local nut case who was sexually abused as a child by his
father? Or maybe it was Valerie Barksdale (Swank), who knew her hubby
was carryiní on with Jessica.
 The Gift would have been a better movie if it had concentrated more on
Annie Wilson and her interaction with the other townspeople ó some of
whom think sheís a witch ó than forcing its audience to walk through
this transparent labyrinth trying to guess who the killer really is.
 For Blanchettís Annie is very reluctant about using her power, which it
seems she considers more of a burden than a gift. Instead of telling
people their futures, she tries to set them on the right path to
determine their own destinies.
 The Gift is partly redeemed by its Twilight Zone-like resolution, but
overall it remains an unsatisfying endeavor.
 Blanchettís Annie is an interesting individual. At times she is
frightened by her gift, tentative about how to use it. Up front she
tells her clients that she cannot solve their problems, only suggest the
road they must take to reach their own resolution.
 At times, though, the script undermines her. When she realizes Donnie,
who has been convicted of Jessicaís death, is not guilty, she runs to
the prosecutor, spills the beans about seeing him and Jessica catching a
quickie in a closet, and insists he reopen the case.
 She also visits Wayne, telling him of her feelings that Donnie has been
railroaded. Not a smart thing to do since these two guys would now be
considered suspects.
 The performances in The Gift, other than Blanchettís, are rather
uneven. Reeves plays Donnie as if auditioning for one of the deranged
backwoodsmen from Deliverance; Ribisi gives another of his, ěHey look at
me, I'm nutsî characterization for which he seems to be becoming
typecast; Swank is totally wasted; while Kinnear plays Wayne as a rather
passive, colorless lacking any real personality.
 Only J.K. Simmons (best known as the racist inmate on HBOís Oz) is
memorable as the easy-going county sheriff who is dubious of Annieís
gift.
 The scene in which he asks about a missing eclair while she is trying
to give him information about the missing Jessica is priceless. If only
more sequences in The Gift could have been so well written.
 The Gift is a flawed movie that wastes the potential of its cast. It
falls short as a character study, a thriller and a mystery.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. More reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com and click on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)

 Fight Club (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Brad Pitt, Edward Norton
and Helena Bonham Carter. Directed by David Fincher.
 "Fight Club" is not what you perceive it to be.
 It is a movie that assails your senses and lacerates your emotions with a
one-two combination of visual style and barbed humor.
 Basically, "Fight Club" is a savage satire, an attack on consumerism, a
cry against the shallowness of our overly commercialized society. It is a
look at the bleakness and emptiness that engulfs a generation which has
grown up without a great war to fight or a great Depression to steel its
mettle.
 Ostensibly, "Fight Club" is about men who need to beat the shit out of
each other in order to feel alive and make an emotional connection with
another human being.
 But the film, directed by David Fincher, is more complicated than that.
 Fincher, the director of "Seven," leads you down a murky winding path of
dark, dank cellars and alleys in which water drips incessantly and blood
and sweat flow and coalesce as if choreographed by a Balanchine.
 As conceived by Fincher and screenwriter Jim Uhls, based on a novel by
Chuck Palahniuk,  "Fight Club" is the ultimate self-help, 12-step program.
 And that is where the story begins. The Narrator (Edward Norton) works for
an automobile corporation as some sort of claims adjuster. He is among the
walking dead, feeling nothing, unable to connect with anyone. He tries to
compensate for this void by buying furniture and gizmos from catalogs.
 He is an insomniac searching for some emotional release. He finds it when
he begins attending meetings of various groups: testicular cancer survivors
and incest victims, for example.
 People listen to you when they think you're dying, the Narrator explains.
 Through these encounters he gathers strength, emotional release - and free
coffee.
 All this changes though, when our hero meets Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt), a
young man who lives by his own rules. Tyler sells soap, which he makes
himself.
 Circumstances throw Tyler and our Narrator together. After a night of
drinking, Tyler goads his friend into hitting him. The two begin fighting
and discover it an enjoyable experience. The pain and bruises are the
confirmation of their humanity within the sterile confines of their
commercial-driven society.
 Soon the concept spreads as more and more men gather around the two.
 Eventually, Tyler forms a nationwide, underground army of disgruntled men
who wear their bandages and bruises as badges of honor.
 "Fight Club" is not as grim as it sounds. Actually it is quite funny, but
it's a sick, razor-slashing  humor. You will either laugh or be sickened.
 At one juncture Tyler and the Narrator make a guerrilla raid on the
garbage bins at a hospital to gather the fatty remnants from liposuction
operations because, as Tyler explains, human fat makes the best soap.
 It is a sequence that is revoltingly hilarious.
 Another moment finds the Narrator blackmailing his boss for a large
severance package by beating himself up in his superior's office, all the
while making it seem as if he is being beaten by his supervisor. Norton's
antics are ballet-like as he flings himself around the room, slamming into
tables and upending bookcases.
 Pitt and Norton give splendid performances. Norton is especially fine. He
again displays the talent that makes him one of the best - if not the
finest - actor of his generation.
 His Narrator begins the film as a dead-eyed, hollowed-cheek, zombie, an
unfeeling, unflinching human being running on automatic.
 As the film progresses, his character becomes more and more animated. His
body language slowly changes. He becomes looser, freer, more at ease with
the world.
 Pitt's Tyler is a cheerful, psychotic dynamo, an urban terrorist. He is a
sick and gross individual who takes pleasure in his rebellion. Working
part-time as a banquet caterer, for example, he urinates into the clam
chowder soup before serving it.
 Pitt creates a larger-than-life outsider. It is a daring performance that
is as comic as it is disturbing.
 Helena Bonham Carter's character is less defined. Her only function seems
to be as the third side of a triangle, to create conflict between Tyler and
the Narrator. Her motivations seem hazy, her usefulness merely a plot
device.
 "Fight Club" is a movie you may need to see more than once to appreciate
its complexity and subtlety. Its apocalyptic-style finale will stir debate.
 "Fight Club" is original, mesmerizing and mind-gripping. You will walk out
partially numbed and exhausted, knowing you have been through an experience
that has jabbed your psyche.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Election (1999)
 Election (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Reese Witherspoon, Matthew
Broderick, Chris Klein and Jessica Campbell.
 One of the pleasures of movie reviewing is watching a film that arrives
unannounced and charms you with its humor and originality.
 Such "sleepers" as "Fargo" and "The Full Monty" fit snugly into this
category. And now you can add "Election," an askewed look at the polemics
of high school politics.
 Everyone of us knows a Tracy Flick. That's the student who always raises
his or her hand first, always knowing right answer; the one who cheerfully
organizes the car wash to raise the money to fund the prom, the one who is
destined to be student body president and lead the school to glory.
 We all know a Tracy Flick - and most of us hated her - or him. OK, maybe
hate is too strong. Jealous, envious. We admired that student's ease and
self-confidence around others while cursing our own tongue-tied
inadequacies.
 At George Washington Carver High School, Tracy Flick is the classic
overachiever, a bright, perky go-getter whose ambition is to be student
government president. And it looks like she will succeed, since she is
running unopposed.
 Jim McAllister is a much beloved, veteran civics teacher at Carver. He has
been on the faculty for 12 years and has been recognized three times as
"Teacher of the Year."
 And he decides that Tracy must be stopped. He sees her treating high
school as the first step in a lifelong career strategy that could take her
to unimaginable heights.
He also knows Tracy's dark secret. She had an affair with his best friend,
a teacher who lost his job after their romance became public.
 So McAllister recruits Paul Metzger, a dim-witted, but nice, popular
football hero sidelined by an injury to run against her.
 Paul is totally unfit for the job, completely in the dark about student
government, but McAllister convinces him that it's his civic duty to run.
 The situation gets even wilder when Paul's younger sister, Tammy - seeking
revenge on the girlfriend who dumped her and began dating her brother -
enters the race on a platform of abolishing student government.
 Soon life in and out of school begin spinning out of control for
McAllister as his plans go awry.
 "Election" is a satirical joy, due mainly to the performances of Reese
Witherspoon as Tracy, Matthew Broderick as McAllister, Chris Klein as Paul
and, especially, Jessica Campbell as Tammy.
 Witherspoon's Tracy is bubbly and gushing to the point of nausea. Her
Tracy is one of those students who treats others as if they were her serfs.
She may be all smiles and dimples on the outside, but underneath she rages
and burns with ambition and intolerance for those who do not live up to her
standards.
 Broderick's deadpan performance is one of low-key desperation, as his
various plots to thwart Tracy continue to be upended.
 Klein is sincere as the friendly doofus who, unlike Tracy, does not see
the election as a life-and-death struggle.
 Campbell's Tammy is sarcastic and brutally honest. Her best moment comes
during the assembly where the candidates give their campaign speeches. She
rallies the students by pointing out the hyprocisy of the system and the
ineffectual role of student government, calling for its abolition.
 What really sets "Election" apart is the voice-over narrations by the
various principals, especially when - at times - what they are saying is in
counterpoint to the action on the screen.
 The script by Alexander Payne and Jim Taylor, based on a novel by Tom
Perrotta, could be seen as an allegory of our democratic process, but I'd
rather not be that pretentious.
 I look at "Election" like that blind date that turned out to be the most
fabulous night of your life. It's a sharp, funny and entertaining movie
that will keep you laughing from the opening reel to the closing credits.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)

 Rounders (1998) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Matt Damon, Edward Norton, John
Malkovich and Gretchen Mol. Directed by John Dahl.
 Rounders is like a high-stakes poker game. Sometimes it shows its hand too
early, sometimes it holds back some of its cards, but a lot of the time it
merely bluffs.
 Director John Dahl's drama centers on a law student (Matt Damon) who has a
secret night life as a player in high-stakes underground poker games.
 After losing it all in a big-stakes game, Mike McDermott (Damon) swears
off the cards to concentrate on his legitimate life as well as his
girlfriend, Jo (Gretchen Mol).
 But an old friend, Worm (Edward Norton), newly released from prison,
forces Mike back into the life to help Worm make good on his old gambling
debts.
 Worm is a complete screw-up. Whereas Mike plays poker for the thrill, to
Worm it's all a con to make money. Worm cheats, and in doing so, not only
gets Mike deeper in debt but gets him beaten.
 Dahl (Red Rock West, The Last Seduction) does what he can with the
material. But writers David Levien and Brian Koppelman hedge their bets.
They create a part Cincinnati Kid, part good buddy-bad buddy film with a
bit of love story thrown in.
 The movie, at a bit over two hours, drags in many spots and spends too
much time focusing on Mike's determination to stay away from the gambling
tables when it is obvious that he really yearns for the game.
 And when he is playing, the suspense is diluted by Mike's voice-over
narration, explaining the intricacies of the game and how to spot a mark so
you can win his money.
 Actually, Mike's narration is the most interesting part of the film, as he
gives an insider's look at the high-ante games and what is needed to win.
 Damon is appealing as Mike. He has that clean-cut, fresh look that makes
his double life believable. He has that charming smile that he utilizes to
escape from tough situations.
 What is hard to understand is his determination to stick with Worm even
beyond the point of common sense.
 Norton is all posing and vulgarity as the cheating card shark. He is a
seedy liar totally lacking in charm. He is a boorish trickster, and it's
amazing that a low-life such as him can even find someone to sit at a table
with him.
 Mol has little to do except berate Mike for his return to his old ways.
 John Malkovich, as the gambling kingpin, talks with a thick Russian accent
that sounds almost like something from an old vaudeville routine.
 John Turturro, as a professional gambler who tries to help Mike, is cool
and cerebral, explaining that the game must be looked at as a business or a
profession.
 Overall, Rounders, though a bit too long, is interesting but uneven. It's
more intriguing than a game of rummy, but it fails to reach the high stakes
at which it aims.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Planet of the Apes (2001)
Planet of the Apes (2001) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Mark Wahlberg, Tim
Roth, Helena Bonham Carter, Michael Clarke Duncan, Paul Giamatti, Estella
Warren, Kris Kristofferson, Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa, David Warner and Charlton
Heston. Screenplay by William Broyles Jr. and Lawrence Konner & Mark Rosenthal.
Based on the novel by Pierre Boulle. Music by Danny Elfman. Directed by Tim
Burton.  Rated PG-13. Approx. 2 hours 
I have to say it. Tim Burton's retelling of Planet of the Apes is more fun than
a barrel of monkeys. 
OK, that's off my chest. No more monkey puns, I promise. 
Seriously, though, Planet of the Apes is one rip-roarin' summer outing, filled
with thrills, action, adventure, wit and bits of funny (dare I say, monkey)
business. I know, I know, I promised. 
And for those film buffs who are fond of the original, Burton's version includes
a couple tips of the hat to that movie. 
Mark Wahlberg stars as Capt. Leo Davidson, a deep-space pilot whose ship gets
drawn into a magnetic field and hurled into the future. He crash lands on a
planet where apes are the dominant species and humans are hunted, captured and
sold into slavery. 
Despite being darker than the original, Burton's film is not as heavy handed nor
as sanctimonious. 
Some of the movie's flashes of humor are surreal as well as typically Burton: An
organ-grinder ape with a midget or an elderly ape taking off a wig and removing
false teeth as he prepares for bed. Then there are the parents who buy a little
girl as a pet for there young daughter. The seller advises the parents to get
rid of the girl before she reaches puberty: "One thing you don't want in your
house is a human teen-ager," he says. You don't have to be an ape to realize the
truth in that statement. Touches such as these are what stamps this movie with
Burton's brand. 
Lines that hearken back to the original movie are sprinkled throughout: The
first words spoken by an ape to Davidson as the astronaut is regaining
consciousness and grabs the simian's foot to try righting himself are: "Take
your stinking hand off of me, you damned, dirty human." Anyone familiar with the
first version of the film will, of course, recognize the irony in that piece of
dialogue. 
Another of Burton's in-jokes is to have Charlton Heston, star of the original,
play the chimpanzee father of Tim Roth's Gen. Thade. The young chimp goes to
visit his dying father. Both have one thing in common, a hatred of humans. With
his dying breath, the elder spews out his vile: "Damn them, damn them all to
hell," he says before expiring. That is the famous line Heston's Taylor shouted
at the conclusion of the original after discovering the planet's terrible
secret. 
The performances throughout are top-notch. Wahlberg plays Davidson not as some
gung-ho hero, but as a confused and somewhat frightened explorer who only wants
to return home. He is reluctant to lead the human rebellion; his only objective
being to find a way off this upside-down planet. This hesitation is what makes
his character believable and vulnerable. 
Roth is ferocious, cunning, cruel and savage as the fascist chimp who wants to
rid his planet of all vestiges of humanity. He leaps and bounds as if he had
springs on his feet. It is a masterful turn. 
Helena Bonham Carter is Ari, the chimp who believes that apes and humans can
live in peace and as equals. Hers is a smart, compassionate characterization. 
Michael Clarke Duncan is big and brutal as Attar the gorilla aid to Thade who
blindly follows his leader until his faith is shaken. 
A fine comic outing is given by Paul Giamatti as Limbo, the ape slave trader
making a living off the misery of the humans he captures. As the battle between
apes and humans looms, the cowardly Limbo pleads, "Can't we all just get along,"
echoing the words of Rodney King. 
Much of the success of Planet of the Apes goes to Burton's technical crew,
especially production designer Rick Heinrichs and the legendary Rick Baker who
created the ape makeup. 
Burton's musical collaborator, Danny Elfman, provides another fine score, though
it is not as memorable as his work on Batman or Sleepy Hollow. 
The movie's only letdown comes at the very end where Burton tries to outshock
the finale from the 1968 original. He comes close, but falls short. 
Otherwise, Planet of the Apes is what a summer movie should be: An amusement
park ride filled with lots of action, stunts and a few laughs. This is one
feature in which the expectations lived up to the pre-release hype. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Saving Private Ryan (1998) 4 stars out of 4
 Saving Private Ryan is a brilliant, savage piece of filmmaking, a soaring
paean to the courage of man - as individual and as family.
 And director Steven Spielberg, with the aid of cinematographer Janusz
Kaminski and film editor Michael Kahn, has created the most intense,
riveting 30 minutes of combat footage in the history of cinema.
 Silence, except for the fluttering of a pale, ghostlike flag, greets you
at the outset of this marvelous movie. The prologue follows a World War II
veteran as he shuffles through the allied cemetery at Omaha Beach in
Normandy.
 The movie then flashes back to D-Day, June 6, 1944. And here the
audience's senses and emotions are bombarded with the sights and sounds of
war.
 A chaotic choreography of carnage is what Spielberg and his team have
thrown at us. Kaminski's hand-held camera darts through the death and
destruction, capturing moments of terror, confusion, fright and most of all
blood.
 It's everywhere. Death comes unexpectedly, swiftly, randomly. Spielberg
spares none of the horror that was D-Day.
 The documentary-style footage will make you wince and perhaps turn away.
These battle scenes are stomach-churning in their realism. And the film's
main story has not yet begun.
 As the GIs earn a toehold on the beach and methodically begin decimating
the German bunkers, Kaminski's camera slowly pans back down the beach,
lingering on a dead GI named Ryan.
 It is that image that propels the plotline of Saving Private Ryan. The
dead Ryan was one of three brothers killed.
 A fourth brother, a paratrooper who was dropped into France the night
before the invasion, is believed to still be alive somewhere behind enemy
lines.
 The big brass in Washington, with equal parts of mercy and attempts to
avoid a PR disaster, order that this fourth brother, James Francis Ryan, be
found and returned stateside.
 Ranger Capt. John Miller (Tom Hanks), who survived the D-Day invasion with
only a few of his men, draws the assignment of finding this needle in a
very huge haystack.
 Spielberg deftly establishes the moral dilemma faced by Miller and his
squad. Why is this Ryan so special? Why does his right to go home outweigh
anyone else's? How does finding him aid the war effort? Is it worth risking
and possibly sacrificing the lives of others just to find one man?
 As the film progresses, these questions are answered.
 Saving Private Ryan is not your gung-ho, John Wayne-Randolph Scott war
movie. These GIs' main focus is not defeating the enemy so much as staying
alive and returning home. If finding Ryan will achieve that goal quicker,
then so be it.
 The men in Miller's squad do what GIs have done since the beginning of
warfare. They gripe, second-guess their superiors and insult each other.
Yet, when thrown into battle, they are a unit, protecting their
brother-in-arms.
 Hanks gives a sterling performance as Miller. He is low-key, a bit
mysterious (his squad has created a continually growing pool trying to
guess what the captain does in civilian life) and very much frightened.
 Despite his fears - his hand continually shakes - and his doubts about
their mission, Miller leads his men on, at times either cajoling, bullying
or sweet-talking them forward. Hanks ably embodies the Everyman-ordinary of
warfare. He is no professional soldier.
 Miller and his men eventually find Ryan, portrayed by Matt Damon as a
sturdy and willful young soldier.
 Among the other cast members, Tom Sizemore is wise, tough and
compassionate as Sgt. Horvath, Miller's second-in-command. Jeremy Davies as
Cpl. Upham, the translator drafted by Miller to leave the safe confines of
the now-secure beach and possibly come face-to-face with the enemy,
represents us, the audience. He is constantly scared, recoiling at every
sound, avoiding combat at any cost.
 Saving Private Ryan is a magnificent achievement. It shows Spielberg as a
more mature filmmaker, a man willing to gamble. How else do you explain why
he uses what could be the grand finale of any other film as the opening
gambit to cast the audience into the story and its characters?
 This is not a movie for the squeamish. Spielberg refuses to compromise.
Death is not pretty. With an unblinking eye, the director shows the misery,
the horror, the tragedy and the human toll of war.
 But the movie's magic is that, while it does not glorify war, it glorifies
its reluctant warriors, not because they are heroic, but because they
trudge on and do their duty, overcoming their fears and own instincts for
survival.
 Saving Private Ryan is an unrelenting, emotional experience that deserves
its "R" rating. Yet it's a movie that young adults should see with their
grandfathers who served in World War II to better comprehend and understand
their sacrifices.
 In Act IV, Scene III of Henry V, Shakespeare had King Henry deliver a
speech to rouse his troops. Part of it went like this:
 He that outlives this day and comes safe home
 Will stand a-tiptoe when this day is named ...
 And gentlemen ... now abed
 Shall think themselves accursed they were not here,
 And hold their manhoods cheap ...
 There is no comparison between the battle of Agincourt and the beaches of
Normandy. But that special bond that is forged and exists between men who
have walked through the gates of hell and returned, must be timeless and
universal.
 And that is the majesty and power of Saving Private Ryan, for it has
captured that camaraderie and shown it to us in all its horrifying
brutality and spiritual splendor.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Mummy Returns, The (2001)

 The Mummy Returns (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Brendan Fraser,
Rachel Weisz,  John Hannah, Arnold Vosloo, Freddie Boath, The Rock, Oded
Fehr, Patricia Velasquez and Adewale Akinnuoye-Agbaje. Music by Alan
Silvestri. Written and directed by Stephen Sommers. PG-13.
 The Mummy Returns is like the desperate comedian who machine guns joke
after joke because he needs his fix of laughter like a junkie needs his
fix of heroin.
 This express train-paced sequel to the hit of a couple of years ago
piles thrill upon thrill and special effect upon special effect until
the audience nearly overdoses. As the final reel unspools you want to
stand up and shout, ěEnough already!î
 The Mummy Returns, at about two and 10 minutes, is relentless, never
giving the viewer a chance to catch a breath.
 Set in 1933, this sequel reunites all the main characters from the
original: soldier of fortune Rick OíConnell (Brendan Fraser), the brainy
Egyptologist Evelyn (Rachel Weisz), now Mrs. OíConnell, her
neíer-do-well brother, Jonathan (John Hannah) and the evil high priest
mummy Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo).
 The movieís plot is a bit complicated, dealing with several Egyptian
relics that, in the wrong hands, will unleash the forces of darkness
upon the world. Donít they always.
 Added to the mix is popular wrestling figure The Rock as The Scorpion
King, an evil warrior who has promised his soul to the dread god Anubis
in exchange for military might.
 Well, old Anubis took The Scorpion King and put him in charge of his
army of darkness.
 But now itís the Year of the Scorpion, and guess who is planning on
making a comeback.
 One interesting note about the feature: The Rock has been played up
very prominently is publicity about the film, yet his appearance is
rather brief and he barely utters a line. This is something like
bait-and-switch, so for those going to see this mainly for The Rock, be
warned.
 Another new character ó and the one who nearly steals the film ó is
Rick and Evelynís brainy 8-year-old son, Alex (Freddie Boath). Heís a
precocious little chap, who could have been rather obnoxious.
But director Stephen Sommers, who also wrote the script, takes such a
tongue-in-cheek attitude to the entire affair that you donít mind the
kidís wisecracks.
 The Mummy Returns is a fast-food movie; you view it, are entertained
and leave. It has no lasting impression. Itís a quick stimulation.
Nothing profound, nothing deep.
 Just cheap excitement, lots of stunts, lots of special effects ó some
of the computer generated images, though, are rather obvious ó and loads
of action.
 Is The Mummy Returns a good movie? No. But it does deliver what the
audience for this type of  outing wants ó a mindless rush that allows
you to put your brain in neutral for about 130 minutes.
 You donít critique performances in a movie like this because they are
secondary. Anyone could have played these roles and it wonít have made
an iota of difference.
 The Mummy Returns is the clarion call for the summer movie season; that
time of year when movies are long, loud and simplistic to a fault.
 So buckle up, summer is on the horizon and The Mummy Returns has just
jump-started the cinematic tour bus.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Scary Movie 2 (2001)
Scary Movie 2 (2001) 1 star out of 4. Starring Shawn Wayans, Marlon Wayans, Anna
Faris, Regina Hall, Chris Masterson, Kathleen Robertson, James Woods, Tim Curry,
Tori Spelling and Chris Elliott. Written by Shawn Wayans & Marlon Wayans &
Alyson Fouse & Greg Grabianski & Dave Polsky & Michael Anthony Snowden & Craig
Wayans. Directed by Keenen Ivory Wayans. Rated R. 
 They should have stuck to the promise emblazoned on the original movie's
poster: "No sequel." 
 Scary Movie 2 is nowhere near as funny as its predecessor, and it is not
because the Wayans brothers, Shawn and Marlon doing the writing and Keenen Ivory
behind the camera, don't try. 
 What defeats them is the genre they have chosen to spoof. The first movie - an
outrageous, low-brow, savage satire of teen slasher flicks such as Scream and I
Know What You Did Last Summer - succeeded because of its take-no-prisoners
attitude toward a type of film that was in vogue, familiar and popular. 
 In Scary Movie 2, the filmmakers take on the haunted house-ghost story format
which, if you look at the grosses for such recent lame offerings as the
respective remakes of The Haunting and House on Haunted Hill, did not draw
audiences nor enter the cultural psyche as did the various teen slasher series.
 Scary Movie 2 does start off promising with a wonderful spoof of The Exorcist,
featuring James Wood in the Max Von Sydow role and Veronica Cartwright
lampooning Ellen Burstyn. Of course split pea soup is the punch line - an
overabundant amount, which offers the hope that the rest of the movie will be
just as tasteless and excessive. 
 But this pre-credit sequence has nothing at all to do with the main action,
which features the cast members from the original signing up to spend a weekend
at a creepy haunted mansion as part of a university class project. 
 Some of the jokes are as scatological and offensive as in the original, but
they lack that take-no-prisoners bite that raised Scary Movie to the heights of
burlesque. 
 Scary Movie 2 merely lurches from one lame sendup to another, offering weak
spoofs of that Nike shoe ad in which everyone does acrobatics with a basketball,
and the films What Lies Beneath and Hannibal (features that only faired
adequately at the box office), John Woo's Mission: Impossible 2 and Charlie's
Angels. 
 It is as if the Wayans and their team of writers - at least seven are credited
- just threw ideas in a blender and hoped they'd coalesce. They don't. 
 While the pace of the original left you breathless, the sequel moves with the
speed of an 18-wheeler carrying two tons of concrete up a steep mountain road.
You can almost hear the reels panting. 
 Scary Movie 2 tries very hard to live up to its original, but it falls very
short. It's a dissatisfying spectacle, a very weak sister of a very good movie.
The really scary aspect of this sequel is how disappointing it really is. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. Other reviews by Bloom
can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
U-571 (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Matthew McConaughey, Bill
Paxton, Harvey Keitel, John Bon Jovi, David Keith and Jake Weber.
Screenplay by Jonathan Mostow, Sam Montgomery and David Ayer. Story by
Mostow. Directed by Mostow
 They sweat, strain and die under the banner of patriotism and prose so
purple it may make you blush.
 But "U-571" does have a sort of old-fashioned innocence to it, and in
its own corny way it is a fun outing.
 Set during World War II, the movie's plot revolves around the retrieval
of an Enigma code machine from a German U-boat. With this machine the
Allies will be able to decipher the secret German code and will be able
to intercept all their messages.
"U-571" is the type of movie in which one good guy torpedo sinks a
destroyer while 2 million Nazi depth charges cannot even put a dent in a
rust bucket, battle-scared submarine.
 OK, so "U-571" isn't history. It's a throwback to those lovable John
Wayne-Randolph Scott war movies in which We were the stalwart heroes and
They were the hissable villains.
 It's the kind of movie in which the black cook - without any formal
training - can man the controls of a German U-boat.
 It's a movie in which the firm, no-nonsense captain (Bill Paxton) gives
his executive officer a lecture about being hesitant to sacrifice men's
lives for the overall good, which - of course - foreshadows events to
come.
 Every situation is telegraphed, every character is stock.
 And the music by Richard Marvin tries to give the film an epic air, but
it only succeeds at assailing the eardrums.
 The claustrophobic feel of the U-boat was done much better in Wolfgang
Petersen's classic, "Das Boot". "U-571" is merely a pale copy.
 Matthew McConaughey is chiseled and determined as the lieutenant
suddenly thrust into command. Harvey Keitel is sagelike as the veteran
Navy chief who helps McConaughey's Lt. Andrew Tyler grow into command.
 The movie's main flaw: The main action piece takes place during a
stormy night, thus making it almost impossible to see who among the cast
lives and buys it for God and country.
 "U-571" is the type of film you drag your wife or girlfriend in
retaliation for being henpecked into taking her to see a weeper such as
"Random Hearts" or "The Horse Whisperer."
 "U-571" is pabulum, a no-brainer. It's merely an excuse to munch on
popcorn.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom, an asociate member of the Online Film Critics' Society, has his
reviews posted by the Internet Movie Database at
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Wood, The (1999)
 "The Wood" is a pleasant, warm comedy about friendship and loyalty.
 It is one of those feel-good movies, a nostalgic trip down memory lane
featuring likable characters, nice music and humorous situations.
 It also is homogenized and non-threatening. Now that is not a criticism as
much as an observation.
 There is no real dramatic tension in "The Wood" because it is a story
involving regular people in ordinary situations.
 It is a movie you just sit back, observe and enjoy.
 The crux of the story centers on Roland (Taye Diggs) on the day he is to
be married. Three hours before the ceremony, the groom turns up missing.
 Sent to find him and bring him to his senses are his oldest friends, Mike
(Omar Epps) and Slim (Richard T. Jones). The pair find Roland drunk at the
home of an old girlfriend.
 As his friends drive him around in order to sober him up, various locales
around the 'Wood - the nickname for their home, Inglewood, Calif. -
rekindle memories and episodes from their adolescence.
 The trio first met during junior high school. Mike, recently arrived from
North Carolina, hooks up with Roland and Slim, who immediately get the new
kid in trouble. They dare him to pinch the behind of Alicia, the prettiest
girl in the school.
 While Mike gets slapped around for his pains. it also is the beginning of
a friendship that as the years progress develops into something deeper and
more personal.
 "The Wood" is a positive movie. No gang-bangers and no drugs - except for
one sequence in which a young man smokes a joint. It presents a slice of
black life that few mainstream Hollywood studios would invest money into
examining.
 The three main actors give strong performances. Diggs, who made his debut
as Angela Bassett's lover in "How Stella Got Her Groove Back" and was
featured earlier this year in the comedy, "Go," is confused and nervous as
the uncertain groom.
 Epps' Mike is the level-headed member of the trio who, despite failures in
his own love life, helps his friend determine his future.
 Jones, who co-starred in last year's failed Steven Bochco TV series,
"Brooklyn South", is the mouthy, hot-headed fellow, who easily becomes
frustrated. At times all he wants to do is slap some sense into his friend.
 The three younger actors who play Roland, Mike and Slim as teen-agers -
Trent Cameron, Sean Nelson and Duane Finley - also exude that cameraderie.
 "The Wood" is an entertaining way to spend a couple of hours.
Finger-snapping music, a warm and humorous series of vignettes and a group
of people you wouldn't mind associating with make "The Wood" a friendly
place to visit.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Gods and Monsters (1998)
 Gods and Monsters (1998) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Ian McKellan, Brendan
Fraser and Lynn Redgrave. Written and directed by Bill Condon.
 "Gods and Monsters" is the story of two men who separated by age and
class, eventually form a strange alliance in which they found commonality
and forge an unease bond.
 What makes this film, written and directed by Bill Condon, so fascinating
is that it is based on the life of a real person - movie director James
Whale, who died in 1957 under mysterious circumstances.
 Whale's death was ruled a suicide. He was found floating in his pool,
fully clothed.
 Whale's glory days were well past him at the time of his death. He had not
been behind the camera in more than 15 years and had been virtually
forgotten by Hollywood.
 If you're not a fan of horror films than James Whale's name may mean
nothing to you. But, he directed four groundbreaking films in the genre in
the early and mid-1930s: "Frankenstein," "The Old Dark House," "The
Invisible Man" and "The Bride of Frankenstein."
 Ironically, this soft-spoken British gentleman also directed the
definitive version of one of the great Broadway musicals of all time,
"Showboat."
 Condon has adapted Christopher Bram's novel, "Father of Frankenstein,"
which takes a fictional look at the circumstances surrounding Whale's
death.
 "Gods and Monsters" is the story of Whale's relationship with Clayton
Boone, his young gardener. Boone is an ex-Marine, trying to eke out a
living while searching for fulfillment in his life.
 Whale slowly draws the young man into his orbit as Boone becomes
fascinated with the older man's stories of his early days in Hollywood as
well as his harrowing experiences in the trenches during World War I.
 Whale, who was openly homosexual at a time when most in Hollywood kept
their sexual preferences in the closet, subtly tries to seduce the young
man, but not for the reasons one would expect.
 For Whale is a sick man. He is recovering from a stroke. His past
continually intrudes into his thought processes. He continually sees people
and events from his childhood, his military days and his time on the set of
"Bride of Frankenstein."
 Whale has trouble sleeping, he cannot concentrate on his paintings or
sketches. He is weary, lonesome and afraid.
 With Boone as his unwitting subject, Whale transforms the inexperienced
and somewhat naive gardener into his "second monster."
 But, just as in his horror films, this real-life monster cannot be totally
controlled to do its master's bidding.
 As Whale, Ian McKellen gives an Academy Award-worthy performance. His
Whale is sophisticated, sly, subtle, urbane, charming and witty. He is also
frightened, bedeviled and lonely, at odds with a world in which he feels
out of step.
 McKellen shows the dissatisfaction of a forgotten old man surviving on
little more than memories as well as the artist who, despite his
infirmities still can construct a real-life script that can manipulate his
actors.
 Brendan Fraser gives a touching performance as Clay, the young man out of
his depth and confused by this artist who introduces him into a world in
which he is not equipped, either mentally or emotionally, to cope.
 Fraser displays the volatile nature that seethes in the underbelly of this
dissatisfied young man who resents being manipulated by Whale. "I am not
your monster," he shouts at Whale.
 He refuses to commit the ultimate act for his new patron, showing that
spark of humanity that parallels the monster's mercy that saves Henry
Frankenstein in the finale of "Bride of Frankenstein."
 Lynn Redgrave is fierce as Hanna, Whale's protective and domineering
housekeeper. She dotes on her employer without indulging his every whim.
She is disapproving of his lifestyle and suspicious of Clay, yet comes to
accept their odd relationship.
 Condon creates some wonderful imagery as he brings his camera into Whale's
mind, showing us flashes of the director's unhappy childhood, his brutal
war experiences and his creative endeavors in filmmaking.
 "Gods and Monsters" is more than historical fiction. It is a paean to a
talented, yet almost forgotten moviemaker whose contributions to the early
sound days of Hollywood need to be re-examined.
 Perhaps "Gods and Monsters" greatest achievement will be to resurrect
Whale's body of works for a new generation of filmgoers to appreciate.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)

Bringing Out the Dead (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Nicolas Cage,
Patricia Arquette, John Goodman, Ving Rhames and Tom Sizemore. Written by
Paul Schrader. Directed by Martin Scorsese.
 Even a mediocre Martin Scorsese film has some interesting moments.
 And a few are interspersed in "Bringing Out the Dead" another trek down
the wet, dark and dangerous streets of New York.
 Unfortunately, Scorsese has taken us down these streets before, most
notably in "Taxi Driver," to which "Bringing Out the Dead" is a distant
cousin.
 Like that earlier classic, "Bringing Out the Dead" features a protagonist
who also narrates throughout, and who, while not a Travis Bickle-like
psychopath, shows an air of disgust toward the human refuse that floats
around him.
 Frank Pierce, though, does not drive a taxi. His vehicle is an ambulance.
Pierce is an EMS paramedic. He's a burnt-out, hollowed-eye hulk of a man,
who wants to get a good night's sleep as well as chase away the ghosts of
the various people he treated but did not survive.
 The most frequent specter is that of Rose, a young woman whose death
continually haunts Frank. Every face he sees reminds him of Rose. The guilt
weighs him down like an anchor.
 One night, Frank meets Mary Burke (Patricia Arquette), a one-time junkie,
after he takes her father - who has suffered a heart attack - to the
hospital.
 He hopes by saving Mary's father that it will be his first step on the
road to redemption.
 The problem with "Bringing Out the Dead," based on the novel by Joe
Connelly and adapted by the legendary Paul Schrader, is that the story
really doesn't go anywhere.
 Cage gives a one-note performance. He merely stares out the ambulance
window with his hound-dog eyes, wishing he were anywhere but on the job.
 Arquette is no better. She merely mopes about, worrying about her father,
commenting on how she hated the man, but - because of his heart attack -
wants to make things right with him.
 As Frank's various partners, John Goodman, Ving Rhames and Tom Sizemore
are more types than real people. They are interchangeable foils for Frank's
various close encounters with the disenfranchised.
 What keeps the film  from being a total loss is some of the dark humor
Schrader has invested in the script. To keep their sanity, the paramedics
drink, beat on their ambulances, use their own drugs and sometimes beat up
on the people they are paid to save.
 These are men at the breaking point, who deal with human suffering every
day, who use any method they can devise to block out the misery surrounding
them.
 "Bringing Out the Dead" is not as vicious or depressing as "Taxi Driver."
It does offer a ray of hope and redemption. Its New York is more of a
surreal nightmare rather than the hell on earth envisioned by Travis Bickle.
 But in the end, "Bringing Out the Dead" falls flat. It lacks substance and
weight. Scorsese has given us a flashy picture show, nothing more.
 Bob Bloom is the movie critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or a
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Man in the Iron Mask, The (1998)
  Randall Wallace's adaptation of The Man in the Iron Mask, more rightly
should be called "The Boy in the Iron Mask." This is not a criticism of the
acting ability of Leonardo DiCaprio, who assays the dual role of King Louis
XIV and his twin brother, Phillippe.
 It is based more on DiCaprio's physical appearance. As he has proven in
such works as This Boy's Life, What's Eating Gilbert Grape  and Basketball
Diaries, DiCaprio is a powerful screen presence.
 Yet his boyish, almost effeminate, looks work against him in this costume
drama. While he matter-of-factly displays King Louis' arrogance and
cruelty, he seems to lack that inner strength, that regal bearing that sets
a king apart from his subjects.
  To his credit, DiCaprio creates two distinct personalities. His use of
his eyes to distinguish between the cold king and his more compassionate
twin is a fine piece of acting, but he is undercut by Wallace's script,
which has the young actor mouthing some rather hoary dialogue.
 Unfortunately, it is not only DiCaprio who suffers from Wallace's very
loose reworking of the Alexander Dumas classic. This sequel to The Three
Musketeers  has been filmed many times before, dating back to one of
Douglas Fairbanks' last swashbucklers in 1929.
 While Wallace has kept the basic plot outline - the aging Three Musketeers
plus D'Artagnan rescue the imprisoned twin of the young, cruel king of
France, the writer of the Academy Award-winning Braveheart has added
characters and subplots that probably would send Dumas spinning in his
grave.
 Wallace even has lifted a subplot from his earlier screenplay involving
forbidden love between a commoner and a person of royalty.
 Another of the film's problems is the conflicting acting styles between
the four brilliant actors playing the over-the-hill
"all-for-one-and-one-for-all" gang.
 Gerard Depardieu, the only real Frenchman among the group, plays his
Porthos much too broadly and comically, almost as if he studied Frank
Finley's interpretation from Richard Lester's The Three Musketeers and The
Four Musketeers from the mid-1970s.
  John Malkovich as Athos makes no attempt at an accent, speaking in his
flat Midwestern tongue, but with the intensity and mannerisms he would
bring to a contemporary work back at the Steppenwolf Theatre in Chicago.
 Jeremy Irons as Aramis, of course, speaks with that upper-class English
accent that immediately brings back memories of his vocal turn as Scar in
Disney's The Lion King.
 As D'Artagnan, Irish actor Gabriel Byrne seems content to merely sulk his
way through the proceedings, interpreting most of his lines in a pained,
whisper-like voice.
 The biggest problem is a lack of chemistry among the quartet. These are
men, legends, who have a lifelong camaraderie, but the audience needs to be
constantly reminded of their glorious past through bits of dialogue because
they are unable to create it through their performances.
 To be fair, this latest screen version of a Dumas work is more appealing
and better worked than the abominable Disney factory recreation of The
Three Musketeers of a few years ago in which Chris O'Donnell, Charlie Sheen
and Kiefer Sutherland were as believable as a group of high school students
performing their fall drama.
  DiCaprio fans won't be disappointed by The Man in the Iron Mask. Dressed
in his kingly robes, the young actor will melt the heart of many a young
teen, while there is enough swordplay and swashbuckling to keep their dates
interested.
  Overall, though, Wallace has taken too many liberties in trying to
modernize a timeless classic that did not need any improvement.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Nutty Professor II: The Klumps (2000)
 Nutty Professor II: The Klumps (2000) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Eddie
Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Eddie
Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Eddie Murphy, Janet Jackson and Larry Miller.
Screenplay by Barry W. Blaustein & David Sheffield and Paul Weitz &
Chris Weitz. Story by Steve Oedekerk, Blaustein & Sheffield. Directed by
Peter Segal. Rated PG-13
 "Nutty Professor II: The Klumps" is a prime example of why movie
sequels are usually scorned and derided.
 There is absolutely no reason for this movie except to fatten the
wallets of Universal Pictures and of the cast member -probably Eddie
Murphy - who has a percentage deal with the studio.
 The movie is like its hero, Sherman Klump, fat, ungainly and leaden.
 It is a cynical offering concocted by a goulash of writers who couldn't
move beyond tired flatulence jokes and making fun of old people having
sex.
 They even threw in a tired fantasy sequence lamely spoofing
"Armageddon" and "Star Wars." How pathetic.
 "Nutty Professor II" is basically an ego trip for Murphy who not only
portrays Professor Sherman Klump, but also assays the roles of Granny
Klump, Mama Klump, Papa Klump, Young Papa Klump, brother Ernie Klump,
Lance Perkins and Buddy Love.
 And I bet if given the opportunity, Murphy would have also played the
giant mutant hamster.
 The silly story revolves around a genetic youth formula invented by
Sherman, which is stolen by the re-animated Buddy Love who has been
genetically removed from Sherman's body then accidentally brought back
to life via a dog's DNA.
 Don't ask or try to understand because it doesn't make a lick of sense.
And neither does the film.
 It's merely one big excuse for Murphy to parade around in old-person
drag bouncing a fake pair of breasts, as if it were the height of humor.
 Even Jerry Lewis, who is listed as one of the picture's executive
producers, should be embarrassed to have his name in the credits.
 OK, Bloom, you're asking, a couple of weeks ago you raved about "Scary
Movie," in which the low-brow humor was heavy on sex, bodily fluids and
bodily functions. So, Mr. Critic, what's the difference between the two?
 Simple, "Scary Movie "- in its own disgusting way - was spoofing a
known genre while also laughing at itself. "Nutty Professor II" simply
mocks the audience, making you feel like a sucker for shelling out a few
bucks to waste your time with this tired turkey.
 "Nutty Professor II" spends so much time showing off Rick Baker's
excellent make-up effects that it forgot the jokes. You need more than a
versatile actor such as Murphy dressing up as various people to propel a
movie. You need to build a plot, create characters with substance and
situations that offer a payoff - whether comic or dramatic - to involve
the audience.
 "Nutty Professor II" does none of these. And it is too bad because I
always have liked Eddie Murphy, and I yearn for the old Murphy who was
so smart and sassy in "Trading Places," "48 HRS" and the original
"Beverly Hills Cop."
 Murphy showed great promise as a comic actor. Instead he became a movie
star.
 "Nutty Professor II" should do well for a week or two at the box
office. Then, like most sequels of its ilk, it will be forgotten,
eventually consigned to the bargain bins at various video stores and
discount houses where it belongs.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN.. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
The Astronaut's Wife (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Johnny Depp and
Charlize Theron
 The only purpose I can see for "The Astronaut's Wife" is using it as a
cure for insomnia.
 This dull excuse for a science fiction thriller is about as exciting as a
countdown, as enthralling as a systems check.
 The film holds your attention by putting you into a stupor. It lulls you
to sleep. You'll find more excitement in reading "Goodnight Moon."
 What's unfortunate is that "The Astronaut's Wife" offers a first-class
cast, headed by Johnny Depp as the astronaut and the beautiful Charlize
Theron as the wife.
 Depp affects one of those cool, laid-back Southern drawls that sounds like
an audition for "Gone With the Wind". This is not one of Depp's finest
hours on film.
 He is a first-rate actor, as proven by his work in "Edward Scissorhands",
"Cry Baby" and "Ed Wood." He has the ability to inhabit a character, of
making whoever he portrays a full-bodied individual, no matter how bizarre
or outrageous.
 In "The Astronaut's Wife," though, he is defeated by a script that
basically gives him nothing to do but try to look spooky while reassuring
the Mrs. that he's the same good ol' boy rocket jockey he was before his
last space mission.
 During that flight, Depp's Spencer Armacost and his partner, Alex Streck
(Nick Cassavetes), lost consciousness and were out of contact with Earth
for two minutes.
 It is what happened during those 120 seconds that is the crux of the story.
 If you have seen enough "Twilight Zone" or "Outer Limits" episodes, or
read enough science fiction, you can pretty well figure out the details.
 But writer-director Rand Ravich decides to stretch the obvious to the
intolerable.
 We know what happened, of course. Most of the characters sort of have an
idea of what took place, so why try to create a mystery and milk suspense
from a situation that is so blatantly apparent?
 Probably because Ravich had a premise but did not know what to do with it.
At least that's what it seems as Depp and Theron merely play cat-and-mouse
until the inevitable finale and expected plot twist.
 The premise of an extraterrestrial spouse was done with more chills and
excitement in the 1957 B-offering "I Married a Monster From Outer Space."
 That movie, despite its minuscule budget and cheesy special effects, packs
more wallop in five minutes than all of "The Astronaut's Wife."
 What is difficult to comprehend is how "The Astronaut's Wife" was
green-lighted because the script's shortcomings are so clear.
 Ravich expends all his time and energy trying to create an atmosphere of
suspense where none exists.
 "The Astronaut's Wife" is a major letdown, a snoozer, a movie that will
soon be consigned to the sales bins at your local video outlet.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Memento (2000)

 Memento (2000) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Guy Pearce, Carrie-Anne Moss,
Joe Pantoliano, Mark Boone Junior, Stephen Tobolowsky and Jorja Fox.
Screenplay by Christopher Nolan based on a short story by Jonathan
Nolan. Directed by Christopher Nolan. Rated. R.
 Memento is an experience for serious filmgoers, those who have the
stamina to focus on what is happening on the screen.
 Memento is a cinematic jigsaw puzzle; turn away for a moment and you
might miss a clue. This is a feature in which the audience is as much in
the dark as the protagonist.
 Leonard Shelby (Guy Pearce) is a former insurance investigator
suffering from short-term memory loss inflicted the night his wife was
raped and murdered. Leonard uses notes, tattoos and snapshots to hunt
down the man responsible for shattering his life.
 Yet how do you know whoís your friend and whoís your enemy when you
canít remember meeting them 10 minutes earlier?
 Director-screenwriter Christopher Nolan, who adapted the script from a
short story written by his brother, Jonathan, begins at the end and
works his way backwards. The film opens with a bang and the viewer then
traces what led Leonard to that moment.
 Leonard is like a walking ghost, explaining his condition to everyone
he meets, not realizing he has met these people before and already
filled them in on his mental state.
 This is a film in which you cannot really describe what transpires. You
simply go along for the ride, watching as Leonard tries to put together
the pieces of his life.
 Memento is a most original and arresting feature. It is
audience-involvement cinema, in which the viewer plays detective along
with Leonard. Your allegiances shift from scene to scene as more and
more of Leonardís past gets filled in. No one is whom they seem to be.
 As the movie progresses ó or is it regresses? ó you question your
perception of events as well as motivations.
Pearce gives a dynamic performance as a man constantly in a fog, relying
on snapshots, scraps of papers and clues tattooed to his body as he
attempts to reconstruct his life.
 Carrie-Anne Moss is cynical and weary as the bartender who becomes
involved in Leonardís quest.
 Also on hand is that wonderful character actor Joe Pantoliano (best
known as the turncoat in The Matrix, and currently seen as the fierce
Ralphie on HBOís The Sopranos). Pantolianoís Teddy is a wisecracking
individual whoís involvement with Leonard is suspect.
 Director Nolan does a masterful job of keeping the audience in his
vise. He grabs you from the outset and leads you through his mental
maze.
 Memento is a movie that has to be seen from the beginning. Miss one
scene and nothing else will make sense. It is a masterful piece of
filmmaking, one of the cleverest and inventive works to hit the screen
in a long time.
 If you like puzzles, then Memento will floor you. This is not for those
who indulge in mindless action. This is a thinking person's feature that
gives you much to ponder.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. Other
reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
 Analyze This (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Robert De Niro, Billy
Crystal and Lisa Kudrow. Directed by Harold Ramis.
 The key to comedy is pacing and timing.
 And the creators of "Analyze This" need to have their watches repaired.
 "Analyze This" is slow, uneven and only intermittently humorous.
 The movie is unoriginal, predictable and cliche-bound. Worse, you can see
the actors working at trying to be funny.
 Robert De Niro plays Paul Vitti, a powerful New York mobster who is having
a mental crisis. He's under a lot of stress. His best friend has just been
killed and he has to prepare for a big meeting of all the mob bosses from
across the country.
 Billy Crystal is Dr. Ben Sobel, a suburban shrink with a comfortable
practice, a smart-aleck son and an insecure fiancé.
 Fate takes a hand when Vitti's and Sobel's worlds collide - literally.
Before you can say "GoodFellas," Vitti is unburdening himself to Sobel,
much to the uptight doctor's dismay.
 Vitti cannot take "no" for an answer, even though Sobel continually tries
to discourage him from becoming a patient.
 The comic possibilities of such a plot are unfulfilled in "Analyze This."
It's flat and slow.
 Unlike the new HBO series, "The Sopranos," which is an expanded version of
the same premise - conflicted mobster unloads his psychic garbage on a
sympathetic shrink - "Analyze Thi"s cannot sustain or take advantage of the
possibilities of such a situation.
 De Niro and Crystal seem lost, as if they cannot get a firm grasp on their
characters. Crystal mostly frowns or looks scared, while De Niro does a lot
of cursing, finger pointing and crying.
 And lovely Lisa Kudrow is wasted in the thankless role of Crystal's
frustrated fiance.
 The only time the movie seems to come alive is when Sobel fills in as
Vitti's representative at the big meeting and begins transforming it into a
giant therapy session.
 Other than that, "Analyze This" just plods along, hoping that the
personality of its stars will carry the weight. Unfortunately, there is no
strong script to bolster them.
 "Analyze This" is a major disappointment, unworthy of the talents of its
two stars.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or a
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)

 Music of the Heart (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Meryl Streep,
Angela Bassett, Aidan Quinn and Gloria Estefan. Directed by Wes Craven
 A woman is deserted by her husband, left with two small boys to raise.
She has to find a job. Her only vocation is playing the violin. She has
taught some students, but has never held a full-time job.
 The woman, through a friend, learns of an inner-city, alternative school
and talks the principal into giving her a job.
 Over the years, the program grows until it is threatened by budget cuts.
The teacher, the principal, parents and various friends unite with the
students to put on a concert to save the music program.
 This sounds like a Lifetime made-for-TV movie. Or worse, one of those
do-gooder films, such as "Dangerous Minds," in which a white educator
ventures into the inner city to help better the lives of minority students.
 Well, as the adage goes, life imitates art. But with "Music of the Heart,"
we have art imitating life.
 The movie is based on the true story of Roberta Guaspari, who did initiate
a violin program in East Harlem. Guaspari, a Navy wife, was deserted by her
husband and left to raise two boys.
 After 10 years, budget cuts eliminated her program and the community did
rally to save it. A concert was staged at Carnegie Hall featuring many of
Guaspari's students as well as such violin greats as Isaac Stern and Itzhak
Perlman.
 "Music of the Heart" is a life-affirming, feel-good movie.
 It also is a paean to music - and its ability to serve as a catalyst to
build character, self-esteem and self-confidence.
 What sets "Music of the Heart" apart from other such films is Meryl
Streep's performance. At first, her Roberta is a shattered, scared woman
who only feels sorry for herself and her situation.
 But as she settles into her new position, her confidence and her
self-worth increase at the same time she instills these emotions into her
students.
 Admittedly, the movie is a bit cliched. Yet, life can be cliched. People
such as Roberta Guaspari who through sheer determination raise themselves
up do exist. We read about them everyday.
 Streep's eyes light up when she is teaching her students. She is a
taskmaster who bullies, cajoles and threatens her students, always pushing
them to do better, to raise their standards and continue testing themselves.
 "Music of the Heart" falters in its portrayal of Roberta's private life.
Her failed relationship with an old high school classmate, Brian (Aidan
Quinn), seems forced.
 Otherwise, the movie contains few missteps.
 Angela Bassett is fiery and strong as the school principal who fights for
Roberta's program. Also featured are Cloris Leachman as Roberta's mother,
Gloria Estefan as a fellow teacher who befriends Roberta and Jane Leeves as
a friend who helps organize Roberta's concert.
 The foundation of the film is Streep's interaction with the various
children who play her students. They sulk, complain, connive and only
grudgingly tolerate Roberta, until they begin to realize the gift she is
driving into them.
 The most incredible aspect of "Music of the Heart" is that it is directed
by Wes Craven. Yes, that Wes Craven, the horrormeister who has given us
"Nightmare on Elm Street," "Last House on the Left," "Scream" and "Scream
2."
 Craven demonstrates that he is not limited to horror films. His direction
is sure, his camera work straight-on. He lets his characters tell the
story, no fancy tricks.
 Even at a bit over two hours, "Music of the Heart" holds you. It is a
movie you will stand up and cheer, a film that offers a positive message
that may also inspire as well as entertain.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)

 The General's Daughter (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta,
Madeleine Stowe, James Woods, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton, Leslie
Stefanson and Clarence Williams III
 "The General's Daughter" is a slick thriller with crackling dialogue,
interesting characters and an intriguing mystery.
 It's an adult melodrama with crisp, give-and-take repartee between
protagonists.
 The "who" of the murder mystery isn't as interesting as the "why."
 "The General's Daughter" stars John Travolta as warrant officer Paul
Brenner, a top investigator for the Army's Criminal Investigation Division.
Brenner is called upon the solve the killing of Capt. Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), the daughter of base commander Gen. "Fighting Joe"
Campbell, who is due to retire within the week and possibly enter the
political arena.
 Brenner is under pressure to solve the killing within 36 hours or the case
will be turned over to the civilian authorities. Aiding him in his
investigation is another CID agent Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe) a former
flame.
 Together they uncover a slag heap of sexual deviation, buried secrets and
enough suspects to fill a platoon.
 The screenplay by Christopher Bertolini and the legendary William Goldman
("All the President's Men," "Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid," "Marathon
Man") is based on the best-selling novel by Nelson DeMille.
 The writing is abetted by Travolta's timing and superb delivery. His
Brenner is a juggernaut who, despite knowing the Army way of doing things,
plows straight ahead in his search for the truth.
 A scene in which Travolta's Brenner interrogates Col. Robert Moore
(scene-stealer James Woods) just bristles with tension as the two spar in a
verbal chess match.
 You get so engrossed in the dialogue and interplay between characters, yet
you never get lost as the plot twists and turns on its way to a nearly
satisfying solution.
 Without giving too much away, let's just say after all the huffing,
puffing and investigating, the final piece of the puzzle fits a bit too
easy and conveniently to tidy up all the loose ends.
 Nevertheless, "The General's Daughter" sparkles with wit. It is no
plodding murder mystery. Rather it jogs along at a steady pace allowing its
audience to keep up.
Fine performances abound. Stowe is smart, sassy and sexy as the CID
investigator who gives as good as she gets from the chauvenistic soldiers
with whom she must deal.
 Woods is wily and a bit vulnerable as the commanding officer of the murder
victim, while James Cromwell is cold, calculating and tough as the famous
general.
 Also along for the proceedings are Timothy Hutton as Col. Kent, the base's
Provost Marshall, and Clarence Williams III as a top aide to Gen. Campbell.
 Stefanson as Capt. Campbell exudes a sexuality that her uniform cannot
hide. Yet, in her small role, she also shows a kind-hearted spirit as well
as a vulnerability that makes her death even the more tragic.
 "The General's Daughter" is an well-packaged drama that, despite a couple
of obvious plot holes, won't disappoint.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Enemy at the Gates (2001)

 Enemy at the Gate (2001). 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jude Law,
Rachel Weisz, Joseph Fiennes, Ed Harris, Bob Hoskins, Ron Perlman and
Gabriel Marshall-Thomson. Written by Jean-Jacques Annaud and Alain
Godard. Directed by Annaud. Rated R..
 Enemy at the Gates opens with scenes of stark brutality that try to
match the ferocious realism of Steven Spielbergís Saving Private Ryan.
 In this scenario, a group of Soviet soldiers are being transported
across a river to take up arms in the defense of Stalingrad. Their boats
are attacked by Nazi aircraft. Ships are blown out of the water and
unarmed men, who are packed in like sardines, are machine gunned.
 Those who jump overboard to escape the carnage are shot down by their
own officers.
 Things get worse once the troops land. They are rushed into battle, but
only every other man gets a rifle. Facing overwhelming German odds, many
of those who survive the onslaught attempt to retreat and are ó again ó
mowed down by their own officers for cowardice.
 This is the setting for an often compelling, but sometime frivolous,
World War II drama based on the real-life exploits of Vassili Zaitsev, a
celebrated Russian sniper who emerged as one of the heroes of the siege
of Stalingrad.
 Enemy at the Gates, which was co-written by Alain Godard and
Jean-Jacques Annaud, who also directs, falls into the Hollywood trap of
foisting an unnecessary love triangle into a story that is compelling
enough to stand on its own.
 The main focus of this drama is the war-within-a-war fought by Vassilli
and a German sharpshooter, Major Konig (Ed Harris), sent from Berlin for
the express purpose of stopping him.
 Vassilli (Jude Law) is an unassuming rural lad who merely performs his
duty with extraordinary skill. But the Soviet propaganda machine óled by
Danilov (Joseph Fiennes) ó  use him as a rallying tool to boost morale.
The Soviet press publishes his daily kill count.
 Where Enemy at the Gates excels is portraying the cat-and-mouse duel
between Vassilli and Konig, as each tries to learn about the other and
anticipate each others moves.
 The rubble of Stalingrad serves as a broken chess board in which these
two marksmen play a deadly game of hide-and-seek.
 This would be enough to sustain this wartime drama, but for some reason
a love interest is added in Tania (Rachel Weisz), one of the many women
soldiers fighting to save her city. She falls in love with Vassilli,
Danilov falls in love with her and their various passions fracture the
close friendship that has grown between Vassilli and Danilov.
 Why this hokum is needed is beyond explanation. The story stands well
enough on its own. If anything, it degrades the heroics and sacrifices
displayed in the movie, merely using the war as a backdrop for a clichéd
situation that has been filmed thousands of times before.
 Yet the Vassilli-Konig scenario is so strong, it even overshadows this
banal subplot.
 As Vassilli, Law is quiet, self-effacing and modest. He does not
consider himself a hero, but a soldier doing his duty. This young
killing machine displays a boyish innocence.
 Fiennes is pragmatic, ambitious and self-serving as Danilov, who wants
not only to help save Stalingrad, but help promote the Soviet message of
communism.
 Harris is calculating as the German marksman. He shows a low-key warmth
and weariness that hides a deadly ruthlessness. He is a noble character
who admires his prey while continuing to hunt him.
 Weisz, unfortunately, is pretty, but bland, and adds nothing to the
proceedings.
 Worth noting is Bob Hoskins as Nikita Khrushchev, sent by Stalin to
oversee the cityís defense, and save it at any cost ó including
sacrificing every soldier under his command. Hoskinsí Khrushchev is a
raw combination of charm, maliciousness and savagery.
 Enemy at the Gates is an interesting experience. How true to history it
is, of course, is questionable. But it would have been much improved if
the filmmakers had shown the courage of Vassilli and jettisoned the
familiar subplot and concentrated on the hunter and the hunted.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Scary Movie (2000)

 Scary Movie (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jon Abrahams, Carmen
Electra, Shannon Elizabeth, Anna Faris, Kurt Fuller, Cheri Oteri, Marlon
Wayans, Shawn Wayans and Regina Hall. Written by Phil Beauman, Jason
Friedberg, Buddy Johnson, Aaron Seltzer, Marlon Wayans and Shawn Wayans.
Directed by Keenan Ivory Wayans. Rated R. Running time: about 88
minutes.
 "Scary Movie" sets new highs in low comedy.
 It is crude, vulgar and provides something to offend everyone - blacks,
women, teens, gays, lesbians, the mentally challenged, cops and
teachers.
 "Scary Movie" also is the funniest movie of the year, a shameless,
unapologetic, savage spoof of teen slasher flicks such as "Scream," "I
Know What You Did Last Summer," their sequels and various rip-offs, as
well as a satiric tip of the cap to "The Sixth Sense," "The Blair Witch
Project" and "The Matrix."
 Despite all its crassness, "Scary Movie" is a very smart and expertly
done burlesque, ranking with the likes of "Blazing Saddles," "Young
Frankenstein" and "Airplane."
 Director Keenan Ivory Wayans, with the help of six screenwriters, has
created a movie that not only lampoons the genre's well-worn formulas,
but does so by reproducing the cinematic techniques familiar from those
films: the closeup of the hand reaching for the locked door, the
character who suddenly jumps into frame, the telephone unexpectedly
ringing, and so on.
 Usually when you see six names in a writing credit, it means trouble;
the cliché about too many cooks is true, especially in screenwriting.
But "Scary Movie" is an exception. The movie has a cohesiveness and
single-minded focus that is maintained from opening reel to closing
credits - and beyond. (Viewer alert: Do not leave after the end credits,
there's more to see.)
 This is one movie in which you cannot discuss the jokes. Most are too
tasteless, involving various sexual organs, bodily functions and fluids,
appliances and garden tools. Ironically, the nudity is held to a
minimum, and it's mostly male.
 The cast consists basically of young, bland performers, the types you
usually find in such movies. The `Drew Barrymore cameo' role is played
by Carmen Electra as the flatulent Drew.
 Also in the cast are Marlon and Shawn Wayans, as well as "Saturday
Night Live" regular Cheri Oteri as Gail Hailstorm, doing a broad spoof
of Courtney Cox's "Scream" news reporter, Gail Weathers.
 Oteri also figures in a wild salute to "The Blair Witch Project" that
will leave you reaching for a hankie and laughing until you hurt.
 For a film buff such as myself, there is nothing as satisfying as a
top-notch sendup. And "Scary Movie" fits that description. I laughed
from beginning to end, not only at the jokes, but at the recognition of
the ambiance created by director Wayans.
 "Scary Movie" is hilarious. Filmgoers without a sense of humor or who
are easily offended might as well stay home. This is not for you.
 But for the rest of us who want to feel our bellies shake and we
guffaw, giggle and scream with delight, "Scary Movie" scores a
bulls-eye.
 It's a gem, a small treasure, a bit tarnished as well as ribald,
scatological and unrefined. And the first chance I get, I'm going to
rush out and see it again. You'll want to do the same, I guarantee it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Payback (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Mel Gibson.
 A bit of the sadist is needed to really appreciate Payback. Mel Gibson's
latest movie is filled with unlikable people, most of whom come to gruesome
ends.
 And when they are dispatched, you'll probably grin or laugh. Yea, Payback
is a movie for those people who get their entertainment from watching those
police or secret surveillance programs that Fox airs.
 Payback is for those of us who slow down and gape at an accident scene,
secretly hoping we catch a glimpse of a mangled body.
 In its own sick way, Payback has some cartoonish-like charm, and that is
mostly because of Gibson.
 Here he plays Porter, a bad guy, a professional robber who, with his
friend, Val (Gregg Henry), steals $130,000 from some Chinese Mafia types.
 Only Val double-crosses Porter, taking his wife and all the money and
leaving Porter for dead.
 Like most Gibson characters, Porter is like that Eveready bunny - he takes
a lickin' but keeps on tickin'. Porter recovers from his gunshot wounds and
goes after Val, but not for revenge. He only wants his cut of the loot -
$70,000.
 To get his money, Porter takes on the Outfit, a crime organization that
Val used the $130,000 to pay off as a sort of entrance fee.
 Porter, then, keeps climbing the Outfit's chain of command, leaving bodies
in his wake, as he tries to secure what he believes is rightfully his.
 Heck, you gotta admire the man's persistence.
 Payback is a bloody, ultraviolent feature with no likable characters. Even
the cops are corrupt, waiting for Porter to make his score so they can take
the money from him.
 But the script by Brian Helgeland (L.A. Confidential) and Terry Hayes,
based on the novel The Hunter by Richard Stark, keeps you riveted. There's
no let-up in the action as Porter moves from person to person like some
unyielding, unstoppable force of nature.
 And if the plot sounds familiar, it's because it was adapted for film in
the late 1960s' as Point Blank, starring Lee Marvin and directed by John
Boorman.
 Helgeland, making his directorial debut, seems to get some glee in sleaze
and S&M. Val, for instance, is savagely beaten by Pearl (Lucy Liu), a
dominatrix with a mean right and a taste for blood.
 Porter is tortured by having some of his toes slammed by a sledge hammer.
 Helgeland isn't so foolish as to show the toes actually being struck, but
you hear the sounds of bones crunching. And that's enough to make an
impact.
 As Porter, Gibson shows the dark side that's underneath some of his more
heroic characters such as his Lethal Weapon's Martin Riggs. Gibson goes
through the entire film with a scowl on his face as if he swallowed a stale
burrito.
 Henry makes his appearance felt as the conniving Val, while William Devane,
James Coburn and Kris Kristofferson are featured as the higher-ups of the
Outfit.
 Maria Bello, best known for her role on TV's E.R.. plays Porter's love
interest, the stereotyped hooker with a heart of gold.
 Payback is definitely not a date flick. It's mean, dirty, ultra-violent
and devilishly fun. But you may feel a twinge of guilt afterward.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)

 The Messenger: The Story of Joan of Ark (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring
Milla Jovovich, John Malkovich, Faye Dunaway and Dustin Hoffman. Directed
by Luc Besson.
 "The Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc" seems to run longer than the 100
Years War.
 At nearly two hours and 45 minutes, this intermitable misfire is
unfocused, idiotic and slow. Its biggest sin however is boredom.
 How anyone can make a dull movie about the life of Joan of Arc is beyond me.
 Yet director Luc Besson, who is guilty of co-authoring the screenplay with
Andrew Birkin, has transformed the very symbol of his native country from
one of inspiration to one of exasperation.
 As portrayed by the little-talented Milla Jovovich - who at the time
production commenced was married to Besson - Joan couldn't induce water to
boil let alone lead an army. Jovovich's Joan screams, shouts, rages and
bullies and tells continually tells everyone within earshot that she's not
making any decisions on her own, but merely passing on messages from God.
 Jovovich lacks any ethereal quality. She offers no hint of divine
inspiration.
 She's just an angry teen-ager with a big mouth who convinces people to
follow her because, she says, it's the will of God.
 This movie is a weak sister, one for which you will need the patience of a
saint to endure.
 And I despise period movies in which actors use modern idioms. When one
character said of Joan, "She's nuts," I just about walked out of the
theater.
 The battle scenes are fragmented, shot in that quick-cut style in which it
is difficult to tell who is doing what to whom. (A tip: The British troops
wear low, rounded helmets, the French helmets are more vertical and
pointed.)
 A superior supporting cast that includes John Malkovich as the sniveling
dauphin, Faye Dunaway as his conniving mother-in-law and Dustin Hoffman as
The Inquisitor, cannot breathe any life into this celluloid corpse.
 Timing is everything, and I sat through this movie two days after seeing
Carl Theodore Dreyer's 1928 restored classic, "The Passion of Joan of Arc."
Even with having to read translated subtitles, this movie emanated more
heart and soul in one 10-minute stretch than Besson's feature could muster
in all of its 160-plus minutes.
 If the historical Joan of Arc was anything like Jovovich's recreation than
it is a wonder the French are not speaking English and drinking tea today.
 The message of "The Messenger." Don't waste your time. After seeing this
movie, you may want to burn Besson at the stake.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Exit Wounds (2001)

Exit Wounds (2001) 1 star out of 4. Starring Steven Seagal, DMX, Isaiah
Washington, Jill Hennessy, Michael Jai White, Anthony Anderson, Bill
Duke and Bruce McGill. Screenplay by Ed Horowitz and Richard D'Ovidio.
Based on a novel by John Westermann. Directed by Andrzej Barttkowiak.
Rated R.
 If you have low or no expectations when going to see Exit Wounds, then
you wonít be disappointed.
 Keep in mind, it stars Steven Seagal, which means there is little
acting, but lots of explosions, vehicular mayhem, thousands of rounds of
ammunition spent and a body count that dwarfs the Civil War.
 In this outing, Seagal is Orin Boyd, a Detroit cop. And guess what?
Heís a loose cannon, a lone wolf, ěThe Lone Ranger.î Yep, heís the
clichéd cop who doesnít play by the rules.
 Exit Wounds is a confusing mess dealing with heroin and crooked cops.
Along the way, of course, the requisite amount of double crosses occur.
 But it is easy to tell whoís on which side of the law merely by
checking the cast list. Supporting Seagal are DMX, Isaiah Washington,
Jill Hennessy, Michael Jai White, Bill Duke and Bruce McGill.
 To show the caliber of this movie, Tom Arnold tags along as the comedy
relief.
 Nothing that happens in Exit Wounds is unexpected. It is as if
scriptwriters Ed Horowitz and Richard DíOvidio fed the story parameters
into a computer and it spit out a script.
 Overall, Exit Wounds is schlock, B-movie escapism. Go in expecting
nothing and you wonít be disappointed.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8mm (1999) 1 star out of 4. Starring Nicolas Cage and Joaquin Phoenix.
 You come out of some movies scratching your head, wondering what the
studio was thinking by green-lighting the project or what possessed an
actor to sign on with such a fiasco.
 This new thriller, starring Nicolas Cage, is overlong, slow, violent,
nasty and unredeeming.
 8mm sputters along, nearly running out of steam before it even gets started.
 Cage plays Tom Welles, a private investigator hired by the widow of a
recently deceased industrialist to discover the truth behind a snuff film
found among her late husband's effects.
 The investigation leads Welles, a devoted family man with a wife and baby
daughter, into the darkest, scummiest corners of the pornography
underground.
Once there, Welles must use all his will to overcome the obstacles thrown
in his path as well as keep from drifting away from what he holds most
dear.
 Cage, at least through the first three-quarters of 8mm, seems catatonic.
He is passive and languid, rarely showing any spark.
 It is only when the movie shifts mode from a mystery to a revenge
melodrama that Cage shows some life. But it is not enough to lift this
yawner out of its doldrums.
 Only Joaquin Phoenix as the streetwise Max, who introduces Welles to the
squalor and horror of the porno underground, shows any flashes of character
and humor. But, again, it is not enough to compensate for the film's
malaise.
 Director Joel Schumacher can't seem to do anything with the material. But
that is what one can expect from the individual who nearly destroyed the
Batman franchise. Working from a script by Andrew Kevin Walker, Schumacher
fails to bring any originality or verve to the proceedings.
 8mm chugs along like an overloaded freight trying to climb a steep grade.
 Unfortunately, we have to come along for the ride.
 8mm is a movie destined for a quick video transfer.
 Bob Bloom the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)

 For Love of the Game (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Kevin Costner
and Kelly Preston. Directed by Sam Raimi
 In baseball parlance, Kevin Costner already has hit a home run and a
triple with "Field of Dreams" and "Bull Durham."
 In his newest outing in uniform, "For Love of the Game," Costner has just
managed a scratch single.
 "For Love of the Game" is a soapish weeper filled with clichés. It is as
predictable as a hit-and-run situation.
 And yet it has moments that ring true despite its mawkish nature and a
lead character who, while not as blue-collar noble as a Crash Davis, is
flawed but likable and heroic.
 Billy Chapel (Costner) is a 40-year-old pitcher for the Detroit Tigers at
the twilight of a Hall-of-Fame career. He has pitched for the Tigers for 19
years, through good times and bad.
 Now, the team's owner is selling the franchise because he has become
disillusioned with the game. "I wanted to leave the team to my kids," he
ruefully tells Chapel, "but, hell, they don't even like baseball."
 He has sold the Tigers to a corporation, and one of the first moves of the
new owners is a plan to trade Chapel to the Giants. That is, unless Chapel
decides to call it quits and go out while he is still on top.
 As Chapel takes the mound for the next to last game of the season, he
looks back on his career and his life - and especially on his involvement
with Jane (Kelly Preston), a magazine writer-single mom whom he met when
her rental car broke down and he stopped to help her.
 As the game progresses, we see that Chapel is fulfilling that rarest of
baseball feats - the perfect game, retiring every batter he faces.
 Bone tired and with a sore shoulder, Chapel reflects on his life between
batters and between innings, recalling the good times and bad.
 The screenplay by Dana Stevens, adapted from a novel by Michael Shaara,
does not offer any surprises, twists or turns.
 Yet, to Costner's credit, his star power raises the film from mediocre to
acceptable. He knows how to wear the skin of the superstar athlete who
treats his celebrity status and the perks that come with it with a casual
acceptance, an air of matter-of-factness.
 During spring training in Florida, he has his own condo. When traveling
with the team on the road, he has his own suite.
 When he slices his hand, he asks Jane, who rushed him to the hospital, to
call the team's trainer because at the moment he is the most important
person in Billy's life, the only one who can help him through this crisis.
 Billy does not even realize how such words cut Jane. His life is focused
on the diamond.
 Preston does her best to breathe some backbone and life into Jane. She
does show her to be a strong, capable woman, so one wonders why she
continually pines for Billy.
 But "For Love of the Game" is really nothing more than a vanity piece, a
star vehicle for Costner.
 And somehow it works. Despite all the distractions - the overripe,
too-literary commentary by the legendary Vin Scully, Chapel's too
self-conscious interior monologues - "For Love of the Game" holds your
attention.
 Even such hoary lines as "This should have been the biggest night of my
life, but it wasn't because you weren't there," as spoken by Costner fail
to make you winch.
 "For Love of the Game" won't be remembered as the worst baseball movie
ever made - "The Babe Ruth Story" or "Major League 3: Back to the Minors"
can battle for that distinction.
 This movie is like a late-season game between two second-division teams
going nowhere - it's meaningless, but if you're a fan, you still can enjoy
the action on the field.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)

 Shaft (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Richard
Roundtree, Vanessa Williams, Jeffrey Wright, Christian Bale, Busta
Rhymes, Dan Hedaya and Toni Collette. Music by David Arnold and Isaac
Hayes. Story by John Singleton and Shane Salerno. Screenplay by Richard
Price and Singleton and Salerno. Directed by Singleton.
 The original "Shaft," when released in 1971, was big on attitude.
 The movie worked because nothing like it had been seen before - and
because of the charisma of Richard Roundtree, the then-epitome of cool
as private eye John Shaft.
 The film was helped along by a funky, driving score by Isaac Hayes as
well as his Oscar-winning Shaft theme song.
 Jump ahead nearly 30 years and we have Samuel L. Jackson as Shaft. The
movie still has loads of attitude. But today's audiences are more
sophisticated and demanding. Unfortunately this new "Shaft" offers very
little else.
 Jackson, like Roundtree before him, is a commanding presence. He is an
actor who can dominate the screen. He also is one of those actors who
can rise above weak material - most of the time - as he did earlier this
year in "Rules of Engagement."
 With young John Singleton directing, as well as having a hand in the
script, you'd think this "Shaft" would be a rousing action thriller, a
gritty homage to the original.
 Think again. Singleton's "Shaft" is flabby and disjointed.
 The plot is a muddled mess, motivation is preposterous and some of the
characters are ridiculous, almost insulting.
 Take Peoples, for example. He's the villainous drug dealer. As
portrayed by Jeffrey Wright, he speaks with an accent that sounds as if
he's doing a poor Desi Arnaz imitation. Any minute I expected to call
for Lucy and ask her to `esplain' what she's doing.
 He's not the only problem. The script by Singleton and Shane Salerno,
with help from Richard Price ("The Color of Money," "Clockers") is
unfocused.
 The movie just jumps from one scene to another without any cohesion or
thought. It's like Singleton just took what he filmed and glued it
together.
 Luckily Jackson is in most scenes. But he appears to have problems
getting a handle on his Shaft. He can't decide if he's a tough mother
... (hey, we're talkin' about Shaft), or if he prefers to be a bit
tongue-in-cheek.
 His persona seems to change from scene to scene, and he doesn't seem to
be getting any assistance from Singleton.
 Unlike Roundtree's Shaft who became a P.I. because he felt the system
was corrupt and discriminated against his people, Jackson's Shaft starts
out as a police detective, and leaves the force in disgust when he feels
the justice system has failed. He doesn't necessarily become a P.I., but
more like a lone-wolf vigilante, with most of his former police partners
helping him out.
 And while Roundtree appears in the film, he is wasted. His only scenes
involve him standing around and talking to his namesake nephew. He still
looks good, but it would have been nice to see the original Man in
action.
 The plot deals with finding a witness to a 2-year-old murder. The
killer, a spoiled rich young bigot, played by Christian Bale, seems a
lightweight case for Shaft to handle. And some of the killer's actions
make no sense whatsoever. How he and the thick-accented drug dealer come
to work together is just too silly to believe.
 Plus this is one of those movies in which the bad guys fire hundreds of
rounds from automatic weapons and miss everything, while Shaft makes
bulls-eyes with every shot.
 The bad guys are so inept, they are like the gang that couldn't shoot
straight. They are most unworthy adversaries.
 Smartly, Singleton retained Hayes' original score without any updating.
David Arnold did a fine job adapting the music and adding some touches
of his own.
 Overall, however, "Shaft" is a disappointment considering the talent in
front of and behind the camera. This is a movie that had potential. Too
bad it was wasted.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN . He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database
at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
The Whole Nine Yards (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Matthew Perry,
Bruce Willis, Michael Clarke Duncan, Rosanne Arquette, Natasha
Henstridge, Kevin Pollak and Amanda Peet.
 Despite containing graphic violence, strong language and nudity, "The
Whole Nine Yards" is a charming screwball comedy that - minus the
above-mentioned contemporary touches - could have been produced in the
1930s.
 The story, which is not as frenetic as it could be, contains several
double crosses, oddball characters and plot twists familiar to this
genre.
 The plot centers on Dr. Nicholas `Oz' Oseransky (Matthew Perry) who
learns that his new next door neighbor `Jimmy Jones' (Bruce Willis) is,
in reality, Jimmy `The Tulip' Tudeski, a notorious hitman recently
released from prison after serving a five-year stretch for ratting out
his former boss.
 Oz's shrewish wife, Sophie (Rosanna Arquette) wants him killed so she
can collect his insurance money to pay back money her father, Oz's
former partner, embezzled.
 Instead, she convinces Oz to collect a `finder's fee' by contacting the
Gogolack family who have sworn revenge against Jimmy for turning state's
evidence. 
 Of course, nothing works out as planned, as each character has a secret
agenda and connives against the other.
 Caught in the middle of all the scheming is poor Oz. Perry goes through
the entire film looking like a deer caught in the headlights. Perry
gives a physical, near-slapstick performance as he stumbles, falls,
spits and stutters through situations that are way over his head.
 This is the sort of role Bob Hope would have played in the 1930s or
40s, except that Perry lacks the false macho bravado that Hope's
cowardly character would bring to such a part.
 In contrast, Willis gives a rather underplayed performance as the cool
hitman unfazed by all conspiracies going on around him. Willis, with
tongue in cheek, realizes "The Whole Nine Yards" is a comedic romp and
rolls along with a twinkle in his eye, enjoying himself immensely.
 The film is stolen by Amanda Peet as Jill, Oz's office assistant whose
ambition in life is to be a hitman (hitwoman? hitperson?). She is as
excited to meet Jimmy as a teen-ager would be to meet Ricky Martin. She
keeps a scrapbook and knows all his hits, she brags.
 Also in the cast are Michael Clarke Duncan as a fellow hitman and pal
of Jimmy, Kevin Pollak as the revenge-seeking Gogolak and Natasha
Henstridge as Jimmy's wife and Oz's love interest.
 "The Whole Nine Yards" has a few slow spots. At about two hours, it's a
bit too long. Some tighter editing could have given it a more frantic
pace, which would have helped.
 Comedy, especially one in this vein, needs to gallop. The audience
should not be allowed to catch its breath, as the story races from setup
to setup.
 The other deficiency is Arquette's performance. Her French accent is
terrible and her character is too cartoonish, too over-the-top, even for
a comedy of this ilk.
 Despite these minor flaws, "The Whole Nine Yards" is most satisfying.
And no one will have to put a gun to your head to make you laugh.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
 The people who populate the movie 54 are shallow, self-absorbed and
self-indulgent. In other words, they perfectly mirror the era as well as
the movie this feature depicts.
 54 is the story of that well-publicized New York disco, Studio 54, the
in-place in the '70s where anybody who was anybody went to be ogled,
photographed and pampered.
 The difficulty with 54, which was written and directed by Mark
Christopher, is that his script takes no point of view. Christopher neither
condemns nor glorifies the legendary excesses that were Studio 54's
hallmark.
 He keeps an uninvolved distance, thus keeping us from forming any
emotional attachment with any of the protagonists.
 The movie's one main asset is the surprising performance by Mike Myers as
Steve Rubell, the famous owner of the nightspot. He is part rebel, part
dreamer, part shrewd entrepreneur. He's smart enough and childlike enough
to pander to the dreams and desires of his clientele, yet stupid enough to
brag on TV about hiding profits from the IRS.
 Myers, in his first straight character part, is in turn appealing and
appalling. At one moment he can try to pressure a male employee into a
sexual situation, then at the next moment apologize for his bad behavior
and offer the young man a handful of cash.
 The story is told by Shane O'Shea (Ryan Phillippe), a New Jersey lad who
dreams of crossing the river to the Big Apple. Shades of John Travolta's
Brooklyn-bound Tony in Saturday Night Fever.
 Eventually, Shane does come to New York, attracts Rubell's eye and is
admitted to the promised land. His looks get him a job as a busboy, and he
is later promoted to the prestigious position of bartender, where he mixes
with and makes drinks for the rich and famous.
 Shane's dream is to meet soap star Julie Black (Neve Campbell), a fellow
Garden Stater. But both characters are so sketchily drawn that even when
they do hook up, it's no big deal. The chemistry between Shane and Julie is
nonexistent.
 54 is a very cold, uninvolving movie. It's all strobe lights and glitz,
all substance. It's sort of like the musical era it covers.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Watcher, The (2000)
 The Watcher (2000) 1 star out of 4. Starring Keanu Reeves, James
Spader, Marisa Tomei, Ernie Hudson and Chris Ellis. Story by Darcy
Meyers and David Elliot. Screenplay by Elliot and Clay Ayers. Music by
Marco Beltrami. Directed by Joe Charbanic. Rated R.
 "The Watcher" is a cliche-ridden B-movie with the only discernible
distinction being the casting of Keanu Reeves as a serial killer.
 Of course, Reeves' psychopath performs just like every other Reeves
character - blank expression, monotone line delivery.
 "The Watcher" has that made-for-TV look with a lot of fancy camera
work, scenes jumping from negative to positive, many quick cuts and an
obnoxious, pulsating score.
 It's hard to imagine what lured Reeves to this underwhelming project -
unless it was the prospect of tarnishing his post-"Matrix" heroic image.
 The movie is totally preposterous in its premise of a serial killer
changing his locale just so he can hook up again with the FBI agent
(James Spader) who was chasing him in California.
 There is a homoerotic subtext to the relationship between Reeves' David
Allen Griffin and Spader's pill-popping, migraine-suffering Joel
Campbell.
 Think about it. If you were a serial killer, would you go from the
sunny climes of the West Coast to the cold Midwest of Chicago merely to
be near the law enforcement officer who knows more about you than anyone
else? That's the type of illogical premise that permeates "The Watcher."
 Spader looks terrible, hollow-eyed and sleep-deprived as Campbell. This
is how his character is supposed to appear, and it's a wonder how he can
be so perceptive  in such a state.
  "The Watcher" is only about 90 minutes long and even that is a
stretch. Director Joe Charbanic puffs it up with lots of padding -
overhead city shots, that time-compacting shot of speeding headlights
zooming by (you know the one) and one-frame jerky shots to turn a simple
cops-and-psycho movie into a pretentious work of art.
 "The Watcher" provides a subversive, guilty-pleasure thrill despite
being predictable and totally hokey. It's interesting watching Reeves.
At any minute you expect him to burst out laughing and say, `Hey, dude,
I'm not really a killer, I'm only screwin' with ya.' That may have made
"The Watcher" a bit more watchable, but I doubt it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found posted on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
 Love and Death on Long Island sounds like the title of a Woody Allen movie.
 Instead, it's a story of one man's journey to self-discovery through the
liberating powers of popular culture.
 Giles De'Ath is an uptight, isolated English writer ill at-ease with the
20th century and most of its advances, especially those electronic.
 For the first time in almost 20 years, Giles decides to see a movie, an
adaptation of an E.M. Forster novel, or so he thinks. He accidentally buys
a ticket for Hotpants College 2, a mindless American comedy. And it is the
experience of watching this film and its teen-age star, Ronnie Bostock,
that changes Giles' life.
 Giles becomes obsessed with Ronnie and begins, furtively, acting like a
hot-blooded teeny-bopper. He buys all the teen-age fan magazines and learns
everything there is to know about the young actor.
 He then takes the bizarre step of catching a trans-Atlantic flight to New
York to somehow connive to meet Ronnie, who lives in the small, secluded
town of Chesterton on Long Island.
 When the two do connect, it changes both their lives.
 As Giles, John Hurt has latched onto his best role in years. His Giles is
priggish, a bit snobbish and uncomfortable with contemporary society. He is
clueless about and suspicious of technology. Only after he sees Ronnie's
movie does he tentatively crawl into the modern age.
 Hurt's performance is a wake-up call to how fine an actor he is. Hurt has
not had such a meaty role since The Elephant Man. His characterization is
full of inspired touches. The scene in an electronics store where he
mistakes a microwave oven for a VCR is only topped by his incomprehension
after purchasing a videocasette player and realizing he also needs a
television to make it work.
 His encounter with a video store clerk also has a deft comic feel, as he
learns about rentals and pizza coupons.
 Jason Priestley is a bit dense, yet likable as Ronnie. He is flattered by
the attention of the famous writer from England, not comprehending
everything Giles is trying to communicate to him, but knowing enough to
listen.
 First-time director Richard Kwietniowski, whose screenplay is based on a
novel by Gilbert Adair, has blended comedy, obsession and a bit of pathos
to offer a winning movie.
 This is not a film for the frivolous filmgoer. The movie is slow, with
lots of talk and not much action. It's a character study, a look at a man
dealing with an identity crisis and coming to terms with it.
 If you can be patient, you will appreciate Love and Death on Long Island.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)

HEARTBREAKERS (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Sigourney Weaver,
Jennifer Love Hewitt, Gene Hackman, Jason Lee, Ray Liotta, Nora Dunn and
Anne Bancroft. Written by Robert Dunn and Paul Guay & Stephen Mazur.
Directed by David Mirkin. Rated PG-13.
 Heartbreakers is one of those movies that tries to be all things to all
people and in the process disappoints.
 On one level, Heartbreakers is a wonderful farce about a veteran con
woman who tries to seduce an older, rich man into marriage so she can
gain his fortune.
 On another level, it's a gooey love story about a
tough-as-nails-on-the-outside-but-tenderhearted-on-the-inside younger
con woman who falls in love with a regular guy causing conflicts about
her living the grifterís life.
 Heartbreakers stars Sigourney Weaver and Jennifer Love Hewitt as a
mother-daughter con team. Mom woos and weds them, daughter arranges a
seduction that mom can conveniently catch so she can collect a large
divorce settlement.
 Daughter wants to branch out on her own, but due to circumstances
beyond both womenís control they are forced to work together one last
time to try for the big score.
 They travel to Palm Beach in order to land a sucker.
 Mom sets her sights on William B. Tensy, a tobacco tycoon, played in
grand style by Gene Hackman.
 Hackman, as Tensy ó a cigarette constantly dangling from his lips ó
hacks, coughs and wheezes his way through his part. He seems to be
having a ball.
 And the scenes between him and Weaver, masquerading as a Russian
émigré, are the best in the film as she mangles her English and fakes
being charmed by this geriatric Lothario.
 Hewittís material is weaker as she vacillates between hard-bitten
bamboozler and love-smitten ingenue. Plus, Jack (Jason Lee), the guy she
falls in love with, is bland and rather dull.
 The possible reason for this schism is that three writers ó Robert
Dunn, Paul Guay and Stephen Mazur ó worked on this project.
Heartbreakers plays as if each ó Dunn working alone, and Guay and Mazur
teaming up ó concentrated on a specific character for director David
Mirkin who, afterward, merely melded the two disjointed scripts.
 Heartbreakers is a weak movie, one of wasted potential. It had the
makings of a great farce, but plays as if someone chickened out and
diluted the more biting story with an overdose of sweetness.
 As it stands, though, it is very enjoyable watching Weaver. As she has
shown in movies such as Working Girl and Galaxy Quest, she is very
comfortable at comedy. Her scenes with Hackman as well as with the other
men she ensnares ó most notably Ray Liotta ó come close to classic
screwball.
 Only in her scenes with Hewitt, when she tries to act motherly, does
the chemistry fail.
 Hewitt is lovely to watch, but her character is rather ill-defined. She
spends a lot of time complaining and whining, and it is difficult to
understand what Jack sees in this self-centered young woman.
 Hackman and Weaver are worth the price of admission. Unfortunately, you
have to sit through the rest of the movie to appreciate them.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Déjŕ Vu (1997)
 Deja Vu (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Victoria Foyt, Stephen
Dillane  and Vanessa Redgrave. Directed by Henry Jaglom.
 Deja Vu is like a drawn-out, talk-a-thon with an O'Henry-like twist at the
end that makes all that went before it seem worthwhile.
 The movie, directed by cult figure Henry Jaglom and written by Jaglom and
his wife, Victoria Foyt (who also stars), is a story about love and
destiny.
 Like many Jaglom films, it has the feel of the actors making up the story
as they go along. And, as in most Jaglom movies, there is mostly talk and
very little action.
 Deja Vu is a movie that requires the upmost patience. You watch for
minutes on end, trying to figure where the movie is going, when you get
sidetracked by another discussion by another group of characters. But as
you listen, you see how that talk ultimately weaves its way into the
tapestry of the film as a whole.
 Deja Vu is the story of Dana (Foyt), an American businesswoman on a
shopping trip in Jerusalem. There she meets a mysterious French woman who
shares with Dana a story of lost love revolving around an antique ruby pin.
The woman departs, leaving the pin with Dana.
 Dana, who is supposed to go to London to meet her fiancé and some friends,
changes her schedule and flies to Paris to try to track down the older
woman and return the pin.
 From there, her search leads her to Dover, where she meets and is drawn to
Sean (Stephen Dillane), a stranger who she feels she has already met.
 From Dover, Dana travels to the London townhouse of her friends where she
meets her fiancé and, coincidentally, Sean and his wife, who are visiting.
 Of course, everything works out for the best for everyone, and the mystery
of the pin is finally unearthed at the finale.
 Deja Vu is a bit pretentious and at times boring, sort of like real life.
But it's a movie that makes you concentrate. It's the words, not the
actions, that drive this fantasy-romance.
 The performances are adequate. The only exceptional turn comes from
Vanessa Redgrave, who plays a free-spirit also visiting the townhouse who
advises Dana to follow her heart and take chances.
 Deja Vu is a rather unconventional, adult movie. It is a leisurely feature
that gradually draws you into its convoluted maze, but once inside you
really don't want to escape until you discover the inevitable outcome.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
  Deep Rising is one of those unoriginal, insipid movies that,when you
watch it, inspires delusions that you, too, can write a movie.
  A tip: If you try, be assured someone will visit you and break your hands
before you are finished with the first act.
  Heck, a chimp could have written Deep Rising. The movie is more an
amalgram of cliches and sequences lifted from other films. (The hero even
gets to say, "I got a bad feeling about this.")
 The story revolves around a charter-boat captain, a team of modern-day
pirates, a luxury liner and some giant creepy crawlies that suck all the
liquid out of people and "excrete their skeletal remains," as one character
so aptly puts it.
 Treat Williams (remember when he was a serious actor) plays Finnigan, the
charter-boat skipper who will take any fare without any questions.
 Williams, and the rest of the cast, run through their paces, yelling their
lines, most of which consist of variations of, "We gotta get outta here."
 Kevin J. O'Connor as Williams' engineer plays a variation on Bill Paxton's
whiny Marine in Aliens, except he is more shrill and obnoxious - as well as
the comedy r
relief.
 The special effects look cheap. As movie technology improves, it is
getting easier and easier to separate bad computer effects from good, and
these are at the low end of the scale.
 And, to try to create suspense, that old dodge of showing the beasties in
shadows and quick-cut edits is employed. Another tiresome cliche.
 An overblown, over-orchestrated score by the usually dependable Jerry
Goldsmith adds to the 90-plus minutes of discomfort.
 Deep Rising  is a movie that should be in the bargain bins and video
stores - and probably will be within the next six months.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)

 The Corruptor (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Chow Yun-Fat and Mark
Wahlberg. Directed by James Foley.
 Sometimes it's an actors charisma that carries a picture.
 On the surface, James Foley's Chinatown crime drama is nothing more than a
bloody, ultra-violent "B" picture.
 The characters are stock: the wise veteran cop who knows his away around
the territory, the eager, young rookie trying to fit in and prove his
abilities, and the sly, calculating crime lord, with the affable
personality that conceals a rattlesnake.
 The pleasure of "The Corruptor" can be attributed to two factors: a
slightly better than average script, and the personality of its star, Chow
Yun-Fat.
 This Hong Kong action star is making his second American film - the first
was "The Replacement Killers" - after a stellar stint as John Woo's
favorite actor in a series of gritty, violent dramas such as "Hard-Boiled."
 Chow is smooth, charming and deadly as Detective Nick Chen, head of the
AGU (Asian Gang Unit). He has strong ties to the Chinatown community, and
is not above accepting a favor or two from some of its "businessmen"
leaders.
 Chen is not a dishonest cop. He knows where to draw the line. His biggest
concern is defusing a gang war that is costing many lives as well as
hurting tourism in Chinatown.
 Enter Detective Danny Wallace (Mark Wahlberg), an idealistic young recruit
who wants to help clean up the community, but instead gets sucked into the
dark underbelly and double-dealing of Chinatown.
 Robert Pucci's script offers enough twists and surprises to hold some
suspense. It is also rather dark and bloody.
 Explosions and car chases abound with innocent bystanders mowed down with
abandon.
 And Foley tends to make you air sick with his continual swirling aerial
shots of New York City. One or two would have sufficed, but it seems he
needs to remind us every few minutes of the story's locale and that New
York is a chaotic composite of good and evil.
 Otherwise, "The Corruptor" is an engrossing little movie. One reason is
the contribution of Ric Young as the seductive crime lord, whose glib
manner entices all those around him.
 Wahlberg is sincere as Wallace, but this is Chow's movie.
 It would be fun to see him and John Woo re-team or see Chow in a film with
a stronger script. His potential is limitless.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
 The film adaptation of Toni Morrison's Beloved is a haunting, poetic epic
that's part ghost story, part love story, part family drama.
 It's a powerful, eerie story that, quite frankly, those with a lack of or
little imagination will have difficulty following or understanding.
 Looming over this story is the abomination of slavery and the scars, both
physical and psychological, it has left on its victims.
 Set in rural Ohio in 1873, the movie tells of Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), her
daughter, Denver (Kimberly Elise), Sethe's lover, Paul D (Danny Glover),
and the strange, young woman (Thandie Newton) who enters their lives. She
calls herself Beloved.
 She is an otherworldly woman-child who appears on Sethe's doorstep covered
with insects and drooling like a baby.
 Sethe takes her into her home and into her heart for Sethe is haunted by a
dark and bloody secret - an infant daughter she killed to keep her and her
family from being returned to slavery.
 Is Beloved the spirit of that daughter? That is the mystery that intrigues
the audience.
 Beloved offers an opportunity for a strong ensemble of actresses to
demonstrate their talents. It is the richest interaction of women on screen
since the 1993 screen version of another best seller, Amy Tan's The Joy
Luck Club.
 First and foremost is Winfrey's Sethe. She is a fierce, yet enigmatic
individual, determined to make a life for herself and her family as free
individuals. The scars she carries, literally and figuratively, drive her
to try to protect her family from the ghosts of her past.
 Winfrey's superb performance should come as no surprise to those who
remember her remarkable film debut a decade ago in Steven Spielberg's film
version of Alice Walker's The Color Purple.
 Winfrey, who purchased the rights to Morrison's Pulitzer Prize-winning
novel about 10 years ago, has nurtured this project for a decade. She has
poured her heart and soul into Sethe, creating a woman of indomitable
fortitude.
 Newton has the showiest as well as the most difficult chore, bringing to
life the unearthly Beloved. At times Newton's performance comes very close
to an Exorcist-like parody, as she croaks, drools and hisses her way
through the script, flailing her arms and walking like a child who has just
mastered her first steps.
 She is demanding and dependent, childlike innocent and darkly demonic.
 Newton walks an acting tightrope with very few missteps. It is a brave and
daring performance.
 The high points of Beloved are those scenes featuring veteran performer
Beah Richards as Baby Suggs, Sethe's mother-in-law. She's a freed slave
turned preacher whose sermons are meant to lift the hearts and souls of a
newly freed people. Her sermon from atop a rock in which the men begin to
dance around her while the children laugh and the women wail is magical.
 Richards is an island of tenderness in a movie filled with some horrific
and brutal images.
 As Denver, Elise has the thankless task of allowing herself to be
overshadowed by the more flamboyant Newton. Yet as the film progresses,
Denver gains strength, resolve and backbone. She starts as someone needing
the protection of her mother and ends up an independent woman fighting to
save her mother's soul.
 Elise, with doe-like eyes and determined mouth, could pass as Winfrey's
daughter. This fine young actress probably delivers the most subtle and
strongest performance in the film.
 Glover brings humor and dignity to the role of Paul D. He's a good man
whose feet, as he says, have done a lot of walking since being freed. He
finds a home and works to make a life with Sethe, trying to help her
conquer the specters of her past.
 The bond that binds these two are Sweet Home, the ironic name of the
Kentucky plantation on which they were both slaves. The flashback scenes
showing the brutalization of the slaves are horrifying, yet somehow
disconcerting. Their tone seems more Mandingo and less Morrison.
Thankfully, Beloved only contains a few lurid flashbacks, not enough to
throw the film out of kilter.
 Director Jonathan Demme (Silence of the Lambs, Philadelphia) tells much of
his story in close-up, making Beloved an intimate experience between
character and audience, bringing the viewer into the lives of Sethe and her
family.
 Screenwriters Akosua Busia, Richard LeGravenese and Adam Brooks did a
masterful job of translating Morrison's sometime elliptical novel into
cinematic terms.
 Rachel Portman's uplifting score adds to the tenor of the film as does Tak
Fujimoto's brilliant cinematography.
 Beloved, at nearly three hours in length, is an outstanding film,
featuring Oscar-caliber performances from its leading players. It is a
literate endeavor, but one literal-minded people may not totally
appreciate. It is a film in which you must allow your imagination free
rein.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)

 Gone in 60 Seconds (2000) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Nicolas Cage,
Angelina Jolie, Giovanni Ribisi, Robert Duvall, Delroy Lindo, Will
Patton and Vinnie Jones. Screenplay by Scott Rosenberg. Directed by
Dominic Sena. Rated PG-13.
 I was not looking forward to Gone in 60 Seconds. I was expecting an
overblown multimillion stunt extravaganza featuring non-stop, repetitive
car chases, crashes and explosions.
 I turned out to be a bit off center. Gone in 60 Seconds is one of those
movies for which you buy a bucket of popcorn, put your brain in neutral,
sit back and enjoy the ride.
 The movie is a noisy bit of entertainment with a surprising touch of
characterization to boot. Itís nothing more than preposterous fun.
 Borrowing only the basics from the 1974 original that was a Southern
drive-in favorite of that era along with such titles as Eat My Dust and
Grand Theft Auto, Gone in 60 Seconds centers on a gang of car thieves
headed by Randall ěMemphisî Raines (Nicolas Cage).
 ěMemphisî had quit the business six years earlier and fled Los Angeles,
But he is forced to take up his old career after his brother, Kip
(Giovanni Ribisi), is jammed up by a big-time operator who threatens to
kill him unless his order of 50 exotic cars is met.
 ěMemphisî has four days to gather up his old crew, plan and execute the
thefts.
 Considering the title and its origins, there is not as much activity as
youíd expect in Gone in 60 Seconds.
 While the centerpiece of the original was a 40-minute chase, there are
relatively few action pieces in this remake. Most of the film deals with
the planning of the various heists, plus the interaction of the
characters.
 Which is not to say that Gone in 60 Seconds is all talk and no
movement. The car chase finale is an exciting sequence of stunt driving
by all involved. Smartly, the filmmakers build to this muscle-vehicle
finale.
 The glue of the film is its cast. Cage is likable as the reluctant
ěMemphis,î forced back into a life he was happy to abandon, while Ribisi
is the resentful, bitter younger brother who feels abandoned by his
legendary sibling.
 Others in the cast include Robert Duvall as an old-time carjacker; Will
Patton as a tough, but honorable former colleague of ěMemphisî; and a
dreadlocked Angelina Jolie as ěSway,î the former girlfriend and member
of the ěMemphisî crew.
 Also worth noticing is Vinnie Jones as Sphinx, the silent member of the
gang. He is compelling to watch without saying a word.
 Delroy Lindo is straight and stalwart as the police detective out to
nab the gang.
 The movieís score by Trevor Rabin at times is a bit too pounding and
overwrought.
 The too-good-to-believe finale is, of course, totally illogical, but,
by then you donít mind. After all, this is fantasy, not a documentary.
 Those expecting 100 minutes of high-speed driving, grinding metal and
fireballs may be a tad disappointed by Gone in 60 Seconds. It's not a
big-screen version of Foxís ěScariest Police Chasesî series.
 Gone in 60 Seconds is merely a good-time, fast-track feature. Merely
take it at face value ó and donít forget to buckle up.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Where the Heart Is (2000)

 Where the Heart Is (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Natalie Portman,
Ashley Judd, Stockard Channing, Sally Field, Joan Cusack and James
Frain. Written by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel from the novel by
Billie Lett. Directed by Matt Williams
 "Where the Heart Is" is a movie overflowing with heart.
 Based on the novel by Billie Letts, and popularized as one of Oprah's
Book Club selections, the story is the odyssey of Novalee Nation, from a
17-year-old girl pregnant and abandoned at a Wal-Mart in the middle of
nowhere Oklahoma, to a self-sufficient single mother who discovers her
self-worth and true love.
 Yes, I know, it sounds hokey, cliched. And to a small extent it is.
 But the warm-hearted screenplay by Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, who
have co-authored "Parenthood", "City Slickers," "A League of Their Own"
and "EdTV," among others, transcends the familiar.
The characters in "Where the Heart Is" are compassionate, loving and
caring. You root for them, you like them.
 Director Matt Williams makes an auspicious debut behind the camera. He
took what could have been an overly schmaltzy pot-boiler and gives it
respectability by not being condescending to his protagonists. He has
genuine affection for these characters and it is evidenced throughout.
 Call me a sentimental softy, but I enjoyed "Where the Heart Is." And
the reason is the cast.
 Natalie Portman, in her first real adult role, brings a childlike
understanding to Novalee. George Lucas' Queen Amidala grows from a
plucky, but frightened teen-ager to a wise young woman who overcomes her
self-doubts about her status on the social structure. She is a woman who
grows to realize that she has earned the right to accept love.
 A wonderful supporting cast of women surround Portman, most notably
Ashley Judd as Lexie who finely blends comedy and pathos as the single
mom of five who always is finding the wrong man.
 The always-grand Stockard Channing plays the loving Sister Husband who
takes in Novalee and treats her and her baby like family. Channing is
such a sharp actress that she can take what is a Shirley MacLaine-"Steel
Magnolias"-type of small-town eccentric and elevate the character into a
full-bodied individual filled with kindness and charity.
 In a smaller role Joan Cusack delivers some comic moments as a
Nashville music promoter, while Sally Field is flinty in a brief cameo
as Novalee's wandering mother.
 James Frain is touching and warm as Forney, who runs the town library
and falls in love with Novalee and her daughter. Frain, best known for
playing pianist Daniel Barenboim opposite Emily Watson in "Hilary and
Jackie," at first is a bit caustic and snobbish. But he softens and
becomes more sympathetic as the movie progresses.
 "Where the Heart Is" will delightfully surprise you. It's a film that
elicits smiles. And if you own shares of Wal-Mart stock, get ready to
earn some dividends. After Where the Heart Is, every woman is going to
want to deliver her baby in Aisle 4.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics Society, has his
reviews posted at http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Next Best Thing, The (2000)
The Next Best Thing (2000). 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Rupert
Everett, Madonna and Benjamin Bratt. Written by Thomas Ropelewski.
Directed by John Schlesinger.
 Cinematically, what is considered the traditional `nuclear' family -
mom, dad and kids - all living under one roof is as scarce as Pat
Buchanan at a gay rights rally.
 And lately, we've experienced a slew of movies in which non-traditional
families abound.
 Think "Object of My Affection," "Big Daddy," "Cruel Intentions," just
to name a few.
Add to that list "The Next Best Thing."
 "The Next Best Thing" should be an easy movie to like. It contains an
attractive cast, led by Rupert Everett, Madonna and Benjamin Bratt.
 Yet something about the movie is unsettling, almost condescending. 
 Despite its messy plot contrempts, the movie is too tidy, too orderly.
 The story is somewhat similar to "Object of My Affection." Abbie
(Madonna), an attractive, successful single woman is continually unlucky
in love (her latest flame dumped her because she is too complex - i.e.,
she's intelligent).
 Her best friend is Robert (Everett), a handsome, successful landscaper,
who also happens to be gay. Robert is the one Abbie goes crying to
whenever one of her romances dies.
 On the Fourth of July Abbie and Robert have too much to drink while
celebrating and wind up in bed. And before you can say diaper service,
Abbie is a mom.
 Abbie and Robert decide to live together  - but not marry - and raise
their son, Sam.
 This works for a few years until Abbie meets Ben Cooper (Bratt). The
two fall in love, decide to marry and Robert founds himself odd man out.
 No need to tell you the rest. Anyone with a fundamental knowledge of
how these movies work can figure it out.
 On the surface, "The Next Best Thing" is a glossy examination of the
complexities of today's modern family in which mom and dad are not
married, and the two may even have diverse sexual orientations.
 And while Robert presents a positive gay role model, he is too perfect,
too clean. He's the exemplary father, model house mate, consummate
friend. He's just too darn perfect. He's a heterosexual's fantasy of the
perfect, non-threatening gay man.
 I know nothing of screenwriter Thomas Ropelewski's sexual politics, but
his script, while not condescending toward gays, seems to take great
pains to present them as good people - make that extraordinary - loving,
doting, unselfish and giving.
 And while this may be true, flashing it across the screen in capital
letters calls to mind the line from "Hamlet," `the lady doth protest too
much.' It is as if he is overcompensating for making his protagonist
gay.
 That said, though, "The Next Best Thing" is a pretty movie. Everyone
has such pearly teeth.
 Everett gives a strong, solid performance as Robert. He is wise, witty
and wonderful, yet also vulnerable. He carries the movie and is the
center of attention when on-screen, even against Madonna.
 The actress-singer's Abbie is more problematic. She's sharp and
beautiful, yet seems lacking in confidence and self-assurance. It's
difficult to reconcile, making her character contradictory.
 Bratt is compassionate and tender as the new man in Abbie's life. He
only wants what is best for all concerned, including Robert, and refuses
to try to usurp Robert's place in Sam's life.
 Overall, "The Next Best Thing" is an engaging, but sanitized movie.
Putting a few smudges on the main protagonists wouldn't have hurt, and
neither would being a little less politically correct.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Thirteen Days (2000)

 Thirteen Days (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Kevin Costner,
Bruce Greenwood, Steven Culp, Dylan Baker, Michael Fairman, Kevin
Conway, Christopher Lawford and Len Cariou. Music by Trevor Jones.
Written by David Self. Directed by Roger Donaldson. Rated PG-13.
 The trick with doing movies about historical events is making them
interesting enough to hold the attention of an audience that ó going
into the feature ó already knows the outcome.
 With lesser known historical events ó such as in Glory ó or events from
the more distant past, more dramatic license can be taken.
 But with events that are fresher in peopleís memories, such as Ron
Howardís superb Apollo 13, the trick is to involve the audience in the
behind-the-scenes nuts-and-bolts that helped create or shape the event
as we know it.
 Such is the case with Thirteen Days, a nail-biting retelling of the
Cuban missile crisis. The movie delves into the machinations and policy
decisions that took us from the brink of World War III ó and probable
nuclear annihilation ó to a rational, peaceful resolution.
 What makes Thirteen Days so watchable is that it builds suspense, not
so much from the situation ó we know what is happening and going to
happen there ó but from the conflicts, arguments and clashes amongst the
men entrusted with and burdened by having to make decisions that could
lead ó literally ó to the end of the world.
 Of course, since this is a movie, dramatic license must be taken. And
that is the crux of another problem. For no distinction is made between
fact and fiction.
 When a group of generals leave a White House briefing and complain
about the Kennedys leading this nation to ruin, is that a report of a
factual conversation or a writer's invention to show the military's
disdain for President John F. Kennedy?
 Questions such as these are the movieís minor distraction.
 The story of Thirteen Days is told from the viewpoint of Kenny
OíDonnell (Kevin Costner), President Kennedyís main political adviser.
So, since he is played by Costner has OíDonnellís role in events been
exaggerated or is what is shown on screen the part he really played in
these harrowing events? We donít know because the film expects its
audiences to accept everything as factual.
 Perhaps, these are nitpicks. After all, the overall picture is correct.
The Soviets did bring offensive missiles into Cuba, the U.S. and
U.S.S.R. went eye-to-eye, they blinked and the missiles were withdrawn.
 The bigger picture matches what the history books say.
 Thirteen Days is an actor's showcase, especially for two reliable, but
not box-office name performers: Bruce Greenwood as President Kennedy and
Steven Culp as his brother, Attorney General Robert Kennedy.
Greenwood, best known as the star of the short-lived Fox series Nowhere
Man as well as for playing Ashley Juddís villainous husband in Double
Jeopardy, stands head and shoulders above any other actor who has
portrayed Kennedy. Here he plays a young president who is still
untested, who really has not gained the respect of those ó especially in
the military and intelligence communities ó who supposedly are under his
command.
 Greenwood shows the burden of decision making actually weighing down
Kennedy as he takes to his rocking chair to ruminate on what course to
follow and the consequences of whatever action he chooses.
 Culp is dynamic as the younger brother who pushes the presidentís
advisers to devise a solution that does not include military action or
escalation. He is the moral voice, keeping a leash on the military who
so eagerly want to invade Cuba to make up for the Bay of Pigs fiasco.
 Either or both are deserving of Academy Award recognition in the
supporting actor category.
 And then there is Costner. His Boston accent is atrocious and
amateurish. He almost stalls the entire production whenever he is on
screen and opens his mouth. It would have been better if he had just
taken his producerís credit and not stepped in front of the camera.
 David Selfís script is riveting, capturing the tension of not only the
men in power, but of a nation as a whole as it gears itself for the
unthinkable. He accomplishes this through images such as churches
holding around-the-clock confessionals and common people reading the
newspapers, their brows furrowed, worry creeping onto their faces and
fear into their eyes.
 Director Roger Donaldsonís does a very good job of staging scenes of
verbal confrontations; the best being the famous U.N. debate in which
U.S. Ambassador Adlai Stevenson (a wonderfully understated performance
by Michael Fairman) confronts the Soviet ambassador at a Security
Council meeting over the issue of missiles in Cuba.
 Donaldsonís one misstep was his decision to fade from color to black
and white during certain scenes involving either the Kennedys or one of
the brothers with OíDonnell. It seemed arbitrary and distracting.
 These minor faults, though, should not detract from the overall power
of Thirteen Days. It is a grim reminder of how close we came to
self-destruction, as well as a triumphant celebration of man's ability
to stare into the brink and have the courage, fortitude and intelligence
to avoid his folly and back away.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. More of Bloom's reviews can be found at
www.jconline.com at golafayette.
 Reviews by Bloom also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Datebase site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
 Roberto Benigni is a clown in the tradition of Chaplin and Keaton.
 This Italian film star, best known in the United States for the poorly
received Son of the Pink Panther, has done the near impossible by creating
a comic fable about the Holocaust.
 But Benigni's Life Is Beautiful (La Vita E Bella) is not so much a story
of the Holocaust as it uses that monstrous outrage against humanity as a
backdrop to tell a story of familial love, devotion and sacrifice.
 The movie starts out as a typical slapstick farce with Benigni's Guido
arriving in the small Tuscan town of Arezzo in 1938 to fulfill his dream of
owning a bookstore.
 Like many of the slapstick clowns who preceded him, most notably the
almost-forgotten  Harry Langdon,  Benigni's Guido has a childlike
innocence. He ignores the growing anti-Semitism of the Fascist government.
 Instead, Guido ardently falls in love and persues Dora, a local school
teacher who already is engaged to a local Fascist official.
 In Benigni's tightly wound script this is the same Fascist official with
whom Guido had an earlier unfortunate - yet slapstick - encounter.
 Fast forward about five years. Guido, Dora, and their 5-year-old son,
Giosue´ (Giorgio Cantarini)  are a happy family. Guido has finally
fulfilled his dream of opening a bookstore.
 But racial and anti-Semitic tensions are on the rise in Italy, and Guido
has determined to do his best to shield his son from these harsh realities.
 The task becomes even the more difficult when the family is deported to a
concentration camp. Here, Guido must use all his skill and imagination not
only to shield his son, but to keep him from being exterminated.
 It is at this juncture in Life Is Beautiful may tend to offend those whom
the Holocaust has touched. For the scenes in the concentration camp lack
the horror, the pain, the unimaginable suffering of a Schindler's List.
 True, many Italian Jews were not deported until the war was nearly over,
and most were not sent to the death camps, but to work camps where they
were used as slave labor.
 Unlike Steven Spielberg, Benigni is not out to tell the story of the
Holocaust. His story is about family and the lengths a parent will go to
protect a child.
 For Guido, to save his son, transforms the entire experience into an
elaborate game. Giosue´ must follow the rules without question to amass
1,000 points. The winner takes home a tank.
 Therefore, Guido tells him, he must remain hidden in the barracks. He
cannot make a sound nor allow the guards to see him.
 Guido explains this during a hilarious sequence when a German guard barks
the camp instructions to the newly arrived inmates. Guido, lying that he
understands German and can translate for his fellow prisoners, instead lays
down the rules for his son to allow him a chance to survive.
 Throughout their imprisonment, Guido's quick thinking continually keeps
his son from harm's way.
 Ultimately, the allies rescue the camp. In a poignant scene, Giosue´ comes
out of hiding just as an American tank rolls into the compound. The boy
goes wide-eyed with wonderment and delight, thinking he has won the game.
 The price for his victory is most high.
Benigni has succeeded in using the blackest moment in human history to
prove that even in hell, a ray of hope and salvation can penetrate the
darkness.
 Life Is Beautiful is a fantasy, a fable. It is not to be taken as a record
of the Holocaust. Those who object to it are missing its point.
 And that is simply where there is hope, where there is life and where
there is love, the spark of humanity will never be extinguished.
 Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Primary Colors (1998)

 Primary Colors (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta, Emma
Thompson, Kathy Bates, Billy Bob Thornton and Adrian Lester.
 Forget all you've read in the papers and news magazines, or what you've
heard on television.
 It's time to judge Primary Colors simply by what director Mike Nichols and
his outstanding cast have brought to the screen.
 What they have accomplished is both a celebration and an indictment of the
American political system.
 As anyone who hasn't been living under a rock for the past month or so
knows, Primary Colors, based on the book by Anonymous (former Newsweek
columnist Joe Klein), is the story of a Southern governor's quest for the
presidency.
 Any resemblance to Bill Clinton is purely coincidental (wink, wink).
 A witty and wicked blend of comedy and drama, Primary Colors is not so
much the story of a presidential campaign as it is a Faustian morality
tale, a battle for one man's soul.
 Ironically, the soul in question is not presidential hopeful Jack Stanton,
but that of his deputy campaign manager, Henry Burton.
 Burton, the idealist grandson of a famed civil rights leader, hesitantly
joins the Stanton team because he thinks the candidate offers hope and a
new vision.
 But as he slowly comes to realize, Stanton leaves his idealism at the door
in his drive to win. Henry's battle is whether it is worth forsaking his
values for what Stanton and his team consider the greater good - the future
of the country - or bolt, thus putting his personal vision ahead of his
pragmatism.
 As Henry, British actor Adrian Lester continually shows not only his
internal conflict, but the slow tide of disillusionment that creeps over
him as he gets deeper and deeper into the machinations of the Stanton
campaign.
 As Stanton, John Travolta does more than a Clinton imitation. He portrays
a man who hungers not only for the approval, but the love of the people -
all the people.
 Stanton, though mouthing platitudes about idealism, believes the ends - no
matter how amoral - justify the means, which is getting him elected so he
can create a kinder, gentler United States.
 Travolta, with his soft, raspy Southern drawl, is a good old boy who
leaves the dirty work to his underlings while focusing on his vision of
reshaping the nation.
 Travolta's Stanton shows a genuine interest in people. But he is not a
paragon of virtue. Scandal sticks to him like flies to a garbage truck. He
is a womanizer and a liar.
 Yet, he is charismatic. You like Stanton even though, like his real-life
counterpart, you find it difficult to respect him.
 The moral center of the movie is Kathy Bates as Libby, Stanton's campaign
trouble-shooter. Her job is to clean up whatever he steps in. At first
appearance, Bates' character is almost caricature and cartoonish, yet as
the movie progresses from comedy to drama, her Libby displays a dignity and
righteousness that rises above petty politics.
 Emma Thompson's Susan Stanton is the foundation on which the Stanton
campaign rests. Thompson's Susan is a woman who knows she has made a pact
with the devil and is resigned to see it through to the finale, because she
is certain - like everyone else in her husband's orbit - that his good
intentions outweigh his peccadilloes and other human frailties.
 Thompson's body language tells all: her humiliation, anger, hurt and
steely determination to see her husband succeed.
 A sharp, pungent script by Elaine May is satiric, vicious, tragic and,
surprisingly, compassionate. Her ear for dialogue is unerring, and she
refuses to simply pigeonhole characters as good or bad.
 For example, Larry Hagman's former governor who enters the race to pose a
late threat to Stanton could have been portrayed as a Ross Perot-type of
buffoon. But Hagman, through Nichols' direction and May's script, brings a
quiet dignity to his character that most other protagonists lack.
 Primary Colors is an engrossing movie, the best so far that deals with
American politics. It champions the process while at the same time
deflating it.
 Despite denials from Nichols, Travolta and others that the movie is about
Clinton, current events surrounding the president do add an undeniable
undercurrent to the movie.
 And for those conspiracy theorists who think the president cut a deal with
Travolta or Nichols to soften the film's portrayal of Stanton, you'll have
better luck finding the gunman from the grassy knoll. If anything, Primary
Colors will make you look harder at the president, and to see what
sacrifices and compromises a person must make within himself to attain his
goals.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for East Is East (1999)
 East Is East (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Om Puri, Linda Bassett,
Ian Aspinall, Jimi Mistry, Raji James, Emil Marwa, Chris Basson, Archie
Panjabi and Jordan Routledge. Directed by Damien O'Donnell. Written by
Ayub Khan Din. Music by Deborah Mollison. Rated R.
 With a title borrowed from a line in a Rudyard Kipling poem, you are
aware beforehand that "East Is East" is going to be a story about a
clash of cultures.
 And so it is. This 1999 British release is a mixture of comedy and
drama, set in the 1970s. The story revolves around the mixed-race Khan
family.
 As the story opens, George Khan's eldest son, Nazir, has disgraced by
father by fleeing from his arranged marriage.
 Undeterred, George continues to plow ahead and try to control the lives
of his six remaining children.
 George, who came to England from Pakistan and married an English woman,
tries to run his family as if he were back in the old country.
But that type of patriarchal domination doesn't work in swingin'
England, and his children continually rebel as their lifestyle of discos
and bellbottoms clash with their father's idea of studying the Koran and
wearing traditional Pakistani garb.
"East is East" is an interesting movie. As portrayed by Om Puri, George
Khan is a character with whom you can empathize and scorn
simultaneously.
 He is a bully, always yelling and cursing at his kids, demanding they
follow his precepts simply because he is the father and his word is law.
But he also is a lovable figure, only wanting the best for his
offspring.
 He cannot understand them wanting to make life decisions on their own.
His attempts to turn his home and family into a little piece of Pakistan
are continually thwarted by his free-spirited offspring.
 "East Is East," despite its cultural baggage, actually is very
universal in theme. Parents, especially those with teen-agers, will be
able to identify with George, while young viewers will certainly see
parts of themselves in the Khan clan, while recognizing traits of their
parents in George.
 For those filmgoers who say they want more diversity in their movie
selections, "East Is East" fits the bill. At about 96 minutes, it is
charming in its own rugged way, a film you can appreciate as well as
enjoy.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloo'm's reviews are posted on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for What Women Want (2000)
 What Women Want (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Mel Gibson, Helen
Hunt, Marisa Tomei, Mark Feuerstein, Lauren Holly, Ashley Johnson, Delta
Burke, Valerie Perrine and Alan Alda. Screenplay by Josh Goldsmith and
Cathy Yuspa. Story by Diane Drake. Music by Alan Silvestri. Directed by
Nancy Meyers. Rated PG-13.
 What Women Want is a retro romantic-comedy in which Mel Gibson acquires
the ability to hear womenís thoughts, thus knowing what women want.
 This is a film that, if made during the 1940s or ë50s would have
starred Cary Grant or in the 1960s would have been a vehicle for Rock
Hudson.
 Gibson stars as Nick Marshall, a hot-shot advertising director, who
during the filmís opening is described as a ěmanís man.î He refers to
women as broads and chicks, and calls them ěbabe.î
 Born and raised in Las Vegas by his showgirl mother, Nick is charming
and irrepressible as well as a chauvinist. He loves listening to Frank
Sinatra, ogling women and flirting outrageously.
 But all that begins to change after two life-changing events:
 First, Nick loses out on a promotion to creative director at his ad
agency to Darcy Maguire (Helen Hunt). Secondly, he receives a major
electrical shock that gives him the ability to hear womenís inner-most
thoughts.
 What Women Want is an enchanting outing, that displays Gibson at his
rakish best. As Nick, he is attractive, seductive and irresistible.
 One memorable sequence features Gibsonís Nick dancing around his
apartment while Sinatraís "Wonít Dance (You Canít Make Me) plays on his
stereo.
 Nick decides to use his new-found ability to undermine Darcy so he can
get the job he believes he deserves. (His boss ó played by Alan Alda ó
told him he did not get the job because he knew nothing about what women
want.)
 The movie has an old-fashioned feel to it. The Gibson-Hunt relationship
is reminiscent of the Spencer Tracy-Katherine Hepburn movies of the ë40s
and ë50s.
 Of course, it doesnít take a genius to figure out the path What Women
Want follows.
 Nick, eavesdropping on the thoughts of thousands of women, not only
learns what women want, but discovers how many actually feel about him.
He discovers he is not the smooth operator he believes he is.
 In a sense Gibsonís Nick trods the same path as Dustin Hoffmanís
Michael in Tootsie. Both learn to be better men by tapping into the
feminine world: Nick by listening to their thoughts, Michael by
masquerading as a woman to land a soap opera role.
 Gibson is suave as well as funny as Nick. His big baby blues light up
when he realizes the power his newfound ability gives him.
 Hunt is beautiful and effervescent as Darcy, who covers up her own
misgivings and doubts about her ability to handle her new job with
bravado. She is a no-nonsense type of woman, yet she also is warm and
vulnerable. Plus Hunt looks dazzling.
 The scenes between Gibson and Hunt seem natural and unforced. They do
create a screen chemistry.
 Unfortunately, What Women Want is about 20 minutes too long. The movie
sort of dies toward the finale. It appears as if screenwriters Josh
Goldsmith and Cathy Yuspa, working from a story by Diane Drake, could
not devise a satisfactory ending. The movie slowly winds down like an
old watch. The film doesnít really end, it seems to just stop.
 And a subplot involving a young office worker at the agency who may be
suicidal seems unnecessary.
 What Women Want will be a great date movie. Women, especially, will
relish it, and many men may walk out of the theater with bruised ribs
from being poked by their better halves.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. For more
reviews by Bloom visit www.jconline.com and click on golafayette.
 More reviews by Bob Bloom can be found at the Internet Movie Database
Web site at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Training Day (2001)
TRAINING  DAY (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Denzel Washington, Ethan Hawke,
Scott Glen, Cliff Curtis, Dr. Dre, Snoop Dog, Macy Gray and Tom Berenger.
Written by David Ayer. Directed by Antoine Fuqua. Rated R. 
 It's usually exciting to see an actor with a good-guy reputation putting on the
black hat and trying to portray the villain. 
 That is the main reason I was interested in Training Day, in which Denzel
Washington shucks his Boy Scout image to play Alonzo Harris, a veteran narcotics
officer, a rogue cop who crosses the line until there is not much difference
between himself and those he has sworn to put away. 
 But Washington's larger-than-life image is so burned into our psyches, that it
hard to accept him as a corrupt narc. The question arises, "Who's problem is
that  the audience's or the actor's? 
 In this case, it's a little of both. Washington cannot totally commit to the
dark side. His Harris is a deadly, charismatic, unpredictable charmer, always
ready with a laugh or a smile. He also can strike with the suddenness of a
rattler. 
 Good actor that he is, Washington tries to present a complex persona, not
allowing his Harris to plunge totally to the depths. His Harris, though
dangerous and deadly, is too flamboyant. Washington has not been able - or not
allowed himself - to totally immerse himself into his character's rank nature.
 Training Day is a violent outing about the first day on the job for a new
narcotics officer, Jake Hoyt (Ethan Hawke). One of the movie's biggest problems
is that Hawke is a cipher. He is too wooden, too overwhelmed by Washington's
personality to find a voice as strong as that of his partner's. 
 Hawke spends most of the movie in Washington's shadow. His character lacks
vigor and verve. His Hoyt is emotionally light and his physical presence is too
slight to be considered an on-screen equal. He is too unworldly, too naive to be
a counterpoint to Washington's illicit dynamo. 
 The story, though, is interesting to follow, as hints to the main plot are
dropped here and there and in rather oblique ways. 
 The film begins unraveling during a scene featuring one of the most lame
coincidences ever put on screen. This sequence  which started out so promising 
drags the rest of the film down with it. 
 Still, the movie is a star turn for Washington. As Harris, he swaggers, struts
and parades around like a one-man band. He is a conniving con artist, ostensibly
trying to teach a rookie officer the way of the street, while continuing to plot
his secret agenda. 
 Nothing rings true here. The film has the feel of playing-acting cops, not
life-on-the-street police. Plus, it features one of those down-and-dirty fights
that would land lesser mortals such as us in the hospital for a month or two,
but from which both antagonists merely stumble away with the usual phony film
limp. 
 Training Day is a glorified lesser feature that does nothing for the careers of
either of its stars. Motivation is questionable, the script needed some more
polish and some of the action is cartoonish. 
 It may satisfy Washington's legions of fans, but that is as far as it goes. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at 
bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can
be found by going to 
www.jconline.com and clicking on golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database: 
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
 Happy Texas (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Jeremy Northam, Steve Zahn,
William H. Macy, Ally Walker and Illeana Douglas.
 "Happy Texas" is just that, a happy little, unpretentious comedy.
 The movie's impetus is that old chestnut about the escaped cons who are
mistaken for other people. It's a twist that dates as far back as Charlie
Chaplin's "The Adventurer."
 In this case, Harry (Jeremy Northam) and Wayne (Steve Zahn) are believed
to be two beauty pageant producers hired by the town of Happy, Texas, to
help qualify the town's girls for the Little Miss Squeezed Pageant.
 Oh, and the townspeople also think the pageant pros are gay. So, Harry and
Wayne go along in order to remain undetected by the law as well as to scope
out the local bank, which is ripe for pickin'.
 Along the way both men get involved with local women - Harry with Jo (Ally
Walker), the owner of the bank, and Wayne with Miss Schaefer (Illeana
Douglas), a schoolteacher.
 "Happy Texas "is one of those farces built upon mistaken identities. It's
a fun movie, filled with enjoyable, warm characters.
 And it has the added pleasure of William H. Macy as Chappy, Happy's
sheriff, whose low-key wooing of Harry is touching as well as comedic.
 Macy transforms a one-note character into a person with depth. When he
hurts, you feel his pain.
 Northam is the straight man (no pun intended), spending most of his time
wooing Jo and learning the intricacies of the bank. He's the brains of the
outfit.
 Zahn (best remembered as the girl-crazy member of The Wonders in Tom
Hanks' "That Thing You Do") is broader as the easily-frustrated Wayne. He
hates the idea of posing as a gay man since it is against his macho nature.
 Zahn is quite funny without being disrespectful.
And Douglas is a delight as the man-hungry Miss Schaefer who believes her
allure can help Zahn's Wayne switch his gender preference.
 Ultimately, the two cons become heroes and everything works out for the best.
After all, this is a comedy.
 "Happy Texas" written by Ed Stone, Phil Reeves and Mark Illsley, and
directed by Illsley, is an undemanding, good-time movie. The laughs are
consistent, and nearly continuous.
 But it also is a movie with heart, a delightful combination.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.com

Title
Review for Trekkies (1997)

 Trekkies (1999) 4 stars out of 4. A documentary directed by Roger Nygard.
 If you know the name of the bit actor who played the red-shirted security
officer zapped within the first minute of episode eight of the second
season, or if you can speak Klingon, than "Trekkies" is your kind of movie.
 "Trekkies," directed by Roger Nygard, is a documentary about one of the
largest fan phenomenons in pop culture.
 And the truly amazing aspect of Nygard's look at some of these eccentric
people is that he treats them with respect.
 How easy it would have been to make a documentary mocking the obsession of
these fanatics. Instead, Nygard displays an affection for them. His
approach is non-judgmental.
 The movie has no narration; these people speak for themselves.
 Our guide through this strange world is Denise Crosby, who serves as the
film's co-executive producer, and who played Lt. Tasha Yar on "Star Trek:
The Next Generation" before deciding to leave the show.
 Crosby takes us into the conventions, the homes and workplaces of people
and families to whom "Star Trek" is more than a television series.
 In "Trekkies" we meet such people as Barbara Adams of Little Rock, Ark.
Adams had been chosen for jury duty in the Whitewater trial and wore her
Starfleet uniform every day.
 Some people may consider such behavior odd, but, as Adams sincerely
explains, as Lt. Cmdr. Barbara Adams she never leaves home without her rank
pips, tricorder, phaser and communicator badge.
 Adams has embraced the philosophy of "Star Trek" and lives her life
accordingly. We see her at various "Star Trek" conventions signing
autographs. Because of the publicity affored her by wearing her uniform to
the trial, she has become a minor celebrity in her own right, admired by
others for her convictions.
 Then there is Dr. Denis Bourguignon, an Orlando, Fla., dentist whose
office has a "Star Trek" theme. He and his entire staff wear "Star Trek"
uniforms, and his office is a treasure trove of "Trek" memorabilia.
 "Trekkies" may elicit some rather odd reactions. At first you may feel
embarrassed for some of these people. You laugh or chuckle, maybe even
mentally ridicule them. You think to yourself that you wouldn't want to be
caught dead in the same room with them.
 But as you watch and listen, a feeling of understanding and respect and
possibly even a bit of admiration creeps into your psyche. They may be
different, but they are principaled and decent human beings.
 They are devoted individuals who have found a purpose in "Star Trek."
 And that is this documentary's greatest asset. Cast members from the
various "Star Trek" series and films are included and they speak with awe
and great affection of their fans.
 Even William Shatner, who mocked them years ago in a famous "Saturday
Night Live' sketch in which he told the Trekkies to "get a life," speaks of
his regard for these individuals.
 "Trekkies" is a warm, enjoyable experience, as cuddly as a tribble and as
refreshing as a cup of tea - Earl Grey.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Bulworth (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Warren Beatty and Halle Berry.
Directed by Beatty
 Jay Billington Bulworth, incumbent Democratic senator from California, is
slowly losing his mind. Sitting in his Washington office late one night, he
continually watches a loop of a campaign ad in which he is spouting some
drivel about entering "the new millennium."
 He watches the tape over and over, not saying a word.
 Later, he meets with a powerful lobbyist for the insurance industry who,
in exchange for Bulworth's word to kill some anti-insurance legislation in
committee, gives the senator a life insurance policy worth $10 million,
naming Bulworth's daughter the beneficiary.
 Bulworth next meets with a shady character who arranges "research
projects." The senator's requests that the subject of an upcoming weekend
project in California be himself.
 Thus, the senator and his advisers set off for California for the final
weekend of his 1996 primary campaign.
 This is the beginning of Bulworth, Warren Beatty's newest film.
 The actor-writer-director-producer has long been a political activist, a
Democratic Party favorite. But in Bulworth, the actor takes no prisoners.
No one is spared, not Democrats, Republicans, the media nor even Beatty's
own glamorous image.
 In California, feeling liberated because of the arrangement he made,
Bulworth speaks to a group of inner-city black constituents at a church. He
tells them the truth: they are poor, so they have no power base.
Politicians just tell them what they want to hear, make them empty
promises, then go about their business of shilling for lobbyists who give
them millions for their campaigns.
 His advisers, of course, are aghast. Is this a new political strategy,
they wonder? But instead of confiding in them, Bulworth merely reassures
them that he has everything under control. Meanwhile, he hooks up with a
trio of young black women who take him to an all-night club where he learns
the joys and intricacies of rapping.
 His next stop is a fund-raiser hosted by movie industry moguls. Bulworth
manages not only to insult the big shots by belittling their product, but
his Jewish contributors as well.
 While all this is going on, Bulworth also has a sudden change of heart and
tries to cancel the contract for the "weekend research project."
 Bulworth is Beatty's most audacious and subversive movie. It is an attack
on the hyprocisy and shallowness of our political system. It is more
strident than Wag the Dog and more critical of the political process than
Primary Colors.
 Yet Bulworth also has a condescending and patronizing aroma, an air of
'60s liberalism in which it was chic to invite a Black Panther to your New
York penthouse or Beverly Hills mansion for a cocktail fund-raiser to
demonstrate your support for the cause as well as ease your conscience.
 There is no question about Beatty's sincerity. He has been a political
activist for many years, and is one of the few actors who is willing to use
his films as a soapbox for his beliefs. His outrage at what has become of
our political system literally screams from the screen.
 His approach in Bulworth, though, seems at times naive. After hearing
Bulworth's profane tirade about race during a televised interview, a local
drug kingpin decides to become a community activist. That is too
unbelievable and Capraesque.
 No doubt after viewing the film, some blacks may accuse Beatty of
perpetrating the very racial stereotypes he is trying so hard to disparage.
His depiction of a gangsta' lifestyle looks like sequences cribbed from
various rap videos.
 A saving grace is Beatty's total lack of vanity. He is one actor not
afraid to allow himself to look foolish, whether it be walking around
through most of the first part of the film with a big cocktail sauce stain
on his shirt, or dressed in hip-hop garb, complete with sunglasses, in the
film's second half.
 The growing relationship between the older senator and a 26-year-old black
woman, a smart, swaggering, but vulnerable performance by the lovely Halle
Berry, touches more on Hollywood tradition than real life.
 A deft comic performance is given by Oliver Platt as Murphy, the senator's
top aide who grows more and more frustrated and confused as he watches what
he believes to be his boss's self-destruction. Platt has a wonderful sense
of timing, knowing what scenes to downplay and when to overact.
 Bulworth's ending is a bit of a cop-out, yet it is the only avenue Beatty,
who co-authored the script with Jeremy Pikser, can traverse for its
demented, but enlightened, hero.
 Bulworth may offend or shock some people. Others will find it highly
amusing. Like politics, it is a movie that will be hotly debated.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
 Snake Eyes is like an Atlantic City casino: a complex, gaudy array of neon
and designs that mask the trappings for one very simple recreation -
gambling.
 Brian DePalma's newest thriller is a structurally complex, gaudy movie
that overlays a flimsy and simplistic murder mystery.
 As a filmmaker, DePalma has always been more technician than storyteller.
To him the placement of the camera is more interesting than the placement
of his actors.
 Rick Santoro is an Atlantic City homicide detective. He's not above
shaking down a drug dealer, accepting a bribe or cheating on his wife. He's
not who you would consider cop of the year material.
 Rick has front-row seats at a heavyweight championship fight courtesy of
his oldest and best friend, Navy Commander Kevin Dunne, who is heading the
security team guarding the Secretary of Defense, a guest at the fight.
 During the bout, the secretary is gunned down. Santoro, to help his buddy,
takes charge of what appears to be an open-and-shut political
assassination.
 Soon, Santoro is over his head, involved in a murky conspiracy involving
defense contractors and weapons systems.
 The entire affair really doesn't make much sense. It seems a lot of people
went to a lot of trouble and a lot of expense to pull off a simple
assassination. And why do it in a sports arena filled with 14,000
spectators? Aren't there any lonely back roads in the Washington, D.C.,
area?
 DePalma's fancy camera work obscures the film's many lapses of logic and
implausabilities.
 For instance, where are other members of the Atlantic City Police
Department? Could it be Santoro is the only one with the night off who
could get a ticket to the fight?
 And why does DePalma make a big deal out of Santoro's decision to seal the
complex and detain all 14,000 spectators without utilizing the situation in
any manner whatsoever?
 And why doesn't DePalma take advantage of the Atlantic City locale? The
movie is mostly set indoors, so it's as if the city was a random selection
as a plot site.
 DePalma uses a Rashomon-style story technique, showing the same action
from different perspectives to advance the plot. And while it works, it
also defuses what little suspense the film has to offer.
 DePalma's overuse of his point of view shots, especially his out-of-focus
sequences with his nearsighted damsel in distress, adds nothing to the
proceedings.
 As Santoro, Nicolas Cage is hyperactive. He seems to rely more on
intuition and street smarts rather than intelligence to solve the case. And
he really doesn't solve it as much as the weak conspiracy merely unravels
around him.
 His Ricky is gauche, cynical, but in his own strange way, honorable.
 Gary Sinese is enigmatic and slimy as Dunne, while Carla Cugino merely
squints as the whistleblowing heroine.
 In all, Snake Eyes comes up craps for DePalma and crew. It's among this
uneven director's weaker efforts.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
A Civil Action (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4
 Jan Schlichtmann is a personal injury lawyer - an ambulance chaser. He's
the kind of lawyer you think about when you hear those anti-attorney jokes.
  And his quest for the truth is the plot of the engrossing courtroom
drama, A Civil Action.
  Some lawyers have compared a trial to high drama, to theater. That may be
when sitting in a courtroom and following a case.
  But watching one on the screen is a different matter. If you bog the
audience down in too much legalese, it becomes bored. If you spend too much
time delving into the personal lives of the protagonists, or toss in a
corny love story, than the drama in the courtroom becomes secondary.
  A few films have hit the right combination: Anatomy of a Murder, Inherit
the Wind, Philadelphia and, now, A Civil Action.
 The movie, set in the 1980s, is based on a true case in Schlichtmann,
representing eight families from Woburn, Mass., takes on two corporate
giants, W.R. Grace & Co. and Beatrice Foods. The families claim that the
companies contaminated their town's drinking water with chemicals and this
ultimately led to the leukemia deaths of their children.
 John Travolta gives a splendid performance as Schlichtmann. At first he is
insincere, arrogant and self-centered. He cares nothing about the Woburn
families and tries to dump the case.
 But when he realizes who he can sue and dreams of the money he can
collect, he changes his mind.
  Schlichtmann later has a metamorphosis, caring little about the money,
only wanting to seek the truth. As one of his clients tells him, the case
isn't about money. All the families want is an apology, for someone to
accept the responsibility for the wrongdoing that claimed innocent lives.
  At this stage, Travolta conveys the single-minded determination and
stubbornness that costs Schlichtmann his friends, his house and,
ultimately, his career.
  Travolta's lawyer walks that narrow rope between obsession and tenacity.
  Backing Travolta is a fine supporting cast, most notably Robert Duvall,
as Jerome Facher, the soft-spoken, but steel-minded attorney representing
Beatrice Foods.
  The only problem with Duvall's character lies in the way he is written,
not in Duvall's performance. Writer-director Steve Zaillian (who wrote the
Oscar-winning Schlinder's List and wrote and directed the little-seen, but
exceptional Searching for Bobby Fischer) gives Facher too many quirks. He
carries around an old, battered briefcase. He takes pens from other
lawyers' offices. He's obsessed with the Boston Red Sox, and on and on.
Zaillian, who adapted Jonathan Harr's best-selling book, probably could
have made Facher just as interesting without so many eccentricities.
  William H. Macy, Tony Shalhoub (who was so solid in The Siege) and Zeljko
Ivanek (best known as prosecutor Danvers on TV's Homicide: Life on the
Streets) portray Schlichtmann's partners who, at first believe in his
crusade, later recognize the toll it is taking on their professional and
personal lives and force their partner to confront his obsession.
 Zaillian's writing and direction is crisp without being flamboyant. With
the help of his editor, Wayne Wahrman, he has created some enthralling
sequences.
Zaillian cross cuts between Facher, who teaches law at Harvard, explaining
to his class how cases are won and lost, to the courtroom where
Schlichtmann makes some of the very legal errors that Facher is describing.
 Always object, Facher tells his students, because it throws off the rhythm
of the opposition. "If you fall asleep in court, the first thing you say
when you awake is ..." and the scene cuts to Facher dozing in the
courtroom, quickly awakening and shouting "Objection."
  A Civil Action, at a little under two hours, is an engrossing movie, made
moreso by being based on fact. But it is more than the story of legal
manueverings or even the search for the truth.
 It's the story of one man discovering his true values and setting right
his moral compass.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
End of Days (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger,
Gabriel Byrne and Kevin Pollak.
TO: SATAN, THE DEVIL, BEELZEBUB, PRINCE OF DARKNESS, LORD OF THE FLIES,
ETC., ETC.
 Your plan to take over and rule the earth is proceeding smoothly. The
movie, "End of Days", has been released and in it you appear so inept and
lame-brained that mankind will be lulled into a state of inertia upon your
return.
 To review: A while back I possessed the soul - what little of it there was
- of an executive at Universal Pictures and green-lighted a preposterous
and silly screenplay entitled "End of Days."
 As you know, it's the story of your return to Earth at the millennium to
sire a child and thus begin your reign of darkness. Why you must impregnate
a woman is never really made clear, but at least it gives us some
opportunities to show some female skin, thus assuring us the young male
audience.
 To further our endeavor we lured Arnold Schwarzenegger back to the screen
to play your adversary, a former cop turned security specialist named
Jericho Cane.
 Casting him was a God send, if you'll pardon my expression.
 What better way to prove your vulnerability than by having the stuffings
beaten out of you by the wooden Schwarzenegger. Forget that he can't act or
that his emotional range is a wide as a matchstick. He knows how to handle
firearms (throughout, he continually shoots you with an arsenal of useless
weaponry), can throw a punch and can also take a lickin' and keep on
tickin'. (Sorry, boss, since I've lived among the humans I've become
addicted to their television.)
 Plus, we had the screenwriter, one Andrew W. Marlowe, throw in so many
obstacles and conditions that it makes it almost a certainty that you will
fail.
 For example, you have to impregnate the young woman while in human form
and must do so between 11 p.m. and midnight on Dec. 31.
 Of course, this is all piffle and nonsense, but it gives old Arnie a
fighting chance to stop you - as if he could in real life. (Boss, you'll
love the scene in which an old lady almost beats Cane to a pulp.)
 And just to try stirring up some controversy for the film, we've
incorporated a fanatical set of gun-toting, knife-wielding priests whose
mission is to kill the girl before you can get your hands on her. If the
church got honked off about "Dogma", this one will drive them over the top.
 And the scene of Schwarzenegger as a Christ figure crucified to the side
of a building will surely make those do-gooders foam at the mouth.
 Oh evil one, I wouldn't lie (not to you, at least), but "End of Days" is
so bad that it is almost comical.
 To ensure that it is not taken seriously, I hired Rod Steiger, the king of
overacting, for the pivotal role of a priest. Of course, he did just as
expected. You could smell the bacon when he was on the set.
 Also, we cast Gabriel Byrne, a decent actor, but not particularly a
charismatic or good-looking guy to play you. No offense, sire, but the idea
wouldn't work if we cast some hunk like Brad Pitt or Edward Norton as
Satan. What young woman wouldn't want to bed down with either of them?
 As they say out here, the movie will do boffo at the box office - at least
for a week or two, just long enough to lull people into complacency for
your real return.
 My only regret, chief, is that we didn't plan for a sequel. But, who's
going to need one when, right? To paraphrase a pop cult line from an
earlier Schwarzenegger movie, "You'll be back."
 P.S. Pardon my presumption, sire, but I just had a devilishly brilliant
idea. Delay your takeover until we get the grosses. If "End of Day" does
well, it will revitalize Schwarzenegger's career - and that will be hell on
earth.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
The Hurricane (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Denzel Washington, Dan
Hayeda and Vicellas Reon Shannon. Directed by Norman Jewison.
 Norman Jewison's "The Hurricane" is like a powerful force of nature,
unbridled and undisciplined.
 This true story of boxer Rubin `Hurricane' Carter features an intense
performance by Denzel Washington, which should garner him an Academy
Award best actor nomination.
 But Jewison's staging of the film is akin an undisciplined young boxer.
He's a flailer instead of a fighter, always looking for the knock-out
punch and forgetting to jab and feint.
 It is Washington's bridled and disciplined portrayal of Carter that
carries this movie. Playing a man who turns his rage and disappointment
inward, he refuses to be beaten by the system.
 Inside he may suffer, but outwardly he remains proud and defiant. He
refuses to wear a prison uniform saying that he `won't wear the clothes
of a guilty man.' His body may be incarcerated by the state, but his
mind and soul remain free.
 For the uninitiated Carter was a championship boxer who in 1966 was
railroaded to prison for the murder of two men and a woman at a bar in
Paterson, N.J.
 He served more than 20 years before his conviction was overturned by a
federal judge and he was released..
 To simplify the plot - and the film - Jewison has created a villain, a
racist detective played by Dan Hayeda who seems to have had it out for
Carter since he was a kid.
 Unfortunately, this weakens the movie by allowing society and the
prevailing judicial system of that era off the hook and transforming the
racism Carter faced into a personal one-on-one vendetta.
 And director Jewison shows no subtlety in his depiction of Hayeda's
Detective Della Pesca. His racism, his hatred is so apparent, so
overblown that he nearly becomes a cartoonish caricature.
 Yet by force of his acting skill Washington transcends the script's and
Jewison's flaws. The movie crackles when he is on screen,
 "The Hurricane" is two stories. The second concerns a disenfranchised
black youth who lives with a group of three white Canadians in Toronto.
The teen-ager, Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon). finds a copy of
Carter's autobiography at a book sale, buys it, reads it and is inspired
by it.
 He writes Carter and a friendship develops. He helps the bitter boxer
by offering hope as he enlists his three activist guardians to help
battle for Carter's freedom.
 The script takes liberties with the facts in the case, trimming the
number of people who fought for Carter's release. Yet it still remains a
powerful document,
 Young Shannon gives a fine performance as the idealistic,
hero-worshipping Lesra, who with the help of his guardians has raised
himself from his street-ghetto environment.
 But this is Washington's movie from start to finish. He doesn't just
play Rubin Carter, he becomes him in walk and talk. It is the actor's
strongest performance to date in a stellar career that already has
included some outstanding work - "Glory," "Philadelphia" and "A
Soldier's Story," to name a few.
 "The Hurricane" has its shortcomings, but the performances and subject
matter compensate for its inadequacies.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
  Double Jeopardy (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Ashley Judd, Tommy Lee
Jones and Bruce Greenwood. Directed by Bruce Bereford
 "Double Jeopardy" is a straightforward, no-frills, guilty-pleasure movie.
 It's a simple programmer, meant only to kill some time.
 This revenge drama offers no bells or whistles, no twists, turns or
surprises.
 Everything about it is predictable and preordained.
 Basically, what "Double Jeopardy" consists of is a chase. A wife, wrongly
imprisoned for killing her husband, is paroled after serving six years,
then sets out to find her conniving spouse (who isn't really dead, of
course) and her son.
 Explanations are few and far between, and this is such a silly story that
you don't even care about the plot holes. For example, how did hubby get
off the sailboat? And whose blood was that all over the boat? And why
wasn't all the blood found on the boat checked to see if it matched that of
Nick Parsons (Bruce Greenwood), the husband Libby Parsons (Ashley Judd) was
supposed to have killed?
 Because if any of that had been accomplished, there would have been no movie.
 "Double Jeopardy" is a movie short on details but long on action. After
being paroled, Libby immediately breaks parole to begin her quest.
 Now searching for her is her parole officer, Travis Lehman (Tommy Lee Jones).
 Of course, by film's end, he comes to believe her story of being framed.
 Nice scenery and locations, including Washington state and New Orleans,
are the main attractions here.
 Judd is adequate as the outraged spouse seeking justice, while Jones
doesn't seem to be working too hard as Lehman. Actually, he seems to be
doing an imitation of his Sam Gerard character from "The Fugitive" and
"U.S. Marshals."
 Director Bruce Beresford, who helmed the Academy Award-winning "Driving
Miss Daisy," is too good a filmmaker to just punch the clock. He keeps
"Double Jeopardy" moving, not allowing the audience to think about all the
preposterous situations and incongruities that are rife throughout.
 "Double Jeopardy" is merely a fun diversion. It's workmanlike and is only
there to entertain. If you keep your expectations grounded, you won't be
disappointed.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. He can be reached
by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Princess Diaries, The (2001)
The Princess Diaries (2001) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Anne
Hathaway, Julie Andrews Carolind Goodall, Hector Elizondo, Heather
Matarazzo, Robert Schwartzman and Sandra Oh. Screenplay by Gina Wendkos.
Based on the novel by Meg Cabot. Directed by Garry Marshall. Rated G.
Approx. 114 minutes.
The Princess Diaries is an appealing live-action fairy tale from Disney
that is simplistically charming.
This G-rated family feature is an undemanding as it is preposterous,
but somehow it actually works and holds your attention, even at an
overlong 114 minutes.
The movie is basically the ugly duckling story transported to
contemporary San Francisco.
Mia Thermopolis is a 15-year-old at a private high school where she
passes unnoticed. She even considers herself invisible. With the
exception of her best friend, Lilly, she is basically ignored by the
other students.
But all that changes when Mia's grandmother, whom she has never met,
comes to the city for a visit. It seems - surprise - grandma is Queen
Clarisse Renaldi of Genovia and Mia is a princess. Not only a princess,
but the heir apparent to the throne of the small European principality.
Mia's mother and father divorced when Mia was an infant. Pop went back
to the old country to take care of royal business, while Mom remained in
San Francisco to follow her career as an abstract artist.
The Princess Diaries is a movie aimed at young girls, most of whom can
probably identify with Mia's predicament. `I don't want to run my own
country, I just want to pass 10th grade,' Mia says.
Mia is intelligent, but painfully shy; she can't make it through debate
class without having to hurl. It also doesn't help that she's a bit
nerdy looking as well as awkward. But once her regal grandmother begins
giving her `princess lessons' - and she gets a complete makeover - she
emerges as a graceful, self-assured young woman.
Anne Hathaway's portrays Mia with the right combination of brains,
gawkiness, reluctance and finally, confidence.
It is a bit difficult to imagine the reaction of an anonymous teen-ager
being told just before her 16th birthday that she is heir to the throne.
Hathaway, Caroline Goodall as her mother and Julie Andrews as Queen
Clarisse nearly succeed in making this unlikely scenario believable.
Truly, though, this is one of the film's weak points. It is difficult
in today's split-second, Internet, super-electronic age to fathom such a
secret being buried for almost 16 years without a leak.
Andrews is dazzling and slyly humorous as the royal grandmother playing
Henry Higgins to her granddaughter's Eliza Dolittle. Those who remember
Andrews from her classical stage performance in My Fair Lady can
appreciate the irony of the situation.
Director Garry Marshall, he of Pretty Woman and Runaway Bride fame,
tries to keep the proceedings moving, but a little more judicious
editing could have been used. At nearly two hours, the film drags in
spots.
The Princess Diaries, based on a young adult novel by Meg Cabot, plays
out as you'd expect, with everyone living happily ever after.
And even though the bumps and detours on this road to happiness are
very predictable, The Princess Diaries is a movie parents and children
can enjoy together. It's not grand cinema, but it is an enjoyable
confection that will give some families an excuse to spend some time
together.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
"Hilary and Jackie" (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Emily Watson and
Rachel Griffiths.
 Realizing this is a generalization, the question still needs to be posed:
Why is it that these bio-pics about artistic people seem to be so
overwrought and punctuated by multiple exclamation points?
 Case in point, "Hilary and Jackie," the story of the English cellist
Jacqueline du Pre and her sister, Hilary, a talented flutist who chose
marriage and family over a concert career.
 The movie, while covering the life of the two women, never really allows
its audience any intimacy with its subjects.
 We know only the surface details. Jackie, driven early in life by her
sister's musical expertise, works to surpass her. It is Jackie who gains
fame as one of the world's top cellist while Hilary is content to live in
the country with her husband, Kiffer.
 What "Hilary and Jackie" lacks is focus and heart. Focus, because the
screenplay, adapted by Frank Cottrell Boyce from the book "A Genius in the
Family" by Hilary and her brother, Piers Du Pre, cannot get a firm grasp on
Jackie.
 Her artistic temperment is well displayed. She is self-centered - while on
tour, she ships her dirty laundry home to be washed; mercurial - she goes
from moments of giddiness to fits of depression and moments of cruelty; and
conflicted - she loves the accolades and perks of fame, yet she envies
Hilary's simple country life.
 The problem is that no discernible reason is given for Jackie's actions.
It must be taken on faith that it is merely her inherent nature. She is
driven by genius. Why? Because we are told so.
 The most controversial aspect of the movie - as it reportedly was in the
book - was the time Jackie quit touring to live with Hilary and "share" her
husband. Jackie, who was married to pianist-conductor Daniel Berenboim,
deserts him and just drops in on Hilary and her family and blithfully
disrupts their lives.
 At least the movie refuses to allow Hilary to become a victim. She is
culpable, allowing her forceful sister to have her way, even letting her
sleep with her beloved Kiffer. Hilary indulges Jackie's outrageous
behavior. Yet, again, no apparent explanation is forthcoming, except that
Hilary is afraid of losing her sister.
 In a normal family relationship, Jackie's behavior would get her tossed
with a good riddance for emphasis. But Hilary consistently hides behinds
Jackie's "genius" as her excuse for her non-intervention.
 As Jackie, Emily Watson, who was so stunning in "Breaking the Waves,"  is
all mannerisms and motion. She doesn't inhabit Jackie so much as possess
her, like the devil possessed Linda Blair in "The Exorcist." Any moment you
expect her to vomit up pea soup. Affecting a nearly incomprehensible
accent, Watson shows us Jackie's artistic madness, but cannot show us what
ignites it.
 Even later, when Jackie is ravaged with multiple sclerosis, Watson's
performance seems just that - acting. You never get the feeling that she
actually inhabits Jackie. She may have copied the outer trappings, but she
has failed to reach the soul of the artist.
 Griffiths Hilary has a much more difficult time. Not as flamboyant as
Jackie, her task is nearly thankless. She must balance that thin line
between martyr and victim. You shake your head in disbelief while she
allows Jackie to use her husband and walk all over her, yet you also admire
her resilience and determination to hold her family - and her life -
together.
 Griffiths' is the spine of the film. Her Hilary, despite all her flaws, is
the stronger of the sisters.
 "Hilary and Jackie" is a movie with faults. Director Anand Tucker's
decision to show some of the same sequences from the perspective of both
Hilary and Jackie seems a bit pretentious and unnecessary.
 However, "Hilary and Jackie" does have some fine moments. One, especially,
is the scene early on when the young Hilary realizes that Jackie has
surpassed her in talent and has become the star of the family. It is
heartbreaking in its honesty and reality.
 Sequences such as those make this movie worth seeing. The music is good,
as well, but it is not what drives this movie. Relationships and the
complexities of family is at the core of "Hilary and Jackie."
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Corky Romano (2001)
 CORKY ROMANO (2001). 1/4 star out of 4. Starring Chris Kattan, Vinessa Shaw,
Peter Falk, Peter Berg, Chris Penn, Fred Ward, Richard Roundtree, Matthrew
Glave, Roger Fan and David Sheridan. Written by David Garrett & Jason Ward.
Directed by Rob Pritts. Rated PG-13. Approx. 88 minutes. 
 It's too bad. I was all set to blame Lorne Michaels for another comedic
disaster starring a Saturday Night Live cast member when I noticed Michaels name
does not appear anywhere in the credits. 
 OK, Lorne, you're off the hook for this one. 
 But someone needs to take the blame for foisting Corky Romano on an
unsuspecting public. 
 Corky Romano stars Chris Kattan, one of the less-than-funny SNL cast members,
in a movie that hardly qualifies as a comedy. Heck, it hardly qualifies as a
motion picture. 
 Corky Romano is an embarrassment, a sloppy, sophomoric feature. 
 Kattan plays Corky as a combination Jerry Lewis-Jim Carrey kind of manchild; a
naive innocent, kind of spastic, an uncoordinated idiot. He is an assistant
veterinarian as well as the outcast, youngest son of a reputed crime lord,
"Pops" Romano (Peter Falk). 
 Corky is drafted by the family to infiltrate the FBI and retrieve whatever
evidence the bureau has on his dad. 
 Of course it is all implausible nonsense, made moreso by the incompetence of
Kattan's Corky, who acts as if he can't even tie his shoelaces. 
 But, only in the movies, through a crooked computer hacker Corky is renamed
Corky Pissant and is a full-fledged FBI operative, skilled in five languages, an
Olympic marksman and just a superman among crimefighters. 
 It numbs the mind to think that screenwriters David Garrett and Jason Ward have
such contempt for their audience that they believe any intelligent FBI official
would believe a klutzy, nerd such as Corky is a special agent. It's insulting
and contemptible. 
 The screenwriters' plot is predictable; everything can be foretold a reel or
three before it happens. They don't create any characters, just throw us
familiar types. Illogical and implausible situations abound throughout. 
 Corky Romano is not funny and lacks any comedic pacing. 
 Plus Kattan can't carry the movie. He is funny in small spurts, but he does not
have the presence or weight to bolster a feature-length venture. 
 It is sad to see a great actor such as Falk reduced to playing such a
stereotypical character, nor is there anything funny about illiteracy nor
homosexuality, two areas the writers unsuccessfully try to mine for humor, but
come up with only pyrite. 
 The only good that may come from this entire folly is to give Lorne Michaels
second thoughts about mounting any features based on some of Kattan's SNL
characters. 
 Corky Romano is for the dogs, it stinks. It's about as funny as road kill. So,
I'd advise you to swerve around it. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
 The writers of Deep Impact framed a good idea. Forget about a special
effects extravaganza. Instead, concentrate on the human element, on how
people would react if they knew the end of the world was near.
 That's fine, but screenwriters Michael Tolkin (The Rapture) and Bruce Joel
Rubin (Ghost) overextend themselves. They've created too many characters
and too many subplots, thus some of their protagonists get short shrift and
some of their stories go nowhere or merely hit dead ends.
 Deep Impact opens as Leo Beiderman (Elijah Wood), a 14-year-old student
and member of his high school astronomy club, discovers a new body in the
night sky.
 His find is sent to Professor Wolf, a noted astronomer who makes the
discovery that the body is a comet, which he names Wolf-Beiderman, and that
it is on a collision course with Earth. But on his way to transmit the
information to higher authorities in Washington, the astronomer is killed.
 This is a pointless plot device since the story jumps ahead several months
and we learn the government knows all about Wolf-Beiderman. We learn this
because TV reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni) is investigating the
suspicious resignation of the Secretary of the Treasury, whom she suspects
is having an affair with a woman named "Ellie."
 When Jenny is kidnapped by the FBI and is taken to meet the president
(Morgan Freeman) she learns that "Ellie" is really "E.L.E.," for extinction
level event.
 The film's first reel is wasted on this, before any real action begins.
 It seems the government is already undertaking a plan to try to destroy or
divert the comet by sending a team of astronauts to land on the body, plant
nuclear weapons and blow it up.
 Meanwhile, back on Earth, the populace is told of a lottery in which 1
million people will be housed for two years in deep caverns in Missouri to
preserve the human race. Actually, it's only 800,000 people as 200,000
scientists, doctors, artists and other professionals (no lawyers, we hope)
already have been notified they will be saved.
 The rest will be chosen by a random computer selection of Social Security
numbers.
 From here director Mimi Leder pushes the story along. But it is rather
slow going, especially here on Earth. The people are too nice, too noble,
too stoic. Oh, Leder shows scenes of looting and rioting, but it's
scattered and downplayed.
 For the most part the human race seems to be facing its end like those
stiff-upper-lip passengers on the Titanic.
 Up in space, astronaut Spurgeon (what the heck kind of a name is that?)
Tanner (Robert Duvall) and his team succeed only in splitting the
seven-mile wide comet into two pieces, and both are still taking dead aim
at Earth.
 We're more than 100 minutes into this two hour drama before the audience
gets what it has come to see. The smaller comet strikes in the Atlantic off
the East Coast creating gigantic tidal waves that destroy every major
American city from Boston to Atlanta.
 But the filmmakers have been sabotaged in a sense by the studio. The
scenes of the tidal wave hitting New York have been shown in television
teasers for the movie so frequently that by the time they are seen on the
big screen they have lost some of their awe. It is a case of familiarity
breeding ennui. No pun intended, but they have lost their impact.
 The performances in Deep Impact are inconsistent. Duvall is his usual
low-key self, playing his heroics in a matter-of-fact professional manner.
Freeman as the president brings a weight and authority to the role that
makes him a most believable head of state.
 Wood is exuberant as the youthful astronomer, but the subplot involving
him, his girlfriend and their respective families seems a bit padded.
 Leoni is sincere, but a bit lightweight for a TV anchor. And Oscar-winners
Vanessa Redgrave and Maximillian Schell as her estranged parents are given
very little to do.
 This is the first of the summer's earth-meets-heavenly body disaster
flicks. The second, Armageddon, opens July 1. Coming from producer Jerry
Bruckheimer (The Rock, Con Air) and starring Bruce Willis, one can expect
more pyrotechnics and machismo.
 For now, though, we will have to settle for Deep Impact. It's a flawed
feature with noble intentions.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for American Outlaws (2001)
AMERICAN OUTLAWS (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Colin Farrell, Scott Caan,
Ali Larter, Gabriel Macht, Gregory Smith, Harris Yulin, Will McCormack, Ronny
Cox, Terry O'Quinn, Nathaniel Arcand, Kathy Bates and Timothy Dalton. Story by
Roderick Taylor. Screenplay by Taylor and John Rogers. Directed by Les Mayfield.
About 95 minutes. Rated PG-13 for violence. 
 American Outlaws is a pretty, but disposable movie. 
 This feature is just another retelling of the Jesse James legend. It adds
nothing to the canon. Its only reason for being is to show off a few studly
young actors shooting pistols and riding horses. 
 The story of Jesse James has been told and retold so many times that it is
almost unnecessary to discuss the plot. After all, actors from Tyrone Power to
Roy Rogers to Clayton ("The Lone Ranger") Moore to James Keach have portrayed
the famed (or infamous, depending on your point of view) Missouri outlaw. 
 Under the direction of Les Mayfield (who is comfortable with remakes, having
helmed Flubber as well as Miracle on 34th Street), we get the same, tired
retread: brothers Jesse and Frank James, along with their cousins, the Younger
brothers, return home after the Civil War only to find that the evil railroad
interests are trying to buy up their land cheaply, and, when failing, are
fomenting a reign of terror to drive the farmers out. 
 Jesse, Frank and the Youngers declare war on the railroad, holding up their
banks and trains, giving some of the loot to their poor neighbors and acting
like 19th-century Robin Hoods. 
 The scenery is lovely, the action is quick-paced, the bullets fly and the
explosions are massive and loud. 
But, what gnaws at you as you watch is, Why another Jesse James movie? The only
notable divergence is a tip of the hat to contemporary gender equality as
Jesse's bride leads a daring rescue of her imprisoned husband. Big deal. 
 That is not say the film is not fun. It is very likable with a personable cast
headed by Colin Farrell as Jesse; Scott Caan (looking and sounding a lot like
his old man, James) as Cole Younger; Ali Larter as Jesse's woman, Zee; and
Gabriel Macht as the wise and careful Frank James. 
 Also in the cast is ex-007 Timothy Dalton as Allan Pinkerton, hired to capture
Jesse; and Harris Yulin and Terry O'Quinn as the hissable railroad baddies. 
 Farrell is a very pleasant Jesse, a soft-spoken young man, sure of himself and
of his mission. The film's only tension is between him and Caan's Cole Younger
as to who is the leader of their outlaw band. 
 Larter is most photogenic and she is given plenty of opportunity to wave around
her golden locks, which has a nice clean, sheen, considering she lives on a farm
in 19th century Missouri and is without any hair products. 
 American Outlaws is a nice diversion. It's one of those movies you watch, enjoy
for the moment then quickly forget. It won't bring about a resurgence in the
sadly neglected Western genre, but it should make enough money at the box office
for other filmmakers wanting to saddle up to consider looking west. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Zoolander (2001)
Zoolander (2001) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Ben Stiller, Owen Wilson, Will
Ferrell, Christine Taylor, Milla Jovovich, Jerry Stiller and Jon Voight. Story
by Drake Sather and Ben Stiller. Screenplay by Drake Sather & Ben Stiller and
John Hamburg. Directed by Ben Stiller. Approx. 100 minutes. Rated PG-13. 
 Zoolander is stupid fun - emphasis on stupid - with only a couple of missteps
that mar its overall enjoyment. 
 The movie, co-produced, co-written, directed by and starring Ben Stiller, is
nothing more than a satirical jab at the fashion industry and the perception of
male models as dim-witted, self-obsessed dolts who are pliable and easily
manipulated. It almost seems like a redundancy. 
 It doesn't sound like much, and nor does it seem like it takes much effort to
skewer male models. After all, Fabio does it all the time just by being himself.
 Zoolander's plot, unfortunately, is in bad taste, considering today's political
climate. It revolves around a cartel of designers wanting the new prime minister
of Malaysia assassinated because he is vowing to raise the wages of his
countrymen who slave in the sweatshops run by said same designers. 
 It would have been less objectionable if a real nation had not been used and
the assassination plot had been altered to perhaps merely overthrowing the
leader. 
 The second misstep revolves around a sequence featuring three of Zoolander's
male model friends who it seems are so dumb that at a gas station they spray
each other with gasoline from the pumps. One is stupid enough to try lighting a
cigarette, thus blowing them all to smithereens. Recent events speak for
themselves as to why this scene should have been deleted. 
 And, yes, in fairness, people at the preview screening howled, thinking it was
hilarious. But there may be some in the audience - myself included - whose
sensitivities may preclude them from seeing the humor in such a situation. 
 But we cannot toss out the entire barrel because a couple of the apples are
rotten. 
 In truth, Zoolander is pure silliness, a no-brainer, just-sit-back-and-laugh
feature. 
 The plot is simple. Since male models are easy to control one must be
brainwashed - or in this case given a light rinse - to carry out the diabolical
plot. And who is the most vacuous model around, why three-time model of the
year, Derek Zoolander  master of the "blue-steel" look. 
 Stiller captures the walk and talk - as well as the look - of the male model.
He snaps his head, raises an eyebrow, furrows his brow in incomprehension with
comical ease. 
 His Zoolander is a man-child, as dense as an Adirondack forest. When his
reporter girlfriend, Matilda (woodenly played by Stiller's wife, Christine
Taylor) tells Zoolander and his main rival, Hansel (Owen Wilson), that she was
once bulimic, Zoolander looks at her in awe and says, "You can read minds?" 
 That's about the level of the movie's humor. 
 A "walk-off" between Zoolander and Hansel, judged by David Bowie, is one of the
film's more inventive sequences, as is a scene in which former X-Files star
David Duchovny shows up as a conspiracy theorist who explains to Zoolander and
Matilda how all the political assassinations of the past 200 years have been
carried out by male models. 
 Wilson walks away with the film as the laid-back Hansel, who shifts from
Zoolander's main rival to ally in his attempt to halt the assassination plot.
With his long blonde locks and outlandish outfits, he makes a charming
blockhead. 
 The movie's main villain, Mugatu, is portrayed by Saturday Night Live's Will
Ferrell who has yet to find a film role that truly exploits his talents. Here,
he is reduced to merely yelling and mugging, while wearing ridiculous outfits
with a crop of white hair that looks like it was borrowed from the Three
Stooges' Larry Fine. 
 At least Stiller made the film a family affair, giving his mom, Anne Meara, the
small role of a protester, while his dad, Jerry Stiller, plays Zoolander's
agent. 
 Zoolander has its shortcomings. It is definitely not sophisticated humor, but
it does provide several laughs. And you will never be able to look at a model
again without wondering how akin he is to Derek Zoolander. 
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found by going to www.jconline.com and clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Tao of Steve, The (2000)
The Tao of Steve (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Donal Logue, Greer
Goodman, Kimo Wills, Ayelet Kaznelson, David Aaron Baker and Nina
Jaroslaw. Written by Duncan North with Grerr Goodman and Jenniphr
Goodman. Dirrected by Jenniphr Goodman.
 "The Tao of Steve "is a different type of romantic comedy in as much as
its protagonist is a character for whom you have very little respect and
whom - at least at the outset - I considered an immature, selfish,
perpetual adolescent.
 We first meet Dex (Donal Logue) at his 10-year college reunion. Once
big man on campus, Dex is now almost as large as a college campus. He
teaches kindergarten, is single and lives by a philosophy that is a
conglomeration of Eastern practices and self-created b.s.
 Basically, Dex's philosophy is this: Be cool and indifferent around
women, don't chase them, let them chase you. Women love to be the
hunters. You will get more women into bed if you be the prey and let
them be the pursuer.
 This is Dex's mantra. And it seems to work for the overweight,
out-of-shape, pot smoking, underachiever.
He is in the midst of an affair with Beth (Ayelet Kaznelson), the wife
of one of his closest friends, and he seems to have bedded half the
women in Santa Fe.
 Then he meets up with Syd (Greer Goodman), a gorgeous young woman who
rides motorcycles and designs sets for the Santa Fe opera. Dex is
smitten, but fights valiantly to maintain his credo.
 Yet at the same time Dex is falling in love with Syd, she appears
unimpressed by his charms. Later, we learn she has good reason for her
disdain.
 In a sense, "The Tao of Steve," written by Duncan North with Greer
Goodman and Jenniphr Goodman, though based on North's life, is actually
a feminist fantasy in which the love of a good woman rehabilitates an
otherwise unredeemable semi-slacker.
 However, the method in which the trio of screenwriters attain their
goal is intriguing to watch.
 Dex's journey to a new understanding is interesting to observe. We see
his doubts, his defense mechanism and his final acceptance of the truth.
 Logue has a very expressive face. It's part smirk, part hurt puppy with
a bit of false bravado tossed in for good measure. In public he feigns a
non-interest in Syd that is meant to keep her off balance. In private,
he pines for her.
 Greer Goodman's Syd could undo any red-blooded man's mantra. She is
lovely, intelligent, self-sufficient; not afraid to speak her mind. She
uses wisecracks to cover the hurt Dex unknowingly caused years before
and, like Dex, she feigns an indifference on the subject of the pair
committing to a meaningful relationship.
 Yet Syd is a vulnerable and caring woman, who cannot explain - even to
herself - her growing attraction to and affection for Dex.
 "The Tao of Steve" is one of those independent movies that is a
90-minute character study. There is a lot of dialogue - much of it
witty, especially a poker-game sequence where Dex and his cronies
explain the coolness of Steves, i.e., McQueen, McGarrett (Hawaii 5-0)
and Austin (The Six Million Dollar Man).
 Articulate and interesting movies such as this are rare. So, take a
chance. You may surprise yourself - and, guys, you may even see
something of yourself in "The Tao of Steve."
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
  Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Lost & Found (1999/I)

 Lost and Found (1999) 1 star out of 4. Starring David Spade and Sophie Marceau.
 David Spade is at his best - if such a word is applicable to this annoying
little man - when he plays the sarcastic twerp.
 Trying to turn Spade into a romantic lead is like trying to convert me
into a figure skater. In other words, it can't be done.
 However, director Jeff Pollack manfully tries to achieve the impossible in
"Lost and Found," a very uneven and dull comedy.
 Spade plays Dylan Ramsey, owner of a small Italian restaurant whose dream
is to expand his operations into the vacant space next door.
 He also would like to find the girl of his dreams.
 Another stretch, trying to convince an audience that Spade is an
entrepreneur, a go-getter. That takes people skills, something most of his
characters lack in abundance.
 "Lost and Found" revolves around Dylan's attempts to win the heart of his
new neighbor, Lila Dubois (the ethereal Sophie Marceau). She is a cellist
trying to start a professional career in the United States and, at the same
time, put a lot of distance between her and her smarmy ex-boyfriend Rene
(Patrick Bruel).
 The love of Lila's life is Jack, her terrier.
 So, how does Dylan go about winning her heart? He kidnaps Jack and then
spends a lot of time with Lila scouring Los Angeles for the "lost" pooch.
 There's a pall that hangs over "Lost and Found," a shadow that grounds the
entire experience. And that is the late Chris Farley.
 One of Dylan's employees is an oversized, not-too-bright, happy-go-lucky
slob named Wally who idolizes his boss to the point that he dyes his hair
to match Dylan's and dresses like his mentor.
 Wally, as played by Artie Lang, does nothing more than remind you of
Farley's absence and how well he and Spade worked together.
 Without him, Spade is like a tricycle with a missing wheel. He continually
spills.
 "Lost and Found" tries very hard to be funny and, honestly, it offers a
couple of cute moments, especially that of Spade filling in for Neil
Diamond at a swank affair.
 But aside from that, "Lost and Found" has little to recommend. Spade is a
comedian whose antics can only be tolerated in small doses. And when he
tries to act sincere, it's as believable and Bill Clinton swearing he never
had sex with that woman.
 "Lost and Found" merely wanders aimlessly from sequence to sequence,
offering stale jokes and very few punch lines.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Space Cowboys (2000)

 Space Cowboys (2000) 2 1/2 out of 4 stars. Starring Clint Eastwood,
Tommy Lee Jones, Donald Sutherland, James Garner, Marcia Gay Harden,
William Devane, Loren Dean, Courtney B. Vance and James Cromwell.
Written by Ken Kaufman and Howard Klausner. Music by Lennie Niehaus.
Directed by Clint Eastwood. Rated PG-13.
 Forget scientific accuracy. That's not what "Space Cowboys" is all
about.
 Its very title implies a boyish, larger-than-life fantasy. And that is
what is so darn appealing about this out-of-this-world tale; its
willingness to tap into a fountain of youth-like quality that we all can
identify with.
 "Space Cowboys" is a good ol' boy romp with the emphasis on old. It's
about four space program veterans dismissed - back in 1958 - before the
project literally got off the ground who have `the ripe stuff' and get a
second chance to fulfill their longtime ambition - go soaring into
space.
 The movie's main drawback is that - like its four protagonists - we
have to wait too long before liftoff.
 Beginning with a flashback to show how the four hot shots - Frank
Corvin (Clint Eastwood), Frank `Hawk' Hawkins (Tommy Lee Jones), Jerry
O'Neil (Donald Sutherland) and Tank Sullivan (James Garner) - were
dropped, the story flashes forward to contemporary times when the
services of the four are required to repair an old Russian satellite
that has a decaying orbit.
It seems the old Soviet satellite's design is one created by Corvin that
was stolen by the commies in the old days when they were our enemies.
 Director Eastwood wastes too much time on old age jokes as the four
comrades go through their training for the space mission.
 The film shifts into high gear when the quartet are blasted into orbit.
 Of course, complications arise when the satellite's deep, dark secret
is revealed.
But the plot - and its inherent clichés - take a back seat to the
winning interplay between the four veteran performers. That is what
truly fuels "Space Cowboys."
 It is a joy to watch the ease in which these wily actors work together.
They do become a team. No one tries to steal any scenes.
 Jones with his Texas twang and Sutherland with his 60s laid-back
persona are so marvelous to watch and enjoy. Not that Eastwood and
Garner are any slouches. They just seem so comfortable around each
other, that you'd think they were all longtime friends, instead of hired
actors.
 This is the reason to see "Space Cowboys." It is a film in which the
performers overshadow and blot out the shortcomings, of which there are
several. But you buy into the illusion because of their combined
charisma.
 The premise that four 70+-year-old men could learn the complicated data
in the short time period allotted is a bit far-fetched. But who cares?
 Just see "Space Cowboys" for a needed douse of old-fashioned
entertainment. It's charming, winsome and sentimental.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found at the Internet Movie Database Web site
at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)

 The Cider House Rules (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Tobey
Maguire, Charlize Theron, Michael Caine, Delroy Lindo, Paul Rudd, Kathy
Baker and Jane Alexander. 
 One young man's search for self-discovery is the main focus of "The
Cider House Rules", a literate and moving adaptation of John Irving's
best-selling novel.
 The movie, featuring a screenplay by Irving, tells of the journey of
Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire), an orphan groomed by kindly old doctor
Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine) to be his successor.
 Larch is a warm-hearted but practical physician who helps women in
trouble either by finding homes for their babies after delivering them,
or performing abortions if the women so desire.
 The movie is set in New Hampshire during the years of World War II, so
Larch's activities, though humanitarian, are illegal.
 Homer learns medicine from Larch, and while Homer does not mind
delivering babies, he will not perform abortions.
 Having spent most of his life at St. Cloud's orphanage, Homer decides
to see what it is like in the outside world, after meeting Wally
Worthington (Paul Rudd) and Candy Kendall (Charlize Theron), who has
come to Larch to terminate an unwanted pregnancy.
 Homer leaves with the pair, going to work picking apples on a farm
owned by Worthington's family, while Rudd - who is in the Army Air Corps
- returns to duty flying missions in Asia.
 Homer learns more than he bargained for in the outside world. He
discovers love, betrayal, heartache and dark secrets he never imagined
were possible.
 Maguire gives a finely honed performance as Homer as he combines
worldliness learned through his years of assisting Larch, and naiveté -
his ignorance of the levels to which people can fall.
 It is Maguire's most fully developed characterization to date.
 Caine is magnificent as the pragmatic, yet idealistic Larch. He is a
kindly, caring man who refuses to judge others. His only desire is to
help people, even if he must use illegal means to do so.
 Delroy Lindo adds another notch to his already sterling resume as Mr.
Rose, the leader of the migrant workers who befriends Homer and teaches
him not only about picking apples, but about the outside world.
 Mr. Rose is a man with a terrible, dark secret, yet he still is able to
garner sympathy.
 Theron's Candy is a woman-child who, as she says, hates being alone.
With her lover off to war, she gravitates to Homer. She is not a selfish
woman, but a needy one.
 Offering able support as Larch's longtime nurses are Kathy Baker and
Jane Alexander. Their screen time is minimal, but they complement Larch
with their warmth and compassion toward their charges.
 "The Cider House Rules" is a movie that smoothly combines humor and
tragedy, darkness and light. It is Homer's odyssey about learning - not
only of the outside world - but about who he really is and about
accepting the responsibility of his destiny.
 Most of all, "The Cider House Rules" is a movie with heart.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
 A former teacher, she now earns her living writing letters for those who
cannot write.
 She works at a table at Rio de Janeiro's Central Station, where she judges
those for whom she writes.
 Sometimes she mails their letters, other times she merely tears them up
and throws them away.
 Dora has a disdain for people and is not above taking advantage of them.
 But all this changes for Dora when through circumstances she is forced to
be responsible for Josue, a young boy whose mother is killed in the street
in front of the station.
 This is the simple set up for Central Station, a heart-tugging story from
Brazil.
 Dora (Academy Award-nominee Fernanda Montenegro) at first is reluctant to
befriend Josue (Vinicius De Oliveira).
 She even tries to profit from his misfortune by selling him to a sleazy
"adoption agency," but relents and instead determines to take the child to
his father in the remote northeast section of Brazil.
 Central Station is more of a character study than a plot-driven movie. It
derives its impetus from the growing relationship between its two
characters as they travel by bus and trucks to reach their frontier
destination.
 And even though you have some sense where the film is headed, the journey
remains a pleasant one.
 For Central Station totally involves you in its characters.
 Montenegro's performance is masterful. She takes what could have been a
cliched character and gives her life and depth. She shows the conflict
within this woman who cannot even explain to herself why she is slowly
becoming a surrogate mother for a young boy whom she at first detested.
 The growing love between the woman and the child develops slowly through
argument, tears and humor.
 As Josue, young De Oliveira is a natural, seemingly unaffected by the camera.
 What truly makes Central Station a memorable experience is its heart. It
proves that there is goodness in even the most displaced and lost among us,
even if they themselves do not know it is there.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Atlantis: The Lost Empire (2001)

 Atlantis: The Lost Empire (2001) 2 stars out of 4. Featuring the vocal
talents of Michael J. Fox, James Garner, Cree Summer, Leonard Nimoy,
Phil Morris, Jacqueline Obradors, Don Novello, Corey Burton, Claudia
Christian, John Mahoney, Jim Varney, David Ogden Stiers and Florence
Stanley. Screenplay by Tab Murphy. Story by Kirk Wise & Gary Trousdale,
Joss Whedon, Bryce Zabel & Jackie Zabel and Tab Murphy. Directed by Wise
and Trousdale. Rate PG. Running time: 93 minutes.
 Disneyís new animated adventure, Atlantis: The Lost Empire, suffers
from a lack of focus.
 The feature is an uneasy mix of comedy and action thriller, with a
violence quotient higher than the usual Disney fare.
 The body count alone should make parents think twice before allowing
the young ones to visit Atlantis.
 Yet the movie seems aimed at them, but the storyline and situations
appear to be tilted toward an older audience.
 The toll ó though no actual deaths are shown ó is high. The feature is
riddled with explosions that claim scores, but it all happens so quickly
that the youngest viewers may not even comprehend the consequences.
 This is not your fluffy, cuddly Disney. No singing teacups, wacky wort
hogs or talking apes, here.
 At about 93 minutes, Atlantis begins rather slowly, building up to the
action sequences. A lot of dialogue and exposition may cause the
youngsters to squirm until the story picks up steam.
 The animation, of course, is top-rate. After all, this is Disney. The
composition is multilayered and the water looks so real you think you
might be able to go for a swim. But it lacks the majestic sweep of The
Lion King or the magical texture of Beauty and the Beast.
 Atlantisí hero is Milo Thatch, a dreamer who wishes to follow in the
steps of his famed explorer grandfather. His obsession is the lost
continent of Atlantis. Milo claims he knows its location, but, of
course, his ideas are ridiculed at every turn.
 An old friend of his grandfatherís ó honoring a wager made with the old
gent ó finances an expedition. The plot thickens as the groupís leader
has a hidden agenda, a point that may be too subtle for some in the
audience to immediately pick up on.
 Of course, Milo unknowingly leads his band of craven mercenaries to
Atlantis, and that is when the plot kicks in at full throttle. A battle
sequence involving bi-planes, a hot-air balloon and futuristic-looking
Atlantian airships is exciting ó even if it does feel borrowed from
George Lucas ó but, again, itís a lot of death and destruction.
 Atlantisí saving grace is the vocal talent of Michael J. Fox as Milo.
He is a milquetoast-like hero, favoring brains over brawn. He is
childlike and overly enthusiastic about fulfilling his dream of
discovery.
 Fox is able to convey all this, making Milo a most likable young chap.
 Other voices lending themselves to the proceedings include James Garner
as Commander Rourke, the expedition leader; Cree Summer as Princess Kida
of Atlantis; Leonard Nimoy as the King of Atlantis; Phil Morris as Dr.
Sweet, Jacqueline Obradors as Audrey, the group's precocious mechanic;
Don Novello, basically reprising his Father Guido Sarducci, as
explosives expert Vinny; the late Jim Varney as Cookie; and most
notably, Florence Stanley, as Mrs. Packard, the droll, chain-smoking
communications operator.
 Though set in 1914, Atlantis is a very PC outing, with individuals from
every color and gender represented.
 Atlantis pales in comparison with some past Disney efforts, most
notably Tarzan and The Lion King. The film does offer some spectacular
animated sequences, but overall it lacks a certain spark. It's a bit
hollow and flaccid.
 One clue to the filmís ultimate problem is the number of credited
writers. While the screenplay is credited to Tab Murphy, story credit is
given to co-directors Kirk Wise and Gary Trousdale as well as Joss
Whedon, Bryce Zabel, Jackie Zabel and Murphy.
 The very young will view Atlantis as eye-candy, while the older kids
and adults will probably appreciate the storyline and pyrotechnics.
 But this is one effort that lacks that fabled Disney magical touch.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Hannibal (2001)

Hannibal (2001) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Anthony Hopkins, Julianne
Moore, Ray Liotta, Giancarlo Giannini and Gary Oldman. Written by David
Mamet and Steven Zaillian. Based on the book by Thomas Harris. Directed
by Ridley Scott. Rated R.
 Hannibal is a very engrossing, thriller with strong performances,
clever writing and first-rate cinematography. It also is a stomach
turner.
 This definitely is not a ědinner-and-a-dateî movie. Dine at your own
risk before viewing this feature.
I
 f I had to choose one word to describe the difference between Jonathan
Demmeís Silence of the Lambs and this sequel by Ridley Scott, it would
be restraint.
 For all the suspense and terror dredged up by Demmeís Oscar-winner, it
is difficult to recall any scenes of graphic violence. Most of the
horror was either spoken about or occurred off screen.
 Not in Scottís Hannibal. He shows it all and seems to relish it.
 Basically what it highlights is a divergence in style and technique.
For Demme, less was more. He was satisfied with leaving many of the
filmís gruesome details to the imagination of the viewer.
 Scott, not wanting to trust the audience of force it to think,
spotlights every depravity. I prefer Demmeís approach, but Iíve always
felt ó like the master filmmakers of years past ó that what is most
terrifying is what the viewer conjures in his or herís mindís eye.
 Another difference between the two films is in the presentation of
Hannibal Lecter. In Silence of the Lambs, you were fascinated and
appalled by his actions and while ěrootî may not be the exact emotion,
you probably admitted to yourself that you were glad to see him roaming
free at the finale.
 In Hannibal, Lecter  again portrayed by Oscar-winner Anthony Hopkins,
is the nominal hero of the piece. While in Silence, your sympathies and
emotional ties centered on FBI trainee Clarice Starling (Oscar-winner
Jodie Foster), in this sequel your investment is with the good, bad
doctor.
 And thatís because screenwriters David Mamet and Steven Zaillian,
working from Thomas Harrisí best-selling novel, give us people seemingly
more morally corrupt than Lecter.
 How can that be since Lecter not only kills his victims, but eats them?
 Simple. Itís because those seeking Lecter are doing so ó not for
justice ó but for revenge and out of avarice.
 The revenge is orchestrated by Mason Verger, a billionaire who once was
a patient of Lecter. Lecter convinced Verger, a pedophile, to peel the
skin from his face, leaving him horribly disfigured. Verger (played by
an unrecognizable and unbilled Gary Oldman) has bred a pack of wild
boars for the specific purpose of chomping on Lecter.
 The avarice comes in the guise of a Florentine police detective, Pazzi
(a scruffy Giancarlo Giannini), who plots with Verger ó for a price ó to
capture Lecter and deliver him for his retribution.
 And finally there is Justice Department official Paul Krendler (Ray
Liotta) who also plots with Verger to use Starling (now played by
Julianne Moore) as bait to lure in Lecter.
 As Lecter, Hopkins remains the quintessential human cobra, ready to
uncoil and spring in a second.  What is lacking in his performance is
that element of surprise that was so captivating in the original. He is
a more flamboyant Lecter and thus his sense of menace is diminished.
 Moore, as the more mature and cynical Starling, nearly makes you forget
Foster. Nearly, being the operative word. Mooreís Starling remains the
moral heart of the story, unbending, single-minded, dogged and
dedicated.
 Yet in Mooreís eyes you can see the doubts, the questioning that has
helped to erode Starlingís youthful idealism.
 Hannibal, at two hours and 10 minutes, is a bit uneven. The suspense
fails to build as in the original. Here, Scott gives you a series of set
pieces aimed more to shock than create tension.
 The movie is very stylish, very colorful, as is Scottís trademark. It
also is very bloody and gross, almost gratuitous.
 Where as Demme would pull back, Scott charges in at full speed, making
sure the audience has the time to savor every sickening act.
 It is difficult for any sequel to live up to its predecessor,
especially one as anticipated as Hannibal. That it succeeds most of the
time is a tribute to the collaborative efforts of the filmmakers and
stars.
 Yet, you walk out of Hannibal a bit shocked and dazed, but ultimately
unsatisfied. Itís as if Scott served you an appetizer and a dessert, but
forgot the entree.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas, The (2000)
The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas (2000) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring
Mark Addy, Stephen Baldwin, Kristin Johnston, Jane Krakowski, Alan
Cumming, Joan Collins, Thomas Gibson and Harvey Korman
 The line in "The Flintstones' " theme song says `you'll have a gay old
time.'
 Maybe, but not by watching "The Flintstones in Viva Rock Vegas."
 I cannot stress how bad a movie this is. My proof? About 40 little kids
were in the audience at the preview screening, and the theater remained
as quiet as the La Brea tar pits, which, by the way, is where they
should sink all the prints of this stinker.
 "Viva Rock Vegas" is so bad, that even Joan Collins - who disgracefully
hams it up as Wilma's mother - would probably not write it on her
resume, and she starred in such stinkers as "The Stud" and "The Bitch,"
both of which are rated as bombs in "Leonard Maltin's Film and Video
Guide."
 This movie is nearly amateurish. It plays like a prolonged skit at a
Universal theme park. The sets and costumes are just as tacky.
 Every prehistoric cliché you can think of is thrown at the audience. 
 Even some of the animatronic dinosaurs show more spark than the actors.
 OK, to be fair, the movie has a couple of redeeming qualities. Stephen
Baldwin does a fine Barney Rubble impression, while Mark Addy, familiar
to American audiences for his role in "The Fully Monty", does a very
good Fred. Both sound like their cartoon counterparts. And Alan Cumming
is funny as rock star Mick Jagged.
 Others in the cast include Kristen Johnston as Wilma, Jane Krakowski as
Betty, as well as Thomas Gibson and Harvey Korman.
 Still, that is not enough to lure audiences to this mess. Frankly, it's
just flat. And not because it is aimed at kids, but because it is so
tacky and lame. The humor is mostly verbal when it should have relied on
slapstick. The pace is too slow and, at just over 90 minutes, the movie
runs too long.
 "Viva Rock Vegas" is one fossil that should have remained buried.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics Society, has his
reviews posted at http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
 Affliction is as depressing and cold as its New Hampshire winter setting.
 Starring Academy Award-nominee Nick Nolte and Oscar winner James Coburn,
this tale of a violent, dysfunctional family is powerful, disturbing
filmmaking.
 But what can you expect when you have a movie directed by Paul Schrader,
who adapted a novel by Russell Banks.
 Wade Whitehouse (Nick Nolte), is the police officer in Lawford, a small,
economically depressed town where nothing really ever happens. Wade's job
consists mostly of clearing the snow off the roads and acting as the school
crossing guard.
 Wade is a man who keeps his fury and frustrations bottled. He is in the
midst of a custody battle with his ex-wife and even at this stage in his
life he cannot stand up to his abusive, alcoholic father.
 An eruption is imminent, and its catalyst is the shooting death of a New
England big shot in what is supposed to be a hunting accident.
Wade, though, sees conspiracy and sets out to prove that the man's death
was murder.
 Yet, the crime is really a secondary issue to Schrader.
 Affliction is about a man who gets "to feeling like a whipped dog" that
someday is "going to bite back."
 And circumstances are bringing that day nearer.
 Despite the love and comfort of Margie (Sissy Spacek), a waitress in a
local restaurant, Wade cannot find peace.
 He feels that if he can prove that a murder was committed and solve it, he
will regain the respect of his daughter, the townspeople and, most of all,
his father.
 Coburn is Wade's father, Glen, a bully and a man who breathes violence
like the rest of us breathe air. He is abusive physically and mentally and
is non-repentent about his actions or lifestyle.
 Coburn gives a brutal performance as Glen, a bitter drunk who only knows
how to express himself with his fists. He spares no one. Glen is a monster,
yet the joy of Coburn's performance is that you feel some pity for this man
even though you should feel nothing but hate. His Oscar was deserved.
 Nolte gives the performance of his career. He is a walking mound of rage,
exploding suddenly, then subsiding and apologizing like a little boy caught
stealing money from his mother's purse.
 His Wade is a poignant, troubled man living in a climate of self-doubt
created by his overbearing father.
 But the real star of Affliction is Schrader. In films such as Blue Collar
and Hard Core, he has created individuals who are outsiders, men who have
difficulty connecting with the society around them.
 An air of bleakness and tragedy hangs over Affliction. Like most of
Schrader's works, it is not a feel-good movie, but it is powerful
moviemaking from a man who has mapped the darkest terrain of the human
soul.
 Affliction is filled with despair, hopelessness and excruciating losers.
You would not want to spend any time with these people, but watching them
try to connect is a painfully fascinating experience.
 Affliction will make you uncomfortable, make you squirm. And you will
emerge from the theater saddened. And that is the power of Schrader's work.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.

Title
Review for America's Sweethearts (2001)
AMERICA'S SWEETHEARTS (2001). 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Julia Roberts,
Catherine Zeta-Jones, John Cusack, Billy Crystal, Stanley Tucci, Hank Azaria,
Christopher Walken, Alan Arkin and Seth Green. Written by Crystal and Peter
Tolan. Music by James Newton Howard. Directed by Joe Roth. Approx. 110 minutes.
Rated PG-13. 
With an all-star cast and a script that keeps the laughs coming almost
continuously, Americaí's Sweethearts is a delight. 
This Joe Roth-directed comedy mixes farce, satire, physical humor and romance to
create a winning feature that will keep you chuckling. 
The story is simple: An estranged movie-star couple must come together for a
press junket weekend to promote their 10th and final film pairing. Along the
way, they bring their emotional baggage, resentments and hostilities. 
America's Sweethearts has an old-fashioned quality despite some raunchy humor.
It's a distant cousin to the screwball comedies of the 1930s and '40s. Some of
the more outrageous moments are reminiscent of those zany Preston Sturges movies
from the early '40s such as Sullivan's Travels. 
Sweethearts has a sweetheart of a cast, headed by Julia Roberts and featuring
Catherine Zeta-Jones, John Cusack, Billy Crystal (who also co-wrote the script
and produced the film), Hank Azaria, Stanley Tucci, Alan Arkin and Christopher
Walken. 
The movie is filled with little gems, from Tucci's maniacally frustrated studio
head describing to veteran press agent Lee Phillips (Crystal) why Senor Wences
was the only true show biz genius, to Cusack's Eddie Thomas and Phillips taking
a bow above the junketís press corps after Eddie nearly falls from the hotel
roof in what the press perceives as a suicide attempt. 
Some nice one-liners also abound. When Eddie shows up alone at the hotel, he is
asked about the whereabouts of his entourage. I'm a paranoid schizophrenic. "I'm
my own entourage," he responds. 
Performances sparkle throughout America's Sweethearts. Zeta-Jones is cruelly
funny as the pampered, spoiled, self-centered movie star who treats every minor
inconvenience as a cataclysmic disaster. 
Cusack's Eddie, while more grounded in reality, practices some New Age
mumbo-jumbo to help remain centered. But he also flashes his movie star ego at
times, worrying about grosses and the trajectory of his career. 
Roberts is the comedy's heart. She plays Kiki, Gwen's sister and assistant. Her
movie-star sibling treats her more like a go-fer than a sister. She uses love
and sisterly devotion to wheedle Kiki into catering to her every whim. 
And it seems she has been doing this her entire life. Kiki reminds her that in
high school when Gwen wanted to break up with a boyfriend, she'd send Kiki to
break the bad news. "I wound up being the most hated girl in school," Kiki tells
her oblivious sibling. 
To make matters more complicated, Kiki is in love with Eddie and believes Gwen
treated him badly. 
Crystal is connivingly convincing as the always-thinking press agent who sees
every misstep or accident as an opportunity as a movie promotion. 
Walken, looking like a Woodstock burn-out case, is hilariously weird as the
director who brings his singular vision to the movie he was supposed to have
shot. 
Veteran Arkin turns in a sly appearance as Eddie's therapist who spouts Eastern
bromides that sound sage, but really make no sense at all. 
The movie's only major misstep is in Azaria's portrayal of Hector, Gwen's
Spanish lover. His characterization comes close to being an offensive stereotype
of Latino machismo as he seems only to be concerned about his 
reputation as a lover and the size of his penis. 
America's Sweethearts is a honey or a comedy, a movie you'd want to cuddle up
with. It's warm and cute as well as satirical and sharp. 
Plus, you get to see Julia Roberts in a fat suit. Who could ask for anything
more! 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Bloom's reviews also can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette
Bloom's reviews also appear on the Web at the Internet Movie Database site:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Buffalo '66 (1998)
 Buffalo 66 (1998) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Vincent Gallo, Christina
Ricci, Ben Gazarra and Anjelica Huston
 Buffalo 66 is a very odd movie. It features a hero who for nearly 99
percent of the movie seems to be totally alienated and a rather unpleasant
guy.
 Yet in some kind of strange way, Buffalo 66 turns out to be a charming
little love story about two people who find themselves alone in the world.
 Buffalo 66 is different. It's not your mainstream linear type of story as
it makes some curious detours from the focal plot then casually goes back
to its story.
 The movie is the singular vision of Vincent Gallo, who not only stars, but
directed, wrote and composed the score for Buffalo 66.
 Gallo plays Billy Brown, released from prison after serving five years for
another man's crime. He served the time to pay a $10,000 debt he owed a
bookie on a football game lost by the Buffalo Bills because the team's
kicker missed a crucial field goal.
 Upon his release Billy only seeks three things: the first, and most
important, is a place to go to the bathroom. The second is the respect of
his parents, who believe Billy works for the government and has been away
on an overseas assignment. The third is revenge; he wants to kill the place
kicker who missed the field goal, thus ruining his life.
 After a few comic attempts to find a place to relieve himself, Billy winds
up at a tap dance school where he kidnaps Layla (Christina Ricci), a blond,
Barbie-doll-like cutie who doesn't offer much resistance.
 Billy explains that he needs her to act as his wife since his parents
believe he is married. He renames her Wendy and they proceed to visit
Billy's parents.
 The family is from dysfunctional hell. Dad (Ben Gazarra) hardly speaks,
spending most of his time glowering at either his wife or Billy. Mom
(Anjelica Huston) is a rabid Bills fan who complains that the only game she
ever missed was on the day she gave birth to Billy.
 But Billy's parents, while virtually ignoring him, fall madly in love with
Layla/Wendy, who tries to build Billy up in their eyes, all to no avail.
She even tells them she's pregnant.
 Ricci is a sweet innocent as Layla. She seems to immediately have fallen
in love with Billy; how or why is not explained. We need to take it on
faith.
 After all, Gallo's story is sort of a dark, urban fairy tale, and his
Billy is a scruffy, demanding and overbearing prince.
 Gallo's Billy is filled with self-loathing. He won't let Layla touch him.
He bosses her around like a boot camp drill sergeant, and yet she accepts
all the abuse without much complaint.
 The story's suspense hinges on whether Billy will carry through with his
revenge or will Layla's love soften his resolve.
 Gallo has created a rather eccentric movie. It will require patience to
sit through this enterprise, but it will be worth the effort.
 The film features fine performances throughout, from Gazzara and Huston,
Gallo and especially Ricci. At one point in the story, she does a little
tap dance at a bowling alley. Why? Who knows? It's really not important.
 But this fine young actress has seen her reputation soar during the past
year as she has taken up some demanding and interesting roles in both
studio works (The Ice Storm) and independent features such as Buffalo 66.
 If you're looking for something different, a movie that will challenge
you, then try Buffalo 66. It may surprise you.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Wizard of Oz, The (1939)

 The Wizard of Oz (1939, reissued 1998) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Judy
Garland, Ray Bolger, Jack Haley, Bert Lahr, Frank Morgan, Margaret Hamilton
and Billie Burke.
 A Kansas farmgirl, unhappy with her life, runs away from home, gets caught
in a storm and winds up in a strange land where she is helped by some
friendly, but vertically challenged people and harassed by an older woman
sorely lacking in social skills and suffering from a phobia about houses.
 The young girl embarks upon a quest to find her way home. Along the way
she is helped by three kindly strangers, a befuddled individual who
continually falls apart in a crisis; a stout, but cold gentleman who's a
bit rusty at heroics; and a mangy coward whose bark is worse than his bite.
 The quartet seek help from a powerful, but mysterious person who may be
able to solve all their problems.
 In the end, of course, the four, through many trials and tribulations,
learn themselves about their own true worth and that "there's no place like
home."
 What we're referring to, of course, is The Wizard of Oz. And unless you've
been locked in solitary confinment for the past 40-plus years or have been
living with some cult that shuns modern applicances, you know this story as
well as any fairy tale from the Brothers Grimm or Hans Christian Andersen.
 For the first time in almost 50 years, you can see one of the most beloved
movies of all time on the big screen, remastered and remixed - that means
the picture and sound have been improved.
 The question is, Why should I pay money at the theater to see a movie I
already have on video (or laserdisc)?
 The answer is simple: Nothing is as magical as a movie theater when the
lights dim and the opening credits fade in. Sure, you know the story, you
can sing along with the songs, you may even know every word of dialogue.
 But seeing Judy Garland at her young and innocent peak on the big screen
before she began that long slide that eventually landed her over the
rainbow for eternity is an experience not to be missed.
 On the big screen you will be able to really appreciate the sets and
costumes, and especially that wonderful moment when Dorothy steps from her
drab black-and-white world into the Technicolor splendor of the wonderful
land of Oz.
 Seeing The Wizard of Oz in a movie theater, the way God and Louis B. Mayer
intended you to see it, is like being at Cape Canaveral for a space shuttle
launch instead of watching it on television.
 It's an emotional, once-in-a-lifetime event that you will later regret you
missed.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Quills (2000)

 Quills (2000). 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Geoffrey Rush, Michael
Caine, Kate Winslett and Joaquin Phoenix. Written by Doug Wright, based
upon his play. Directed by Philip Kaufman. Rated R.
I  have no objection to movies that try to send a message or make a
pertinent point about the integrity of the artist or freedom of
expression.
 What I canít abide, though, are films that do it in such a
heavy-handed, obvious manner that it seems condescending to the
audience.
 With a screenplay by Doug Wright, based upon his play, and direction by
Philip Kaufman, Quills is at times riveting, disturbing and provocative.
 But it also is obvious. The story revolves around the last days of the
infamous Marquis de Sade (Geoffrey Rush), locked up in the Charenton
Asylum, but still allowed quills and ink to write his shocking and
explicit novels.
 Emperor Napoleon, disgusted by de Sadeís writings, orders Dr.
Royer-Collard (Michael Caine), a conservative moralist, to oversee the
asylum and cure de Sade by any means possible.
 At the asylum, Abbe Coulmier (Joaquin Phoenix) uses more humanitarian
methods to try to reach those mentally defectives incarcerated in his
institution. He encourages painting and theater, plays staged and
written by de Sade, in the hopes of soothing the demons within his
charges.
 Where Quills missteps is in the portrayal of Royer-Collard. He is so
obviously one-dimensional  hypocritical, venal, capricious,
small-minded  that the scales are automatically tilted in favor of de
Sade, no matter how abominable you may find his writings.
 De Sade is fighting for freedom of expression  no matter the subject,
no matter the cost. Royer-Collard is the symbol for those who want to
stifle that freedom and make everyone conform to what the state
considers the norm.
 Who in their right mind could favor Royer-Collard's position?
 Wright and Kaufman have so stacked the deck that Caine has no chance of
creating any understanding of his character or his position. Wright and
Kaufman fail to instill one iota of decency or compassion within
Royer-Collard.
 And this is grossly unfair and totally undermines their argument.
  Rushís de Sade is a flamboyant rabble-rouser who believes his writings
are art that forces his readers to examine their souls and convictions.
 Rush does not portray the marquis as a dirty old man, but rather as a
singular, hedonistic visionary who fervently believes pleasure is no
sin.
 Caine does his best with what Wright and Kaufman have given him. His
Royer-Collard is cold and calculating.
 Kate Winslett portrays Madeleine, the asylum laundress who is de Sadeís
courier to the outside world. She smuggles the marquisí writings to his
publisher's agent by hiding the papers in her laundry basket.
 In exchange the marquis reads his works to her, as well as teaches her
to read and write.
 Phoenix instills his cleric with benevolence and mercy. He also
displays his battles with temptation as he fights his attraction toward
Madeleine.
 Kaufman stages some rather interesting sequences, including one in
which de Sade, stripped of quill and ink, arranges a relay system in
which his latest work is passed on from inmate to inmate until it
reaches Madeleine, who transcribes it.
 Toward the end, Quills falters as it becomes a gross depiction of
torture and humiliation, almost a chapter from a de Sade novel.
 Quills is a rather interesting feature. If only Wright and Kaufman had
not been so fervent is trumpeting their message. A little more balance
would have gone a long way toward making Quills a much better cinematic
argument.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. Other
reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com at golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database at: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Angela's Ashes (1999)
Angela's Ashes (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Emily Watson,
Robert Carlyle, Joe Breen, Ciaran Owens and Michael Legge. Written by
Alan Parker and Laura Jones. Directed by Parker.
 In a strange, almost perverse way, "Angela's Ashes" is a feel-good
movie. You stumble out of the theater after watching two-plus hours
about one family coping with a poverty level that is unimaginable to
most of us, and you want to clasp your hands and whisper a prayer to
whatever deity you worship, thanking him (or her) for whatever bounties
you have.
 Many will find the abject misery displayed in this adaptation of Frank
McCourt's Pulitzer Prize-winning memoir hard to ingest.
 What keeps the movie from being unbearably morose is the bits of humor
displayed throughout the proceedings. Even amidst the most dire of
circumstances - and as long as they are together - the McCourts can
rummage for scraps of happiness.
 Director Alan Parker's adaptation is wet and bleak. Death is a constant
neighbor, hunger a daily playmate, despair a daily companion.
 Set mostly in Limerick, Ireland, in the 1930s and 40s, "Angela's
Ashes" almost revels in the displaying the hardships endured by the
McCourts.
 Children are born, then die.  The local church is no help, neither are
the local charities who would rather judge than assist.
 Part of the problem is simple prejudice. Malachy McCourt (Robert
Carlyle) is a Protestant from Belfast. But his wife, Angela (Emily
Watson) is a Catholic girl from Limerick. In a nation with such
sectarian hatred and religious divisiveness as Ireland, such a union is
scandalous.
 Plus, Malachy is a wastrel. He drinks and cannot hold a job. His only
function is to entertain his children with tall tales and legends from
Irish history.
 The McCourts are a family, as an adult Frank narrates, that do things
backwards. 
 The family leaves the slums of Brooklyn, N.Y., to return to a harsher,
more unforgiving live back in Limerick.
 Parker presents all the wants and hunger and humiliations suffered by
the McCourts with a journalist's objectivity. It would have been so easy
to transform "Angela's Ashes" into a maudlin tear-jerker in which you
could only feel sorry for this pitiful family.
 Yet Parker creates - not a nobility - but an admirable fortitude so
that you feel uncomfortable pitying the McCourts.
 The film's performances are splendid. Watson, with her saintly visage,
seems so soft, yet she is a woman of indomitable strength who goes to
any lengths, makes any sacrifice to keep her family together and a roof
over its head.
 Carlyle is a dreamer, a drunkard, but not really a bad man. He is weak
and overwhelmed, proud and stubborn. Yet he is a loving and caring
father and husband.
 Three young actors portray Frank at various stages and the
transformation from one to the other is seamless. All three - Joe Breen
(Young Frank, age 5 to 8), Ciaran Owens (Middle Frank, age 10 to 13) and
Michael Legge (Older Frank), all display the gaunt, hollow-eyed, gnawing
pangs that constant hunger creates. But they all also show spirit and an
energy that allows Frank to constantly battle back.
 In the beginning, the film's narrator intones the opening of McCourt's
book: `When I look back on my childhood, I wonder how my brothers and I
managed to survive at all. It was ... a miserable childhood; the happy
childhood is hardly worth your while. Worse than the ordinary miserable
childhood is the miserable Irish childhood; and worse yet is the
miserable Irish Catholic childhood.'
 Parker, who adapted McCourt's book with Laura Jones, has been able to
transform misery into near poetry.
 Some of the pieces in "Angela's Ashes" will leave you depressed, some
may sicken and sadden. But - in the end - it will inspire.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)

 Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999). 3 1/2 stars out of 4.
Starring Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Jake Lloyd, Natalie Portman and Samuel
L. Jackson. Written and directed by George Lucas.
 Something eerie happened when the 20th Century Fox theme blared from the
screen and those magical words, "A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away"
appeared.
 I felt an adrenaline rush, and I leaned forward in my seat.
 Then the familiar strains of John Williams "Star Wars" theme blasted from
the screen and I felt myself drawn into that mythical world created almost
a quarter of a century ago by George Lucas.
 "Star Wars: Episode 1 - The Phantom Menace" is not a great film, but it is
magical and majestic.
 Many people will dismiss it as an overblown, kiddie, Saturday matinee
popcorn confection. And they would be right.
 And that is exactly what makes "The Phantom Menace" a wonderful viewing
experience. It is a movie that resurrects the child in all of us. It
recalls a time of innocence in movies in which a clear demarcation existed
between the good guys and the bad guys.
 Like its predecessors, especially the first "Star Wars" movie from 1977,
"The Phantom Menace" evokes a feeling of nostalgia, which is ironic, since
it is one of the most technologically advanced features ever brought to the
screen.
 More than 2,000 effects were used in this 130-minute fantasy, yet the
movie does not feel cold or sterile.
 "The Phantom Menace" is a two-hour-plus appetizer, produced to whet our
expectations for the saga to follow. That also is the movie's main
drawback.
 It's more of a history lesson, a primer. Its main purpose is to introduce
us to its characters and explain a little about them.
 The movie is like those briefings combat pilots get before flying sorties.
They are shown the lay of the land and its outstanding landmarks in order
to familiarize themselves with the topography. The only difference is that
"The Phantom Menace" is much more enjoyable.
 The main objective of "The Phantom Menace" - besides being rousing
entertainment - is to show the beginnings of the downfall of the old
Republic as well as the machinations that lead to the rise of the evil
Galactic Empire.
 Along the way we are introduced to younger versions of characters we have
met or heard about in the first trilogy: a young slave boy named Anakin
Skywalker; the Jedi master Yoda; a young Jedi apprentice named Obi-Wan
Kenobi, a work-in-progress protocol droid named C-3PO and a feisty, round
little droid called R2-D2.
 We also meet some new characters: the Jedi Knight Qui-Gon Jinn, young
Queen Amidala of Naboo, Jar Jar Binks, a clumsy, childlike amphibious being
belonging to an underwater race called the Gungans, Darth Maul, a Dark Lord
of Sith who wields a double-edged light saber, and Lord Sidious, his
master, who stays in the shadows as he plots to overthrow the Republic.
 Lucas fills "The Phantom Menace" with much exposition, but it is balanced
with various and spectacular action sequences and jaw-dropping vistas.
 One of the most awe-inspiring scenes involves a pod race won by the young
Anakin. It is the consummate high-tech drag race, inspired by its creator's
fond memories of his hot-rodding youth.
 And, of course, what would a "Star Wars" film be without the obligatory
dogfight in space. As usual, computer-generated vehicles roll, dive and
soar like miniature hawks.
 Lucas has been accused of lavishing more time on his props and computer
effects than on his human actors.
 And while a case can be made that he seems to have left Liam Neeson as
Qui-Gon Jinn and Ewan McGregor as young Obi-Wan to their own devices, it
appears he put in many hours with young Jake Lloyd (Anakin) and Natalie
Portman (Queen Amidala).
 Neeson gives a stalwart, dignified performance as the veteran Jedi. But he
has played larger-than-life characters before ("Rob Roy," "Les Miserables,"
"Schindler's List"), so he is familiar with the territory.
 McGregor ("Trainspotting," "A Life Less Ordinary") is one of the finest
young actors in movies today. And judging by his previous performances, he
also has an intelligence and instinct that leads him to make the correct
choices. However, to be fair, he really has little to do except say, "Yes,
Master,"" over and over to Qui-Gon, as well as engage in various laser
saber battles.
 With young Lloyd, Lucas walks a tricky path. Anakin, ostensibly, is the
movie's hero. Lloyd is charming, confident and endearing, but ...
 This is the boy who, when he becomes an adult, is corrupted to accept the
Dark Side and is transformed into Darth Vader, one of the most memorable
villains in movie history.
 Lucas underscores this at time through the music of John Williams, who has
created a resounding score. His Anakin's theme is a bit pastoral, yet
undermining it are hints of the Darth Vader theme from the first "Star
Wars" trilogy.
 Portman is regal and resourceful as the young queen, and it will be
interesting to see her mature if she retains the role in the two sequels.
 Also bringing heart to the proceedings is Pernilla August as Anakin's
mother. Their scenes together are poignant, the best in the movie.
 Also on hand are the vocal talents of Frank Oz as Yoda and, in what
amounts to a cameo, Samuel L. Jackson as Mace Windu, a member of the Jedi
Council.
 Unfortunately, Jackson has little to do except sit, ponder and issue dire
warnings about Anakin's future.
 The real stars of "The Phantom Menace" are the thousands of
behind-the-scenes people at Industrial Light and Magic who brought Lucas'
creations to life.
 This movie is a good 95-plus percent computer-generated effects. Yet the
characters, especially Jar Jar Binks as well as the rest of the Gungan,
seem so real, so human, that you soon forget they are pixels and bytes.
 "The Phantom Menace" is a rip-roarin' good time. Like its predecessors,
it's a throwback to an earlier era in movie history, while at the same time
it is in the vanguard of a cinematic future in which computers will create
worlds and landscapes we could only imagine.
 The Force is alive and well and beats strongly in "The Phantom Menace."
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
 Eccentric families are a movie staple dating to the screwball comedies of
the 1930s.
 But in these more complex times the family dynamics are more complicated.
Humor can still be mined from the family situation, but it's harder to hit
a mother lode these days.
 Slums of Beverly Hills does come close though. Told through the eyes of
15-year-old Vivian Abramowitz (Natasha Lyonne), the story centers on the
family's constant struggle for a better lifestyle, as typified by Vivian's
father, Murray (Alan Arkin), who is constantly moving the family from one
cheap apartment to another, albeit all in the Beverly Hills School
District.
 Murray is one of life's losers. He's a former restaurant owner turned car
salesman. He lives mostly off the charity of his older brother, Mickey.
 Murray's one goal is to be able to maintain a lifestyle that will allow
his kids to stay in the school district. After all, he reasons about their
constant moves, "furniture is temporary, education is forever."
 All this turmoil is not helping Vivian. She's a "late bloomer" who is not
too happy with her new bodily contours. Also upsetting is the fact that
it's the center of family discussion among her father and two brothers.
 To the rescue comes Rita (Marisa Tomei), the family's crazy cousin who
recently escaped from a drug rehabilitation center.
 To get more money from Mickey, Murray promises to look after Rita and help
get her straightened out.
 Rita, in her own unorthodox way, is an affirmative influence for Vivian,
helping her realize the positives about herself as well as helping her
understand her budding sexuality.
 Slums of Beverly Hills is an eccentric comedy written and directed by
Tamara Jenkins. The movie marks Jenkins' feature debut, and if Slums is any
indication of her talent, she is a filmmaker who will be making an impact.
 Her writing is witty, sharp and crisp. Her directorial style is direct,
ignoring the fancy camera angles and movements used by many young,
first-time directors who use the camera more as a toy than as a part of the
filmmaking process.
 Her characters are multitextured and all too human.
 Murray, for example, is both comical and a bit tragic. Yet as played by
the wonderful Alan Arkin, he is someone you respect even as you pity his
situation. Near the film's finale, Jenkins stages a wonderful scene in an
airport restaurant in which Murray insists on picking up the check for
breakfast.
 He is rebuked and belittled in front of his children by Mickey (a jovial
venal Carl Reiner) for trying to play the big shot since whatever money
Murray has ultimately came from Mickey.
 Jenkins elicits strong performances from Lyonne and Tomei. Despite their
age difference the two are more like sisters than cousins. They even have
their own special, secret language.
 You root for this family to rise above its problems. Despite a less than
happy outcome, the family at least remains intact, its members having
strengthened their bonds.
 Slums of Beverly Hills is an interesting, comedy-drama. It will make you
laugh and at times it may shock you. You may even recognize aspects of your
own family in the Abramowitz clan.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)

 The Talented Mr. Ripley (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Matt Damon,
Gwyenth Paltrow, Jude Law, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Cate Blanchett, Jack
Davenport and James Rebhorn. Written and directed by Anthony Minghella.
 Tom Ripley's credo is simple: It's better to be a fake somebody than a
real nobody.
 That drive to shed his own personality and put on the persona of another
is the crux of "The Talented Mr. Ripley."
 The movie, based on the cult novel by Patricia Highsmith, is an
intelligent thriller about a nobody who goes to fatal lengths to become a
somebody.
 By mistake, piano player-tuner Tom Ripley (Matt Damon) is mistaken by
shipping magnate Herbert Greenleaf (James Rebhorn) as a fellow Harvard
graduate of his son, Dickie. Little does Greenleaf know that Tom works as a
men's room attendant.
 It seems Dickie (Jude Law) does not want to enter the family's shipping
business, so he is living and playing in Italy, ignorning his father's
entreaties to return home.
 Tom is offered $1,000 plus expenses to go to Italy and persuade Dickie to
return home.
 Instead, Tom falls in love with Dickie's lifestyle, determining that this
is the way he wants to live.
 But every fairy tale must come to an end, thus it is with Tom and Dickie.
 Dickie, who is spoiled, self-centered and a bit cruel, begins tiring of
Tom and sends him packing.
 Tom and Dickie fight and during the scuffle Dickie is killed.
 Thus, Tom flees to Rome where is able to begin a new life as Dickie Greenleaf.
 The joy of Oscar-winner Anthony Minghella's movie is watching the webs Tom
continually spins, the lies he constantly gets caught in and the way he
always extricates himself from the most perilous situations without
exposing himself.
 Minghella's Ripley differs from Highsmith's in one crucial sense:
Minghella's Ripley is not as amoral or cold-blooded as the novel's.
 For example, Dickie's death is a spur of the moment crime of passion and
rage rather than a calculated act.
 In a sense this allows you to feel some sympathy for Ripley, while at the
same time you can abhor his actions and immorality.
 In Damon's hands, Ripley is a gawky outsider, his nose always pressed
against the window, watching the rich play, envying them their position.
 Ripley has a few talents, including mimicry and forgery, both which abet
him in his quest for the riches he so badly desires.
 Damon plays Ripley as a sycophant, a parasitic hanger-on with an air of
naivete. He lacks the worldiness and sophistication of those around him.
Yet he is always willing and eager to please.
 Oscar-winner Gwyneth Paltrow makes a sweet Marge Sherwood, Dickie's
fiance. She is warmer, more compassionate than Dickie, opening her arms to
the young stranger who latches on them.
 Yet after Dickie's disappearance she hardens and becomes determined to
uncover the truth.
 Minghella has turned the book into a sort of class struggle with Ripley
taking whatever extremes necessary to raise himself and remain in a sphere
that otherwise would be out of his reach.
 Jazz also plays a role in the movie. Tom, a classical pianist, studies and
memorizes various jazz works in order to get close to Dickie. And the way
Minghella has Damon deliver some of Tom's explanations about events make
them sound like jazz riffs as he covers his tracks.
 "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is a very pretty movie, the scenery, sets and
costumes covering the underlying darkness of Tom's obsession.
 It is a long movie, nearly two hours and 20 minutes, but the time passes
quickly as Tom flies from one seemingly impossible dilemma to another
without so much as taking a deep breath.
 Offering able support are Philip Seymour Hoffman as Freddie Miles,
Dickie's fey friend, Cate Blanchett as Meredith, the young woman who loves
Tom/Dickie without realizing his deception and Jack Davenport as Peter
Smith-Kingsley, who befriends Tom without realizing his true intentions.
 "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is sure-fire entertainment, a solid piece of
filmmaking. To his credit, Minghella takes his time telling the story,
allowing us to get to know the characters before igniting the main
storyline.
 You will walk out of "The Talented Mr. Ripley" unsure of your feelings
about young Tom. You can be outraged by his lack of morality and shocked by
his behavior, but deep down - in that dark place only you can see - you may
find a spark of admiration.
 And that is the genius of Minghella's movie.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Snow Day (2000)
Snow Day (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Chevy Chase, Mary Kay
Place and Chris Elliott.
 "Snow Day" is a cartoonish feature that has the look and feel of a
made-for-TV movie.
 The characters are stock, the situations are cliched. The movie plays
more like one of those old "ABC Afterschool Specials" than a theatrical
release.
 One basic problem is the movie is unsure to which audience its wants to
pander, the younger kids or teen-agers. So, it offers a goulash of both,
satisfying neither.
 The best indicator of the reception this film will likely receive from
the under-10 set came from a little boy sitting a couple rows in front
of me at a preview screening.
 He punctuated the theater with a loud `yuk' three times. Each
exclamation followed a kissing scene between two teen-age characters.
 At just about 90 minutes, Snow Day moves at a brisk pace. But the story
is fragmented and is populated by types, not real people - or even real
kids.
 There's the geek who has a crush on the popular, beautiful girl; his
best friend, a pretty, honest girl who has a crush on him; the stupid,
jock boyfriend; the younger, but wiser, sister; the fat friend who emits
a symphony of sounds; and the buffoonish school principal everyone
hates.
 "Snow Day," a co-production between Nickelodeon and Paramount Pictures,
is strictly by-the-numbers filmmaking.
 And in a sense, the film, though meant to be slapstick and a bit of a
fantasy, is somewhat irresponsible. For example, a group of young kids -
elementary school age - want a second snow day. To get it, they kidnap
`Snowplow Man' (Chris Elliott in a comically disgusting turn) and
commandeer his snowplow. Showing youngsters driving around in heavy
machinery is not my idea of a smart move.
 However, the kids are charming, and the film contains barely enough
action and gags to sustain it.
 "Snow Day" is aimed at an audience the filmmakers condescendingly think
are too young to have an opinion. But three `yuks' should tell them
something.
 Maybe they should have canned the romance and filmed more snowball
fights.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
 Images are the dominant motif in The Governess, an interesting period
piece by first-time director Sandra Goldbacher, who also wrote the script.
 Many of the shots in Goldbacher's story view the protagonists reflected in
mirrors, through a camera lens, or some other object.
 That is because The Governess is a study of people wanting to change their
image and of how they want people to see them.
 Rosina Da Silva (Minnie Driver) is a Sephardic Jewish woman living within
the warmth and love of her family in London in the 1840s. Then her world is
turned upside down when her father is murdered.
 In debt, Rosina, to provide for her family, decides to create a new
identity, Mary Blackchurch, and accept a job as a governess to a family
living on a remote Scottish island.
 There she goes to work for the Cavendish family, who are the usual
assortment of Victorian dysfunctionals. Rosina/Mary's pupil, Clementina
(Florence Hoath), is precocious, spoiled and craves attention. Mrs.
Cavendish (Harriet Walter) is bored and snobbish, treating her new employee
with the utmost condescension. Mr. Cavendish (Tom Wilkinson) spends most of
the day cooped up in his laboratory completely absorbed in his pioneering
studies of photography.
 Before you can say Charlotte Bronte, Mary has won over Clementina and
formed an uneasy friendship with Mr. Cavendish, who notices her interests
and aptitude in the natural sciences.
 As quickly as you can say Jane Eyre, Mary is helping Mr. Cavendish - she
now calls him Charles - in his work, and soon after they are helping each
other undress.
 Of course, this being the Victorian era, Charles is one of those repressed
types who pours all his emotion into his work. Though he is in infatuated
with Mary, he also mistreats her for diverting his passions from his
studies to her.
 Added to the mix is the Cavendishes' black sheep son, Henry (Jonathan Rhys
Meyers), sent home from university in disgrace. He, too, becomes smitten
with Mary to the point of obsession. His curiosity about her leads him to
discover her secret.
 As often happens in such melodramas, the lovers part and Rosina returns to
London where she begins a new life as a photographer, recording the people
in her Jewish community.
 The Governess is a bleak movie. Goldbacher keeps her colors muted to fit
the tone of the story.
 She derives a fiery performance from Driver, who is all-consumed by her
new-found passion for Charles.
 Wilkinson is rigid and tightly would as the introspective inventor who
finds his newly-awakened desires an unbearable intrusion upon his
experiments.
 Together Driver and Wilkinson form an odd alliance of heart and mind, or
the sensual and the logical.
 Where Goldbacher's story fails is in the buildup to the relationship
between the two. It happens too quickly, and we are not sure - beside their
common interest in science - what could drive such two opposites to begin
such a fruitless venture.
 The Governess, however, is a compelling period melodrama that touches a
bit on the anti-Semitism faced by London's Jewish populace and the
sacrifices and compromises some chose in order to grab what few
opportunities the world afforded.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
You can e-mail him at bloom@journal-courier.com or at cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back (2001)
JAY AND SILENT BOB STRIKE BACK (2001) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Jason Mewes,
Kevin Smith, Ben Affleck, Shannon Elizabeth, Will Ferrell, Jason Lee, Chris
Rock, Ali Larter, Brian Christopher O'Halloran, Seann William Scott, George
Lucas, Carrie Fisher and Mark Hamill. Written and directed by Kevin Smith. Rated
R. 
Jay and Silent Bob Strike Back can rightfully be subtitled "Kevin Smith's
Greatest Hits" for the film is comprised of numerous references and characters
from Smith's earlier works including, Clerks, Mall Rats. Chasing Amy and Dogma.
So, be advised: Bone up on that cinematic quartet in order to achieve the
maximum enjoyment from Smith's latest outing. 
Kevin Smith must be a very likable person because several good sports took a ton
of kidding in this feature, most notably Miramax, the studio whose subsidiary,
Dimension Films, is Jay and Silent Bob's distributor. Others deserving accolades
include Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, directors Gus Van Zant and Wes Craven and the
mighty George Lucas. 
This is a laugh-filled, foul-mouthed road film with Jay (Jason Mewes) and Silent
Bob (Smith) hitching to Hollywood to sabotage Miramax's production of Bluntman
and Chronic, comic book characters based on the two Jersey slackers. 
Jay's convoluted reasoning is that if the film is shut down, people on the
Internet will stop insulting him and Bob, even though it is not him and Bob the
people are dissing, but rather their comic book counterparts. 
No matter, the duo begin their long trek hitching rides across the country. But
first they get some tips from a veteran hitchhiker, played by George Carlin, who
tells them to follow "the book" - the rules of the road. 
Of course Jay's interpretation immediately gets the duo in trouble with a
friendly nun (Carrie Fisher) who offers them a ride. 
Jay and Silent Bob contains enough laughs that the movie's weaker aspects -
which include a lame subplot about a girl gang of diamond thieves as well as a
buffoonish federal park ranger played by Will Ferrell - can be easily tolerated.
Really, how can you not laugh at a film in which our heroes are picked up by the
Mystery Van, and Jay has a pot-induced hallucination concerning Velma and
Daphne. 
The movie's highlight, though, is near the finale. In Hollywood, Jay and Silent
Bob sneak onto the Miramax lot where they crash the set and are mistaken for
extras of the latest Affleck-Damon picture, Good Will Hunting 2: Hunting Season.
Here we are privy to a hilarious conversation between Affleck and Damon in which
the two put down each other's careers and film choices. 
And the laughs continue to grow. Next up is Jason (American Pie) Biggs and James
(Dawson's Creek) Van der Beek, the actors chosen to portray Bluntman and
Chronic. The pair mistake Jay and Silent Bob for their stunt doubles. 
Finally, comes a Star Wars homage featuring one of the stars of that legendary
feature. This bit will leave you howling. 
Smith's obvious affection for pop culture icons is evident in the way he shoots
these scenes and handles his performers. He allows them to play it all
tongue-in-cheek. Their fun comes through the screen to the audience. 
It is too bad that this is Jay and Silent Bob's swan song. The characters have
grown since their supporting role debuts in Clerks. But Smith realizes that
times have changed, and he doesn't want his creations to overstay their welcome.
So Smith has provided them with just the right kind of exit, saving the best for
last. 
Goodbye Jay and Silent Bob. At least you're going out with a blast. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
 American History X (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Edward Norton,
Edward Furlong, Stacy Keach, Avery Brooks, Beverly D'Angelo and Elliott
Gould. Directed by Tony Kaye.
 American History X is a brutal, saddening story of hate and the bitter
fruit it sows.
 The movie is a powerful and disturbing drama about prejudice, its
consequences and family.
 And director Tony Kaye gets right in your face with his message. Much of
the movie is shot in close-up, so you can look these people in the eyes.
 The drama centers around two brothers, Derek (Edward Norton) and Danny
(Edward Furlong). The story is narrated by Danny, who idolizes his older
brother.
 Derek, following the death of his firefighting father - who was shot while
battling a blaze at a crack house - succumbs to a philosophy of hate and is
transformed into a charismatic leader of a white power movement.
 Derek is sent to prison for murder. There, he goes through a process of
self-discovery, realizing that what he thought he knew and what he was
taught by Cameron (Stacy Keach), the behind-the-scenes manipulator of the
skinheads, is bogus.
 Released from prison after three years, Derek arrives home and finds Danny
starting to trod Derek's old path - hanging around with Cameron and the
other skinhead losers.
 Derek works to dissuade Danny from that life of hatred, trying to convince
him of the lies and intolerance spewed by Cameron.
 Danny, meanwhile, must rewrite a school paper for his history class
because the one he wrote on Mein Kampf - at Cameron's urging - was
rejected. The principal orders him to write about Derek, how he feels about
him and the events leading to Derek's incarceration.
 Through this process, and through talks with Derek, Danny slowly comes to
realize the truth - that the venom spewed by Cameron and his ilk creates
nothing but misery.
 Kaye and screenwriter David McKenna spare no one as the sins of one
brother are visited upon the other.
 Many disturbing scenes, especially the trashing of a Korean-owned grocery
story, will leave you breathless in their mindless violence.
 Norton gives a powerful performance, his best since his stunning debut in
Primal Fear. He shows Derek's intelligence, his charisma and his
commitment, both to the cause to which he thought he believed and, after
his release from prison, his resolve to extract his brother from the
ill-fated path he followed.
 Norton's performance is of Academy-Award caliber.
 Furlong, best remembered as young John Conner from Terminator 2: Judgment
Day, brings a sense of confusion mixed with adulation to his role as the
impressionable younger brother.
 With his skinhead haircut and slit-eyed glance, one can see the virus of
hate planted in the boy begin to grow. When Danny is around Derek, his
entire posture changes. He is more the young, adoring brother hanging on
every word said by his older sibling.
 There is a powerful moment when the brothers take down all the hate
literature and Nazi paraphernalia hanging in their bedroom. No words are
needed. Their actions say it all.
 Later, Derek stares long and hard at the large, black swastika tattooed
over his heart, with a look combining regret and shame. Again, without a
word, Derek places his hand over his heart in order to obliterate the foul
reminder of his past life.
 Kaye has gathered a rather impressive cast. Keach, as Cameron, is, in
Derek's words, "a chicken hawk," preying on young dissatisfied minds to
convert to his cause, sending them out to do his dirty work while he stays
in the shadows. Keach speaks in calm, low, soothing tones, pouring his ugly
philosophy into the ears of boys such as Danny. He is a snake in human
form.
 Avery Brooks, as the school's principal and Derek's former teacher, is a
rock of integrity, a man who wants to help the brothers regain their moral
equilibrium.
 Beverly D'Angelo and Elliott Gould are featured as the brothers' mother
and her would-be suitor. Gould's Murray, a liberal Jewish teacher, is
driven away by Derek's racist and anti-Semitic tirades.
 Kaye refuses to allow a happy ending. Tragedy, built from hate and
bigotry, strikes Derek's family, and the consequences of his earlier
actions are brought home in the most brutal manner.
 American History X is not a comfortable movie. It will make you squirm. It
will shock and disgust you. But most of all it will sadden you. The movie
is a fine treatise on hate, a movie that should not and cannot be ignored.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Ride with the Devil (1999/I)
Ride With the Devil (1999) 1 star out of 4. Starring Tobey Maguire,
Skeet Ulrich, Jewel and Jeffrey Wright. Directed by Ang Lee.
 "Ride With the Devil," an overwrought Civil War melodrama, is a very
long and boring trot.
 The mediocre offering from director Ang Lee is a major misfire, a big
disappointment that will do nothing to further the career of its two
main stars, Tobey Maguire and Skeet Ulrich.
 Nor will Jewel probably want to add her lackluster film debut to her
resume.
 This wounded turkey lacks focus and a point. Is it about the futility
of war? Is it a story of accepting responsibility? Or is it a tale of
brotherhood?
 Who knows. Who cares. Director Lee, best known for his fine work on
"Eat Drink Man Woman," "Sense and Sensibility" and "The Ice Storm,"
seems lost as he tries to handle this potboiler that looks at the war
from the point of view of two Missouri youths who join the Bushwhacker
guerrilla movement to protect their state from being overrun by
Jayhawkers and federal troops.
 The stilted dialogue sounds like it was ripped from the pages of some
failed romance novel.
 None of the main actors shows any personality or spark. When not
skirmishing with the enemy, they sit around a lot just chewing the fat,
boring us to death.
 The movie's bright spot belongs to Jeffrey Wright as Daniel Holt, a
former slave who chooses to fight with the Southern sympathizers. Holt
is the only character who shows any complexity or dimension.
 Ulrich, especially, with an accent dripping with molasses, sounds like
a refugee from a road show company of "Gone With the Wind." His
mannerisms are such sickening affectations that you find it hard to
believe Lee actually allowed his cinematographer to film his scenes.
 Maguire seems to spend most of his time pouting, when he's not shooting
people or talking endlessly about family and honor.
 The only positive about "Ride With the Devil" is the scenery. Otherwise
this is one Civil War drama that should be gone with the wind.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
 Nurse Betty (2000) 4 stars out of 4. Starring Renee Zellweger, Morgan
Freeman, Greg Kinnear and Chris Rock. Screenplay by John C. Richards &
James Flamberg. Story by Richards. Directed by Neil LaBute. Rated R.
 Sometimes a movie comes along that is so special, so out of the
ordinary that you want to embrace it as tightly as a long-lost relative.
 Such a film is "Nurse Betty," a whimsical fairy tale as fragile and
spunky as its heroine. It is a movie with Oscar contender stamped all
over it.
 Betty Sizemore (Renee Zellweger) is a sweet, young woman, a waitress in
the Tip Top, a small restaurant in Fair Oaks, Kan. She is married to
Del, a used car dealer with all the stereotypical vices associated with
those in that maligned profession.
 Betty's one vice is her addiction to the soap opera "A Reason to Love,"
and her devotion to its hero, Dr. David Ravell.
 One night, while in another part of the house watching a tape of her
soap, Del is in the living room negotiating a shady business deal with
two men, Charlie (Morgan Freeman) and Wesley (Chris Rock). The pair turn
out to be hitmen who dispatch Del because he stole a package belonging
to their employer.
 The brutality of the situations sends Betty into a fantasy world in
which she believes she is the long-lost fiancé of famous heart surgeon
Dr. David Ravell, and she decides to drive to Los Angeles to find him
and rekindle their relationship.
 So, Betty packs her bags and hops into a Buick LeSabre taken from her
late husband's car lot and drives off. Coincidentally, and unknown by
Betty, the item Charlie and Wesley seek is secreted in the car.
 Thus, while Betty begins her odyssey to L.A., Charlie and Wesley set
forth on one of their own seeking clues to the whereabouts of the
elusive woman.
 Once in the land of dreams, Betty transforms herself into Nurse Betty,
gets a job at a hospital, makes a friend and acquires a roommate at the
same time, and begins her quest to find her Dr. David.
 Fate is kind, and Betty comes face to face with her dream lover. In a
scene reminiscent of Peter Sellers' "Being There," Betty begins quoting
dialogue from old episodes of "A Reason to Love" to Dr. David, actually
actor George McCord (Greg Kinnear), who believing she is a determined
actress seeking a role on the soap, plays along as Dr. David.
 That is about as much of the plot as I care to reveal without spoiling
the rest of this Capraesque story. Let us just say that Betty fulfills
her dreams.
 One of the ironies of "Nurse Betty" is that it is directed by Neil
LaBute, who helmed such cynical offerings as "In the Company of Men" and
"Your Friends & Neighbors." "Nurse Betty" does not quite seem the
material for a director who has such a bleak outlook on the human
condition.
 But LaBute pulls it off. He treats Betty with love and respect, neither
mocking nor criticizing her mental state.
 This is not to say the movie is light fare. It has an edge and LaBute
stages some harrowing scenes of violence.
 As Betty, Zellweger gives an outstanding performance. Within the
parameters of her manufactured world she acts rationally, sanely and
with utter conviction. She tightropes that thin line between sanity and
psychosis with the aplomb of a veteran acrobat. I rooted for her,
wanting to see her achieve happiness.
 Zellweger's performance is charming. It is a turn that could - and
should - bring her an Academy Award nomination if not the statue itself.
 Freeman's performance is wonderfully smart and controlled. As a veteran
hit man who takes pride in his work, he gradually falls in love with
Betty as he tracks her across the country.
 Freeman is one of those actors who elevates weak material merely by his
presence. Presented with well-written material as in "Nurse Betty," his
work is stellar, whether it be lecturing his partner, Wesley, about the
lack of work ethic in the country, or musing about Betty and wondering
what kind of woman she really is. This is another possible Oscar
contender.
 Kinnear also does sterling work as the soap opera star caught up in
Betty's fantasy. Kinnear has the difficult task of playing an actor
acting on a soap opera. And, when with Betty, he must, as George, act in
character as David. He captures the self-centeredness of the actor
perfectly.
 Rock is all hair-trigger impatience and attitude as Wesley. He spews
some funny, biting lines, yet despite his overall violent nature, he is
a rather impulsive, but likable character.
 "Nurse Betty's" script, with a screenplay by John C. Richards and James
Flamberg, based on a story by Richards, is delicious with its double
meanings and cultural insights.
 "Nurse Betty" is like an oasis in a cinematic desert. Finally, finally,
a movie that I can recommend without hesitation has reached the
theaters. "Nurse Betty" is a must-see experience, a winning trifecta of
acting, writing and directing.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found posted on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Brokedown Palace (1999)
 If I were pitching "Brokedown Palace" to a movie producer, I could do it
in one sentence: "Midnight Express" meets "Chicks in Chains," MTV-style.
 In other words, this turgid melodrama is derivative of every other movie
involving Americans jailed in Third World prisons.
 There is not an original frame of celluloid in this tripe, which is aimed
at impressionable, MTV-watching young girls who movie executives hope swoon
over Claire Danes and would enjoy watching her suffer nobly.
 "Brokedown Palace" also commits the cardinal sin of being boring.
 The two young women caught in this dire predicament are so self-absorbed
and naive that you really can't muster any sympathy for them.
 Danes and Kate Beckinsale portray Alice and Darlene, recent high school
graduates who decide to have one last summer of fun before going off to
college. The girls are told about scenic Thailand, where they can enjoy
themselves for weeks for a mere $500.
 Of course, the girls' parents nix the Far East, so Alice and Darlene lie,
telling them they are going to Hawaii. And they go to Thailand, anyway. I
mean, how much fun can Hawaii be?
 Once in Thailand, the girls take in the sights and meet a smooth-talking,
charming young Australian who wines, dines and beds them.
 Nick, who claims to work in software, invites the girls to meet him in
Hong Kong for a weekend of fun. He even buys their tickets.
 As the girls are about to board their plane - faster than you can utter
"Return to Paradise" - they are busted by armed Thai police who find a
hefty supply of drugs in their backpack.
 Thai justice is swift, and before you can mutter "Brad Davis," Alice and
Darlene are tried, convicted and sentenced to 30-plus years in prison.
 There, they must cope with all manner of indignities - tough guards,
crappy food, American-hating inmates - as well as the disintegration of
their friendship as each begins to blame the other for their plight.
 "Brokedown Palace" is a testament to cliché. The film's only glimmer comes
during its finale - the "noble sacrifice" moment that will have all the
teens in the audience reaching for the Kleenex.
 Danes and Beckinsale try hard to breathe some life into this turkey, but
nothing can revive it.
 Bill Pullman as the girls' lawyer shows some spunk, but his role calls for
him to mainly look quizzical at Alice and Darlene and try to figure out who
is lying and who is telling the truth.
 Lou Diamond Phillips is totally wasted as a DEA agent at the U.S. embassy
who won't lift a finger to help the girls.
 Watching "Brokedown Palace" is like a long prison stretch. Unlike Alice
and Darlene, though, you can escape.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)

 Music of the Heart (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Meryl Streep,
Angela Bassett, Aidan Quinn and Gloria Estefan. Directed by Wes Craven
 A woman is deserted by her husband, left with two small boys to raise.
She has to find a job. Her only vocation is playing the violin. She has
taught some students, but has never held a full-time job.
 The woman, through a friend, learns of an inner-city, alternative school
and talks the principal into giving her a job.
 Over the years, the program grows until it is threatened by budget cuts.
The teacher, the principal, parents and various friends unite with the
students to put on a concert to save the music program.
 This sounds like a Lifetime made-for-TV movie. Or worse, one of those
do-gooder films, such as "Dangerous Minds," in which a white educator
ventures into the inner city to help better the lives of minority students.
 Well, as the adage goes, life imitates art. But with "Music of the Heart,"
we have art imitating life.
 The movie is based on the true story of Roberta Guaspari, who did initiate
a violin program in East Harlem. Guaspari, a Navy wife, was deserted by her
husband and left to raise two boys.
 After 10 years, budget cuts eliminated her program and the community did
rally to save it. A concert was staged at Carnegie Hall featuring many of
Guaspari's students as well as such violin greats as Isaac Stern and Itzhak
Perlman.
 "Music of the Heart" is a life-affirming, feel-good movie.
 It also is a paean to music - and its ability to serve as a catalyst to
build character, self-esteem and self-confidence.
 What sets "Music of the Heart" apart from other such films is Meryl
Streep's performance. At first, her Roberta is a shattered, scared woman
who only feels sorry for herself and her situation.
 But as she settles into her new position, her confidence and her
self-worth increase at the same time she instills these emotions into her
students.
 Admittedly, the movie is a bit cliched. Yet, life can be cliched. People
such as Roberta Guaspari who through sheer determination raise themselves
up do exist. We read about them everyday.
 Streep's eyes light up when she is teaching her students. She is a
taskmaster who bullies, cajoles and threatens her students, always pushing
them to do better, to raise their standards and continue testing themselves.
 "Music of the Heart" falters in its portrayal of Roberta's private life.
Her failed relationship with an old high school classmate, Brian (Aidan
Quinn), seems forced.
 Otherwise, the movie contains few missteps.
 Angela Bassett is fiery and strong as the school principal who fights for
Roberta's program. Also featured are Cloris Leachman as Roberta's mother,
Gloria Estefan as a fellow teacher who befriends Roberta and Jane Leeves as
a friend who helps organize Roberta's concert.
 The foundation of the film is Streep's interaction with the various
children who play her students. They sulk, complain, connive and only
grudgingly tolerate Roberta, until they begin to realize the gift she is
driving into them.
 The most incredible aspect of "Music of the Heart" is that it is directed
by Wes Craven. Yes, that Wes Craven, the horrormeister who has given us
"Nightmare on Elm Street," "Last House on the Left," "Scream" and "Scream
2."
 Craven demonstrates that he is not limited to horror films. His direction
is sure, his camera work straight-on. He lets his characters tell the
story, no fancy tricks.
 Even at a bit over two hours, "Music of the Heart" holds you. It is a
movie you will stand up and cheer, a film that offers a positive message
that may also inspire as well as entertain.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Life (1999)
 In Life, Eddie Murphy and Martin Lawrence play two young men wrongfully
convicted of murder and sentenced to life in prison.
 After about an hour of watching this movie, you begin to realize how their
characters feel. Fortunately, for audience members there's a chance to
escape  the nearest exit.
 This, undoubtedly, is Eddie Murphy's worst movie  and that's an
accomplishment.  Remember The Golden Child, Harlem Nights? Compared to
Life, they look like Citizen Kane.
 Life is long, predictable, foul-mouthed and only intermittently funny. Its
100-minute running time feels like 100 years. Robert Ramsey and Matthew
Stone's script basically consist of Murphy and Lawrence referring to
everyone around them as "motherf...s" or "n ..... s."
 You lose count how many times both those obnoxious, offensive words are
used. And if that all it takes to write a script, than any illiterate
jackass can sit at a word processor and compose a movie.
 But, like Life, it will probably stink.
To be honest, the screening audience surrounding me in the theater yucked
it up. But these were the same people who howled at all the flatulence and
fat jokes as well.
 Life is as sophisticated as a belch. It's crude and stereotypical.
Years ago, movies stereotypically portrayed blacks subservient,
second-class people, good for being only maids and servants. For the most
part, the lot of blacks  and other racial groups  have improved.
 But a new, more insidious stereotype is creeping into movies. In many
recent films, through actors such as Murphy and Chris Tuckers, blacks are
presented as fast-talking, conniving, scam artists or hip-hop, gun-crazy,
sex-crazed youths.
 Both sets of caricatures are demeaning. And the fault does not rest with
the actors. They have to eat, too. It is with the people who write the
scripts, the studios who green-light the projects and the audiences who
accept these portrayals without protest.
 Life's only redeeming virtue is the artistry of makeup legend Rick Baker
who flawlessly ages Murphy and Lawrence into 90 year olds.
 Otherwise, Life is an embarrassment, a blot on the resumes of those
associated with it. See it at your own risk.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)

 The Siege (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Denzel Washington, Annette
Benning, Bruce Willis and Tony Shaulabob. Directed by Edward Zwick.
 The most apt way to describe The Siege is to paraphrase a classic line
from cartoonist Walt Kelley's famous comic strip, Pogo: We have met the
enemy and it is us.
 The Siege is a political thriller that raises many questions, most
importantly: Does the security of the nation supercede the rights of the
individual?
 The Siege is a flawed melodrama that gives itself a self-important weight
it cannot sustain throughout. Directed by Ed Zwick (Glory),
 The story, as the old movie ads dealing with topical subjects used to
proclaim, is ripped from today's headlines.
 Arab terrorists are creating havoc in New York. They first blow up a bus.
Later, an attempt at a school is thwarted. A strike at a Times Square
theater kills hundreds. The last straw is the bombing of a federal office
building in Manhattan in which 600 people are killed.
 The president declares martial law and sends in the military to patrol the
streets of Brooklyn, since it is believed this is where the terrorist
enclaves are located.
 The borough is sealed off, and all Arab men between certain ages are
detained in a makeshift detention camp in a sports stadium.
 The gung-ho general (Bruce Willis) put in charge of the operation uses
whatever means necessary, including torture, to gain information from
suspected terrorists.
 Meanwhile a straight-arrow FBI agent (Denzel Washington) and a mysterious
CIA operative (Annette Benning) who, of course, knows more than she lets
on, work separately to resolve the case so Willis and his GI Joes can be
withdrawn and Brooklyn can return to normal - if that's possible.
 The problem with Zwick's film is a lack of subtlety. It emblazons its
IMPORTANT MESSAGE in letters big enough for filmgoers in the back row to
read. The film's simplistic moral: freedom good, persecution bad.
 It doesn't help matters that at times Willis' troops are shown acting like
boot-jack Nazis, pushing people at gunpoint into trucks and carting them
away.
 However, in fairness, Zwick does show the Arab-American community in a
favorable light, as its leaders seek to cooperate with the authorities to
end the bombings.
 Actually, the acting honors are stolen by Tony Shaulabob, as Washington's
partner, a Lebanese-American with a wry wit and dry sense of humor. When
his 13-year-old son is interned, Shaulabob's disillusionment with his
adopted country is shattering.
 Washington is the film's moral compass, a righteous, dedicated official
who wants to end the bombings, bring the perpetrators to justice, but by
means that are within the letter of the law.
 Benning's character seems unfocused. One minute she seems to be a step
ahead of Washington and his agents, the next she appears uncertain of her
objective.
 Willis is cold and rigid as the soldier who carries out his distasteful
duty with a bit too much enthusiasm. Considering that earlier in the film
he gave a short speech indicating his disdain for such an assignment, that
he would perform it with such gusto appears inconsistent with his
character.
 The Siege is no political diatribe. It tries to be fair to all sides, and
makes an effort to offend no one. This nullifies some of it impact.
 Also, its pace is slow and uneven. At just under two hours, The Siege, at
times, seems to become one.
 Taken for what it is, The Siege is a decent endeavor. Better editing and
more spine, though, could have raised it higher.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for 102 Dalmatians (2000)
 102 Dalmatians (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Glenn Close, Gerard
DePardieu, Ioan Gruffudd, Alice Evans, Tim McInnerny and Ben Crompton.
Screenplay by Kristen Buckley and Brian Regan and Bob Tzudiker and Noni
White. Story by Buckley and Regan. Directed by Kevin Lima.
 102 Dalmatians is a so-so sequel to a so-so comedy.
 More a rehash of the original, 102 Dalmatians finds the evil Cruella
DeVil still obsessing over those adorable doggies as she schemes to
capture them to use their pelts for a new coat ó plus hood.
 The film is rather slow in the beginning, and doesnít really pick up
speed until the break-neck, cartoonish finale in which the Dalmatians
give Cruella her comeuppance.
  However, this is a film for the little ones, who will enjoy the animal
antics as well as Glenn Closeís over-the-top, slapstick performance as
Cruella.
  Most of the characters are bland and the story and situations are
merely passable. Even the various animals, with one exception, lack any
real personality.
 Only Waddlesworth, a parrot who thinks heís a dog, shows any spark, and
that is because he is voiced by the wonderful Eric Idle.
 102 Dalmatians is not a bad movie. Itís just fails to offer anything
extraordinary.
 Close is divinely wicked and witchlike in her outlandish manner and
color costumes. Of course she steals the show. In fact, the movie just
founders when she is off screen.
 The white-bread young lovers, Kevin (Ioan Gruffudd) and Chloe (Alice
Evans), are as charismatic as a presidential wannabe. They are kind of
dull, and we really donít care a whit about them.
 Gerard Depardieu is hammy as the evil Le Pelt, cohort of Cruella. After
making so many American movies, his English remains as fractured as Pepe
LePewís.
 Close, of course, earns the good sport award for enduring the
indignities heaped upon Cruella, including being dumped in vats of cake
mix and baked in an oven. Through it all, she keeps a twinkle in her
eye, and her tongue rooted in her cheek.
 Of the Dalmatians, only the puppy Oddball stands out, and that is
because he is spotless, and spends most of the movie trying to rectify
that situation.
  The movie does have a couple of clever moments. While Kevin and Chloe
are out on a date, the dogs decide to watch a video and choose Lady and
the Tramp. Director Kevin Lima ó one of the directors of last yearís
animated hit, Tarzan ó then cuts back and forth between the famous
dining scene in the cartoon and Kevin and Chloe dining at an Italian
restaurant. It is a clever bit, one of the few the film offers.
 102 Dalmatians is harmless. Itís a simplistic, cartoonish film
definitely aimed at the younger set.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. For more of
Bloom's reviews, go to golafayette at www.jconline.com
 Reviews by Bob Bloom also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Chocolat (2000)

Chocolat  (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Juliette Binoche, Alfred
Molina, Judi Dench, Lena Olin, John Wood, Leslie Caron, Victorie
Thivisol and Johnny Depp. Screenplay by Robert Nelson Jacobs. Based on a
novel by Joanne Harris. Music by Rachel Portman. Directed by Lasse
Hallstrom. Rated PG-13.
 Chocolat is a whimsical fairy tale that covers familiar ground about
the ills of blind conformity.
 This tasty little treat, while not wholly original, is a movie to savor
and enjoy.
 Chocolat, directed by the marvelous Lasse Hallstrom (The Cider House
Rules, My Life as a Dog) is reminiscent of the magical Like Water for
Chocolate, in that food is the means to unleash the hidden desires and
emotions of the various protagonists.
 Set in a small French village, this comic fable stars the luminous
Juliette Binoche as Vianne who, with her daughter, Anouk (Victorie
Thivisol), literally blows with the North Wind into the village of
Lansquenet, where tranquility is prized and life has not changed for
decades.
 Vianne soon opens a chocolaterie that awakens hidden desires and
appetites among the populace. Over time these changes are noted by the
local nobleman and town mayor, the Comte de Reynaud (Alfred Molina), who
sees Vianne as a threat to his domainís strict moral code.
 Any savvy filmgoer knows how all this will turn out, of course. But
that should not deter you from viewing this fluffy confection.
 While watching Chocolat, I was reminded of another recent movie set in
France that dealt with a battle between conformity and self-expression,
Quills. Of course, Chocolat is nowhere as dark or brutal as the
18th-century drama about the last days of the Marquis de Sade, but the
two do follow similar tracks.
 Both feature authority figures who battle fiercely to retain the status
quo and link non-conformity to godlessness. Quills, of course, is Grand
Guignol, while Chocolat is more French farce.
 Chocolatís main shortcoming is its portrayal of the villagers. They
seem more archetypes than real people: There's the sexually starved wife
who uses chocolate to rekindle the passion in her marriage; the grumpy
old woman (Oscar-winner Judi Dench) a pariah to her family because of
her independence and outspokenness; the timid, abused wife (Lena Olin)
who learns assertiveness and self-confidence; and the old man (John
Wood) who works up the courage to court an elderly widow (Leslie Caron)
he has loved for years from afar.
 But it is the charming performance of Binoche that gives Chocolat its
magic. At once, wise and mystical, she quietly works her magic on the
various townsfolk through her sweet confections, guessing their favorite
types of chocolate and using those as a means to awaken their apathetic
spirits.
 Binoche is winning, otherworldly and beautiful as the sweet sorceress.
 Molina has a more difficult task, portraying a rigid, unforgiving,
repressed man who ó though decent ó allows his strict moral code to
create a tragedy that almost cost lives.
 Dench, of course, holds the screen as the wise old woman who marches to
her own drummer.
 Acting honors, though, belong to Olin, who at first seems like a
madwoman, but who we come to realize is so brutalized by and frightened
of her husband that she cannot even think straight.
 Watching her blossom as the movie progresses is expected, but she
carries it off in such a grand manner that one cannot help but admire
her transformation.
J
 ohnny Depp makes an appearance as a houseboat gypsy who has a short,
loving fling with Vianne, who, of course, is at first the only person in
town to treat the gypsies with any humanity.
 Chocolat is a flavorful excursion, an entertaining bite for the
cinematic sweet tooth. It may be something you have seen before, but
thereís no law stopping you from going back for seconds.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. More reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com and click on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)

 Gladiator (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Russell Crowe, Joaquin
Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Richard Harris, Oliver Reed and Djimon Hounsou.
Screenplay by David Franzoni and John Logan and William Nicholson. Story
by Franzoni. Directed by Ridley Scott
 Grip your theater seats and prepare to be entertained.
 From its opening battle to its visually poetic finale, "Gladiator" is a
non-stop action piece, a thinking man's epic in the vein of "Spartacus"
and "Ben Hur."
 Starring Russell Crowe, Gladiator combines excitement and thrills with
a solid script and a larger-than-life hero.
 Crowe plays Maximus, a legendary Roman general, loyal to his emperor,
Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris), and his ideals.
 Through the machinations of the jealous Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix), the
emperor's ambitious, immoral son, Maximus is marked for assassination
after Marcus Aurelius' sudden demise.
 Escaping an ambush, he rushes to his far-away home to find his wife and
 Captured and sold into slavery in North Africa, Maximus is trained as a
gladiator. He soon begins winning fame in the bloody arena and is taken
to Rome to do battle in the Colosseum.
 Once in Rome, Maximus sets out to win over the populace as well as
avenge himself on the new emperor - Commodus.
I
 n print, this all may sound a bit silly or even childish. Or worse,
like one of those cheesy Italian `epics' from the late '50s or early
'60s starring people such as Steve Reeves or Gordon Scott.
 Take my word for it, "Gladiator" towers over those movies like Mount
Everest over the Himalayas.
 If it's blood and swordplay you crave, than "Gladiator " is your fix.
 But be warned: This is a brutal movie. Limbs are hacked, heads fly and
bodies are split. Yet director Ridley Scott's camera is too busy to take
a breath and linger on the corpses. We are thrown into the midst of
combat; the clanging of swords, the whoosh of arrows, the thump of
spears hitting flesh, the cries of dying and wounded men surround you.
 Yet behind all this spectacle and special effects is a story of honor
and of one man's quest for justice.
 Maximus may be a heroic general, but underneath he is a simple soldier
longing for his home and family. He craves no honors except to be
allowed to rejoin his wife and son.
 Fate treats him cruelly, thrusting him into a world where he must
survive not only on the strength of his sword arm, but with the cunning
of his brain.
 Crowe is magnificent as Maximus. Though he goes through "Gladiator"
killing dozens of men, you continue to cheer for him. You hold him in
awe and respect him, despite the brutality he must adopt to endure.
 Crowe is an actor whose silence speaks volumes. He uses his
expressions, especially his eyes, to convey a wide range of emotions.
The Australian actor is a chameleon. You will not see any of "The
Insider's" Jeffrey Wigand, nor "L.A. Confidential's" Bud White in this
Crowe.
 Here he is solid, square-jawed, standing like a Roman god. With a quiet
dignity, he commands the screen and your attention.
 Phoenix is an effete psychopath, reminiscent of John Hurt's Caligula in
the BBC series "I, Claudius," but not as hammy or mad as Jay Robinson in
"The Robe" or "Demetrius and the Gladiators." No, Phoenix's Commodus is
an immoral, ambitious, spoiled little boy.
 One aspect of Commodus that is almost a cliché is his incestuous lust
for his sister, Lucilla (Connie Nielsen). Why is it that every film that
features a villainous Roman emperor must insist that the character -
besides his other flaws - have the hots for his sister. Is not throwing
people to the lions or assassinating rivals proof enough?
 One sentimental note about "Gladiator." The movie marks the final
performance of Oliver Reed, and it is a memorable supporting role.
 Reed is Proximo, who runs the gladiator school. Unlike the bombastic,
over-the-top characters Reed played in his later films, his Proximo is
an honorable scoundrel, and Reed plays him accordingly. It is good to
see that this fine actor went out as a winner.
 "Gladiator" will keep you riveted to your seats. The time flies, even
though the film clocks in at about 2 hours and 40 minutes. "Gladiator"
is a continuous visual treat from beginning to end. It opens the summer
movie season with a bang.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafaytte,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
  Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, can be found at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Twilight (1998)

 Twilight (1998) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Paul Newman, Gene Hackman,
Susan Sarandon, James Garner and Stockard Channing. Directed by Robert
Benton.
 A feeling comes over you while you're watching Twilight. The simplest way
to describe it is reassurance, a confidence that the movie will not
disappoint you.
 This feeling, no doubt, can be attributed to those involved both in front
and behind the camera of this laid-back mystery. Twilight stars Paul
Newman, Susan Sarandon and Gene Hackman, plus it features James Garner and
Stockard Channing. And, the movie is directed and was co-authored by
Oscar-winner Robert Benton (Kramer vs. Kramer, Places in the Heart,
Nobody's Fool).
 With credentials like these, Twilight can't fail.
 Well, that depends. For today's young audiences, used to MTV-style rapid
cuts, dramatic explosions, testosterone machismo and music loud enough to
drown out inane dialogue, Twilight will seem quaint.
 But for the serious filmgoer - those who, no matter what their age, can
appreciate crisp dialogue and good acting - Twilight will be a treat.
 It is a languid melodrama, set in contemporary Hollywood and features
stock characters familiar to those who enjoy the film noir genre. There's
the burned-out ex-cop-retired private eye who, though he observes the world
through cynical eyes, nonetheless still retains a modicum of idealism.
There's the rich movie star couple who, behind the facade of having it all,
share dark secrets. There's the rebellious, sexpot young daughter who's too
mature for her age. And there's the decent police detective who, though
bound to do her duty, also is compassionate enough to bend the law to aid a
friend.
 Newman is Harry Ross, ex-cop, ex-P.I., who has fallen on hard times. He
lives above the garage of the mansion of his last clients, screen legends
Jack and Catherine Ames (Hackman and Sarandon). Two years earlier, Ross was
hired by Jack Ames to go to Mexico to retrieve Ames' then-17-year-old
daughter.
 Ross caught the teen, but in the ensuing struggle, she got hold of his
gun, which discharged, hitting him in the upper leg. However, as Ross was
to learn later, the rumor circulating around L.A. was that he was shot in
his manhood.
 It is two years after the shooting incident and Ross, who claims to be
retired, is asked by Jack Ames to deliver a package.
 Being this is Hollywood and a murder mystery, the package, of course,
contains hush money for a blackmailer. From this starting point, the bodies
and mayhem begin to pile up.
 Like most types of tales in this genre, there are some lapses in
plausibility, but the script is so slick, the acting so intriguing, that
it's not until you are leaving the theater that you pause and ask yourself,
"Hey, why didn't he just ...?"
 Newman, as Ross, glides through his role. His voice has the raspiness of a
man who has downed a hundred too many Jack Daniels, and his observations -
especially in his voice-over narration - are that of a weary man who has
seen too many double-crosses and listened to too many lies.
 Wisely, Sarandon is not a smoldering femme fatale, but a mature woman who
exudes sexuality without needing to advertise it. She is fierce and sharp.
 Hackman's character, the onetime matinee idol, is the weakest of the
three, both literally and figuratively. He is dying of cancer. But, despite
his illness, he remains a shrewd observer of the human condition, playing
on Harry's guilt to get the detective to work for him.
 Garner, as Ross' colleague and rival, matches his longtime friend's
cynicism. What he lacks is the moral center that Ross is still able to
maintain.
 Channing, as the police lieutenant and Ross' former partner, again
demonstrates what a fine actress she is. Her Verna is a good cop with
divided loyalties, first to the department, the other to her ex-partner.
 Twilight is a stylish film. Benton's dialogue is mature and wry. The
musical score by the legendary Elmer Bernstein is appropriately plaintive.
 Twilight, though set in contemporary L.A., has a nostalgic aura. It
doesn't rush its story, allowing the viewer to get to know its protagonists
as it ambles along. It's a first-class production.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)

 State and Main (2001).  2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring William H. Macy,
Alec Baldwin, Sarah Jessica Parker, Philip Seymour Hoffman, David
Paymer, Rebecca Pidgeon, Charles Durning, Patti Lupone and Clark Gregg.
Written and directed by David Mamet. Rated R.
 Previously when dealing with the movies, most notably in Hurlyburly,
David Mamet has used his pen as a scalpel to satirically slice the
industry. But in his latest venture, State and Main, the playwright is
content with using his writing instrument as a feather merely to tickle
the industry.
 The premise is simplicity itself. A movie company, after losing its New
Hampshire location, settles upon the sleepy little town of Waterford,
Vt., to film The Old Mill. Waterford seems perfect; it has a firehouse
and an old mill ó at least according to a brochure about the town.
 Unfortunately, after settling on Waterford and making all the
arrangements needed to film, director Walt Price (William H. Macy) and
his production crew discover that the brochure is a bit out of date ó
the mill was destroyed during a rash of suspicious fires back in 1960.
 So, first-time screenwriter Joe White (Philip Seymour Hoffman),  a
promising young playwright, must revamp his script while at the same
time searching for a manual typewriter to replace his, which was lost in
transit from New Hampshire.
How the film company solves its various dilemmas and interacts with the
easy-going New Englanders of Waterford is the gist of Mametís
screenplay.
 State and Main, which Mamet also directed, is a gentle comedy. Mametís
jabs at Hollywood are more like love taps. The movie is funny, but not
biting.
 But what a cast. Beside Macy and Hoffman, the film stars Alec Baldwin
and Sarah Jessica Parker as Bob Barrenger and Claire Wellesley, the
stars of The Old Mill; David Paymer as the filmís trouble-shooting
producer; Charles Durning as Waterfordís mayor; Patti Lupone as his
snobbish wife; Rebecca Pidgeon as Waterfordís bookstore owner and
community theater director; and Julia Stiles as a teen-age groupie out
to exploit Bobís predilection for young girls.
 State and Main just meanders along. And that is the filmís problem.
Itís comic, but not frantic; the laughs are there, but they lack a big
payoff.
 Even the satire lacks spark. It's of the obvious type, mostly
consisting of the ěsophisticatedî Hollywood folk not able to comprehend
the rustic style of their hosts.
 State and Main has its moments, but you seem to have to wait for them.
 The one nice aspect of Mametís story is seeing Hoffman playing a
romantic figure. The love affair that develops between the idealistic
writer and practical community theater director is sweet. Hoffman and
Pidgeon make a lovely couple.
 But the others all seem to be playing types: Macy as the profane
director who wonít let anything or anyone stop him from making his
movie; Baldwin as the self-centered leading man; Parker as the airhead
bimbo with artistic aspirations; Paymer as the ruthless money man. They
all are caricatures.
 State and Main is a rather tame outing. Itís enjoyable, but nothing
that will make a lasting impression.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Clay Pigeons (1998)
  Nothing is more infuriating than a scriptwriter who is sloppy or lazy.
Taking short cuts or devising preposterous or illogical contrivances merely
to further a plot shows contempt for the viewer.
  Such was the case with Armageddon in which the asteroid that threatened
the Earth wasn't discovered until 18 days before the scheduled calamity.
  And such is the case with Clay Pigeons, a murder-comedy that tries to
mine the quirky field already claimed by the Coen Brothers in such works as
Blood Simple and Fargo. Clay Pigeons, set in Montana, is the story of a
not-to-bright, garage mechanic named Clay (Joaquin Phoenix) and his
relationship with a good ole boy cowboy named Lester (Vince Vaughn).
  What sets the story in motion, though, is the suicide of Clay's best
friend, Earl. Clay and Earl are in the middle of nowhere drinking beers and
using the bottles for target practice.
  Earl takes Clay's handgun and threatens to use him as a bulls-eye because
he knows that Clay and his wife are having an affair. Clay at first denies
it, but is forced to confess after Earl reveals his wife had taunted him
with the information.
  Earl says he will get even not by killing Clay, but by committing suicide
and making it look like murder, specifically one committed by Clay.
 And how is he going to do this? Easy. He's going to shoot himself with
Clay's gun.
 Now, here's where the story falls apart. Didn't either of these bozos ever
hear of fingerprints. Earl's are all over the gun. He's not wearing gloves.
He's stupid, and Clay is just as dim-witted for not just running to the law
and telling the easy-going, but sly sheriff (the veteran Scott Wilson) what
has happened.
 Instead, after Earl's self-inflicted demise, Clay runs to Earl's wife,
Amanda (Georgina Cates), a self-absorbed, hedonistic, tramp, who refuses to
aid Clay because she doesn't want it known all over town that she was
cheating on her husband.
 Not only that, she wants to continue the hot and heavy affair, but Clay no
longer wants anything to do with her.
 So, Clay makes Earl's death look accidential.
 Later, at a bar, Clay meets Lester and the two strike up a friendship.
Lester is duly impressed after Clay slaps Amanda in the bar.
 Unbeknownst to Clay, Lester is a woman-hating serial killer being hunted
by the FBI, and Lester is setting up Clay to take the fall for his crimes.
 Of course, everything works out all right by the finale, despite the fact
that bodies keep turning up in Clay's vicinity.
 But the first five minutes of David Dobkin's film drags the rest of the
proceedings down with it because of one silly script glitch that could have
been corrected with a simple rewrite.
 Phoenix is hunky, but dim as Clay. His character is merely a puppet being
manipulated by events.
 Vaughn, with his big smile and nervous giggle, makes a fine psychotic.
Released before the remake of Psycho, Clay Pigeons could almost serve as
Vaughn's screen test for his Norman Bates portrayal.
 Jeanne Garafolo is a bity swarmy and condescending as the FBI agent
tracking Vaughn. Her remarks and asides to the small-town sheriff and his
deputy are meant to serve as the film's humor, but come off as
mean-spirited instead.
 None of the characters in Clay Pigeons are worth a hoot. You can't feel
any compassion for Clay or his predicament because he is too dense, too
self-absorbed to care about.
 Only Wilson's sheriff offers a respite from the murderous proceedings. His
reserve and small-town manners mask an active mind and a humanistic outlook
that compensates a bit for the flotsam surrounding him.
 Clay Pigeons is an interesting effort that a bit of script polishing could
have saved.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com

Title
Review for Exit Wounds (2001)
Exit Wounds (2001) 1 star out of 4. Starring Steven Seagal, DMX, Isaiah
Washington, Jill Hennessy, Michael Jai White, Anthony Anderson, Bill
Duke and Bruce McGill. Screenplay by Ed Horowitz and Richard D'Ovidio.
Based on a novel by John Westermann. Directed by Andrzej Barttkowiak.
Rated R.
 If you have low or no expectations when going to see Exit Wounds, then
you wonít be disappointed.
 Keep in mind, it stars Steven Seagal, which means there is little
acting, but lots of explosions, vehicular mayhem, thousands of rounds of
ammunition spent and a body count that dwarfs the Civil War.
 In this outing, Seagal is Orin Boyd, a Detroit cop. And guess what?
Heís a loose cannon, a lone wolf, ěThe Lone Ranger.î Yep, heís the
clichéd cop who doesnít play by the rules.
 Exit Wounds is a confusing mess dealing with heroin and crooked cops.
Along the way, of course, the requisite amount of double crosses occur.
 But it is easy to tell whoís on which side of the law merely by
checking the cast list. Supporting Seagal are DMX, Isaiah Washington,
Jill Hennessy, Michael Jai White, Bill Duke and Bruce McGill.
 To show the caliber of this movie, Tom Arnold tags along as the comedy
relief.
 Nothing that happens in Exit Wounds is unexpected. It is as if
scriptwriters Ed Horowitz and Richard DíOvidio fed the story parameters
into a computer and it spit out a script.
 Overall, Exit Wounds is schlock, B-movie escapism. Go in expecting
nothing and you wonít be disappointed.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)

 Keeping the Faith (2000) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Ben Stiller,
Edward Norton, Jenna Elfman, Anne Bancroft, Eli Wallach, Milos Forman
and Ron Rifkin. Directed by Norton. Written by Stuart Blumberg.
 Hey, did you hear the one about the priest, the rabbi and the blonde
they both loved?
 That's the one-joke premise of "Keeping the Faith," a new comedy that
marks the directorial debut of actor Edward Norton.
 And while the film is an appealing romantic comedy, it does have its
drawbacks.
But let's stick with the positives for now.
 Best friends Jake Schram (Ben Stiller) and Brian Kilkenny Finn (Norton)
call themselves `the God Squad.' Jake is a rabbi, Brian, a priest. Both
are young and hip and want to take their respective flocks into the 21st
century.
 Both are popular, packing the pews at their respective houses of
worship.
 As children, Jake and Brian plus Anna Reilly were inseparable, the best
of friends. Then Anna's father was transferred to San Francisco.
 Years later, Anna (Jenna Elfman), now a high-powered executive, returns
to New York and looks up her old buddies. Once again the three are
inseparable.
Except that now, complications arise.
 Sparks begin to fly and a highly unusual love triangle develops, with
Anna in the middle.
 The trio make an attractive couple. The camera just loves Elfman. She
is beautiful, charismatic and a fine comedic actress with impeccable
timing instincts.
 Stiller is charming as the bachelor rabbi fending off all the mamas who
continually try to fix him up with their available daughters.
  is sincere and dedicated as a young priest who is wise, pragmatic and
spiritual.
 All three do well with their comic turns, especially Stiller who seems
continually harried as he tries to appease everyone in his Manhattan
congregation.
 And while "Keeping the Faith" is enjoyable, the script by Stuart
Blumberg, a fellow Yale graduate and classmate of Norton's, contains
some flaws. 
 Everything seems too glossy, crises are resolved too easily, situations
seem pat. 
 There doesn't seem to be any serious conflict. It's as if Blumberg
decided not to cross some invisible line, so he downplayed the real-life
consequences of a priest having bouts of self-doubt about his avocation,
or a rabbi fretting over the import of a relationship with a non-Jewish
woman.
 Yet, you can't help but like "Keeping the Faith." it is a sunny, New
York fairy tale with a fine supporting cast, including Anne Bancroft,
Eli Wallach, Ron Rifkin and Milos Forman.
 As a director, Norton is fine with handling his actors. He never allows
the proceedings to go overboard.
 He knows how to use his camera and compose his shots. But he needs to
be more brutal in the editing room. At two hours and nine minutes,
"Keeping the Faith" contains a few dead spots that tighter editing could
have eliminated.
 "Keeping the Faith" offers another benefit. In this cynical age, its
comforting to see a movie about two intelligent young men who can commit
to a life that basically eschews the crass materialism and commercialism
that dominates our society.
 These are two  men who hear God's calling and answer it without
hesitation.
 The movie's resolution, unfortunately, is too simple, and a bit
unrealistic.
 But that should not discourage anyone from viewing this cheery
confection.
 What is especially interesting will be to watch Norton's maturation as
a director. With just seven movies under his belt as an actor, he
already has gained a reputation as one of the finest and most dynamic
actors in years.
 You can only imagine the heights he will be able to reach behind the
camera.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
In. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. An associate  member of the Online Film Critics
Society, Bloom's reviews can be found online at
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Flawless (1999)
 Flawless (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Robert De Niro, Philip Seymour
Hoffman and Barry Miller. Directed by Joel Shumacher.
 "Flawless" is one of those flawed movies about opposite worlds colliding,
but ultimately coming to understand and like each other.
 Robert De Niro plays Walter Koontz, a macho, homophobic
ex-cop-turned-security guard who suffers a stroke.
 Philip Seymour Hoffman plays Rusty, a flamboyant drag queen and Koontz's
neighbor. They despise each other, hurling invectives back and force
through their respective apartment windows.
 But after Koontz's stroke, he turns to Rusty for help. Koontz asks Rusty
to give him singing lessons in an effort to regain the use of his vocal
cords.
 Director Joel Shumacher - who ruined the Batman franchise with his "Batman
Forever" and "Batman and Robin" - does not spare us one cliché here.
 Rusty, to put it kindly, is an over-the-top flaming drag queen, whose only
wish is to save enough money to have an operation that will transform him
into a woman.
 He and his fellow drag queen friends are loud, colorful and witty.
Koontz on the other hand, is dull, plodding and bigoted.
 The movie is not helped by a nasty subplot concerning a low-life drug
dealer and his stolen money.
 The movie's main asset is Hoffman's performance. Hoffman, best remembered
as the young crew member with a crush on Mark Wahlberg's Dirk in "Boogie
Nights," takes what could have been a caricature and transforms him into a
fully-developed human being.
 Despite how you may feel about the kind of life Rusty leads, you come to
respect him.
 De Niro on the other hand seems to be reprising some of his moves from
"Awakenings" as the stroke-impaired Koontz.
 He does a fine job at showing the frustrations of a man who can no longer
function at 100 percent. But he adds nothing more.
 And some of the other characters feel cliched, especially the actresses
who play the women in Koontz's life. Both are prostitutes, but one ditches
him after his stroke, while the other, with the proverbial "heart of gold,"
loves only him and doesn't care whether or not he has a nickel.
 The entire enterprise feels contrived.
 "Flawless" will not do much to advance the cause of gay rights. It does
have some funny moment though, especially a scene in which some three-piece
suit, gay Republicans try to reconcile with their more flamboyant brothers.
 The difference between them, Rusty explains, is that the Republicans are
ashamed of being gay, while Rusty and her friends feel nothing but pride.
 "Flawless" is a bit too violent for the subject at hand, and that adds a
disquieting note to the proceedings.
 Overall, though, "Flawless" is carried on the shoulders of Hoffman. And it
is his performance, worthy of an Oscar nomination, alone that makes this a
movie you may want to see.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.com

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
 The truth is out there, but you will only learn bits and pieces of it in
The X-Files movie, and that's the fun - and charm - of this big screen
adaptation of the cult television show.
 The X-Files follows the investigations of two FBI agents, Fox Mulder and
Dana Scully. Mulder (David Duchovny) is the paranoid one, seeing
conspiracies, hidden agendas and aliens behind every occurrence.
 Scully (Gillian Anderson) is the rational one who tries - and often fails
- to shed light on the paranormal and explain it as normal.
 Together, these two over the past five TV seasons have investigated the
weird crimes that fall into the bureau's lap.
 Now the show's creator, Chris Carter, has brought the entire mythos to the
big screen. Along with Mulder and Scully come the black helicopter, the
Cigarette-Smoking Man, the Well-Manicured Man, the Lone Gunmen, the oozing
black goop, the autopsies and the convoluted rantings and whispers about
worldwide conspiracies and a planned alien domination of the planet.
 Plus, the  sight of cornfields and bees will now become part of the
ominous lexicon.
 And who is heading up all these black ops. Well, you'd be surprised to
learn that it's those friendly and caring folks at FEMA. Yes, the Federal
Emergency Management Agency.
 Helping out in disasters is only a front, it seems. The agency's real
agenda is to suspend the Constitution and take over running the country
during a national crisis.
 Those who have never seen The X-Files still can follow the movie. There's
just enough expositional dialogue to get you caught up on who Mulder and
Scully are, what their assignment was (and is), what is the Syndicate and
its members about, and what that nefarious group's ultimate aim is.
 Plus, director Rob Bowman, a veteran of the TV show, also stages enough
action to keep the die-hard X-philers from getting bored.
 The movie, thankfully, does not take itself too seriously. It has a wry
wit and a laconic charm as well as a bit of tongue-in-cheek, as if telling
the audience not to worry that it's only a bedtime fairy tale for adults.
The plot has some holes, which are glossed over, just as in the TV series,
but the real focus is the Mulder-Scully relationship. Before that, all else
in the film pales and seems rather trivial.
 It's really not worth going into the performances of Duchovny and
Anderson. Basically, they act intense, surprised and smart. They've been
under the skin of their characters for a long enough time that making the
transition from small screen to large was no big leap.
 They look good, they look sexy and they do ...
 Well, some things you will have to find out for yourself.
 It's a sad state of affairs when the biggest questions about the movie
doesn't concern the plot, but rather if it contains any shots of Agent
Mulder's derriere or if Mulder and Scully lip-lock.
 No answers will be given here. You'll have to fight the future lines at
the box office to find the answers.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)

 The Straight Story (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Starring William Farnsworth,
Sissy Spacek, Everett McGill and Harry Dean Stanton. Directed by David
Lynch.
 The simplicity and sincerity of "The Straight Story" will put a
stranglehold on your soul.
 It's a movie that celebrates determination, love and life. It is one of
those events that will cradle you in its warmth and caress you with its
generosity of spirit.
 "The Straight Story" is a feature that overwhelms you with its lack of
pretense. It's unassuming art like a Grandma Moses painting or a Norman
Rockwell drawing.
 And it's protagonist, Alvin Straight, is a man who could have stepped out
of one of those Rockwell works.
 As portrayed by Richard Farnsworth, Straight is as leathery as an old
saddle and as intransigent as Mount Rushmore. His character befits his
name. He is a frank, honest man, quiet-spoken with an economy of words. He
says little, but speaks volumes.
 "The Straight Story," which is based on a true incident, follows Alvin as
the 73-year-old decides to travel from his home in Laurens, Iowa, to Mount
Zion, Wis., to visit his estranged brother, Lyle, who has been felled by a
stroke.
 Alvin and Lyle had a falling out about 10 years earlier and Alvin feels he
must make things right.
 However, Alvin is not in the best of health himself. He walks with the
support of two canes and can't see well enough to drive.
 So Alvin, fueled only by his determination, sets out on his 1966 John
Deere riding lawnmower to cover the approximate 350 miles to Lyle's.
 Alvin refuses help from those around him, including his beloved daughter,
Rose (Sissy Spacek). This is a trip he feels he must make on his own terms.
It is a kind of penance, he believes.
 Along the way, Alvin meets various people, among them a runaway, pregnant
teen-ager whom he teaches the value of family, and a good Samaritan former
John Deere dealer who helps him out when his mower runs into problems.
 "The Straight Story" is directed by David Lynch, the man who has given us
such dark and perverse movies as "Eraserhead," "The Elephant Man," "Blue
Velvet" and "Lost Highway."
 It turns out Lynch is as talented at showing the heart of the heartland as
he is the dark underbelly of society.
 And "The Straight Story" is a movie with heart, lots of it. Alvin is a
good man as are the people he knows and the people he meets along his
journey. This is a movie that leisurely celebrates family in the
all-encompassing sense of the word.
 Lynch has us ambling along with Alvin as he travels at 5 mph on the
highway berm drinking in the beauty of the land and the stars. This is a
reflective movie and Lynch offers us plenty of time to think about the ties
that bind people.
 In one of the film's loveliest sequences, Alvin offers a meal and shelter
to a runaway girl. He doesn't pry into her life. He simply tells her a
story. When his children were young, he says, he would have them pick up a
stick and break it. Then he would take a bundle of sticks and tie them
together and tell his children to try to break the bundle.
 They couldn't, of course. And that, Alvin explains, is family.
 The next morning the girl is gone, a bundle of sticks lying near the
campfire embers.
 Another powerful sequence features Alvin and another World War II veteran
sitting in a bar swapping their war memories. Their shared pain can be seen
in their eyes. It's here that Alvin explains that the war led him to drink,
which he admits caused much pain for his family.
 But he has quit drinking and put that part of his life behind him. Now he
only wants to make amends.
 Farnsworth, a former stuntman, best known for his roles in such films as
"Comes a Horseman" (for which he received a supporting actor Oscar
nomination), "The Natural" and "The Grey Fox," gives a magnificent
performance. It is so warm, so tender - so human - that if does not walk
off with the best actor Oscar at the next ceremony, the movie industry
should toss the entire proceedings into the trash heap.
 This is a once-in-a-lifetime role, one which Farnsworth was born to play.
Whether dealing with a distraught woman who - because she has to travel the
same road every day to get to work - has hit and killed 14 deer in seven
weeks (a typical Lynchian touch), or sweetly explaining to the bickering
twin mechanics who repair his riding mower the special bond of brotherhood,
Farnsworth carries himself with a craggy dignity.
 Ably supporting Farnsworth are Spacek as his loving daughter, Everett
McGill as the John Deere dealer who gets him the wheels to make his
journey, and Harry Dean Stanton as Lyle.
 When the brothers finally meet, no words are necessary. Alvin and Lyle
merely need to look at each other. Their expressions convey all that needs
to be said.
 "The Straight Story" is one of the best movies of the year, and Lynch's
finest achievement. Academy Award recognition should go to the movie,
Lynch, Farnsworth, the cinematography of the legendary Freddie Francis and
the screenplay by John Roach and Mary Sweeney.
 "The Straight Story" is that rarity, a "G"-rated movie that is a true
family experience. In this instance, the "G" stands for more than "general
audiences;" it connotes gem, great and genuine. "The Straight Story" is a
film that will make you stand up and cheer.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Legally Blonde (2001)
Legally Blonde (2001). 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Reese Witherspoon, Luke
Wilson, Selma Blair, Matthew Davis, Victor Garber, Jennifer Coolidge, Holland
Taylor, Ali Larter, Jessica Cauffiel, Alanna Ubach, Oz Perkins, Linda
Cardellini, Bruce Thomas, Meredith Scott Lynn and Raquel Welch. Screenplay by
Karen McCullah Lutz & Kirsten Smith. Based on a book by Amanda Brown. Directed
by Robert Luketic. 96 minutes. Rated PG-13. 
Star quality is that intangible gift that simultaneously enables  performers to
rise above their material as well as elevate projects - no matter their
shortcomings - on the weight of their talent. 
With Legally Blonde, Reese Witherspoon shows that she is such a performer. 
Legally Blonde is a very appealing feature despite its stock situation and
clichéd and stereotypical characters. 
The feature's charm rests squarely on Witherspoon's lovely shoulders. In films
such as Cruel Intentions, Pleasantville and especially Election, Witherspoon has
demonstrated her keen acting ability. However, it was not necessary in any of
those films for her to carry the burden of the projects' success or failure. 
But this bubbly comedy is different. From opening scene to final fadeout, this
is Witherspoon's baby, and, as Elle Woods, she delivers. As played by
Witherspoon, Elle is no dumb blonde. 
She's an achiever, a go-getter but without the pathological drive of her
Election's Tracey Flick. Elle,  a senior at CULA, is president of her Delta Nu
sorority, has a 4.0 G.P.A. - her major is fashion design - appeared in a Ricky
Martin video and was a runner-up in the Miss Hawaiian Tropic contest. 
Elle is a warm, loving person. But because she is very perky, blonde and
beautiful, no one takes her seriously. Her boyfriend, Warner, dumps her on his
way to Harvard Law School, because he plans to run for the Senate and Elle is
not his nor his family's picture of a senator's perfect wife. "I need a Jackie,
not a Marilyn," he tells her upon dumping her. 
Elle, to win him back, determinedly works her way into Harvard Law School,
creating a dynamite video essay (directed by a Coppola) to impress the all-male
admissions board. At first, her stuck up East Coast classmates treat her as a
joke, but Elle, despite some setbacks, proves her worthiness and wins the day. 
In a sense, Legally Blonde is a movie about perceptions. It's one of those
don't-judge-a-book-by-its-cover life lessons. The movie says nothing new nor
profound. As Elle complains, People just "see my blonde hair and my big boobs."
Legally Blonde is a pleasing pastiche about self-worth and self-confidence. 
Witherspoon gives a finely honed performance. She's ebullient, quick-witted and
a rather nice person. She is sensitive and caring, and even though she looks
clueless, she's not. Witherspoon uses makeup and wardrobe to deflect from Elle's
intelligence, but allows you to see it in her eyes. 
The rest of the cast merely lives in her shadow. Matthew Davis is rather bland
as Warner, and it is difficult to understand why Elle is so infatuated with him.
Some memorial turns are provided by Oz Perkins as one of Elle's dorky, but
brainy, classmates and Ali Larter as a murder suspect Elle comes to defend. 
The lawyers in the audience may cringe at some of the courtroom antics, but keep
in mind that this is a comedy not Anatomy of a Murder. 
Legally Blonde is a fun summer date movie, a lightweight enjoyable outing that
in its own sneaky way will make you think twice before judging someone merely by
their appearance. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier  in Lafayette, IN. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net
Other reviews by Bloom can be found by going to www.jconline.com and clicking on
golafayette. 
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)

 Tarzan (1999) 4 stars out of 4. Featuring the voices of Tony Goldwyn,
Minnie Driver, Glenn Close, Lance Henriksen, Rosie O'Donnell, Wayne Knight
and Brian Blessed.
 "Tarzan," Disney's latest animation feature, is a visual delight that will
leave you breathless as you soar through the primordial jungle with the
legendary ape man.
 Using a process called Deep Canvas, the Disney animators have created an
Edenesque landscape in which Tarzan swoops, glides and soars. Edgar Rice
Burroughs' famed creation no longer swings through the trees like a trapeze
artist; rather, he skates and surfs the boughs and branches as if they were
green waves. He has been transformed into the "Big Kahuna" of the forest.
 "Tarzan" is Disney's most thoughtful and satisfying animated feature since
"The Lion King." Keeping merely the basic premise of Burroughs' original -
a husband, wife and baby are marooned off the African coast, the parents
are killed and the baby is adopted by a female ape who raises him to
manhood - the story becomes a quest for identity.
 And that is the genius of this adaptation. The character of Tarzan has
been brought to the screen nearly 50 times since 1918, yet only one movie -
Hugh Hudson's plodding "Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes"
- has even come close to hinting at the conflict within Burroughs hero.
 And yet, this was a theme Burroughs touched upon in most of the 24 books
chronicling the adventures of Tarzan.
 One of the most outstanding factors of Disney's "Tarzan" is the editing,
an aspect usually overlooked in animated films.
 The opening sequence, paralleling the stranding of Tarzan's family with
the family life of the she-ape Kala and her mate, Kerchak, leading up to
the killing of Kala's baby by a leopard and the death of baby Tarzan's
parents by that same big cat is inspired.
 The entire episode is played out over the song "Two Worlds," sung by Phil
Collins.
 It is one of the four songs written and performed by the pop star, whose
vocal and composing talents are one of the film's finest contributions.
 Not enough can be said about the character animators. For nearly the first
half of the film Tarzan moves on the balls of his toes and his knuckles -
apelike.
 It is not until he meets Jane and begins to realize why he is different
from the other apes that he adopt an upright stance.
 And that is the crux of the story. Tarzan is the outsider, the outcast.
Despite the love and protection of Kala and the friendship of the
smart-mouthed ape, Terk, and the neurotic elephant, Tantor, Tarzan can
never truly feel like a full-fledged member of the ape tribe.
 It is the discovery of people, a safari led by the evil Greystoke that
ignites the spark of humanity in Tarzan's breast.
 With the help of Jane and her scientist father, Tarzan learns about man
and the outside world.
 Usually in the Tarzan movies, Jane must rely on the strength and courage
of Tarzan for her protection. This animated Jane, though, has spunk - and a
sense of humor. As voiced by the wonderful Minnie Driver, Jane is
quick-witted, intelligent, curious and fearless.
 She is the perfect complement to Tarzan.
 As Tarzan, Tony Goldwyn (best known as the villain in "Ghost" as well as
the director of "A Walk on the Moon") modulates his voice to show the angst
and conflict within his character. When Kala advises him to create his own
roar and not copy that of the tribe, Goldwyn's Tarzan does not use a Johnny
Weissmuller-like yodel, but a deep, freeing sound that comes from his
heart.
 Goldwyn is able to convey Tarzan's vulnerability as well as his strength
and determination.
 Glenn Close is wise and loving as Kala, while Lance Henriksen ("Aliens,"
TV's "Millennium") is gruff, suspicious and ferocious as Kerchak.
 The comedy relief is supplied by Rosie O'Donnell as the wise-cracking Terk
and Wayne Knight as the meek Tantor.
 Brian Blessed provides the right tone of suave villainy as Greystoke,
while Nigel Hawthorne is funny and warmly befuddled as the absent-minded
Professor Porter, Jane's father.
 Also interesting to note is the way the animators created Kerchak and
Greystoke.
 Structurally, they are almost mirror images of each other. This adds a
dimension to Tarzan's struggle of finding his true self as he watches these
two male role models.
 Directors Kevin Lima and Chris Buck have created a movie that again raises
the bar for Disney animation. And in the process they also have made one of
the finest Tarzan movies in the entire ape man canon.
 "Tarzan" is a must-see, 88 minutes of color, adventure, suspense, humor
and romance. It is one of the best movies of the year. Don't miss it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Ghosts of Mars (2001)
JOHN CARPENTER'S GHOSTS OF MARS (2001) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Ice Cube,
Natasha Henstridge, Jason Statham, Pam Grier, Joanna Cassidy and Clea Duvall.
Written by Larry Sulkis and John Carpenter. Music by John Carpenter. Directed by
Carpenter. Rated R. 
The Red Planet runs redder in John Carpenter's Ghosts of Mars. Those who enjoy
watching decapitations and body limbs being hacked off will go orgasmic over
this cartoonish piece of unoriginality. 
This pulplike outing is sloppy and derivative, owing much to Carpenter's first
big hit, Assault on Precinct 13. 
So many parts of this movie go haywire that finding a starting point is
difficult. First, Carpenter offers a crash course on Martian colonization,
explaining that the colonists established a matriarchal society. 
This is merely a setup so the audience won't be shocked when they see female
cops bossing men around. Big deal. 
Then, there's the confusing story structure. The film is told in flashback by
Lt. Ballard (Natasha Henstridge), the sole survivor of a team set to a distant
mining town to check on a disturbance and bring back and well-known criminal
named James "Desolation" Williams (Ice Cube), whose characterization is most
reminiscent of Carpenter's Napoleon Wilson from Precinct 13. 
Cube's Williams even cribs some dialogue that is similar to lines spoken by
Wilson in the earlier flick. 
It seems that every major character must be given his or her own flashback,
explaining events we are watching as they do voice overs. it becomes most
repetitious and boring. 
Carpenter takes too long in building up the suspense, and the payoff is a big
let down. 
The Martian ghosts - really dustlike particles that take over humans - create an
army of zombies who run around shouting and killing colonists. The army also is
a rip-off of the anonymous gangbangers who were mowed down during Precinct 13. 
Even what is supposed to pass for witty repartee between Henstridge's Ballard
and Ice Cube's Williams seems forced. The chemistry factor is zero. 
Carpenter does add a couple of interesting touches. Ballard and her mouthy
subordinate, Jericho (Jason Statham) sneak off into a store room where Jericho
suggests they have one last fling before facing the overwhelming odds against
them. Instead of acting insulted or slapping his face, Ballard pauses, agrees
with him and begins sucking face. 
Before anything can happen, though, those rude Martians begin attacking again. 
Ghosts of Mars is one of Carpenter's weakest efforts yet, and he has helmed a
bunch of howlers. 
And Carpenter doesn't help with his obnoxious, pulsating and loud score that
blares every suspenseful piece of business as if it was the most important bit
of action in the movie. 
This is one of those watch movies. No, you're not watching the screen, but
checking your time piece to try to determine when it will all end. Ghosts of
Mars is a snoozer. Only the explosions may interfere with your napping. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)

 Summer of Sam (1999)  2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John Leguizamo, 
Miro Sorvino and Adrien Brody. Directed by Spike Lee.
 In Summer of Sam, filmmaker Spike Lee has tried to create a mosaic of 
what is was like in New York City during the summer of 1977, a time when 
a deranged individual, later known as the Son of Sam, held the city in a 
grip of terror. 
 Sam, also called the .44-caliber killer because of his choice of weapon, 
went on a yearlong killing spree that left several people  mostly women 
 dead. 
 Lee's film is not so much a story about Sam himself, but about the 
paranoia that gripped the city and its effect on its residents.
 Lee concentrates his story on one Italian-American alcove in the Bronx, 
where suspicion and fear hold the neighborhood in a vise of fear.
 While the overall canvas is fascinating, Lee did not allow every part of 
his painting to dry before exhibiting it for the public.
 His movie's main focus is on Vinny (John Leguizamo), a hair dresser 
continually cheating on his faithful wife, Dionna (Oscar-winner Mira 
Sorvino). 
 The movie also examines the strain put on the friendship between Vinny 
and Ritchie (Adrien Brody), a guy from the neighborhood now involved in 
the British punk scene.
 With his spiked hair, dog-chain collar and outlandish dress, Ritchie 
immediately falls under the suspicious eyes of the other dimwits in the 
neighborhood who consider him a prime suspect for all the killings.
 And that is the concept that is Lee's double-edged sword. The 
blue-collar boys in this 'hood are beer-swilling, foul-mouthed idiots. 
None, except for Vinny, hold a steady job.
 If two of Summer of Sam's writers had not been Italian, Lee could be 
accused of racism. As it is, he presents a rather grim and depressing 
picture of a poor neighborhood where there's really nothing to do but 
hang out and fuel one's darker side.
 As usual, Lee hits his point with a sledgehammer, having the men 
congregate under a large sign reading "Dead End." Subtlety is not Lee's 
forte.
 The biggest flaw with the movie is it has no hero. Vinny is a lowlife 
whiner, drug-user and adulterer. 
 And his friends are no better. Ritchie, at least, has some nobility, as 
he goes about trying to make something of himself by joining a punk rock 
band and trying to stay true to his convictions.
 Except for Ritchie, Lee gives his audience no one we can really care 
about. 
 Sorvino has one good scene in which she finally explodes at Vinny, 
spewing her pent-up frustrations about their relationship, his 
philandering and their going-nowhere lives together.
 Lurking behind all of this is the character of David Berkowitz, who Lee 
brings to center stage for a few moments throughout the 
two-hour-and-20-minute drama.
 But even here, Lee goes overboard. A sequence in which a delusional 
Berkowitz hears Sam (the dog who allegedly ordered him to kill) speak is 
done in such a manner that it creates laughter instead of horror or pity 
from the audience.
 Summer of Sam is a flawed, but ambitious, exercise. It's loud, long and 
interesting, yet it also feels cold and distant. Lee tries to bring the 
city alive, making it the film's main character. He only partially 
succeeds, and that is the film's biggest disappointment.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)

"Any Given Sunday" (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Al Pacino, Cameron
Diaz, Randy Quaid, Jamie Foxx, James Woods, Mathew Modine, LL Cool J,
Ann-Margret, Jim Brown, Lawrence Taylor and Charlton Heston. Directed by
Oliver Stone.
So, what is Oliver Stone trying to tell us in "Any Given Sunday?"
That football is no longer a sport. That it's a microcoism of America. That
the players aren't playing for the love of the game, but for the money, the
endorsements, the women.
That the owners are now bottom-liners who don't look at their players as
human beings, but as commodities to be traded, dropped or beefed up with
drugs like cattle then sent out to the Sunday afternoon slaughter.
Gosh, I knew all of that just by reading the daily newspaper.
But you must give Stone credit. In his own overwrought, overly kinetic
manner he has driven home his point with all the force of an all-out blitz
on third-and-10.
Does he tell us anything we don't already know. Not really.
Yet Stone is so sincere, so evangelical that you can't help but admire the
man and forgive him his excesses.
"Any Given Sunday" is not a great movie, but it is a solid entertaining
vehicle, even at about two hours and 50 minutes.
And Stone doesn't leave any stone unturned. He shows the generation gap
between coaches and players; the cloaked racism that exists amongst
teammates; the owners whose loyalty is not to the fans, but to the money;
as well as the cameraderie that coalesces 11 individuals into a single unit
- a team.
The performances in the film are strong, but Stone's cinematic style
distracts from any appreciation of the actors' contributions.
Stone cannot keep his camera still for a moment. He continually jumps
around, cross-cuts, inter-cuts, changes film stock to the point where you
cannot concentrate on the story.
It is as if Stone knew his subject matter what not the strongest material,
so he decided to jazz it up, make it seem more important, more urgent than
it was meant to be.
"Any Given Sunday" is merely a routine movie wrapped in an epic's clothing.
Al Pacino as head coach Tony D'Amato gives a strong turn as a man who must
be friend, bully, father confessor, motivator and tyrant to those around
him. He is a man who has sacrificed his family for the game. He is a
mercurial man who can slide from bitterness and self-pity into evangelical
fervor to rouse his players.
Cameron Diaz is tough, spoiled and mercenary as the young team owner who
inherited the franchise from her father. To her, the Miami Sharks are
merely a commodity. If she could move them to Los Angeles to boost their
value, she would. Her loyalty is to the bottom line.
Dennis Quaid shows a quiet dignity as the veteran quarterback who realizes
his time has passed, while Jamie Foxx is vibrant, cocky and pragmatic as
the third-stringer who gets a chance to shine and make a name for himself.
But the real star of "Any Given Sunday" is Stone, and he doesn't let you
forget it. His signature style is all over the place, as he intercuts from
scene-to-scene, from locker room to the private boxes where, like in the
days of Rome, the rich watch these contemporary gladiators batter each
other for their amusement.
"Any Given Sunday" is an interesting vehicle. Stone has done better work,
most notably "Platoon," "Born on the Fourth of July," "JFK" and "Nixon."
But no one who sees "Any Given Sunday" will look at football the same way
again. And perhaps that was Stone's intention.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom at
iquest.net

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
 Oh, yes. We're in Hollywood, on the set of "Stab 3," an another sequel
in the saga of the Woodsboro murders.
 Before that, though, we are on a Los Angeles freeway where a boyhood
friend of slasher victim Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) gets a strange
phone call.
 Rushing home he enters his apartment and ...
 Welcome to Wes Craven's "Scream 3." And like the first two movies in
the series, this one is mixes an awareness of the slasher movie genre
with audience expectations. But by now the formula is a bit stale, so
the audience is - if not ahead - at least able to keep pace with Craven
and screenwriter Ehren Kruger.
 OK, so back to the lot of Sunrise Pictures, where a replica of Sidney's
house stands on a closed set and a cast of two-dimensional types sit
around complaining about the script and their parts.
 Of course, now the cast members begin to get bumped off so ...
 Enter the famous newswoman Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox Arquette, as she
now bills herself)  to get the scoop. And who better, since she was a
player in alll the previous action and even wrote a book about it.
 Also on hand is Dewey (David Arquette), the film's technical adviser
and Gale's former boyfriend, who still carries a torch.
        Ain't love grand. What better to reunite two former lovers than a good
serial killing spree.
        As for Sidney, she is holed up somewhere with enough security locks to
keep out the CIA. But the ghost-masked killer learns where she is, so
she flees her isolation, heads for L.A., hooks up with Gale and Dewey
and we're off to the races.
        At about 1 hour and 50 minutes, "Scream 3" drags. There is too much
exposition, the pace is uneven and the rationalization for everything
two complex. There are too many characters, too many red herrings and
the finale is a disappointment.
        But what the heck. The movie will make money because those who were
fascinated by "Scream" and "Scream 2" won't be able to resist this
outing.
        Craven offers some good scary moments and a few goosebumps, but it
seems so formulated, so rote. It lacks a freshness. The movie has a deja
vu, haven't we been here before, feel.
        The cast just goes through its motions, no one stands out and no one
does anything special. "Scream 3" is just more of the same old, same old
        Even cameos by Roger Corman, Carrie Fisher and Kevin Smith as Silent
Bob and Jason Mewes as his motor-mouthed pal from "Dogma" cannot enliven
the plodding proceedings.
 It is time to retire this worn out series. Come on, Wes. Put the knives
and ghost masks away and keep them locked up. Move on. "Scream 3" is
like the party guest who stayed too long and wore out his welcome.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)

 Mission: Impossible 2 (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Tom Cruise,
Thandie Newton, Dougray Scott, Ving Rhames and Anthony Hopkins. Story by
Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga. Screenplay by Robert Towne. Directed
by John Woo.
 "Mission: Impossible 2" is really two movies in one.
 The first is an action-packed thriller complete with outlandish
students, flying bullets and Hong Kong-style martial arts encounters.
 The second is a love story borrowed from Alfred Hitchcock's
"Notorious," in which the hero's lover is asked literally to sleep with
the enemy.
 Somehow legendary screenwriter Robert Towne ("Chinatown") - adapting a
story written by Ronald D. Moore and Brannon Braga - and director John
Woo ("Face/Off") are able to merge these two in a seamless outing that
will leave audiences gasping.
 "Mission: Impossible 2" is a critic-proof movie. No matter how many
flaws, shortcomings or nitpicks I can point out, people are going to
ignore them and flock to this film.
 And, honestly, there is no reason why they shouldn't.
 "M:I2" is everything you want a summer movie to be: visually arresting,
an easy-to-follow plot, tons of pyrotechnics and two gorgeous stars.
 One is Tom Cruise, reprising his role as Ethan Hunt. The other is
Thandie Newton, one of the most beautiful actresses to grace the screen
today.
 Their scenes together smolder with sexual chemistry.
 The film's plot centers around a deadly virus supposedly held by a
renegade IMF agent named Sean Ambrose (Dougray Scott). Hunt's mission,
which he accepts, of course, is to retrieve the virus as well as its
cure.
 To do this he is told to recruit Nyah Hall (Newton), Ambrose's former
love interest. Nyah also happens to be a professional thief.
 The attraction between Nyah and Hunt is instantaneous as they first
meet in Seville, Spain, with the throbbing beat of flamenco music heard
in the background.
 As is his custom, Woo uses many slow-motion shots and close-ups. He is
especially fond of extreme close-ups of Newton, who is very easy to look
at.
 Cruise looks buff and sculpted. His babyish face is beginning to take
on some character giving him a semi-rugged countenance that suits him.
 Scott, who played Prince Henry in "Ever After," does not seem that
formidable a foe. He appears a bit too soft, too vulnerable to be an
out-and-out, over-the-top villain.
 Also in the cast is Ving Rhames again playing computer genius Luther
Stickell, and Anthony Hopkins in a cameo as Hunt's boss.
 "M:I2" is a visual treat. Set pieces include a car chase involving Nyah
and Ethan as well as a hair-raising motorcycle duel between Hunt and
Ambrose. "M:I2" is stylish, stunning and loud.
 The musical score by Hans Zimmer alternates from a pounding action
motif to a romantic flamenco love theme for the scenes between Ethan and
Nyah.
 The movie's main drawback is that it's not really "Mission: Impossible"
as created by Bruce Geller. The TV series emphasized brain over brawn.
The IMF team would play mind games, use masks, illusions, create train
rides, earthquakes, all to confuse and bedevil their target into
surrendering that week's McGuffin.
 "M:I2" plays more like a James Bond outing. True, both Hunt and Ambrose
use masks to disguise themselves to learn information, but that is
basically the only tip of the hat to the TV series.
 Too many gunbattles and too many hand-to-hand encounters gives "M:I2"
the feel of encroaching into 007 territory.
 However, that aside, "Mission: Impossible 2" is an extremely
entertaining vehicle, a testosterone-filled escape. It's a slam-bang way
to begin the summer.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, is can be found on the Internet Movie Database Web site:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)

 My Favorite Martian (1999) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Jeff Daniels,
Christopher Lloyd, Wallace Shawn and Ray Walston
 Sometimes we film critics go above and beyond the call of duty. We sit -
and suffer - through some products so you won't have to.
 Such is the case with My Favorite Martian, a witless, childish adaptation
of the mid-1960s sitcom.
 It is a movie that contains laughs, but they are more of the embarrassing
type than ones created by humorous situations.
 Jeff Daniels as Tim O'Hara and Christopher Lloyd as his "Uncle Martin"
spend most of their time mugging outrageously rather than acting. They are
joined by Wallace Shawn, who is so over the top that you can cover him with
pineapple and use him for an Eastern Sunday dinner.
 It's a sad pronouncement on a movie when a computer generated living
spacesuit conveys more personality than any of the live actors.
 Thus it is with this silly, crass venture.
Am I being too critical of something that is meant to be merely a piece of
fluff. Not really. Just because a movie aims for the lowest common
denominator doesn't mean it should be praised when it hits its mark.
 Even the special effects have that second-rate feel to them, more along
those of a made-for-TV movie than a big studio motion picture.
 The plot, what little there is, revolves around "Uncle Martin" crashing on
Earth and his attempts to repair his spaceship and return to Mars. Along
the way Lloyd makes numerous cliched remarks about how backward humans are,
while learning the joys of ice cream.
 It's all very juvenile and aimed for a young, undiscerning and
unsophisticated audience.
And of course, the ending leaves an opening for a sequel which, if one is
produced, should go directly to video or the Disney Channel, where such
low-fare offerings can be switched off with the pressing of a button.
 My Favorite Martian is an black eye for the Disney studio. It is a movie
that should make a warp speed jump to the video shelves.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
 Forces of Nature (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Ben Affleck and Sandra
Bullock.
 Sometimes we film critics can be a bit too smart for our own good.
 We watch a few minutes of a movie, size up the characters and situations
and automatically assume we know what's going to transpire.
 But then something strange and frightening happens, something that makes
going to the movies worthwhile - the filmmaker surprises us. He pulls the
cinematic rug out from under our feet and sends us sprawling on our
collective behinds.
 Thus it is with "Forces of Nature," a comedy-road picture starring Ben
Affleck and Sandra Bullock.
 He's the straight-arrow guy with the dull job - writing blurbs for book
covers.
 She's the free spirit who has held every kind of job except rodeo clown.
 They meet cute - he rescues her after their plane skids off the runway
during takeoff.
 And they are forced to take a long journey together even though they are
incompatable opposites.
 With all that, you literally connect the dots to the conclusion.
Or can you?
 Screenwriter Marc Lawrence and director Bronwen Hughes lead you down that
garden path - with a few bumps - and then ...
 Well, no more. You're going to have to see "Forces of Nature" to find out
the rest.
 True, the characters are cliched and predictable, the situations familiar.
You know what is going to happen 10 minutes before it does.
 The acting is simply by-the-numbers, for-the-paycheck. They don't seem to
be putting any effort into trying to breathe any credibility into their
characters.
 Plus there's no chemistry. Affleck and Bullock merely seem to be spouting
lines at each other.  Both  have done better.
 So, do yourself a favor. See the first 10 minutes of "Forces of Nature,"
then hang around the lobby for about an hour and a few minutes. Return to
see the last 10 minutes, go home and be satisfied.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for You Can Count on Me (2000)

 You Can Count on Me (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Laura Linney,
Mark Ruffalo, Rory Culkin, Matthew Broderick and Jon Tenney. Written and
directed by Ken Lonergan. Rated R.
 Absolutes, it seems, only exist in the movies ó and thatís because
audiences require a closure of some sort.
 That is what makes You Can Count on Me so unusual. It is a movie that
deals with life issues and in a manner that mirrors reality ó sloppy,
flawed and inconclusive.
 Sammy (Laura Linney) has been on her own since her parents were killed
in a traffic accident.
 As the film opens, Sammy is the lending officer at a small-town bank
branch. She is a single mom with an 8-year-old son, Rudy (Rory Culkin).
 Her younger brother, Terry (Mark Ruffalo), is a drifter and a screw-up.
In need of money, he abandons his girlfriend and drops in on his big
sister.
 And the family dynamics begin. Sammy mothers Terry, brow beating him
for not keeping in touch. He finally admits that he served a few months
in a Florida jail because of his involvement in a barroom fight.
 Sammy, meanwhile, has a lot on her plate. She is dating Bob (Jon
Tenney) whom she may ó or may not ó love, and she is coping with a fussy
new bank manager, Brian (Matthew Broderick), who at their first meeting,
refuses to allow her to leave ó as is her custom ó from 3:15 to 3:30 so
she can pick up her son at the bus stop and drop him off at the baby
sitter.
 Terry, meanwhile, decides to extend his visit after he discovers his
girlfriend tried to commit suicide. Terry takes this opportunity to get
closer to his nephew.
 Written and directed by Ken Lonergan, You Can Count on Me rivets your
attention not only because of the top-rate performances by all involved
ó especially Linney and Ruffalo ó but because we each can recognize some
of ourselves in the interaction between the two: The long-held
resentments, the fear of disapproval the self-doubts about a course of
action.
 On a whim, it seems, Sammy begins an affair with the married Brian.
Linney superbly displays Sammy's mixed emotions as she goes through a
grab-bag of feelings ó from exhilaration to guilt ó after one tryst with
her boss.
 Ruffaloís Terry is really a good-hearted soul who just cannot do the
right thing. He means no harm. Rather, he's merely a bit naive and even
a bit idealistic.
 When Rudy asks Terry about his father, the latter ó without consulting
Sammy ó drives Rudy to the trailer where his father lives. There, the
boy is rejected and denied, an action that so infuriates Terry that he
gets into another fight and again winds up in trouble ó not only with
the law ó but with Sammy.
 Ruffalo plays Terry as a wounded animal, but one that has been mentally
abused. It is a performance that garners sympathy and ultimately
respect.
 Broderick is clever in his supporting role as the anal boss who cannot
understand why people continually question his authority or his
decisions. Broderick, a childhood friend of Lonerganís, takes what could
have been a one-dimensional  buffoon and transforms him into a comical
individual whom you can laugh at and recognize from your own workplace.
 You Can Count on Me ends as it begins, with life going on and nothing
really getting resolved. Terry leaves to see how his former girlfriend
in faring, while Sammy merely drives back to the bank for another day of
work.
 Even this description is inadequate to explain the emotional resonance
that rings through You Can Count on Me. Itís a movie that doesn't tackle
any big issues or even make any profound statements. It is merely a look
at some regular people making the best of their situations from day to
day.
 And, just like us, for them some days are better than others. And if
you want a better day, I strongly recommend you take the time to see You
Can Count on Me.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Other reviews by Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http:.//www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Duets (2000)
Duets (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Gwyneth Paltrow, Paul Giamatti,
Andre Braugher, Huey Lewis, Scott Speedman, Maria Bello and Angie
Dickinson. Written by John Byrum. Directed by Bruce Paltrow. Rated R.
 When the performers are on stage, "Duets" soars. But when this uneven
movie follows its performers offstage it is transformed into a
discordant, cliched, mess.
 This episodic comedy-drama lacks direction and cohesion as it follows
three plotlines that converge on the stage in Omaha, Neb., for the
$5,000 Grand Prize Karaoke Contest.
 The most intriguing story involves Todd Woods (Paul Giamatti), a driven
salesman who suffers a meltdown while chasing the American Dream, who
chucks it all to go on stage and sing, and his connection with Reggie
Kane (Andre Braugher), an ex-con with the voice of an angel who is
unwilling to follow society's rules.
 When these two performers are on screen - and on stage - "Duets" is
magical.
 Unfortunately, the film's other stories are weak sisters. One involves
a Karaoke hustler (Huey Lewis) who is saddled with the daughter he
hasn't seen in years. She's a Las Vegas showgirl (Gwyneth Paltrow) who
wants only to belong to a family.
 The other story involves Suzi Loomis (Maria Bello), an earthy waitress
who sees winning the contest as a stepping stone to a musical career and
is willing to do anything to attain her goal. She hooks up with an
idealistic cab driver, Billy (Scott Speedman), whom she convinces to
drive her to Omaha.
 Unfortunately, director Bruce Paltrow (Gwyneth's father) cannot get
screenwriter John Byrum's script to gel. It is fragmented and jagged,
never coalescing into one coherent story.
 Plus the mixture of schmaltz, drama and comedy never comfortably
adhere.
 Gwyneth Paltrow's character, Liv, is very unfocused and ill-defined.
She acts like a naive, almost simple, child, chasing dad Ricky Dean
(Lewis) around like a hurt puppy.
 Bello's Loomis is too self-centered to care about, while Speedman's
Billy is too idealistic to be believed.
 And while Giamatti's Woods is a bit over the top, he is the one
character you can root for and make an emotional connection with. You
feel his pain and disillusionment.
 Braugher's character, while interesting, seems a bit too sketchy and
his ultimate sacrifice seems more a plot contrivance.
 But the movie's best moments are the ones involving the music. When
these characters are on stage - whether singing themselves or via voice
doubles - "Duets" shows signs of greatness.
 If you like good music, "Duets" is a movie you should see, despite its
many flaws and shortcomings.
 It is too bad that the care and attention lavished on the musical
numbers could not be transferred to the other parts of the film.
 Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net.
Reviews by Bob Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
 Reindeer Games (2000) 1/2 star out of 4. Starring Ben Affleck, Charlize
Theron and Gary Sinese. Directed by John Frankenheimer
 Take my word for it, you don't want to play in any of these "Reindeer
Games."
 This convoluted heist caper is turgid, stupid and preposterous, an
embarrassment for director John Frankenheimer, a man whose distinguished
career has included such classics as "The Manchurian Candidate," "Seven
Days in May" and "Seconds."
 The main problem with "Reindeer Games" is the illogical complexity of
what is basically a simple robbery. Plus the actions of the characters
seem dictated more by script necessities than by what could be
considered normal - or even abnormal - human behavior.
 The basic story involves Rudy (Ben Affleck), a car thief who, when
released from prison, masquerades as his slain cellmate Nick (James
Frain), because he has fallen in love with Ashley (Charlize Theron),
Nick's prison pen pal, who promised to meet him upon his release.
 Rudy and Ashley's brief romantic interlude is violently cut short by
Gabriel (Gary Sinese), Ashley's brother, who wants Rudy - whom he
believes is Nick - to help him and his gang rob a Michigan casino at
which Nick once worked as a security guard.
 Of course, no one believes Rudy when he tells them he is not Nick,
despite his complete ignorance about the casino and its workings.
 Gabriel and his cohorts are the gang that couldn't shoot straight. They
are long-distance truckers who run guns on the side. And they all have
unusual names such as Merlin, Pug and Jumpy. Gabriel's nickname is
Monster, so of course he acts like one.
 As "Reindeer Games" progresses, we are treated to a series of double
identities, double crosses, botched set-ups, lots of gunfire and more
twists than a Chubby Checker dance marathon.
 Now all of this sounds like it should be an exciting outing. But, for
some reason, there is too much talk, too much exposition and "Reindeer
Games" just drags and sputters on and on.
 The characters are so cartoonish, so unbelievable - and act so dumb
that one wonders how they could rob a 7-Eleven, let alone a casino.
 Affleck has no chance to stretch his acting chops. In fact, he goes
through the movie merely posing, acting the leading man, instead of the
paroled convict.
 Sinese, who is usually a performer of exceptional quality, made a bad
career decision with this flick. His Gabriel merely rants and raves, and
he is supposed to be the brains of the outfit.
 Theron looks pretty and works hard at acting the seductress, but she
lacks that Barbara Stanwyck-"Double Indemnity" hard edge needed for her
character.
Frankenheimer merely lets his scenes drag on. Judicious editing -
cutting "Reindeer Games" from its nearly two hours to about 90 minutes -
may have improved the overall pacing, but it is doubtful it would have
salvaged this mediocre misfire.
 "Reindeer Games" is no fun at all. It is a slow, dim-witted excuse for
sex, gunfire and a Ben Affleck butt shot. And even that's not reason
enough to spend your money.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
 It used to be that not just anyone could become a vampire.
 Usually, you had to be an aristocrat - a count such as Dracula or Karnstein.
 To qualify, you'd have to have a modicum of sophistication, so you'd at
least look cool - or suave - when biting into some young damsel's throat.
 But today, in our overly politically correct world, any scuzzy-looking,
long-haired, unshaven lout or any spiked-haired harridans can put the bite
on you.
 By the same token, to be a vampire hunter, one had to have some sort of
medical training and knowledge of the occult or maybe perhaps be some sort
of professional soldier, or at least one who retired with honors.
 Not in these times. All you need are some sharp weapons, some bullets
forged from silver and any yahoo can be a Buffy - or a Blade.
 Without sounding elitist, the fear of vampires has greatly diminished
because of this lack of exclusivity.
 Which brings us to Blade, the latest in a long line of vampire movies in
which, it seems, half the population is putting the bite on the other half.
 Not only are there thousands of vampires, but they seem to move from city
to city, pay off police departments and, most importantly, establish their
own exclusive after-hours raves in which the highlight is the sprinkler
system going off and dousing all the occupants in a blood shower. With all
that blood, you wonder why they have to hunt for victims. You also wonder
when they get the time to get their clothes dry-cleaned and why no cleaner
ever complains about all the bloodstains.
 Blade, which is based on a Marvel comic book character, is, like a comic
book, all visual. The plot is basically Blade repetitiously slashing his
way through the vampire army seeking their leader, Deacon Frost.
 It's all hokum and nonsense, of course. But the filmmakers play it straight.
 Unfortunately, at least at the advance screening I attended, the audience
didn't see it that way and laughed through much of the proceedings.
 You know a movie is in trouble when the scenes of blood and gore that
should elicit screams of fright instead evoke peels of laughter.
 Another tell-tale sign is when the audience seems to be admiring the
hero's costume more than the hero.
 Also it seems it's not enough for today's vampire merely to have fangs. He
must also be proficient in the martial arts. Why a supernatural being, one
of the undead, needs such skills is beyond me. (Of course, this concept
dates to the 1974 Hammer Films-Run Run Shaw production of Legend of the
Seven Golden Vampires, in which Dracula is defeated by seven
karate-chopping siblings.)
 Wesley Snipes is buff as Blade. He growls his lines -the few he has - and
spends most of the time glowering - as if he was suffering from indigestion
or having second thoughts about starring in and co-producing this turkey.
 Blade is just another example of how the vampire film, a once honorable
member of the horror family, has gone downhill. This dud mostly makes you
yearn for those quaint old days when Christopher Lee could be stopped just
by dangling a crucifix in his face.
 Today's vampires lack the panache, the style of a Bela Lugosi or a
Christopher Lee. They are not even worthy enough to carry those great
bloodsuckers' capes. They are more farcical than frightful.
 This whole enterprise is one dull Blade that could have used lots of
sharpening.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Exorcist, The (1973)
The Exorcist (1973, 2000-reissue) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Ellen
Burstyn, Linda Blair, Jason MIller, Max Von Sydow and Lee J. Cobb.
Written by William Peter Blatty. Directed by William Friedkin. Rated R.
 Time has not been kind to "The Exorcist."
 What was controversial and stomach churning back in 1973 seems almost
quaint today.
 "The Exorcist" still packs a wallop, but it has been blunted because
over the past 27 years our senses have been assailed with images much
more horrifying - both on and off the screen - that our systems we have
been dulled to the point of numbness.
 It is ironic that the most uncomfortable scenes in "The Exorcist" have
nothing to do with demonic possession; rather, they are the sequences
set in the hospital where poor little Regan (Linda Blair) is put through
various painful medical procedures to try to determine what is causing
her spells and outbursts.
 Nor does the addition of new scenes help the movie; it only makes it
longer.
 As a brash young reporter in Springfield, Ohio, I reviewed "The
Exorcist" upon its initial release. I said then that the movie was
overhyped, that it was nothing more than an overblown horror film. For
my trouble, the irate local theater owner tried to get me banned from
his movie houses. Not likely.
 More than a quarter-century later, I still stand by that first
impression.
 "The Exorcist" is a nerve jangler, to be sure, but it is neither the
first nor last word in horror films. I still would rate such films as
"Halloween" and the original "Alien" as much scarier outings than
William Friedkin's frightfest.
 "The Exorcist" offers many fine performances, including Ellen Burstyn,
Jason Miller and especially young Blair.
Friedkin's direction is crisp and keeps the audience at seat's edge.
 But, unfortunately, the movie does seem dated. The jumping bed, the
pea-soup vomit, Regan's spinning head, today look like what they are -
movie trickery.
 "The Exorcist" still is potent in some scenes, but overall the magic
and mystery are gone.
 Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net.
Reviews by Bob Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
 X-Men (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Patrick Stewart, Hugh Jackman,
Ian McKellen, Famke Janssen, James Marsden, Halle Berry, Anna Paquin,
Tyler Mane, Ray Park, Rebecca Romijn-Stamos and Bruce Davison. Directed
by Bryan Singer. Story by Tom DeSanto and Singer. Screenplay by David
Hayter. Music by Michael Kamen. Rated PG-13.
 The X-Men are not your normal kind of super heroes.
 No, not because they are mutants. In a sense all comic book heroes who
possess one extraordinary power or another is a mutant.
 It's because these men and women are like us; they have issues, they
squabble and sometimes get on each other's nerves.
 And that is one of the charms of "X-Men," the long-anticipated movie
adaptation of one of Marvel Comics most popular franchises.
 "X-Men" is a story of tolerance vs. intolerance, with echoes reaching
back to the Nazis' `final solution.'
  "X-Men" is set in the undefined, not-too-distant future. There is a
growing concern and paranoia in the United States, led by demagogue Sen.
Robert Kelly (Bruce Davison) about the threat from mutants, people who
are freaks of nature, scientific oddities. Kelly is pushing legislation
making it mandatory that these people be registered.
 In the background, quietly opposing Kelly are two camps. One is led by
Professor Charles Xavier (Patrick Stewart), the world's most powerful
telepath, who runs a school for `gifted' students where they are taught
to control their powers and use them for good.
Xavier fights to protect the very people who hate and fear him and his
kind.
 The other faction is run by Erik Lehnsherr, also known as Magneto (Ian
McKellen). His answer is, if you can't lick em, join em. He and his
evil Brotherhood of Mutants, devise a diabolical plan that would force
humanity to accept them.
 Director Bryan Singer ("The Usual Suspects," "Apt Pupil"), who co-wrote
the story with Tom DeSanto, as well as screenwriter David Hayter, have
created a balanced plot that is equal special effects-mutant-vs.-mutant
WWF, knock-down-drag-'em-out battles, coupled with a human element, as
these gifted people learn to cope and accept their strange powers.
 First, a mini-scorecard for those unfamiliar with X-Men, so you can
learn the various players.
 The good guys, those aligned with Professor X, include: Cyclops, whose
eyes emit powerful energy beams; Storm, who can manipulate the weather;
and Jean Gray, a telepath who also has telekinetic powers.
 Joining them are Wolverine, the surly loner with adamantium claws and
amazing healing powers who would rather fight than talk, and Rogue, a
sensitive teen-age girl who can absorb the powers and memories of anyone
she touches.
 Opposing them is Magneto's Brotherhood of Mutants, which includes the
animalistic Sabertooth; the blue-skinned metamorph Mystique and the
far-jumping, tongue-lashing Toad.
 "X-Men" features a wry sense of humor. As the X-Men move out dressed in
their black, all-leather uniforms for their final confrontation with
their foes, Wolverine asks if they really wear these clothes in public.
To which Cyclops replies, `What would you prefer, yellow Spandex?'
 Then there's the throw-away scene at Professor X's school in which we
see a group of youngsters playing basketball. One young lad with super
speed continually passes the ball to himself, making an easy lay-up. An
off-screen voice protests: `Hey, no fair, no superpowers allowed.'
I
 t's moments like these that confirm that Singer and his writers have
gotten it right. There's is one of the best comic book adaptations since
Tim Burton's original "Batman" movie.
 The "X-Men" cast: Stewart is wise, gentle and authoritative as the
fatherly leader of this band of outsiders.
 Hugh Jackman, another Australian hunk in the Russell Crowe mode, is
tenacious, tough and a bit tender as the ferocious Wolverine.
 James Marsden plays Cyclops with a cool nonchalance and a quick sense
of humor.
 Halle Berry is beautiful and tough as the no-nonsense Storm, while the
lovely Famke Janssen displays a firmness, dedication and intelligence as
Jean Gray.
 Oscar-winner Anna Paquin ("The Piano") is vulnerable and
psychologically scarred as the alienated and confused Rogue.
 The movie's one drawback is that the villainous mutants are not as
fully developed as their heroic counterparts. Thus, Tyler Mane mainly
roars and rends as Sabertooth; Rebecca Romjin-Stamos shape shifts as
Mystique, while Ray Park as Toad, gets to cut a wisecrack or two.
 Only Ian McKellen as Magneto is drawn with any depth. His contempt for
humanity is understandable. He does what he feels is necessary not for
any really evil purpose, but as a method of survival.
 "X-Men" will prove to be a hit, opening the door for a sequel or two or
three. Despite my cynicism about sequels, I wouldn't mind watching the
future adventures of these interesting heroes, if the writing is as
intelligent and sharp as this introductory adventure.
 You need not be a comic book aficionado to enjoy "X-Men." It features
great visuals, an appropriate Michael Kamen score, lots of action and -
most of all - very interesting characters.
 "X-Men" creator Stan Lee should be proud. His concept has been
successfully transferred from printed page to big screen with very few
compromises.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloo'm's reviews are posted on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Jurassic Park III (2001)
JURASSIC PARK III (2001) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Sam Neill, William H.
Macy, Tea Leoni, Michael Jeter, Trevor Morgan, John Diehl and Laura Dern.
Written by Peter Buchman, Alexander Payne and Jim Taylor. Directed by John
Johnston. Approx. 96 minutes. Rated PG-13. 
By Bob Bloom 
Journal and Courier, Lafayette, IN.
Four things come to mind while mulling over Jurassic Park III: 
 1. The running time: The film flashes by in about 95 minutes. 
 2. The film is fast: It is mostly non-stop chase and run from beginning to end.
 3. The dinosaurs are phenomenal: The computer generated or mechanical creatures
are so life-like, you can almost buy into the illusion that they are real. 
 4. Universal knows how to milk monster/horror franchises. This is the studio
that took Dracula, Frankentstein, the Mummy, the Wolf Man and their related
brides, sons, ghosts and daughters and ultimately made them straight ghouls for
Abbott and Costello. 
Thankfully, the studio does not sink to that level with Jurassic Park III.
Despite its B-movie trappings, this adventure thriller exhibits some wit and
style. 
And it also is savvy enough to realize its audience. While the movie is brutal,
the violence is neither very graphic nor gratuitous. It may scare the little
ones, but the teen-age audience for which it is aimed will appreciate the
man-eating chomping that runs through the film. 
Back from the original cast is Sam Neill as Dr. Alan Grant, who is lured to Isla
Sorna  the backup island featured in Jurassic Park: The Lost World  under the
pretense of leading an aerial tour for a wealthy adventurer (William H. Macy)
and his wife (Tea Leoni). 
In reality, the couple  who are divorced  are searching for their son who
disappeared with his stepfather while parasailing near the island. However, the
expedition's plane crashes on the island, and the race is on. 
This Joe Johnston-directed feature seems to sprint through most of its plot
points and explanations, leaving many open-ended questions concerning the film's
editing. 
For example, at the outset, the team  which includes veteran character actors
Michael Jeter and John Diehl  hired by Macy's Paul Kirby makes a big display of
showing off a lot of big firepower. But then that arsenal is lost when the plane
goes down and one of the dinosaurs  plays kick-the-can with the ship's hull. 
It feels as if to achieve its running time, a lot of what was shot was left on
the cutting room floor. 
The relationship between Macy's Kirby and his ex-wife, Amanda, also is murky.
Supposedly divorced because he was not a risk-taker and she was, the couple -
though united to search for their lost son - do not display the emotional
turmoil that would normally exist between estranged ex-spouses. 
While the action is first-rate, the character motivation and creation seem
sloppy. Neill's Grant, for example, goes through the film as a grouchy
curmudgeon, scolding everyone to keep quiet so as not to attract the attention
of the behemoths. He constantly corrects his companions about the dinosaurs,
calling them merely amusement park attractions, and not considering them the
real McCoy because they were genetically engineered. 
But most of these complaints are offset by the film's visuals and sly sense of
humor. There's a nod to Disney's Peter Pan, for example, as the stranded humans
are alerted to the approach of a gigantic carnivore by the sound of a cellphone
it swallowed along with the person holding it. (How they retrieve the phone is
one of the film's grosser points that will amuse those enamored by scatological
humor.) 
The party does find the Kirbys' missing son, who has managed to keep himself
alive on the island for two months. This self-sufficient lad (Trevor Morgan)
explains to Grant how he used T-Rex urine to ward off other predators. When
asked by Grant how he got the specimen, the young man says, "You don't want to
know," a line that allows the audience to conjure up all kinds of imaginative
scenario. 
If only the movie itself had risen to that level. 
With the exception of an impressive giant aviary, Jurassic Park III has a rather
claustrophobic affect. It lacks scope and mostly looks as if the entire venture
was filmed on a soundstage. 
Jurassic Park III lacks the awe and spectacle of the original, and that is
mostly because audiences have become jaded and blasé about the special effects
used to create the various animals. 
Otherwise, the movie is an entertaining romp, a no-brainer fun time for dinosaur
aficionados. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Other reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database
site: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 

Title
Review for AntiTrust (2001)

Antitrust (2001)  2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Ryan Phillippe, Rachael
Leigh Cook, Claire Forlani, Tim Robbins, Douglas McFerran and Richard
Roundtree. Written by Howard Franklin. Directed by Peter Howitt.
 Computer geeks take heart. You have been elevated in the cinematic
world to the level of dashing romantic hero, able to perform Bondian
derring-do, while keeping you wind-swept, but somewhat disheveled hair
perfectly coiffed.
 Now you are the savior of the common man, the everyday computer user,
whom you are protecting from the big, bad nefarious computer designers
out to make millions off the latest technology, even if it means
committing murder.
 My, how things have changed. A few years ago men such as Bill Gates
were admired, almost worshipped. They were the good guys who were making
our lives easier through their various innovations.
 Today, they are the villains who rob, steal and kill in order to corner
the software marketplace.
Thus we now have Antitrust in which young hunk Ryan Phillippeís Milo is
a computer genius recruited out of college by a Gates-type named Gary
Winston (Tim Robbins), who needs the young manís expertise to help him
complete an ambitious project ó Synapse.
 And what is Synapse? Merely a program that, using satellites, will link
every computer, TV screen, cell phone and any other electric gizmo and
gadget worldwide.
 The entire affair sounds like silly hokum, and, to be truthful, it is.
But itís also fun, not something to be taken seriously as some dire
warning about the perils of computer technology or even about
monopolies.
 The paranoids in the audience will have a field day with Antitrust.
Every time one of them turns on his or her computer screen, they will
begin looking over their respective shoulders.
 The story, written by Howard Franklin, was inspired, according to
Antitrustís press kit, ěwith the personalities and machinations at the
core of the computer software industry. He was intrigued by the fiercely
competitive search for The Next Big Thing ... and ... the intense power
struggles between huge computer corporations and young geniuses in
garages who can potentially put the big guys out of business with one
great idea.î
 Of course, Franklin merely used a traditional thriller plot
substituting software for the latest deadly weapon or miracle drug. But,
as I said, this is no cursory warning about the evils of the computer
software industry. Itís merely an amusement park ride with various
twists and turns to hold the audienceís attention.
 Antitrust is a smooth, sleek little B-programmer with sharp
performances by Phillippe, Robbins, Rachael Leigh Cook and Claire
Forlani.
 After viewing this movie, the status of computer geeks is moving up. So
guys, better brush up on those social skills, the chicks are going to be
banging down your doors.
 Now, how about a movie in which a small-town film critic saves the
world ... Naw, no one would believe it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. Other
reviews by Bloom can be found at www.jconline.com at golafayette.
 Reviews by Bloom also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)

 Eyes Wide Shut (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Tom Cruise, Nicole 
Kidman and Sydney Pollack. Directed by Stanley Kubrick.
 Eyes Wide Shut is an examination of betrayal.
 Director Stanley Kubrick's final film looks at the consequences of 
marital infidelity.
 He does so by scrutinizing this premise: Is it being unfaithful to your 
spouse if you fantasize about having an affair with another person?
 This is the issue that is raised by William Harford (Tom Cruise) and his 
wife, Alice (Nicole Kidman), who have been married  happily, it seems  
for nine years.
 William is a successful doctor. Alice, who used to manage an art 
gallery, now stays at home and takes care of the couple's daughter.
 After attending a party at the home of their friend, Victor Ziegler 
(director Sydney Pollack), in which two women come on to William and a 
charming gentleman named Sandor Szavost tries to seduce Alice, the 
couple return to their lavish apartment and get on with their lives.
 The next night, as the two are sharing a joint, Alice asks William if he 
was tempted by the women. William says he wasn't because he loves Alice 
and being faithful is one of the tenets of marriage.
 Alice, a bit high, then admits to her husband that a year ago, while on 
vacation, she fantasized about having sex with a naval officer she 
spotted in the hotel at which they were staying.
 William is most upset by this revelation and cannot cope with the fact 
that his wife  even for an instant  contemplated being unfaithful.
 This starts William on a dangerous and self-revealing course that leads 
him through the dark sexual underbelly of New York's elite.
 Kubrick's movie is sexually frank, provocative and disturbing.
 The director, who co-wrote the script with Frederic Raphael, was 
inspired by the 1920s novel Traumnovelle by Arthur Schnitzler. 
 And as in most Kubrick works, the technical aspects of Eyes Wide Shut 
draw you into his world.
 At times he uses his camera like a voyeur, eavesdropping on his actors 
as they discuss the intimate details of their relationship.
 In the scene where Szavost tries to seduce Alice on the dance floor, the 
camera continuously circles the two.
 Kubrick's use of colors, especially yellow in the opening party 
sequence, also helps set the tone of the film.
 The director's use of music also heightens the drama. The discordant 
notes of the minimalist piano piece "Musica Ricerata, II," mixed with 
such divergent tunes as "Baby Did a Bad Bad Thing" by Chris Isaak as 
well as such standards as "I'm in the Mood for Love" and "I Only Have 
Eyes for You," are the exclamation points as Kubrick's story moves 
along.
 Kubrick has never really been known as an actor's director. When you 
think of his films, you think of the "Dawn of Man" or the space station 
sequences from 2001 or Slim Pickens riding the atomic bomb near the 
finale of Dr. Strangelove.
 In Eyes Wide Shut he has encouraged and succeeded in getting Cruise and 
Kidman to bare themselves emotionally.
Cruise, because of his looks, has always been underrated as an actor. But 
time and again, in such films as The Color of Money, Born on the Fourth 
of July and Rain Man, he has proven he is a performer of subtlety and 
depth.
 Here he adds a vulnerability and a sense of uncertainty that makes his 
odyssey all the more desperate and poignant. 
 You feel sorry for William because you know he is not sure what he is 
searching for.
 He also uses Cruise's looks to question his sexuality. In one scene, a 
bunch of New York toughs harass Cruise's 
 William as he is walking down the street, thinking he is gay. In another 
sequence, a gay hotel clerk gives "Bill" some needed information because 
he is infatuated with his looks.
 William can't find his answers if he is not sure of the questions. Is he 
seeking revenge? A few times he comes close to cheating on Alice, but at 
the moment of crossing that line, providence continually intervenes  
whether it be the ringing of a telephone or a knock at the door.
 Kidman, like her husband, also has been somewhat underrated because of 
her beauty. But in films such as To Die For, Flirting and The Portrait 
of a Lady, her dramatic and comedic talents have overshadowed her 
beauty.
 That also is true in Eyes Wide Shut. Kidman opens her self up, allowing 
the audience to see the insecurities and doubts that exist below the 
surface in every marriage.
 Eyes Wide Shut, at two hours and 40 minutes, is a movie that takes 
patience. It is an intimate, interior story, a truly mature and adult 
exercise. It is Kubrick examining an emotional terrain few filmmakers 
have had the courage to tackle.
 And while many may feel the movie is obvious, plodding and a bit dull, 
others will find it riveting, intense and sensual. You can count me in 
the latter group.
 Eyes Wide Shut will not be remembered as Kubrick's finest film, but it 
will be regarded as his most adult venture.
Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He 
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
 You've Got Mail is a timely romance for this impersonal, computer-driven
decade.
 Two people who've never met confide in each other via e-mail without
revealing their true identities.
 Nora Ephron's contemporary update of The Shop Around the Corner retains
the basic plot: Two people who despise each other unwittingly become
enamored with each other through their anonymous correspondence.
 Ephron, who co-wrote the film with her sister, Delia, as well as directed
it, knew what she was doing by reteaming Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan as the
at-odds couple.
 Ryan is Kathleen Kelly, owner of a small children's bookstore, while Hanks
is Joe Fox, who heads up a chain of mega bookstores (think Barnes & Noble).
 Their charm and chemistry are the glue that binds this film, even through
some of the script's rough spots.
 For the Ephrons invested so much effort in their protagonists that they
give short shrift to the talented supporting cast, including Parker Posey,
Greg Kinnear, Jean Stapleton and Steve Zahn.
 Yet no one is really going to complain because the Ephrons know their
audience - and what the paying public wants is Hanks and Ryan.
 And the two are kept busy. One, the other or both are in nearly every scene.
 Hanks has his decent guy routine down pat, yet each time he does it, it
seems effortless, spontaneous and fresh.
 Ryan smoothly moves between spunky and vulnerable, with a sexy touch of
winsomeness added to the brew.
 Their scenes together sparkle, even though they lack the nostalgic
romanticism of Sleepless in Seattle.
 And the shadow of that earlier hit hangs over You've Got Mail like
dried-up mistletoe. The sparks created by the earlier movie are, by
necessity, not evident here. True, these are two people seeking true love,
but You've Got Mail is more comic and less poignant than its predecessor.
 The Ephrons' script is witty and sharp. However, as a director Nora Ephron
is a bit uneven. Some scenes drag, while others, especially when Hanks and
Ryan are revealing their souls via e-mail, are crisp and tidy.
 Also, the script gets sloppy toward the end with characters merely
disappearing from the story.
 A nice, romantic soundtrack adds to this date-night special.
 Overall, You've Got Mail is a lush and cute outing, taking advantage of
the star appeal of its two leads.
 It's a nice holiday movie, one for holding hands and snuggling.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
While The Avengers television series was cheeky, stylish and sexy, its
big-screen descendant is listless, plodding and as steamy as a
brother-sister prom date.
 After seeing this turkey, it's understandable why the studio decided to
keep it under wraps until the last possible moment.
 It's a total misfire. The script is weak, the continuity choppy (probably
from slicing the film from its original two-hour length to about 95
minutes), and the actors seem to lack any concept of how to approach their
characters.
 Ralph Fiennes hasn't a clue to the character of secret agent John Steed.
While he can act the veddy, veddy English gentleman, he lacks that slight
twinkle in the eye, that subtle wink that Patrick Macnee brought to the
role, letting us know that he, too, was in on the joke.
 Uma Thurman works too hard at trying to be sexy, a feat that came almost
nonchalantly to Diana Rigg, the TV show's Mrs. Emma Peel. Unfortunately,
Thurman emits as much heat as a winter solstice.
 The movie's biggest crime, however, is the utter waste of Sean Connery as
deranged villain Sir August De Wynter. It takes an awful script and shoddy
dialogue to make Connery look bad on screen. Can you even remember the last
time Connery was so cinematically embarrassed?
 Basically, The Avengers stinks because director Jeremiah Checnik and
screenwriter Don Macpherson missed the point of the TV series. And because
of that, we all have to suffer.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)

 Message in a Bottle (1999) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Kevin Costner, Robin
Wright Penn, Paul Newman and John Savage.
 Theresa Osborne is a woman with a hole in her life. She is divorced and
devotes her time between her job as a researcher at the Chicago Tribune and
caring for her son, Jason.
 But underneath this seemingly dependable, confident woman is an
unfulfilled soul yearning for that special someone to help her reconnect.
 Sounds like a romance novel, doesn't it?
 Well, Message in a Bottle is a glossy love story, a star-studded date
movie that's not as soapy as it sounds.
 Strong performances, crisp directing and first-rate photography have
meshed to create a compelling story, based on Nicholas Sparks' best-selling
novel, that while a bit long at two hours and 15 minutes, maintains your
involvement with the protagonists.
 While jogging on the beach, Theresa finds a bottle containing a letter.
Her soul reaches out to its author for his words are filled with pain and
regret. The writer has lost his wife, his "true north" and his letter deals
with his sorrow.
 Theresa's boss publishes the letter, which leads to the discovery of a
second and a third. Theresa makes it her mission to find the writer. Her
sleuthing leads her to the Outer Banks of North Carolina and to sailboat
builder Garret Blake (Kevin Costner).
 She convinces the paper to send her to North Carolina, where she contrives
to meet Garret.
 Of course, a romance blooms. But Garret is still grieving for his lost
Catherine. He finds it difficult to extinguish the past, even as his salty
old dad, Dodge (Paul Newman), pushes him to get on with his life.
 The two best aspects of Message in a Bottle are Newman's performance and
the cinematography of the legendary Caleb Deschanel.
 Newman's Dodge is an alcoholic who has given up the bottle. He limits
himself to two beers a day. Newman adds heft and complexity to Dodge that
surprasses what could have been a one-dimensional, cliched character.
 The sequence is which he confronts Garret, who has brushed him off,
telling him that what Garret does is none of his concern, is one of the
strongest in the film. Newman shows the pain a child's errant word can
cause.
 Deschanel, whose credits include The Right Stuff, The Natural, The Black
Stallion and Fly Away Home, is a master of bringing whatever environment he
is filming into the audience's lap.
 In Message in a Bottle, you feel the spray of the ocean, the power of the
waves, as the wind captures the sails of Garret's boat.
 As Garret, Costner is not afraid to show his character's vulnerability. In
such films as Dancing With Wolves, JFK and even the dreadful Waterworld and
The Postman, Costner has created larger-than-life characters. It is a
relief to see him playing a regular guy with flaws and doubts.
 The only quibble about his performance is that - on land - he seems too
slow, too deliberate, as if he is allowing his grief to envelop him and
debilitate his natural rhythm. At sea, Costner seems to allow his Garret to
be freer, more spontaneous.
 As Theresa, Robin Wright Penn is radiant and intelligent. She tries to
hide her insecurities behind a carefree nonchalance about what is lacking
in her life.
This is an intimate story and director Luis Mandoki, best known for White
Palace and When a Man Loves a Woman, intersperses the love story with many
closeups, especially of Wright Penn's eyes.
 Mandoki also is adept at using silence to forward the story, especially in
a scene in which Costner's Garret and his feuding brother-in-law, Johnny
(John Savage, in a small, but effective, role), resolve their differences.
 Gerald DiPego's script is not perfect. Theresa's co-workers, for example,
come across as types, cliches, rather than full-blown characters. This is
too bad, since Theresa's best friend is portrayed by the titanic-talented
Illeana Douglas. Wasting that great actress's gifts is a high crime.
 Overall, though, Message in a Bottle is an entertaining outing. Your date
may enter the theater with reluctance, but he may exit with a tear in his
eye.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
 House on Haunted Hill (1999) 1 star out of 4. Starring Geoffrey Rush, Taye
Diggs and Peter Gallagher.
Why do filmmakers always feel that by adding color, gore and high-tech
special effects they can improve on old movies?
Case in point, the current dreadful remake of "House on Haunted Hill."
 Up front, I will admit to a prejudice. The William Castle original is one
of my favorite childhood memories. I fondly recall sitting in the theater
watching Vincent Price ham it up on the screen, and listening to others -
but not me, of course - scream when the phony skeleton came flying down
from the rafters.
That was Emergo, Castle's gimmick to lure audiences to the theaters. We all
knew it was phony, but it was fun.
And that is what is missing from this lame remake. As hard as it tries,
it's not fun. The spirit of tongue-in-cheek, winking at the audience has
all but disappeared.
 Oh, star Geoffrey Rush tries hard. Adorned with a pencil-thin mustache and
given the name Stanley Price, he is supposed to be a walking homage to the
great Vincent.
Well, Mr. Rush - Oscar or no Oscar - I knew Vincent Price - having the
privilege of twice interviewing him - and you are no Vincent Price.
This remake starts off promising, with a gruesome prologue that explains
how the house on haunted hill earned its reputation.
>From there we meet the bickering Prices who have as much love for each
other as Jesse Helms and Carol Mosley-Braun.
But once the movie shifts focus to the haunted mansion, it becomes nothing
but a series of chases as the various guests - none of whom are known by
either Price, nor do they know who invited them - merely run, gasp, scream,
shout and die.
The guests - including Taye Diggs and Peter Gallagher - are merely types,
and we really don't give a damn what happens to any of them.
 If you want to have a really good time, forget this insult to William
Castle and rent the original. It's hokey, it's corny, but at least it has a
spark of life.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.

Title
Review for Horse Whisperer, The (1998)

  The Horse Whisperer (1998) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Robert Redford,
Kristen Scott Thomas and Scarlett Johansson.
  All the action in The Horse Whisperer occurs within the first five
minutes of the film: A tragic accident while riding leaves one girl dead,
costs another her leg, and severely injures a prize horse.
 Unfortunately, the movie still has about two hours and 40 minutes to
unspool, and most of that is taken up with picture-postcard scenery, and
long stretches where nothing happens. Nothing, that is, except for a man
staring at a horse, and the maimed and scarred equine staring back.
 But this is no ordinary man. He's Tom Booker, the horse whisperer. He
doesn't help people with horse problems. As he says, he helps horses with
people problems. And this is no ordinary actor portraying this rugged
individualist. It's larger-than-life, face-as-craggy-as-a-Rocky Mountain
Robert Redford.
 The Horse Whisperer is a pretty movie. Redford who also produces and
directs the movie, based on Nicholas Evans' best-seller, must have incurred
a fuel bill running into the hundreds of thousands. Every five minutes it
seems a sequence segues into an airborne view, celebrating the vast
landscape, the great outdoors, the beauty of nature.
 OK, OK, Mr. Redford - environmentalist and conservationist - we get the
idea. Open ranges, crystal-clear water and unpolluted sky, good.
 Only after so many snowy peaks and rolling hills, it becomes tedious and
repetitious.
 Redford the director relies on Redford the superstar to carry the picture.
This is the first time Redford has directed himself and, unfortunately, he
just loves to watch himself do nothing. Of course, he looks sexy - even at
60 - standing in those worn jeans, cowboy hat perched atop his head, even
though he is beginning to show his age, especially in several of his many
close-ups
 The script, adopted by Oscar-winner Eric Roth (Forrest Gump) and Richard
LaGravenese (The Bridges of Madison County) is rife with homespun homilies.
Redford's Booker talks like a cowboy Master Po from the old Kung Fu TV
series rather than a real person. He is a saint, overly patient, infinitely
understanding, and something of a bore. But so are most people who are too
good to be true.
 Kristin Scott Thomas as Annie, the driven magazine editor who drags her
injured daughter and wounded horse to Booker's Montana ranch, is not a very
likable character. She is a bit snobbish, demanding, condescending and
thoughtless. Her transformation to all-American mom seems more plot device
than a natural evolution.
 Only Scarlett Johansson as Grace, the young girl trying to regain her life
and spirit, is believable. She is petulant, sarcastic and rude - an
ordinary teen-ager. But her gradual transformation seems more believable.
 The developing romance between Booker and Annie appears forced. No reason
is given for the supposed estrangement between Annie and her husband,
Robert (a wasted Sam Neill). What could attract this laid-back cowboy
philosopher to this self-absorbed woman is never made clear.
 Redford is usually a no-frills director. Like fellow actor Clint Eastwood,
his style eschews fancy camera angles and tricks. But for The Horse
Whisperer, Redford has become self-indulgent. He takes his time telling his
story. And it seems he has adopted the attitude that since he's Robert
Redford, Icon, his audience will simply follow and accept this because he
has something important to say.
 To paraphrase a legendary show biz adage: If you want to send a message,
call Western Union.
 The Horse Whisperer, like Redford's A River Runs Through It, is a
beautiful movie to watch, thanks to cinematographer Robert Richardson. But
what the movie needs is a film editor who can stand up to its
star-director-producer and convince him to trim about 45 minutes.
 Evans' original story, as well as Redford's pro-Earth campaign, are lost
in unending travelogue-like vistas of distant horizons, majestic mountain
peaks and dazzling sunsets.
  Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
Ind. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
 Spiceworld (1998) 1 star out of 4. Starring the Spice Girls.
 Spice World  tries very hard to be A Hard Day's Night. Unfortunately, it
turns out to be "Blandworld," a movie aimed at the female pre-pubescent
fans of the Spice Girls, a British girls group whose members offer more
attitude than talent.
 Luckily, it is their attitude that salvages this movie. While the Spice
Girls are by no means actresses, their lack of self-consciousness before
the camera gives the film a naturalistic vibrancy.
 As performers the Spice Girls are merely adequate. They strut and pose
rather than dance, and they at least sing on key. Their songs are
unremarkable, and after a while, they all begin to sound alike.
 Despite cameos from Elton John and Elvis Costello, among others, most of
the regular performances are embarassingly hammy.
 It's a shame to see a wonderful actor such as Richard E. Grant, as the
girls' manager, mug his way through the proceedings. Roger Moore, as the
behind-the-scenes Mr. Big, is a travesty.
 More than anything else, Spice World  needs a harder edge. The girls try
too hard to please and to be liked and accepted, unlike the Beatles who, in
A Hard Day's Night, enjoyed thumbing their noses at the establishment.
 A little more seasoning added to the Spice World  recipe, could have made
for a tasty treat instead of a safe, unoriginal extended music video.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
American Psycho (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Christian Bale,
Reese Witherspoon, Jared Leto, Samantha Mathis, Chloe Sevigny and Willem
Dafoe. Directed by Mary Harron. Written by Harron and Guinevere Turner.
 I was uncertain what to expect when the lights dimmed and "American
Psycho" began unreeling.
 But I was pleasantly surprised, no, make that impressed, with Mary
Harron's adaptation of Bret Easton Ellis' notorious novel.
 A bravura performance by Christian Bale as Patrick Bateman, a wealthy
Manhattan stock broker who murders people, is the key to this dark,
disturbing black comedy.
 Yes, I said comedy. For there is no other way to interpret "American
Psycho" other than as a satire about greed, envy and materialism.
 In this respect, "American Psycho" is a first cousin to last year's
"Fight Club," except that the former is set during the heady days of the
Reagan presidency, which inspired young turks such as Bateman to get as
much as they could as quickly as they could.
 The movie contains another parallel with "Fight Club." The line between
what is real and what is illusion is murky.
 The film also brings to mind the disastrous "Bonfire of the Vanities".
There, too, a movie examined a group of self-absorbed individuals who
had forgotten their humanity.
 You first view "American Psycho" as the story of a madman, someone who
indiscriminately kills men and women for no other purpose than he can.
Bateman admits to having no soul, no feelings, so why not kill. `My mask
of sanity is about to slip,' he says at one point during his voice-over
narration.
 However, as you are drawn deeper into Bateman's world you begin to
question whether the killings are literal or figments of his warped
imagination. You never know for sure, and that is the enigma of
"American Psycho."
 Instead of taking the easy road and producing a yuppie-fied "Friday the
13th" slasher flick, Harron has devised a bloody social commentary that
deftly blends wit and gore.
 Be assured, "American Psycho" is not as bloody as the book. Much of the
violence has been toned down, but it remains an intense experience.
 And much of the movie's success can be laid at the feet of Bale, the
former child actor best remembered as the star of Steven Spielberg's
"Empire of the Sun."
 Thank goodness Bale did not lose this role to Leonardo DiCaprio, who
supposedly expressed interest in playing Bateman, but whose asking price
was too high for the producers. While DiCaprio has the acting chops for
the part, he is too soft looking, too baby-faced, to have made a
credible, convincing Bateman.
 Bale's vacant eyes, his taut, hard body, is the perfect personification
of a hedonistic `me-generation' sociopath.
 His matter-of-fact narration as he drones on at the beginning about
what body lotions, shampoos and soaps are best to use perk your interest
in this unusual young man.
 Harron fills the screen with some very comic set pieces. One, timed and
edited like a high-noon showdown, has various young execs whipping out
their business cards to see which one has the most expensive and
tasteful lettering.
 Bateman and his friends are like the living dead. They never seem to
work, just go from one fancy restaurant to another, ordering exotic
meals and drinks simply because they can.
 No one seems to listen to anyone. At one point, talking to some women
who ask him what he does for a living, Bateman says, `murders and
executions.' `Oh, mergers and acquisitions,' the woman replies. This
places the viewer on alert. Did what Bateman say come from his mind or
his mouth? You are left with the ambiguity.
 Underlying all of the proceedings is a sadness and a horror; sadness
for the unfulfilled lives these people adhere to, and horror at their
loss of humanity. They don't interact with each other as much as
verbally spar and practice one-upmanship.
 Beside Bale, the cast includes Reese Witherspoon as his
overly-talkative fiancee. Witherspoon's Evelyn is a bit reminiscent of
her Tracey Flick from "Election," except much more vacuous. Chloe
Sevigny is sweet and caring as Jean, Patrick's mousy secretary.
 Others in the cast include Samantha Mathis and Willem Dafoe.
 "American Psycho" is a surprising film. It will make you laugh, but
uncomfortably, as well as send chills down your spine.
 Harron and her co-screenwriter, Guinevere Turner, may have sanitized
Ellis' novel, but they have not lessened its impact.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
In. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. An associate  member of the Online Film Critics
Society, Bloom's reviews can be found online at
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
 The Bone Collector (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Denzel
Washington, Angelina Jolie, Queen Latifah, Michael Rooker and Luis Guzman.
Directed by Phillip Noyce.
 In "The Bone Collector," the murder mystery is ludicrious, the killer is a
wimp and the finale is preposterous.
 Simple: Denzel Washington and a strong supporting cast.
 Washington plays Lincoln Rhyme, a legendary NYPD forensics expert, now
bed-ridden after a near fatal accident that cost him the use of his arms
and legs.
 Rhyme is a man afraid. His mind works like a precision timepiece, but his
body is failing him. Seizures are growing more violent and any day one
could put him into a permanent vegetative state.
 Rhyme's only wish is to end life on his terms, with dignity.
 But then Rhyme's is given a reason to continue. A series of grisly murders
are being perpetrated by an unknown killer who is leaving cryptic clues at
the crime scenes. The only person who can interpret them is Rhyme.
 The best sequences of "The Bone Collector", directed by Phillip Noyce
("Patriot Games," "Clear and Present Danger") are those set in Rhyme's
apartment where his former forensics team sets up shop to be his arms and
legs.
 Added to this group is Angela Donaghy (Angelina Jolie), a street-smart cop
who comes to Rhyme's attention after she stops a train to prevent it from
rumbling over a crime scene.
 Rhyme believes Donaghy has a natural-born gift for forensics and she
becomes his eyes at the various crime scenes.
 The interplay between Denzel Washington's Rhyme, Jolie's Donaghy and the
various members of the team, most notably character actor Luis Guzman
("Boogie Nights," HBO's "Oz") and Queen Latifah as Rhyme's compassionate
nurse, is the spine of "The Bone Collector."
 Where the movie, based on a best-selling novel by Jeffrey Deaver and
adapted by Jeremy Iacone, is weakest is in dealing with the killings.
 In retrospect they are too intricate, too thorough to have been carried
out by the character finally revealed to be the mad killer. His motivations
are implausible and his final confrontation with Rhyme borders on the
improbable.
 "The Bone Collector" even falls back on the hoariest of cliches, the
villainous explanation. That is when the bad guy has the hero in his
clutches and all he has to do is shoot him. But, no, the villain gloats and
begins giving a long spiel about how smart he is, how he manipulated the
hero and why our hero is reponsible for our killer's murderous rampage.
 Of course, all this does is allow one or more of the hero's compatriots to
arrive on the scene in the nick of time to save him.
 You'd think this device had been used in enough films that the villain
would know better.
 Another inexcusable cliche is the arrogant, self-important, inept police
superior who thinks he is smarter than the hero. Here, he is played by
Michael Rooker, a fine character actor reduced to a shouting, stomping
stereotype.
 Despite these shortcomings, "The Bone Collector" is an enjoyable, albiet
gruesome, excursion. It's a funhouse experience that will offer some goose
bumps.
Washington and Jolie create sparks, and both give potent performances.
 Washington, especially, confined to a bed portrays a man who wants to live
- or die - by his own precepts.
 Just ignore the flimsy finale and savor the first 100 minutes. "The Bone
Collector" won't disappoint.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Hamlet (2000/I)

 Hamlet (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Ethan Hawke, Julia Stiles,
Kyle Maclachlan, Liev Schreiber, Bill Murray and Diana Venora. Based on
the play by William Shakespeare. Adapted and directed by Michael
Almereyda. Rated R.
 To bore or not to bore? That is the question that ruminates through the
latest reincarnation of William Shakespeare's venerable "Hamlet."
 This truncated, contemporary outing features Ethan Hawke as the
melancholy New Yorker, for that is where this latest adaptation has been
relocated. Forget the foreboding battlements of Elsinore, it's now an
upscale Midtown hotel.
 Taking a page from recent Shakespearean ventures - most notably Buz
Luhrmann's "Romeo and Juliet," which transposed the tragic tale of
doomed lovers to contemporary Florida - director Michael Almereyda, who
also adapted the classic - has set his story of murder, foul love and
intrigue in the high-powered corporate world.
 Hamlet, the president and C.E.O. of the Denmark Corp., has died. His
brother, Claudius, not only has taken over the conglomerate, but has
married his sister-in-law, Gertrude. This, of course, doesn't sit well
with young Hamlet. Well, you know the rest.
 While the concept has merit, the execution is flawed. The movie
features several shots of New York landmarks, yet Almereyda doesn't take
advantage of any of them. A few scenes are filmed on Gotham's sidewalks,
but the rest are set either in the hotel or Denmark's corporate
headquarters.
 Unlike, "Macbeth" or "Henry V," Shakespearean plays that can be `opened
up' for film, celluloid "Hamlet's" - ranging from Olivier's 1948 version
to Kenneth Branagh's 1996 treatment - always have stayed close to or
within the confines of Elsinore, giving the tragedy the claustrophobic
atmosphere needed to help accentuate the calamities that lie ahead.
 So, setting the story in New York, one of the most picturesque cities
in the world, appears more as a gimmick than a dramatic device to
benefit the action.
 Indeed, this "Hamlet" is rather flat, disjointed and flabby. Even
though the running time is just a few minutes over two hours, the play
seems to drag - as if everything was unfolding in slow motion.
 Almereyda does create some visually interesting notions. Instead of
staging a play `to catch the conscience of the king,' Hamlet offers a
video presentation of his father's murder. And the director stages the
`to be or not to be' soliloquy in a video store with the monitors
surrounding Hamlet running scenes of death and destruction.
 But the main problem with "Hamlet" is its casting. The title role is
simply beyond Hawke's range. Wearing a snow cap that makes him look like
the twin brother of Billy Bob Thornton from "A Simple Plan, "Hawke
merely sulks and whines.
 True, he is supposed to be a melancholy Dane, but Hamlet is also
supposed to be a man of intellect and action, a schemer who can fake `an
antic disposition,' a man of words who can open his mother's eyes to
point out the errant behavior.
 Hawke's Hamlet is a wuss, which makes it difficult to comprehend,
firstly, why Ophelia can be smitten with such a dolt, and, secondly, why
Claudius can be so concerned about his actions.
 Hawke's Hamlet is too passive, too soft. He lacks the underlying rage
called for in the role.
 Julia Stiles ("Ten Things I Hate About You)" seems out of her depth as
Ophelia. She plays her as a petulant, spoiled teen-ager. Her reading of
the lines is flat and unconvincing.
 Kyle Maclachlan lacks the majesty needed for Claudius and, more
importantly, fails to display the charisma with which he could have so
quickly wooed his sister-in-law.
 Diana Venora as Gertrude shows some passion and lust, and a bit of
insight toward the finale.
 The two best performers are, ironically, Bill Murray as Polonious and
Liev Schreiber as Laertes.
 Murray is comically sly and wise as Claudius' main counselor, while
Schreiber displays the appropriate spirit and rage needed as Hamlet's
main rival.
 Overall, though, this "Hamlet" can be considered a failed experiment.
Setting the play in contemporary times while maintaining Shakespeare
iambic pentameter may have seemed like a novel approach, but somehow it
sounds disconcerting and pretentious.
 It is rather empty. This "Hamlet" lacks spark, fire and, most of all,
majesty. "Hamlet" is a drama that should be larger than life. This
version plays like a Fox network soap opera.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN.. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Bloom's reviews can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Bait (2000)
 BAIT (2000) 1 star out of 4. Starring Jamie Foxx, David Morse, Kimberly
Elise, David Paymer and Doug Hutchison. Story by Jeff Nathanson, Andrew
Scheinman, Adam Scheinman and Tony Gilroy. Screenplay by Scheinman,
Scheinman and Gilroy. Music by Mark Mancina. Directed by Anthony Fuqua.
Rated R.
 "Bait" is one of those annoying movies in which flash and camera tricks
substitute for a lack of substance.
 A derivative piece of work, borrowing liberally from such movies as
"Enemy of the State" and "Blue Streak," "Bait" also suffers from the sin
of indecision. The film can't decide whether it's an action comedy or
action thriller, so it tries to be both - falling flat on either count.
 The movie stars Jamie Foxx, who performed so well in Oliver Stone's
hyper-kinetic "Any Given Sunday." But here Foxx flounders, trying to
magically switch from comical to serious not as he character demands,
but as the script dictates.
 It is not Foxx's fault that he does not succeed. The actor has a screen
presence, which is wasted in pap such as "Bait."
 As a matter of fact, a line in the movie aptly describes his
predictament: "What do you do with bait when you're done with it?"
 In this case, you let it founder in a formulaic script that makes about
as much sense as naming Bob Knight dean of Miss Manners School of
Etiquette.
 What is most preposterous about "Bait" is its plot, which begins with
the heist of $42 million in gold bullion.
 The theft was a two-man job: The mastermind, a computer genius,
escapes; the second man - who conveniently has a weak heart - dies
before he can tell the feds where he hid the loot.
 So the only way to retrieve the gold is to use Foxx's Alvin Sanders as
bait. And why Sanders?
 Because he spent about eight hours in a holding cell with Mr. Bad
Ticker, so the feds think he may have been told where the gold was
stashed.
 So to find the $42 mil, the government spends about $200 million on
newly developed surveillence equipment, including installing a device in
Sander's jaw. (This was done by having him beaten in prison so he would
need surgery).
 Not only is Sanders bugged, but helicopters fly all over the place,
seemingly following him wherever he goes, and two or three unmakred vans
- also filled with snoop gadgets - are constantly trailing him.
 Only the U.S. government would authorize the spending of hundreds of
millions to find a measly $42 million. Come to think of it, that's the
most plausible aspect of this nonsense.
 "Bait "is MTV filmmaking: a lot of quick cuts making it hard to discern
who's doing what to whom; loud music that tries to pump up the action;
and big, loud explosions, which look like a fireworks display gone mad.
 And it is riddled with cliches: the soft-spoken psychopath,
computer-nerd (Doug Hutchison); the tough-talking and acting fed (an
overwrought David Morse) who's as obsessed as "Les Miz's" Javert to
capture the criminal and recover the gold; the car chase in which 150
vehicles are smashed, but no accident reports get filed. You get the
idea.
 Wasted in this entire outing is the lovely Kimberly Elise, who was so
wonderful in "Beloved." Here she plays Alvin's girlfriend. She's an
intelligent, self-sufficient woman, which makes it hard to comprehend
what she sees in Alvin.
 "Bait" is nothing special. At a bit over two hours, it is at least a
half-hour too long. The movie is just an excuse to nosh on popcorn. Try
not to let this movie hook you.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
 Arlington Road is a most uneven thriller, made more uneven by the nearly 
embarrassing performance of Jeff Bridges, who is forced to act so 
overwrought and paranoid that his character becomes nearly cartoonish.
 The story revolves around an issue that strikes close to home  domestic 
terrorism.
 Bridges plays Michael Faraday, who teaches a course on terrorism at 
George Washington University. A few years earlier, his wife, an FBI 
agent, was killed during a botched raid on a supposed right-wing 
enclave.
 Faraday is still in mourning. He is a man consumed with pain and rage. 
He also has trouble trying to reconnect with his 9-year-old son.
 His new neighbors, the Langs, who recently moved in across the street, 
become friendly with Faraday. The Langs have a young son, and he and 
Faraday's boy become the best of friends.
 But eventually Faraday begins to suspect that Oliver Lang is not who he 
says he is. His investigation, consumed by paranoia, leads him down a 
dangerous and deadly path.
 As directed by Mark Pellington, a veteran of music videos, Arlington 
Road is a frustrating endeavor. Pellington seems more content to play 
with his camera  using whatever odd angles he can devise  to create 
Faraday's nightmarish world.
 It becomes more of a distraction than a dramatic device.
 And Pellington fails to rein in Bridges' over-the-top reading. Bridges 
is one of our best actors, usually able to get under the skin of a 
character. He is best at portraying the average man caught in 
extraordinary situations, such as in Fearless.
 But in Arlington Road, he is all motion  bug-eyed, sweaty and rumpled. 
He seems too unstable, too out of control to be a disciplined college 
professor.
 In contrast, Tim Robbins as Oliver Lang and Joan Cusack and his wife, 
Cheryl, behave normally and underplay their respective roles as the 
couple with a secret.
 Robbins also shows a streak of decency and honor as he protects 
Faraday's son because the professor had saved the life of Lang's son 
after a fireworks accident.
 Cusack is almost June Cleaverish, but with a dark streak that she subtly 
reveals throughout the movie.
 Overall, Arlington Road has some fine sequences, but as a whole, the 
movie is an aggravating experience. The film falls very short of its 
potential.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN.. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Jakob the Liar (1999)
  Jakob the Liar (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Robin Williams, Alan
Arkin, Bob Balaban, Michael Jeter, Armin Mueller-Stahl and Liev Schreiber
 "Jakob the Liar" unfolds like a Sholemcq Aleichem story: Through a
misunderstanding, an unimportant little man suddenly gains stature and
influence that he neither wants nor deserves.
 However, instead of some turn-of-the-century shtetl in Russia, this story
is set in an unnamed Polish city's Jewish ghetto during World War II.
 Jakob (Robin Williams), like everyone else in the ghetto, lives with death
on a daily basis. People are shot at random, put into cattle cars or commit
suicide.
 Jakob only wants to stay alive and away from the Nazis.
 One night, though, near curfew he is accused of trying to escape from the
ghetto and is sent to the office of a Gestapo official.
 There he hears a radio broadcast and sees a map that pinpoints Russian
troop deployments, indicating they are only 400 miles away and closing fast.
 This information bolsters his spirits, and when he is allowed to return to
the ghetto, he determines to spread the information among his friends, thus
giving them hope.
 But, like the story that is passed around the campfire, changing from
person to person until it is barely unrecognizable, the other ghetto
residents come to believe that Jakob has a hidden radio and begin pestering
him for more news on the war's progress.
 Despite his various protestations, no one believes Jakob when he insists
he has no radio. Situations begin to escalate in comic and tragic turns.
People begin treating him with respect and he becomes a reluctant leader in
the community.
 Jakob seems like a role created for Williams. He is funny, yet subdued as
the circumstances demand. His asides and mutterings to himself are pure
Williams, and that is the flaw in his performance. He doesn't come across
as a poor, simple, scared former potato vendor, but as a big-time actor
doing a star turn with an affected Eastern European accent.
 The movie, directed by Peter Kassovitz with a screenplay by Kassovitz and
Didier Decoin, struggles to blend comedy with the horror of the Holocaust,
while also trying to keep an reverent tone concerning that nightmare.
 They succeed partially. Kassovitz is able to convey the casualness of the
brutality and death the Jews were forced to endure. It seems so impersonal
that it lacks any emotional resonance or shock.
 Despite a strong cast, including Alan Arkin, Bob Balaban, Michael Jeter,
Armin Mueller-Stahl and Liev Schreiber, Jakob the Liar feels cold and
impersonal. The performances by all concerned are good, but a spark,
something to ignite the audience's emotions, is lacking.
 "Jakob the Liar," unlike "Life Is Beautiful" - to which it will be
compared mostly - and "Schindler's List," fails to touch  our hearts and
souls concerning the plight of these unfortunate people persecuted simply
because they are Jewish.
 Like the film's setting, "Jakob the Liar" is cold and gray. It neither
inspires nor shocks. It just sits like a cold, day-old potato pancake.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. He can be reached
by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
 Anna and the King (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Jodie Foster and
Chow Yun-Fat. Directed by Andy Tennant.
 The first thing you can discern from reading the credits of "Anna and the
King" is that this will be a politcally correct interpretation of the
oft-told tale about the widowed English schoolteacher and the King of Siam.
 You realize that when you see the film was directed by Andy Tennant, who
put a modernist, feminist spin on the Cinderella story in last year's
delightful "Ever After."
 The second thing you realize about "Anna and the King" is that these are
two people who need to shuck their duds and just hop into bed together.
This movie emits as much sexual tension as two virgins on their wedding
night.
 Then there's the nagging question you ask yourself as you watch "Anna and
the King". Why another remake of a story that - since 1947 - has been
filmed three times - once straight, and twice as the musical, "The King and
I" (the second musical was a dismal animated version released earlier this
year).
 "Anna and the King," taken for what it is, is an entertaining, but
overlong movie. Running nearly 2 1/2 hours, about 30 minutes could have
been saved if Tennant had judiciously edited out all the meaningful and
smoldering glances between Anna (Jodie Foster) and King Mongkut of Siam
(Chow Yun-Fat).
 Yes, we get it, Andy. Unrequited love, the passion that cannot be
consummated because of propriety as well as society's 19th century
conventions concerning the co-mingling of the races.
 So, let's move on with the rest of the story.
 Watching "Anna and the King" is an interesting experience, especially if
you have seen the 1947 version starring Irene Dunne and Rex Harrison. Then,
the notion of British colonialism, the bringing of Western culture and
ideas to less developed parts of the world, was applauded and seen as "the
white man's burden," to quote Kipling.
My, how times have changed. When Anna talks of the British bringing
enlightenment to the rest of the world, her Indian servants merely shakes
their heads at each other.
 Later, Anna castigates the British officials in Siam for initiating the
political intrigues in an attempt to incorporate the country into its
sphere.
 One added subplot concerning a rebellion to overthrow the king adds some
action missing from previous versions of the story.
 As Anna, Foster is prissy, prim, proper and unbelievable. This is a role
that should have been played by an English actress - an Emma Thompson or
Kate Winslett or Emily Watson. Foster seems to be spending a lot of time
concentrating on making sure she maintains her accent.
 Chow Yun-Fat. Ah, there's another story. He can almost make you forget Yul
Brynner. He has an aura of dignity and wisdom as the king. He is not so
childish or overtly funny as Brynner. His is a sly humor mixed with a
knowledge of the world as well as people.
 This is a king with sex appeal, thus making it more understandable while
all his wives love him. This king also is a family man, concerned about all
his sons and daughters, and they reciprocate that love.
 The story is so well known that I don't thin I'm giving anything away by
showing another example of how the story has been redirected to make it
more politically correct.
 In the other versions of the story when the girl Tuptim betrays the king,
she is punished because the king's pride and honor are wounded. Here, the
king is forced to carry out the punishment because Anna interfered, thus he
would lose face with his ministers and people if he acts to pardon the girl.
 It's a subtle difference, but one that does help set the tone of the movie.
 "Anna and the King," which was mostly filmed in Thailand, is very pretty
to watch. Beautiful scenery gives you a new appreciation of that small
nation. But you could have gotten the same from a travelogue.
 Overall, the movie is like vanilla ice cream. It tastes OK but needs some
added ingredients to spice it up.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)

 EDtv (1999) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Matthew McConaughey, Jenna
Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen DeGeneres, Martin Landau, Sally Kirkland and
Elizabeth Hurley.
 Inevitably, someone is going to liken EDtv to The Truman Show.
 But comparisons, in this case, are invalid.
 The only thing these two movies have in common is that both concern
individuals whose life is continually put before the public.
 But while Truman Burbank was the unwitting and unknowing star of his own
life, Ed Pekurny allows his life to be taped and presented uncensored to a
curious and, later, demanding public.
 Ron Howard's EDtv is a comedy about our obsession with fame and celebrity.
Along the way, it skewers our notion of what constitutes these qualities
and how people acquire them.
 Ed (Matthew McConaughey) is a loser. He's a 31-year-old transplanted Texan
working in a San Francisco video store when he is plucked from obscurity by
Cynthia (Ellen DeGeneres), the programming director for True TV, a new
network looking for an audience hook.
 Her idea is to follow around one person for 24 hours a day, seven days a
week, capturing every facet of his life on television.
 Cynthia chooses Ed because he is such a schnook, a good old boy with no
pretenses.
 At first, Ed likes the idea, but when he realizes the price that fame
costs him, his girlfriend and his family, he becomes disillusioned.
 The charm of Howard's film, written by his usual collaborators, Lowell
Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, is in the wonderful performances Howard elicits
from his all-star cast, which also includes Woody Harrelson, Jenna Elfman,
Martin Landau, the great Sally Kirkland, Dennis Hopper, Elizabeth Hurley
and Rob Reiner.
 The essence of screen acting is to perform as if the camera is not there.
To be successful, an actor cannot be self-conscious. A performer must
forget about the camera.
 But in EDtv, the cast has to continually switch emotions, going from
ignoring the camera to the realization that their lives are being shown
live nationwide. In other words, the actors must act self-consciously
during those scenes in which they realize they're being broadcast on video.
 It is not a simple task, yet Howard's cast is most successful at
differentiating between being on-camera and "on camera."
 McConaughey displays a goofy kind of innocence as Ed, even though his part
could have been an unsympathetic one. By not caring or realizing the havoc
his decision would rain on his family and friends, McConaughey's Ed comes
across as a bit of a self-absorbed geek.
 Yet his Ed is so likable, so down to earth, that we forgive his trespass
and root for him.
 Elfman, as Shari, the woman whom 71 percent of the people in a USA Today
poll say is no good for Ed, is wonderful and photogenic.
 Elfman is one of those actresses the camera loves. When she is on the
screen, she grabs a scene and holds it. She has charisma, warmth and sex
appeal.
 Harrelson is funny as Ed's braggart older brother who uses Ed's 15 minutes
of fame to promote his gym concept.
 DeGeneres is sly and witty as the TV programmer who continually manipulates Ed.
Landau almost steals the film as Ed's wise-cracking stepfather, while
Kirkland as his publicity-hungry mom is given little to do.
 Hurley contributes some nice physical comedy as the model who uses Ed as a
publicity ploy.
 The script continually cuts to various groups watching Ed's life unfold.
They are our Greek chorus, commenting on the action. It's a slick device
that keeps the movie moving.
 EDtv is not as vicious a satire as I would have liked. Its swipes at the
media are more jabs and love taps than uppercuts, and its finale seems
contrived.
 Still, it is an enjoyable two hours filled with solid performances and
some genuine laughs.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
 Armageddon (1998) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Bruce Willis, Ben
Affleck, Liv Tyler, Billy Bob Thornton and Steve Buscemi.
 Armageddon is a loud and dumb movie. Be assured that doesn't necessarily
equate into bad.
 On the contrary, Armageddon offers an adrenaline rush of thrills, narrow
escapes and explosions.
 To really enjoy it, though, it's best to leave your brain at the box office.
 Unlike this summer's other end-of-the-Earth disaster flick, Deep Impact,
which at least made an attempt at a modicum of intelligence and scientific
accuracy, Armageddon is pure amusement park fun.
 If the two movies were compared to talk shows, Deep Impact would be Oprah
and Armageddon would be Jerry Springer.
 It's a paradox that the best science fiction films make the audience
believe that their premises, no matter how improbable, could be rooted in
fact.
 To stand out from the rest of the herd, a good science fiction movie must
have a foot - or at least a big toe - in the sea of plausibility.
 Armageddon forgets this precept from the outset.
 As in Deep Impact, a body from deep space - in this case an asteroid about
"the size of Texas" - is on a collision course with Earth.
 The difference, though, is significant. In Deep Impact, the threat was
discovered more than a year before the fatal encounter. In Armageddon,
impact will take place in 18 days.
 Hello! Anyone at Touchstone Pictures or in producer Jerry Bruckheimer's
office ever hear of the Hubble Telescope? You know, that big eye circling
our planet that in the past couple of years has discovered objects billions
and trillions of miles away. And what about all the observatories on Earth,
not to mention all the amateur astronomers who peer at the skies nightly.
Think they would miss something this big?
 Even real events have shown how foolish this concept is. A few months ago, a
scientist panicked the world for a day when he announced the discovery of
an asteroid that he predicted could hit Earth about the year 2038. Luckily,
his calculations were off and the asteroid will merely whiz by at a
neighborly 350,000 miles. So, Armageddon's very foundation is weak.
 In Deep Impact, a joint U.S.-Russian team of astronauts attempt to save
the world by landing on the comet, planting a nuclear device and detonating
it.
 Armageddon uses the same scenario, but instead of professional astronauts,
who does NASA select?
 A motley crew of blue-collar oil drillers, roughnecks, led by
super-driller Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis).
 By now, you may realize that Armageddon has as much in common with science
as The X-Files does with civics.
 So, with less than three weeks before doomsday, NASA trains these guys,
who include Ben Affleck, Will Patton and Steve Buscemi, for space flight.
 Training takes long enough to leave the drill team only about 12 hours to
land on the big rock, drill its 800-foot-deep hole, plant the nuke and fly
away home.
 This isn't science fiction, it's "The Dirty Dozen Saves the Planet."
 Armageddon is a visceral, pulse-pounding, exciting movie, no doubt about
it. And it's all so familiar that you can sit back and just watch, knowing
what will come next.
 The characters are stock. Willis' Harry is the pragmatic, get-the-job done
leader-father figure; Affleck's A.J. is the hot-head,
thinks-he's-smarter-than-anyone, son-Harry-never-had romantic lead.
 Billy Bob Thornton as Truman, the NASA director, is the guy who keeps
reminding everyone of the clock; Liv Tyler is Harry's independent-minded
daughter who's in love with A.J., much to Harry's disapproval; and Buscemi
is Rockhound, the wacky, smart-mouth, wise-cracking genius who has lost a
couple of his marbles.
 So there you have it. The outcome is obvious. During the 144-minute
running time, you don't need a scorecard to figure out who survives and who
doesn't.
 Armageddon features some dynamite special effects, but on the whole, it's
an empty, almost cynical movie in the way it manipulates its audience.
 It's also rather jingoistic. The rest of the world merely watches and
prays, leaving it up to the good, old U.S.A. to save the planet.
 That seems like the most improbable aspect of this seat-of-your-pants fantasy.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)

 The Beach (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Leonardo DiCaprio, Virginie
Ledoyen, Guillaume Canet, Tilda Swinton and Robert Carlyle. Directed by
Danny Boyle.
 "The Beach" is an appealing movie. It features lush scenery, plus
attractive young people in skimpy costumes - one of whom is Leonardo
DiCaprio, who just seems drawn to movies that feature water.
 And while "The Beach" may be a treat to the eye, the storyline is
pedestrian.
 Basically it is because the protagonists are self-absorbed,
self-centered and selfish.
DiCaprio plays Richard, a young man at loose ends, who drifts into
Bangkok, Thailand, just looking for kicks. Richard is searching for
something, he's unsure of what it is, but he will know it when he finds
it.
 "The Beach," directed by Danny Boyle, best known for helming
"Trainspotting," yearns to be profound. However, it comes off as merely
pretentious, especially involving sequences in which DiCaprio's Richard
is doing a voice-over narration.
 "The Beach," with a screenplay by John Hodge, based on a novel by Alex
Garland, deals with a group of young expatriates who - dissatisfied with
the world -  gather at a secret island and establish a community of
their own
 But of course the same human frailties these people carried in the
outside world are brought into this self-made Eden.
 It is DiCaprio's performance that saves "The Beach" from being overcome
by its own pomposity. His Richard is a cocky young man who hides his
insecurities behind a facade of coolness and braggadocio.
 DiCaprio always has been a fine actor. He can overcome the limitations
of the most mundane dialogue, i.e. "Titanic," and has a charismatic
screen presence. DiCaprio is one of those actors whom the camera loves.
 Yet he is sometimes undercut by Boyle's affinity for fancy camera
angles and unnecessary long, aerial shots which, I suppose, are there to
remind us of the isolation of the island as well as it's natural beauty.
 Once is enough, but Boyle and cinematographer Darius Khondji use these
types of shots as exclamation points, as if the audience wouldn't get
the message unless they shout it photographically.
 The rest of the cast includes Virginie Ledoyen as Francoise, the young
woman with whom Richard becomes involved; Guillaume Canet as Etienne,
Francoise's companion, who turns out to be the moral center of the
story; Tilda Swinton as Sal, the leader of the unusual community; and,
in basically what amounts to a powerful cameo, Robert Carlyle as Daffy,
the drug-crazed individual who sets the 
plot in motion by giving Richard a secret map to the beach.
 In a compelling way, "The Beach" offers some interesting insights. For
example, the Thai farmers who grow marijuana on the other side of the
island, leave the expatriates alone as long as they keep their locale a
secret.
 When because of Richard's thoughtlessness, a quartet of tourists meet
tragedy, paradise is lost.
 Where "The Beach" goes awry is near the final reels where Richard is
exiled from the community for his transgressions. Here the movie becomes
a overwrought cross between "Lord of the Flies" and "Apocalypse Now."
 "The Beach" is a flawed movie, but it is entertaining. DiCaprio's solid
performance and the beautiful landscapes will be the main draw. Those
seeking more will have to look elsewhere.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Wedding Planner, The (2001)

The Wedding Planner (2001) 1 star out of 4. Starring Jennifer Lopez,
Matthew McConaughey, Bridgette Wilson-Sampras, Justin Chambers, Judy
Greer, Alex Rocco, Joanna Gleason and Charles Kimbrough. Music by Mervyn
Warren. Writtrn by Pamela Falk and Michael Ellis. Directed by Adam
Shankman. Rated PG-13.
 While watching The Wedding Planner, I played a game called ěCount the
Cliches.î
 What are the rules? Simple. Just count characters or situations youíve
seen in countless other movies.
For example in The Wedding Planner we have:
 1. The successful, single career woman who everyone thinks lives a
glamorous life, but who goes home to a drab apartment, fixes a frozen
meal and watches The Antiques Road Show.
 2. The man-crazy, overly perky assistant who sees every single male as
a potential match for her boss.
 3. The meet-cute situation in which he and she come together, their
eyes meet and sparks fly.
 4. The old-world father ó hers ó who sees his daughter as a failure
because sheís still single.
You get the idea.
 The Wedding Planner is a slick little trifle that is insipid,
inoffensive, corny and unoriginal.
 Itís a movie that wastes the talents of Jennifer Lopez and Matthew
McConaughey. It play more like a TV pilot than a feature film. Even the
music gives off a sitcom-like aura. The only thing missing is a laugh
track.
 This film is so predictable that if you canít figure out what is going
to happen 10 minutes before the event, you need a remedial course in
Movie Watching 101.
 Lopez plays Mary Fiore, the always-in-control A-list wedding planner of
San Francisco who makes everyoneís most memorable day perfect and every
brideís dream come true.
 She has just landed the biggest account of her career ó the wedding of
Fran Donnelly (Bridgette Wilson-Sampras), who is the daughter of a famed
Internet tycoon. This prize means she rises to partner in her company.
 But on this fateful day, Mary almost has a near-fatal collision with a
runaway Dumpster. (Like I said, this is sitcom situationland.) She is
rescued at the last minute by Dr. Steve Edison (McConaughey), a
gorgeous-looking pediatrician.
 After a quick checkup at the hospital, Maryís overly-eager assistant
invites Dr. Steve to join the two women that night for a
movie-in-the-park date. Of course when the doc shows up, Maryís
assistant takes a powder, thus allowing the two to share a lovely
evening.
 But, guess what? Fran drops by Maryís office a day or two later to
begin planning her wedding and drags her fiancé along. And you know who
that is?
 No need to go on. The rest of the plot falls into place as neatly as
those big-piece puzzles you buy a pre-schooler.
 The Wedding Planner is a chick flick, and a lame one at that. It offers
nothing original. Even at about 100 minutes the movie seems to drag.
 Lopez has some pleasant moments as the successful Cinderella looking
for her Prince Charming, but McConaughey appears totally bored and seems
to bring nothing to his character. He acts as if itís strictly a
take-the-money-and-run gig for the young heartthrob.
 The Wedding Planner is rated PG-13 for some silly reason, and I canít
fathom why since the movie is so inoffensive and innocuous.
 In the film, one of Maryís talents is predicting how long a marriage
will last by noting the color of the brides maidsí gowns, the types of
flowers selected and the title of the coupleís wedding song.
 Too bad screenwriters Pamela Falk and Michael Ellis, along with
director Adam Shankman, didnít have a Movie Planner advising them on
this project. They may have left it at the altar.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
 Outside Providence (1999) 2 stars out of 4. Stars Shawn Hatosy, Alec
Baldwin and Amy Smart. Written by Peter and Bobby Farrelly and Michael
Corrente. Directed by Corrente
 Now that the Farrelly brothers, Peter and Bobby, have said something about
Mary, they are taking a semi-sentimental turn and tackling father-son
relationships and the maturing process of '70s teen-agers.
 "Outside Providence," based on a novel by Peter Farrelly, is the story of
Timothy Dunphy (Shawn Hatosy), a blue-collar kid from Pawtucket, R.I., who
is on the fast track to nowhere.
 He spends most of his time drinking and smoking pot with his friends. He
has no plans for his future and just lives from one toke to the next.
 But after an accident in which Timothy rams into a parked police cruiser,
his gruff, tough-talking dad (Alec Baldwin) ships him off to a tony prep
school in the hopes that Tim will straighten out his life.
 Instead, Tim finds himself over his head and out of his league socially
and academically.
 It's not until he meets Jane (Amy Smart) that he decides to actually begin
taking school seriously and concentrate on graduating.
 "Outside Providence" is not a side-splitting comedy. It's an uneasy
mixture of sentiment and humor, but the two never seem to mesh.
 Some scenes go nowhere, just stopping, as if the camera ran out of film.
 The film does not seem to have a main focus, switching from subplot to
subplot, while allowing other minor story points to merely disappear.
 For example, Tim's nerdy roommate, Irving, talks a lot about a girl he met
at summer camp who later dumped him. Two scenes between Tim and Irving
revolve around this girl. We even see her picture, as Tim encourages Irving
to call her and try to patch things up.
 But there is no payoff. The entire matter is dropped, and we never know
the outcome.
 The reason for other situations are never fully explained. The animosity,
for example, borne by Mr. Funderburk (Tim Crowe), a school official,
against Tim is never made clear. He seems to be simply a villainous device
to give the movie a protagonist.
 "Outside Providence" has some very good sequences. The scenes between Tim
and his dad ring true. The old man continually rides his son, but not out
of any spite. It is his way of showing affection, of trying to keep Tim on
the right path.
 Hatosy as Tim can't seem to get a grip on his character. Is he just a
slacker, or does he harbor some ambition? He changes depending on the whims
of the script, thus his character seems unfocused and lost.
 The movie suffers from a split personality. It can't decide if it should
be an outright comedy to attract the Mary fans, or a sentimental,
coming-of-age vignette to appease an older audience.
 It tries for both and only partially succeeds, which is too bad. For
buried somewhere in the screenplay by the Farrellys and director Michael
Corrente is the gem of a good movie.
 It is just too bad they did not dig deeper to unearth it.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Title
Review for Shadow of the Vampire (2000)

 Shadow of the Vampire (2000) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John
Malkovich, Willem Dafoe, Catherine McCormack, Eddie Izzard, Cary Elwes
and Udo Kier. Written by Steven Katz. Directed by E. Elias Merhige.
Rated R.
 The conceit of Shadow of the Vampire is intriguing: Legendary German
film director W.R. Murnau hires an actual vampire to star in his
production of Nosferatu, but passes him off to his film company as Max
Schreck, a method actor who lives the role of the evil bloodsucker.
 Writer Steven Katz and director E. Elias Merhige have used the filming
of Murnauís 1922 groundbreaking horror film to examine the obsession of
the artist and the magic of filmmaking.
 Murnau (John Malkovich) is passionate about truth in his movies, and he
has decided to film the most horrific feature ever made.
 Undeterred by the refusal of the rights to Dracula by Bram Stokerís
widow, Murnau carries on, changing the name of his vampire and moving
the setting to Bremen, Germany, instead of London.
 Always the perfectionist, Murnau takes his crew and cast on location to
shoot. There the fun begins as Schreck ó lured into the role by Murnau's
promise that at the end of filming he may dine on the movie's leading
lady ó begins feeding off cast and crew much to Murnauís displeasure.
 It is not the lives he's concerned about, itís the loss of valuable
people he needs to complete his project. Plus Schreck had promised
Murnau he would control his blood lust until the last frame was filmed.
 Malkovich is fun to watch as Murnau. Wide-eyed, obsessive, his focus is
solely on making his movie. When Schreck kills his cameraman, Murnau
berates him for jeopardizing the project. The death of the
cinematographer has put the film behind schedule because Murnau must
take time off to hire a replacement.
 Willem Dafoe gives a tour-de-force performance as Schreck.
Unrecognizable under heavy makeup, Dafoe gives rein to the theatrics one
would expect from a hammy vampire seeking his own brand of immortality.
 Dafoe also manages to bring a bit of humanity to his monster as, in one
scene, he explains to the filmís producer and writer the loneliness of
having lived for centuries. We know he is speaking from the heart, they
applaud his passion for staying in character and method acting.
 Dafoe is flamboyant, comical and mesmerizing as Schreck. He dismisses
Murnauís protests with a casual wave of his hand and continues on his
own course, knowing that Murnau is too maniacal, too hungry for glory to
shut down the production.
Others in the cast include Eddie Izzard as Gustav, the male lead in
Nosferatu who is simultaneously afraid of and in awe of Schreck;
Catherine McCormack as the prime donna leading lady who is the unknowing
object of Schreckís desire; Udo Kier as Murnauís exasperated producer;
and Gary Elwes as the world-weary cinematographer.
 At 93 minutes, Shadow of the Vampire speeds along to its apocalyptic
conclusion. Murnau gets his picture, but at a dear price. As for Schreck
ó well, youíll have to buy a ticket for that answer.
 Shadow of the Vampire is a most entertaining feature, filled with
satire, humor and some horror. The cinematography captures the bleak
landscape of Murnauís tableau, while the black-and-white scenes seen
through Murnauís camera as he films his Nosferatu recreate the stylistic
manner of the original production.
 This is a movie that is a film buffís delight. It is witty, intelligent
and unusual ó a most gratifying experience.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net. Other reviews by Bloom can be found at
www.jconline.com by clicking on golafayette.
 Other reviews by Bloom can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie
Database: http:.//www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Original Kings of Comedy, The (2000)

 The Original Kings of Comedy (2000) 3 stars out of 4. Starring Steve
Harvey, D.L. Hughley, Cedric the Entertainer and Bernie Mac. Directed by
Spike Lee. Rated R.
 "The Original Kings of Comedy "is a raw, funny concert film
spotlighting four of the funniest black comedians on the circuit today -
Steve Harvey, D.L. Hughley, Cedric the Entertainer and Bernie Mac.
 This is an interesting experience, not so much for the four gentlemen
named above, who all are very fine comedians. No, it is more for the
cultural significance of this venture.
 It is interesting to compare this concert film with Richard Pryor's
groundbreaking 1979 `Live in Concert' movie.
 My, how times have changed. The language is still as biting as it was
20-plus years ago. In fact, Bernie Mac delivers an entire riff on the
word `motherf ...,' explaining why black people like to use it so much.
 But the anger of Pryor's time concerning the gap between blacks and
whites  has subsided, replaced by a bemused indulgence as if the
Caucasian race was a beat behind and not quick enough to get the joke.
 That is not to say that this quartet of well-dressed funnymen don't do
a number on the foibles of blacks.
 Harvey, for instance, begins by spoofing the hit film "Titanic,"
ridiculing the concept of the band staying on board and playing until
the ship sinks. Black musicians, he says, would have dropped their
instruments, grabbed the nearest piece of furniture for ballast and dove
in.
 Harvey then berates rap music, explaining his love for the `old school'
- as he calls the sounds of the soul groups of the 60s and 70s. He
doesn't like going to rap concerts because it's too much work, he
explains.
The singers always are barking out orders: clap yo' hands, get on your
feet, feel the groove.
 All poor Harvey wants to do is sit back and enjoy the music.
 This is the tenor of the routines by the talented foursome.
 Watching the comedians interact with the audience brings to mind a
church service. The fervor and love in which the Charlotte, N.C., crowd
embraces these men is akin to a clergyman-congregation relationship.
 Director Spike Lee intercuts several audience reaction shots, and as
you watch, you feel as if he is more interested in the byplay between
performer and customer than in the actual comedic routines.
 And he probably is. After all, Harvey, Hughley, Cedric and Bernie Mac
are not doing anything differently than they've done on various comedy
specials on HBO, Showtime or some other cable network.
 It's not the comedy that is the main focus, but the cultural
phenomenon. The audience inspires the comedians, urging them on,
applauding, shouting encouragement and agreement, recognizing and
laughing at themselves in the various descriptions of black life
spotlighted by the standups.
 Cedric regales the crowd with his explanation of why there isn't a
black president, going on to explain how a black leader would handle a
billion-dollar deficit, and the audience explodes.
 Unfortunately, "The Original Kings of Comedy" will probably have a
limited appeal. I saw it with a mostly black preview audience, who
howled, stomped and clapped, enjoying themselves immensely.
 I would urge others to take a chance. You may surprise yourself and
laugh along with the rest of us.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom
Bring It On (2000) 1 1/2 stars out of 4.. Starring Kirsten Dunst, Eliza
Dushku, Jesse Bradford and Gabrielle Union. Written by Jessica
Bendinger. Directed by Peyton Reed. Rated PG-13.
 Probably the one saving grace of "Bring It On" is its sincerity.
 After all, this is a story about cheerleaders - usually a target of
cinematic ridicule - and their struggles to make it to the national
championships in Orlando, Fla.
 Admittedly, the plot isn't "War and Peace." This is just a silly,
formulaic movie with stock characters who are pretty to ogle.
 The photography is well lit, the film's score is bouncy and the cast
plays it straight. It avoids the pitfalls of tackiness and sexism.
 The story centers around the Rancho Carne High School cheerleading
squad in San Diego. The squad has won the national championship five
consecutive years. Now, under the leadership of newly appointed captain
Torrance Shipman (Kirsten Dunst), the Toros squad will shoot for title
No. 6.
 But Torrence makes a disturbing discovery. The squad's routines had
been stolen from the Clovers, a hip-hop squad from East Compton, by the
Toros' former captain.
 Thus Torrance must create enough confidence in herself and her squad's
abilities to devise all new routines to carry them to the championship.
 Meanwhile Isis (Gabrielle Union), the driven captain of the Clovers,
must concoct a way for her squad to raise money to attend the nationals
so they can gain the recognition they so richly deserve.
 "Bring It On" does have a certain innocent charm to it, despite its
PG-13 rating. The sexual innuendo is limited to the cheerleading
routines.
 The movie's main flaw is that most of the characters, especially the
Toros girls, are types.
 But this is not the fault of the performers, but of writer Jessica
Bendinger.
 Dunst, who made a startling film debut in "Interview With the Vampire,"
and since then has gone on to do fine work in such films as "Little
Women," "Drop Dead Gorgeous" and the made-for-cable drama "Devil's
Arithmetic," is smart, honest and inventive as Torrance.
 the school has no gymnastics program. Dushku, best known for her role
as Faith in WB's "Buffy the Vampire Slayer," plays Torrance's new best
friend who opens her eyes to the Toros' former captain's perfidy.
 Acting honors, though, go to Union as the tough, self-sufficient Isis
who fights to bring her squad to the nationals.
 "Bring It On" is very lightweight fare. Honestly, who takes
cheerleading - or cheerleaders - seriously. The good folks at Universal,
though, in trying to emphasize the importance of cheerleading enclosed a
fact sheet in the press kit that includes a list of famous people who
were cheerleaders. Among the names, Madonna, Kathie Lee Gifford, Donna
Rice, Alicia Silverstone, Meryl Streep, Paula Adbul, Halle Berry and
Sheryl Crow.
 Come on, studio folks. It's only a movie - loud, colorful, but
feathery, with limited appeal for those who believe cheerleading is the
alpha and omega of their existence.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier. in Lafayette,
IN He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)

 Me, Myself & Irene (2000) 2 stars out of 4. Starring Jim Carrey, Renee
Zellweger, Robert Forster, Chris Cooper, Anthony Anderson, Mongo
Brownlee, Jerod Mixon and Michael Bowman. Written by Peter Farrelly &
Mike Cerrone & Bobby Farrelly. Directed by Bobby Farrelly & Peter
Farrelly. Rated R.
 The Farrelly brothers are insidious filmmakers. They force you to laugh
at situations and behavior that in real life you would feel guilty or
ashamed if you had a similar reaction.
 That is the depraved genius of these two irrelevant guys. They appeal
to everyone''s lowest basic instinct. So, you laugh at a man tied to a
tree butt naked with a chicken's head stuck where the sun don't shine.
 Or you laugh at three young black men with genius I.Q.s who talk and
curse as if they came from the meanest inner city ghetto in America. And
it's even funnier when their profanity is in German.
 These are just some of the examples of bad taste that abound in "Me,
Myself & Irene," Jim Carrey's latest outing, and his first with the
Farrellys since "Dumb and Dumber."
 Carrey plays Charlie Baileygates, a 17-year veteran of the Rhode Island
police force. He is a dedicated, nice guy, who lets everyone walk all
over him because he hates confrontation.
 Even when he loses his wife who presented him with three black sons by
the black, midget chauffeur who drove them to their honeymoon cottage,
he maintains his composure and becomes a loving, doting father.
 Carrey also plays Hank Baileygates, Charlie's ultra-aggressive
alter-ego. Hank loves confrontations, talking dirty, smoking and
fighting. He also is as honry as a rooster.
 It seems that Baileygates suffers from Split Personality Disorder.
Now, schizophrenia is not funny. And people who suffer from it, as well
as their friends and relatives, may take offense at "Me, Myself &
Irene."
 And I agree that such a disease is no laughing matter. But as portrayed
by Carrey and written by the Farrellys, with help from Mike Cerrone, no
one can really take Carrey or the way he presents this malady as a
serious look at the illness.
 "Me, Myself & Irene" is just an exercise for more of Carrey's
rubber-faced antics and slapstick physical humor. And the Farrellys
offer Carrey plenty of opportunities for pratfalls as Hank continually
clobbers Charlie.
 The movie's plot, which is only serviceable, has Charlie assigned to
convey an alleged hit-and-run driver from Rhode Island to upstate New
York.
 His prisoner, Irene Walters (Renee Zellweger), was framed and was
running away from her mobster ex-boyfriend.
 Actually, it's not important. What the movie boils down to is an
elongated chase with Charlie/Hank taking turns protecting and wooing
Irene, as well as Charlie/Hank fighting among himself for the young
woman's affections.
 Unfortunately, Zellweger, a very good actress as evidenced by her
performances in "Jerry Maguire" and "One True Thing," seems adrift
basically playing straight woman to Carrey's carrying-ons.
 She seems uncomfortable and unsure how to react to the madness going on
around her. Her performance is tentative and a bit weak.
 The film's true scene-stealers are the three young men who portray
Carrey's grown-up sons: Anthony Anderson as Jamaal, Mongo Brownlee as
Lee Harvey and Jerod Mixon as Shonte Jr. Their interaction as they
profanely debate quantum physics or taunt each other about the
universities that accepted them are priceless.
 Overall, the film's' pacing is a bit uneven and, at nearly two hours,
could have used some tighter editing.
 "Me, Myself & Irene" is strictly low-brow, slip-on-a-banana-peel
comedy. Its purpose is to make you laugh, even if you chide yourself
later for doing so.
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette,IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
bobbloom@iquest.net
 Reviews by Bloom, an associate member of the Online Film Critics
Society, can be found on the Internet Movie Database at:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom

Title
Review for Swordfish (2001)
 Swordfish (2001) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring John Travolta, Hugh Jackman,
Halle Berry, Don Cheadle, Vinnie Jones and Sam Shepard. Written by Skip Woods.
Directed by Dominic Sena. Rated R. 
At the outset of Swordfish, John Travolta's Gabriel Shear is pontificating about
the status of American cinema today. 
Basically, he says, it boils down to a lack of imagination among the majority of
writers. 
How ironic, as Travolta seems to be describing his latest venture. 
Swordfish is loud, violent and amoral. It has the audacity to justify murder and
mayhem in the name of sustaining our way of life. 
And how does Travolta's Gabriel plan to do this? By robbing billions from his
own government and using the funds to out-terrorize terrorists. 
Swordfish is a very cynical movie. It relies on an audience's perception of our
leaders as ineffectual and duplicitous and on terrorists as non-human, faceless
entities not worthy of compassion or consideration. 
The movie's plot is preposterous with enough illogical leaps that if the film
ever slowed down, you'd actually see how ridiculous it all is. This is a
live-action Road Runner cartoon, moving so quickly that it's over before you can
catch your breath to ask any reasonable questions. 
The storyline revolves around super hacker Stanley Jobson (Hugh Jackman),
recruited by Gabriel to crack the government's computer codes so Gabriel can
gather billions for his anti-terrorist campaign. Talk about whacked-out
patriotism. 
My objections to Swordfish are many. The body count is high, but that is
expected in a movie of this sort. It's becoming a bore watching anonymous
soldiers, police officers and government agents blown to bits. 
Another example is the family dynamics between Stanley, his 10-year-old daughter
and his ex-wife. Stanley, though having served time in prison for hacking, is
shown as a loving and caring father, forbidden by his ex to see his little girl.
Audience animosity is immediately created for his former spouse by showing her
as a drinker and smoker who also sometimes stars in her new husband's adult
films. 
Thus when she is found murdered late in the movie, neither Stanley nor his
daughter are allowed any time to grieve. In fact, subconsciously, many in the
audience are probably glad she was killed. 
Then there is the sequence involving one of Gabriel's henchman holding a gun to
the head of Stanley's daughter to coerce the hacker to download the key computer
program for Gabriel. Children as pawns have become a most unwelcome cliché in
recent films. 
There is enough violence in the real world involving children without having to
make them on-screen victims as well. 
Yea, it's only make believe, but that doesn't mean you have to tolerate it. 
Travolta is cool, deadly charming and flamboyant as the near-crazy Gabriel. His
character is reminiscent of his villainous characterizations in Broken Arrow and
Face/Off. 
Jackman looks dour through most of the proceedings. His only moment of any depth
comes when he finally is able to create the worm to get inside the government
database. His sense of joy and accomplishment is one any computer whiz can
appreciate. 
Halle Berry is decorative and lovely as Gabriel's assistant, while Don Cheadle
is given little to do as the head FBI agent hunting Gabriel. 
Swordfish plays like a comic book with a larger-than-life character in Gabriel.
Viewers align themselves with him despite their uncertainty if he is hero or
villain. And maybe that is the movie's underlying flaw: There is no real hero to
speak of, only those doing their upmost to survive. 
And that is not enough. This is one Swordfish that should have been thrown back
in the water. 
Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN. He can
be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at bobbloom@iquest.net.
Bloom's reviews also can be found at www.jconline.com by clicking on
golafayette. 
 Bloom's reviews also can be found on the Web at the Internet Movie Database:
http://www.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Bob+Bloom 
